'Greece and the Soviet Union have reached agreement in Moscow on a joint venture for a 450 mln dlr alumina plant in Greece, government spokesman Yannis Roubatis said.     Roubatis told reporters the Soviet Union agreed to buy the plant\'s entire annual output of 600,000 tonnes of alumina. More details would be given later by Greek Industry Undersecretary George Petsos, who was in Moscow.     The project was due to start in 1986, but problems over plans to sell some alumina to Bulgaria caused delays. The Soviet Union, which was to take 400,000 tonnes, later agreed to take the full production.  \n',alum
'(Alcan Aluminium Ltd) is closing its aluminum smelter in Ludwigshafen, West Germany this June due to high operating costs, an Alcan spokesman said.     The smelter, near Frankfurt, had annual capacity of about 44,000 metric tons but was operating at about half that in January, spokesman Fernand Leclerc said.     Leclerc said Alcan decided it would cost too much to modernize the plant.     He said there is a possibility the company will sell the smelter, which currently employs 320 people, before its scheduled closing.               \n',alum
'Alcan Australia Ltd said it increased the list price of 99.5 pct purity aluminium ingot to 2,050 dlrs a tonne from 1,950 dlrs, effective immediately.  \n',alum
'Alcan Aluminiumwerke GmbH, a subsidiary of Alcan Aluminium Ltd AL.N of Canada, said it plans to close its aluminium smelter in Ludwigshafen at the end of June.     A spokesman said Alcan was closing the smelter, with annual capacity of 44,000 tonnes and 320 employees, because of high electricity costs and the low world market price of aluminium.     Alkan had said earlier this year it would close half the plant\'s capacity but decided to shut down completely when talks with potential cooperation partners failed, the spokesman said. He declined to name the other companies involved in the talks.  \n',alum
'Alcan Aluminium Ltd is closing its aluminum smelter in Ludwigshafen, West Germany this June due to high operating costs, an Alcan spokesman said.     The smelter, near Frankfurt, had annual capacity of about 44,000 tonnes but was operating at about half that in January, spokesman Fernand Leclerc said.     Leclerc said Alcan decided it would cost too much to modernize the plant.     He said there is a possibility the company will sell the smelter, which currently employs 320 people, before its scheduled closing.  \n',alum
'Alcan Aluminium Ltd. in Montreal said it increased yesterday its prices for unalloyed ingot and extrusion billet by two cents a lb, effective with shipments beginning May 1.     The new price for unalloyed ingot is 64.5 cents a lb while the new price for extrusion billet is 72.5 cents a lb.     \"We feel very confident about raising our prices because we see demand over supply as being sustainable for some time,\" said Ian Rugeroni, Alcan\'s president of metal sales and recycling - U.S.A.     Rugeroni said sheet and can bookings for Alcan aluminium were up at a time when the company\'s total 1.1 mln tonne North American smelter system had less than a week\'s supply.     \"We\'re short and we\'re buying,\" he said.     Rugeroni added that Alcan expects the International Primary Aluminum Institute to report a drop in total non-Socialist stocks in February and March. He estimated supply in the latter month will have fallen 100,000 to 150,000 tonnes, based in part on current low inventories of aluminium in Japan and on the London Metal Exchange.  \n',alum
'Alcan Aluminium Ltd said it joined with Carrozzeria Bertone S.P.A. to exhibit Alcan\'s technology in aluminum structured vehicles at Geneva\'s international auto salon.     Alcan said it and Bertone have built several Bertone X1/9 sports cars with structures of adhesively bonded sheet aluminum. It said the bodies were made on presses used for Bertone\'s steel-structured sports cars.     Alcan said two of the cars are currently being tested in Britain by the Motor Industry Research Association.      Alcan said it has developed and tested the aluminum structure technology so that it is suitable for modern auto making methods and plants.     Alcan said the technology, which reduces the weight of a car\'s basic structure by up to 50 pct, can improve handling and performance and reduce fuel consumption for any size car. It said the structures also provide long life without the need for rust protection.     The structure provides the same stiffness and safety as present materials, while continuously bonded seams allow a 65 pct reduction in spot welds, Alcan said.  \n',alum
'Alcoa officials acknowledged the possibility that they may have a position in the off-exchange aluminum options market, but declined specific comment on trade speculation that the company is holding a large outstanding position.     An Alcoa (Aluminum Company of America) source involved in terminal trading for the company said: \"We use all means available to manage our business, so it\'s a possibility we\'re trading options.\"     \"We won\'t go into specifics about what we\'re doing. But when you\'re dealing in un-alloyed ingot, it\'s a commodity business where there are a lot of tools available (for hedging) and Alcoa is using all of those tools,\" said Al Posti, Alcoa\'s manager of corporate news.     Trade sources have said Alcoa is long call options equal to 30,000 to 50,000 tonnes of aluminum due to mature in April and May. However, some New York-based aluminium traders said they believe the size of Alcoa\'s position has been exaggerated.     The possibility that Alcoa may be long call options is one factor indicating that supply tightness may worsen in the second quarter, traders said.     \"If they decide to exercise their right to buy, it would mean really squeezing the market,\" one New York trader said, noting that aluminum stocks on the London Metal Exchange were 90,500 tonnes at the end of last week.  \n',alum
'Aluminium capacity expansion planned for the period after 1990 will be insufficient to supply any acceleration in demand growth, let alone an increase on the scale which seems likely, according to analyst Anthony Bird Associates\' 1987 Aluminium Review.     By 1995 non-socialist world primary capacity will need to be around 18 mln tonnes, whereas on current plans only 15 mln tonnes are scheduled, Bird said.     Bird forecast higher economic growth after 1990 and increased imports by less developed countries.     Aluminium consumption growth is not expected to accelerate by as much as general growth, but non-socialist world consumption is nevertheless forecast to increase sharply from 13.77 mln tonnes in 1990 to 17.25 mln tonnes in 1995, Bird said.     Aluminium companies were slow to adjust to the pace of change after 1973, the review said, and now they have completed this transition they may be in danger of remaining preoccupied with the strategies of retrenchment and survival which have served them well in recent years.     In order to encourage the construction of additional smelters aluminium prices will need to settle at a higher level.     Production costs are likely to rise again in the years ahead as the glut of alumina capacity vanishes and electricity suppliers take a more aggressive line with aluminium companies, according to the review.     At March 1987 prices the three most likely cost-price scenarios call for a long-run aluminium price of between 73 and 89.5 cents a lb, depending on exchange rates, Bird said.     Such a price development is not expected to cause any marked competitive problems for the metal because of the likely rise in commodity prices as a whole and cost pressures in the pipeline for steel and copper.     In the short term, however, the outlook is dull, Bird said, as the world economy has not responded well to the opportunities offered by cheap oil.     Its 1987 consumption forecast of 13.01 mln tonnes is 0.4 pct down on 1986, while production is forecast six pct higher in 1987 at 12.67 mln tonnes.  \n',alum
'Aluminium scrap recovery and usage and output of secondary metal will continue to rise, said Shearson Lehman Brothers in a review of the secondary aluminium market which details cost and demand factors.     Although primary smelting costs have declined generally in recent years, the still substantial energy cost savings offered by secondary smelters will continue to make re-melted material increasingly attractive.     It takes around 15,000 kilowatt hours (kwh) of electricity to produce one tonne of primary aluminium compared with around 550 kwh for one tonne of secondary metal, Shearson said.     On the demand side, developments in automobiles and packaging bode well for secondary aluminium consumption.     Automobile production, although expected to fall this year, is still on an upward trend and will continue to be so for the foreseeable future and, in addition, use of aluminium castings is gaining wider acceptance in the automobile industry, particularly in the U.S.     In packaging, Shearson does not expect aluminium to dominate the beverage can market in any of the other major economies to the extent it does in the U.S., But says there is evidence recycling is on the increase in other countries.     In addition to the cost savings involved, technology advances now enable alloys of higher purity to be produced by the secondary aluminium industry, Shearson said.     There is not likely to be a problem of availability as the U.S. Has a huge scrap reservoir and this is also true of several European countries, albeit on a smaller scale.  \n',alum
'Schweizerische Aluminium AG ALUZ.Z (Alusuisse) plans further drastic cuts in its aluminium smelting capacity and more concentration of higher value-added products, chief executive Hans Jucker said.     Elaborating on plans disclosed in outline last September, company officials said current smelting capacity of 390,000 tonnes a year would be cut to between 250,000 and 260,000 tonnes by 1989 or 1990. They did not say where cuts might be made.     Two years ago, before selling its Ormet Corp subsidiary in the United States to local management and staff, Alusuisse had an annual capacity of 800,000 tonnes.  \n',alum
'Billiton International Metals B.V., the Dutch mining company, has urged Surinam to change policies it says are causing heavy losses on bauxite mining operations there, a company spokesman said.     He tolds that Billiton, a fully-owned Royal Dutch/Shell RD.AS subsidiary, presented the demands to Henk Heidweiler, a top aide to Surinam military leader Desi Bouterse, who visited the Netherlands last week for official talks.     Billiton and Suralco, owned by U.S. Conglomerate Alcoa AA.S, both want devaluation, and lower wages, welfare contributions, taxes on bauxite and energy prices.     The two firms are the biggest private sector employers in Surinam. Billiton also urged Heidweiler to improve the safety of its employees in the campaign against a jungle guerilla group, the spokesman said, adding rebel fighting since July 1986 had depressed production at Billiton and Suralco plants.     High voltage cables from the power plant of Afobakka have been cut, and a bauxite mine at Moengo has been shut, he added.     \"We are already making vast losses in Surinam and you can\'t expect any company to remain operating with losses,\" the spokesman said.  \n',alum
'An unnamed Norwegian firm agreed to buy 100,000 tonnes of alumina a year from a refinery in eastern Orissa state due to start operations in the next 12 months, a Commerce Ministry official tolds.     He said the state-owned National Aluminium Co, which owns the plant, and the state-owned Mineral and Metals Trading Corp signed its first long-term export agreement with the company, but gave no further details.     Of the plant\'s 800,000 tonnes annual capacity, 425,000 will be smelted into 218,000 tonnes of aluminium and the remaining 375,000 will be exported, the official said.  \n',alum
'Japanese primary aluminium imports rose to 98,170 tonnes in February from 91,157 in January and 94,926 a year earlier, the Japan Aluminium Federation said.     This brought total imports in 1986/87, ending March 31, to 1.09 mln tonnes against 1.25 mln a year earlier.     The February total included 19,102 tonnes from the U.S. Against 16,577 in January and 9,933 a year ago, 24,391 from Australia against 19,585 and 21,208, and 12,611 from Indonesia against 5,891 and 16,601.  \n',alum
'Japanese aluminium output fell to 5,298 tonnes in February from 7,472 in January and 14,280 a year earlier, preliminary International Trade and Industry Ministry figures show.     Output fell sharply from a year ago as most aluminium firms stopped smelting in the past year due to cheap imports, industry sources said.     Sales and end-month stocks in tonnes were:             Feb 87   Jan 87   Feb 86     Sales   36,557   38,678   75,687     Stocks  53,248   56,620  127,083  \n',alum
'Owners of two aluminum smelters in Kentucky received temporary relief from higher electric rates after a decision Tuesday by state regulators denying a rate hike to (Big Rivers Electric Corp) of Henderson, Ky.     But the owners of the smelters, (National Southwire Aluminum Co) and Alcan Aluminium Ltd AL, said further viability of the operations would depend in part upon how the rate case is eventually settled.     \"We\'re hoping for no rate increases but we can\'t say for sure. It\'s still possible we\'ll have to close the smelter,\" a National Southwire spokesman said. He said there were other variables to consider in any decision whether to close or continue the smelter, located in Hawesville, about 60 miles west of Louisville.     National Southwire is owned by National Intergroup Inc NII, which holds about 55 pct, and (Southwire Co), which holds the rest, the spokesman said.     A spokesman for Montreal-based Alcan said, \"The decision is 48 pages long and is in legal-ese, so it certainly will be a long time before we can make a decision\" about what it means for the Sebree smelter in Henderson, about 100 miles west of Louisville. \"But we\'re delighted that Big Rivers Electric was denied the requested rate increase.\"     A spokesman for the utility, a cooperative that generates and wholesales electricity to four distributors, said the requested increase was 7.5 mln dlrs a year over 1985 rates.     The Kentucky Public Service Commission, in denying the increase, asked the utility to meet with creditors, which include Manufacturers Hanover Corp MHC and Irving Bank Corp V, and the smelters, to renegotiate a rate plan, the utility spokesman said.     The commission suggested that Big Rivers Electric work out a flexible rate schedule with the smelters that would index their electric costs to the price of aluminum, he said.     \"We have always been amenable to try, as far as we can, to assure that the two aluminum smelters remain viable,\" he said.     No meetings are scheduled and none have been planned between the utility, its creditors and the aluminum plant owners. The commission has set a hearing on the rate issue for July 28.  \n',alum
'The London Metal Exchange (LME) has listed the aluminium brand \"CBA\' produced by Cia Brasileira de Aluminio at its Mairinque, Sao Paulo, plant.     The brand will constitute good delivery from April 1, the LME said.  \n',alum
'The London Metal Exchange\'s, LME, decision to introduce a dollar-denominated aluminium contract, with the Port of Singapore listed as a delivery point, is a positive move, physical traders and LME dealers said.     Earlier this week the LME declared that a 99.70 pct minimum purity aluminium contract would commence trading on June 1, 1987, alongside its long-established sterling-based 99.50 pct contract.     This is the LME\'s first dollar contract and non-European delivery point, and the Board and Committee are looking at Singapore as a delivery point for other contracts.     Trade sources said the LME\'s new contract will conform with existing industry practice, where 99.70 standard re-melt material, priced in dollars, is most commonly traded.     The location of a warehouse in Singapore is also a positive move by the LME, given its ideal location for Australian and Japanese traders, who would be able to place metal on to warrant speedily and relatively inexpensively, they said.     Hedging during the LME ring sessions becomes much simpler with a dollar contract. At present pre-market trading is almost exclusively dollar-based, but currency conversions have to be done during the sterling rings, they added.     LME ring dealers said the new contract would match more closely trade requirements and possibly alleviate some of the recent wide backwardations.     Very little physical business is now done in 99.50 pct purity metal, nearly all of which is produced in Eastern Bloc countries, such as Romania.     The Soviet Union also produces 99.50 pct, but has declined as an exporter recently, they said.     Some dealers said the new 99.70 contract may suffer from liquidity problems initially, as business may continue to centre on the present good ordinary brand (gob) contract, where there are many holders of large short positions on the LME.     But others said the new contract would soon attract trading interest, given that much 99.70 metal has already been attracted to the LME\'s warehouses by backwardations.     The LME also has a much more viable liquidity base for a new contract, compared to the Comex market in New York, where high grade aluminium futures are not particularly active, they said.     Thus, it seems likely that the sterling contract will eventually lose trading interest and volumes will decline. Like standard zinc, which was superseded by a high grade contract, gob aluminium will probably be replaced, although the process in this case may take longer, they added.     Forming a new contract and establishing a Singapore warehouse are constructive moves by the LME but backwardations, which make physical trading difficult, would not totally disappear as a result, the trade sources said.     These premiums for prompt metal have become a semi-permanent feature over the last year, due to increased business and volatility in traded options, and are presently around 50 stg.     Increasingly large granting of option positions has been taking place. When some of these are declared and exercised at the end of the relevant month, physical tightness and squeezes around these dates are commonplace, they said.     Listing Singapore as a delivery point allows Far Eastern operators to deliver aluminium into a LME warehouse instead of having to cover.     But tightness and backwardations are seen continuing, even though the LME\'s new option contracts widen the gap between the declaration and prompt dates.     These will be due on the first and third Wednesday of the month, whereas at present most fall on the 20th and 25th.     Backwardations will remain while operators continue to grant options where potential tonnage to be delivered exceeds aluminium stock levels, an LME option trader said.  \n',alum
'Nippon Light Metal Co Ltd NLGT.T, which has annual capacity of 63,000 tonnes, will continue primary aluminium production at a rate of 35,000 tonnes owing to low domestic and world prices and low water supplies at its hydroelectric power plant, a company official said.     Nippon, which has no plans to restore output to the 48,000 tonnes a year at which it was working until late 1986, will become Japan\'s only smelter.     Ryoka Light Metal Industries Ltd will stop smelting in April owing to high power costs and low prices, and Mitsui Aluminium Co Ltd has said it stopped smelting in February.  \n',alum
'Non-Communist daily average unwrought aluminium production in February was 33,900 tonnes, up 400 tonnes from a downwardly revised 33,500 tonnes in January and compared with 32,900 tonnes in February 1986, provisional figures from the International Primary Aluminium Institute (IPAI) show.     Total production in February (28 days) was 949,000 tonnes compared with a downwardly revised 1.038 mln in January (31 days) and 920,000 in February 1986.     The regional breakdown of unwrought aluminium production was as follows (in thousands of tonnes) the IPAI said.                  Feb\'87   Jan\'87    Feb\'86     Africa           45       50        41     North America   354      389       353     Latin America   115      121        98     East Asia         7        9        16     South Asia       72       79        72     Europe          268      293       256     Oceania          88       97        84  \n',alum
'Noranda Aluminum Inc. said it has increased its primary aluminum prices by two cents a lb, effective with new orders as of March 25 and all shipments beginning May 1.     The new price for unalloyed ingot will be 64.5 cents a lb while the new price for extrusion billet will be 72.5 cents a lb.  \n',alum
'Northwest Aluminum Co said it will open a second pot line in mid-May, bringing the smelter here to 80 pct of its production capacity.     Northwest Aluminum President Brett Wilcox, who leased the 30-year-old smelter from Martin Marietta Corp., said production would increase from around 45 tons a year at present to just over 70 tons.     Martin Marietta closed and mothballed the smelter in 1984. Northwest Aluminum reopened it last December.     Wilcox said a good aluminum market and several months of successful operation led to the decision to expand production.   \n',alum
'Pechiney PUKG.PA said it signed two letters of intent with the Soviet Union covering the setting up of packaging and packaging materials joint ventures.     It said one proposed venture would produce  aluminium packaging for food and cosmetics. The other envisaged Pechiney putting together a consortium of  European partners to set up a packaging and equipment manufacturing unit in the Soviet Union.     A Pechiney spokesman said two working groups would prepare detailed projects over the next three months. He said it was too soon to estimate the financial value of the two ventures.  \n',alum
'Singapore welcomed the London Metal Exchange\'s (LME) decision to list Singapore as a delivery point for the LME\'s new dollar-denominated aluminium contract.     Tay Thiam Peng, manager for international trading at the Trade Development Board, said the decision would boost Singapore\'s image as a major delivery port.     \"We hope this will encourage more metal traders to set up shop here and that Singapore can become a delivery port for other metals as well,\" he said.     The new contract, to start trading on June 1, is LME\'s first dollar-contract.  \n',alum
'The Surinam Aluminum Company (SURALCO) registered a 75 pct drop in alumina exports in February after its operations were shut down by worker violence and guerrilla sabotage, the official Surinam News Agency, SNA, reported.     SNA said Suralco\'s alumina exports dropped to 23,869 tonnes in February from 92,852 tonnes in January. Aluminum exports, meanwhile, decreased nine pct in the same period, to 1,511 tonnes from 1,647 tonnes.     Suralco\'s alumina refinery at Paranam, 18 miles south of the capital, was shut down February 2 after workers destroyed plant and computer equipment in a protest over layoffs at the company\'s nearby aluminum smelter.     The smelter was shut down January 26 after anti-government guerrillas dynamited two electricity towers which transmit power to the plant from the Afobaka dam.     The alumina refinery, owned jointly by Suralco and Billiton NV, a Royal Dutch Shell subsidiary, was reopened March 9. But the smelter remains closed, as do the Suralco mines at Moengo, 60 miles east of Paramaribo, which were closed down by guerrillas last November.  \n',alum
'The 1.4 mln tonnes capacity bauxite refinery at Paranam in Surinam, which closed at the end of January after being sabotaged by anti-government rebels, has now reopened, a spokesman for Dutch metals company Billiton said.     The refinery is run by Suralco, jointly owned by the U.S. Company Alcoa and the Dutch company Billiton, which is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell.     Production of alumina at the refinery is currently running at around 3,000 tonnes a day and is expected to get back to full capacity of 4,000 tonnes within a week, the Billiton spokesman added.     The refinery was forced to close at the end of January when rebels cut the main power line.     Earlier, the refinery had had to import some supplies of bauxite, as rebel activity shut off supplies from Alcoa\'s mine at Moengo in the east of the country.     Billiton\'s mine at Onverdacht, between Paranam and the capital Paramaribo, is still working but Moengo remains closed and the refinery is continuing to import some bauxite, the Billiton spokesman said.  \n',alum
'The U.S.-owned Surinam Aluminum Company (SURALCO) offered workers a lump sum and up to five months\' wages to quit the firm because jungle-based rebels have disrupted bauxite mining and alumina smelting, ANP said.     The Dutch news agency said SURALCO, a subsidiary of the Aluminum Company of America(ALCOA) wanted to reduce its work force because it had been hard hit by guerrilla attacks that cut power lines to the area in January.     All bauxite mining at Moengo ceased four months ago and SURALCO\'s Paranam alumina smelter is using imported bauxite.  \n',alum
'A senior Ivory Coast Agriculture Ministry official confirmed his country\'s backing for a new international cocoa pact and said Ivorian delegates would be present at talks on its buffer stock starting this week.     The official tolds that Ivorian Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon would attend the opening of the talks, convened by the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO), in London on Monday.     While Bra Kanon is due to return home this week for funeral ceremonies for a sister of Ivorian President Felix Houphouet-Boigny, scheduled to be held in the country\'s capital Yamoussoukro between March 19-22, senior Ivorian delegates will be present throughout the London talks, the official said.     Bra Kanon is chairman of the ICCO Council and rumours that he or Ivorian delegates might be delayed because of public mourning in the West African nation helped depress already low world cocoa prices Friday.     The official said Ivory Coast continued to support the new pact, which was agreed in principle last year by most of the world\'s cocoa exporters and consumers.     He also said Bra Kanon would fulfil his duties as ICCO Council chairman during the talks, scheduled to end on March 27.     The meeting aims to set rules for the operation of the pact\'s buffer stock which producers hope will boost a market hit by successive world cocoa surpluses.     Ivory Coast did not participate in the last international cocoa pact and its decision to join the new accord has sparked hopes that it will be more successful in supporting prices.  \n',cocoa
'Showers continued throughout the week in the Bahia cocoa zone, alleviating the drought since early January and improving prospects for the coming temporao, although normal humidity levels have not been restored, Comissaria Smith said in its weekly review.     The dry period means the temporao will be late this year.     Arrivals for the week ended February 22 were 155,221 bags of 60 kilos making a cumulative total for the season of 5.93 mln against 5.81 at the same stage last year. Again it seems that cocoa delivered earlier on consignment was included in the arrivals figures.     Comissaria Smith said there is still some doubt as to how much old crop cocoa is still available as harvesting has practically come to an end. With total Bahia crop estimates around 6.4 mln bags and sales standing at almost 6.2 mln there are a few hundred thousand bags still in the hands of farmers, middlemen, exporters and processors.     There are doubts as to how much of this cocoa would be fit for export as shippers are now experiencing dificulties in obtaining +Bahia superior+ certificates.     In view of the lower quality over recent weeks farmers have sold a good part of their cocoa held on consignment.     Comissaria Smith said spot bean prices rose to 340 to 350 cruzados per arroba of 15 kilos.     Bean shippers were reluctant to offer nearby shipment and only limited sales were booked for March shipment at 1,750 to 1,780 dlrs per tonne to ports to be named.     New crop sales were also light and all to open ports with June/July going at 1,850 and 1,880 dlrs and at 35 and 45 dlrs under New York july, Aug/Sept at 1,870, 1,875 and 1,880 dlrs per tonne FOB.     Routine sales of butter were made. March/April sold at 4,340, 4,345 and 4,350 dlrs.     April/May butter went at 2.27 times New York May, June/July at 4,400 and 4,415 dlrs, Aug/Sept at 4,351 to 4,450 dlrs and at 2.27 and 2.28 times New York Sept and Oct/Dec at 4,480 dlrs and 2.27 times New York Dec, Comissaria Smith said.     Destinations were the U.S., Covertible currency areas, Uruguay and open ports.     Cake sales were registered at 785 to 995 dlrs for March/April, 785 dlrs for May, 753 dlrs for Aug and 0.39 times New York Dec for Oct/Dec.     Buyers were the U.S., Argentina, Uruguay and convertible currency areas.     Liquor sales were limited with March/April selling at 2,325 and 2,380 dlrs, June/July at 2,375 dlrs and at 1.25 times New York July, Aug/Sept at 2,400 dlrs and at 1.25 times New York Sept and Oct/Dec at 1.25 times New York Dec, Comissaria Smith said.     Total Bahia sales are currently estimated at 6.13 mln bags against the 1986/87 crop and 1.06 mln bags against the 1987/88 crop.     Final figures for the period to February 28 are expected to be published by the Brazilian Cocoa Trade Commission after carnival which ends midday on February 27.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) council agreed standard price differentials for different origin cocoas to form part of the buffer stock buying and selling procedure, consumer delegates said.     The buffer stock manager will accept offers for different origin cocoas according to a sliding scale of price differentials, under which Ghana cocoa will be pegged at a 137 stg premium to Malaysian.     Thus, if the buffer stock manager was buying cocoa based on a Malaysian price of 1,200 stg a tonne, he would accept Ghana offers up to 1,337 stg.     Differentials were fixed as follows,  Country       Differential stg/tonne  Malaysia           0  Brazil            55  Ivory Coast       67  Cameroun          77  Nigeria          120  Togo             130  Ghana            137     Nigeria\'s differential is on \"landed weight\" terms. Shipping weight terms will be accepted at a 15 stg discount to this rate.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) moved closer to an agreement on buffer stock rules, with many delegates saying they expect to reach an accord by Friday.     \"Everyone is convinced the buffer stock rules should be in place by Friday so the buffer stock can be put into operation Monday,\" a consumer delegate said. \"The atmosphere is excellent.\"     Other delegates said the buffer stock might not be operational by Monday but could be in place by around April 1, if the rules are agreed by Friday.     A detailed package on how the buffer stock manager will buy and sell cocoa was presented to a buffer stock working group this afternoon -- a big step toward a \"very interesting stage of negotiations,\" delegates said.     The package, based on negotiating principles informally agreed by delegates, has been forged bit by bit during fortnight-long meetings by ICCO Executive Director Kobena Erbynn and a small group of other delegates.     Producers, the European Community (EC) and consumers are scheduled to consider the paper separately and then jointly tomorrow.     Under the proposal, the buffer stock manager would buy cocoa from origins or the second-hand market on an offer system. He would alert the market via news agencies as to when he wanted to buy cocoa and include shipment details and tonnage desired, delegates said.     The manager would buy cocoa on a competitive basis, rather than choosing the cheapest cocoa as before, giving preference to ICCO member-country exporters. Standard price differentials would be fixed for each origin, similar to golf handicaps, to determine the relative competitiveness of offers of various cocoas from different origins, they said.     The differentials could be reviewed at the request of a member country or recommendation of the buffer stock manager, the delegates said. Revision would be decided by a majority vote of the ICCO council.     Buffer stock purchases from non-ICCO member countries would not be allowed to exceed 10 pct of the total buffer stock, they said.     The purchases would be limited to 5,000 tonnes of cocoa per day and 20,000 tonnes per week, and could be bought in nearby, intermediate and forward positions, they added.     One of the underlying ideas of the rules package is \"transparency,\" meaning virtually all the buffer stock manager\'s market activities will be public and he will have as little discretion as possible, delegates said.     After the tin market collapse in 1985, when the International Tin Council buffer stock ran out of funds, cocoa delegates are anxious to install safeguards in the cocoa market mechanism, they said.      Earnest debate on the buffer stock proposal is expected to begin late tomorrow, as delegations feel the pressure of the approaching Friday deadline, when the ICCO meeting is due to adjourn, delegates said.     The ICCO failed to agree buffer stock rules in January when the new International Cocoa Agreement came into force. The existing buffer stock of 100,000 tonnes of cocoa was frozen in place with its bank balance of 250 mln dlrs -- both untouchable until rules are agreed.      Though the current semi-annual council meeting is not the last chance for delegates to cement buffer stock rules, producers are keen to get the wheels of the market-stabilizing mechanism turning to stem the decline in world prices, delegates said.  \n',cocoa
'A final compromise proposal on cocoa buffer stock rules presented by International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, council chairman Denis Bra Kanon is swiftly gaining acceptance by consumer and producer members, delegates said.     \"We are close, nearer than ever to accepting it, but we still have some work to do,\" producer spokesman Mama Mohammed of Ghana tolds after a producers\' meeting.     European Community, EC, delegates said EC consumers accepted the package in a morning meeting and predicted \"no problems\" in getting full consumer acceptance.     Delegates on both sides are keen to come to some agreement today, the last day of the fortnight-long council meeting, they said.     The compromise requires that buffer stock purchases from non-ICCO member countries cannot exceed 15 pct of total buffer stock purchases, delegates said. The non-member cocoa issue has been among the most contentious in the rules negotiations.     The 15 pct figure, up five percentage points from earlier proposals, represents a concession to consumers, delegates said. They have demanded a larger allowance for non-member cocoa in the buffer stock than producers have wanted.     Another problem area, delegates said, was the question of price differentials for different origins of cocoa bought into the buffer stock, by which the buffer stock manager could fairly compare relative prices of different cocoas offered to him.     The compromise narrowed the range of differentials between the origins from what previous proposals had detailed -- a move some delegates described as \"just fiddling.\"     But the adjustments may prove significant enough to appease some countries that were not satisfied with the original proposed differentials assigned to them, delegates said.     The compromise also stated buffer stock purchases on any day would be limited to 40 pct each in nearby, intermediate or forward positions, delegates said.     If the compromise is accepted by the council, most consumers and producers want buffer stock rules to take effect next week, or as soon as practically possible.     The full council is scheduled to meet around 1500 GMT to discuss the compromise, and could agree on it then if all parties are satisfied, they said. Consumers are due to meet before the council.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) buffer stock could face an uphill battle to halt the downtrend in world cocoa prices when it begins buying operations in the next few weeks, cocoa traders said.     Traders said they believed buffer stock purchases could reach 75,000 tonnes in a matter of weeks without lifting prices significantly, given the amount of surplus cocoa overhanging the market. The buffer stock may begin buying shortly as the ICCO 10 day average indicator price is now at 1,578.03 Special Drawing Rights (SDR) per tonne, below the 1,600 \"must buy\" level.     Rules governing buffer stock operations were agreed last month by the ICCO council. Buying will begin once the buffer stock manager has completed preparations, traders said.     Some traders said the buffer stock manager may delay buffer stock buying until mid or end-April when changes in months used to calculate the ICCO indicator may lift the 10 day average above the 1,600 SDR \"must buy\" level.     The ICCO indicator price is calculated from the average of the second, third and fourth positions on the London and New York futures markets. The daily price was 1,577.61 SDR per tonne yesterday.     Months used currently for the indicator are May, July and September, but these are set to change to July, September and December on April 15, prior to May becoming the New York spot month, traders noted.     The introduction of December into the calculations may lift the daily SDR price as December is currently quoted about 75 stg above May on the London terminal market.     But the buffer stock manager would have to wait for the higher daily price to feed through into the 10-day average, the indicator which governs his activities, traders said.     \"The buffer stock manager is obviously looking at the implications of delaying until forward prices lift the indicator since it might mean he has to buy less cocoa,\" an analyst from a leading cocoa trade house said.     Traders said the buffer stock purchases could reach 75,000 tonnes fairly quickly once buying starts. If purchases reach this level within six months, buying is suspended pending an ICCO council review of price ranges. But some cocoa market watchers said the buffer stock may benefit from recent forecasts for a poor Brazilian Bahia temporao crop at 1.5 mln to two mln 60 kilo bags against initial expectations of up to three mln.     A lower than expected Brazilian crop may cut the 1986/87 world surplus to between 50,000 and 70,000 tonnes, compared with a recent forecast by the ICCO statistics committee of 94,000 tonnes, traders said.     In these circumstances, the buffer stock may only need to buy between 20,000 and 30,000 tonnes to lift prices above the \"must buy\" level.     But some dealers said the ICCO buffer stock rules may put constraints on how quickly and effectively the buffer stock manager can remove cocoa from the market.     The buffer stock system of price differentials set according to quality and a 15 pct limit on purchases from non-members could limit the buffer stock\'s scope for action, dealers said.     Most of the cocoa readily available to the buffer stock is nearby in-store material of Malaysian and Ivory Coast origin.     But the buffer stock can only buy 15 pct Malaysian cocoa as Malaysia is not an ICCO member, while purchases of nearby cocoa can only reach 40 pct in any one day, which forces the buffer stock to buy some intermediate and forward shipment material.     Limits on buffer stock purchases of nearby and non-member cocoa will reduce the impact on terminal prices which are pressured by the overhang of Malaysian material, traders said.     Buffer stock purchases of forward shipment cocoa from quality producers such as Ghana will have only a limited impact on futures, but is likely to widen physical market premiums for this cocoa over futures.     Ghana\'s premium to the terminal has risen to about 50 stg from 25 to 30 stg a month ago partly in anticipation of buffer stock buying, dealers said.     \"The buffer stock may not help the terminal market, but will provide a backstop for quality cocoas,\" one trader said.     Traders cautioned that views on the impact of the buffer stock were \"all prognostication\" and that no one could hope to predict accurately what the result would be. Psychologically buffer stock buying should help prices, but since the buffer stock already holds a carryover of 100,000 tonnes from the previous cocoa agreement and the market is in surplus, dealers expressed doubts purchases can counter bearish pressure.     In June the ICCO is due to discuss rules for a withholding scheme as an additional market support mechanism.  \n',cocoa
'The cocoa buffer stock rules just decided by the International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, council will take effect immediately, delegates said.     That means the buffer stock manager is likely to begin buying cocoa within two or three weeks, after organizing communication systems and assessing the market, they said.  \n',cocoa
'International Cocoa Organization\'s, ICCO, council chairman Denis Bra Kanon continued work towards a compromise plan on how the ICCO buffer stock should buy cocoa, consumer delegates said.     Consumer delegates said Bra Kanon had not formally presented the compromise plan to producers and consumers, and it was unlikely he would do so before Friday, they said.     There was widespread confidence a result on the outstanding items could be reached by Friday, when the council session is due to end, consumers said.     Bra Kanon completed bilateral consultations with several delegations today on the main sticking points in the draft buffer stock rules package, they said.     Certain delegations wanted further discussion on the amount of non-member cocoa the buffer stock will be permitted to buy, differentials for different origin cocoas and limits on buffer stock purchases of nearby, and forward material, the delegates said.     The buffer stock working group finalized the remaining buffer stock rules, with only minor modifications to the original draft buffer stock package produced last week, the delegates said.     The ICCO council is due to elect a new executive director when it reconvenes Friday, producer delegates said.     Producers intend to present a single candidate for the post, and this is most likely to be Edouard Kouame from Ivory Coast, they said.     Earlier, the existing executive director, Kobena Erbynn from Ghana, was expected to re-nominated, but he is now likely to withdraw, the delegates said.     The executive committee is due to meet Friday at 1100 GMT, with the council unlikely to reconvene until late Friday, consumers said.  \n',cocoa
'Consumer members of the International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, accepted a final buffer stock rules compromise, \"on the condition that producers also agree,\" consumer spokesman Peter Baron said.     The full council was meeting at 1530 GMT to discuss the compromise, which was put together yesterday by ICCO chairman Denis Bra Kanon.     Consumer delegates said they were optimistic the council could reach agreement on the rules fairly quickly.  \n',cocoa
'Representatives of cocoa consuming countries at an International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, council meeting here have edged closer to a unified stance on buffer stock rules, delegates said.     While consumers do not yet have a common position, an observer said after a consumer meeting, \"They are much more fluid ... and the tone is positive.\"     European Community consumers were split on the question of how the cocoa buffer stock should be operated when the ICCO met in January to put the new International Cocoa Agreement into effect, delegates said.     At the January meeting, France sided with producers on how the buffer stock should operate, delegates said. That meeting ended without agreement on new buffer stock rules.     The EC Commission met in Brussels on Friday to see whether the 12 EC cocoa consuming nations could narrow their differences at this month\'s meeting.     The Commissioners came away from the Friday meeting with an informal agreement to respond to signs of flexibility among producers on the key buffer stock issues, delegates said.     The key issues to be addressed at this council session which divide ICCO members are whether non-member cocoa should be eligible for buffer stock purchases and what price differentials the buffer stock should pay for different types of cocoa, delegates said.     A consumer delegate said producers and consumers should be able to compromise on the non-member cocoa question.     A working group comprising delegates from all producing and consuming member countries met briefly this morning, then broke up into a producer meeting and an EC meeting, followed by a consumer meeting.     Producers, who are in favour of the buffer stock buying a variety of grades of cocoa and oppose non-member cocoa being accepted, reviewed their position ahead of the working group meeting this afternoon.     \"We are waiting to see what consumers say,\" a producer delegate said. \"We hope they will be flexible or it will be difficult to negotiate.\"     The ICCO comprises 33 member countries. Non- members include the U.S., a consumer, and Malaysia, an increasingly important producer.  \n',cocoa
'International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, Council chairman, Denis Bra Kanon, said he will attempt to reach a compromise on buffer stock rules for the International Cocoa Agreement.     Bra Kanon called for bilateral consultations among producers and consumers Thursday morning to resolve outstanding differences on how much non-member cocoa the buffer stock can purchase and differentials to be fixed for different origin cocoa, consumer delegates told reporters.     Bra Kanon is expected to meet with about eight delegations individually in attempt to iron out remaining problems.     Producers and consumers indicated support \"in principle\" for the draft buffer stock rules package formulated over the past week by a small working group, consumer delegates said.     Despite remaining differences delegates remained confident a buffer stock accord would be agreed to by Friday when the council session ends, but certain technical points need further clarification, the delegates said.     Certain consumers are concerned that differentials included in the draft buffer stock package are out of line with market realities, consumer delegates said.     Unless these are modified there are fears it would promote purchases of quality cocoas, such as Ghana origin, which are normally required by manufacturers, they said.     Restrictions on buffer stock purchases of non-member cocoa might lead to a supply overhang in Malaysian cocoa, which would depress prices, they added.  \n',cocoa
'International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, council chairman Denis Bra Kanon will present a compromise proposal on buffer stock rules to producer and consumer delegates either later today or tomorrow morning, delegates said.     Bra Kanon held private bilateral consultations with major producers and consumers this morning to resolve outstanding differences, mostly on the issues of how much non-member cocoa the buffer stock can purchase and price differentials for different varieties.     Delegates were fairly confident the differences could be worked out in time to reach agreement tomorrow.     Some consuming member nations, including Britain and Belgium, favour the buffer stock buying more than 10 pct non-member cocoa, delegates have said.     The consumers argue that buying cheaper, lower quality non-member cocoas, particularly Malaysian, will most effectively support prices because that low quality cocoa is currently pressuring the market.     Producers, meanwhile, say non-member cocoa should make up at most a very small percentage of the buffer. They say Malaysia should not be able to benefit from the ICCO unless it is a member, and if the buffer stock bought Malaysian cocoa Malaysia would have no incentive to join, delegates said.     As to differentials, Ghana apparently wanted a higher differential for its cocoa than is outlined in the most recent proposal, so it would have a better chance of having its cocoa bought for the buffer stock, producer delegates said.     Some consumers wanted differentials to be adjusted in a way that would not promote buffer stock purchases of the more expensive cocoas, such as Ghanaian and Brazilian, they said.     Other technical points need to be sorted out, including limits on how much cocoa the buffer stock manager can buy in nearby, intermediate and forward positions and the consequent effect on prices in the various deliveries, delegates said.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) council adjourned after agreeing buffer stock rules for the 1986 International Cocoa Agreement, an ICCO spokesman said.     The buffer stock will begin operations immediately, he said.     He confirmed delegate reports that the buffer stock manager will trade cocoa by means of an offer system, and according to fixed differentials for cocoa from different origins.     Purchases from non-members will be limited to 15 pct of the total and buying or selling operations in any one day will be restricted to a maximum of 40 pct each for nearby, intermediate and forward positions, he said.  \n',cocoa
'The buffer stock rules agreement reached on Friday by the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) is an improvement on previous arrangements but the price-support mechanism is unlikely to do more than stem the decline in cocoa prices, many ICCO delegates and trade sources said.     The accord was reached between producers and consumers of the 35-member ICCO council after two weeks of talks.     European chocolate manufacturers and delegates said the accord may boost cocoa prices immediately, but world surpluses overhanging the market will pull prices down again before long.     \"If the buffer stock operation is successful, I doubt it will do anything more than stop the price from falling further, and it will have no relevance at all to retail chocolate prices,\" a European dealer said.     And if the buffer stock manager delays too long in buying, or is not seen to be using his purchasing power when the market is relying on him to do so, the bearish trade reaction could pressure prices dramatically, dealers said.     The buffer stock is the market-regulating tool of the ICCO, into which cocoa can be bought or from which it can be sold to manoeuvre prices into a pre-set stabilization range.     A new cocoa agreement came into force in January but delegates could not agree buffer stock rules at that time.     The new rules take effect immediately. The buffer stock manager is expected to begin buying cocoa within the next three weeks, after organizing communications with cocoa producing countries and assessing the market, since prices are below the \"must-buy\" level of 1,600 Special Drawing Rights per tonne specified in the agreement, the sources said.     The buffer stock theoretically has funds to buy a maximum 100,000 tonnes within a five week period, but its approach will be more cautious, buffer stock manager Juergen Plambeck said.     The buffer stock has around 250 mln dlrs in funds and a buying limit of 250,000 tonnes of cocoa, 100,000 tonnes of which are already in the buffer stock.     ICCO council chairman and Ivorian Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon said the new rules have a good chance of stabilizing prices. Ivory Coast is the world\'s largest cocoa producer.     \"We have established rules which will permit us to withdraw immediately the surplus of cocoa on the world market,\" Bra Kanon told reporters after the council adjourned. Bra Kanon reckoned the world cocoa surplus could be less than half the 94,000 tonnes estimated by the ICCO statistics committee.     However, some producer and consumer members emerged from the final ICCO council meeting with reservations about the pact.     Ghana, whose high-quality cocoa is the world\'s most expensive and provides 60 pct of the country\'s export earnings, made a formal protest to the council about the price differentials assigned to its cocoa, saying they were too high for Ghanaian cocoa to be bought for the buffer stock.     According to consumer spokesman Peter Baron of West Germany, \"Consumers weren\'t perfectly happy with the buffer stock rules. We reached a very sensitive compromise...There were no real winners or losers.\"     Some European Community delegates were not satisfied that important points were fully discussed during the talks, and as a result, doubted the rules can deal with world surpluses as effectively as they could have, delegates said.     Under the new rules, the buffer stock manager would seek offers of different origin cocoas, using price differentials to reflect different qualities. Non-ICCO member cocoa can comprise up to 15 pct of the total buffer stock.     London cocoa prices traded today around 1,300 stg per tonne, down from around 1,450 stg in January 1987 and 1,750 stg in January 1986.     A cocoa withholding scheme can take a further 120,000 tonnes of cocoa off the market if a special council session decides market conditions warrant it, according to the agreement.     The withholding scheme can only be used if prices fall below the 1,600 SDR lower intervention price for more than five days and if 80 pct of the maximum buffer stock capacity has been filled, or if the buffer stock runs low on funds, it says.     The ICCO will discuss withholding scheme rules at an executive committee meeting on June 9/12, ICCO officials said.  \n',cocoa
'Hopes mounted for an agreement on cocoa buffer stock rules at an International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, council meeting which opened here today, delegates said.     Both producer and consumer ICCO members said after the opening session that prospects for an agreement on the cocoa market support mechanism were improving.     \"The chances are very good as of now of getting buffer stock rules by the end of next week,\" Ghanaian delegate and producer spokesman Mama Mohammed told journalists.     Consumer spokesman Peter Baron called the tone of the negotiations \"optimistic and realistic.\"     The ICCO council failed to agree on buffer stock rules when a new International Cocoa Agreement came into force in January, with deep differences of opinion precluding serious discussions on the matter at that time. The existing buffer stock of about 100,000 tonnes of cocoa was frozen, with a funds balance of 250 mln dlrs.     The ICCO made buffer stock rules negotiations a priority at this semi-annual council meeting in order to stop the slide in world cocoa prices.     Consumers and producers agreed yesterday on the principles as a basis for negotiations.     The council broke for lunch, and reconvenes at 1500 hrs. A working group which has been meeting since Monday will tackle the buffer stock rules issue again at 1600 hrs, when ICCO executive director Kobena Erbynn presents a fleshed-out version of a draft proposal he prepared earlier this week, delegates said.     Mohammed said delegates will have a much clearer indication of prospects for an accord after details of the rules are elaborated by Erbynn, and after producers and consumers meet separately later today to examine the scheme.     The draft proposal included three principles: a limit to non- member cocoa comprising the buffer stock, an offer system for buying buffer stock cocoa, and price differentials to be paid for various cocoas making up the buffer stock, delegates said.     During the morning council session, the Ivory Coast delegation gave \"an open minded statement\" that it is willing to work out a buffer stock rules solution which could come into effect as soon as possible, Baron said.     Ivorian Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon, chairman of the ICCO council, was now expected to arrive in London Monday to attend the talks, Baron said. Vice chairman Sir Denis Henry of Grenada chaired the meeting in his place.     Soviet and East German delegates did not attend the council session because of a conflicting International Sugar Organization meeting today, but could arrive this afternoon, delegates said.  \n',cocoa
'The credibility of government efforts to stabilise fluctuating commodity prices will again be put to the test over the next two weeks as countries try to agree on how a buffer stock should operate in the cocoa market, government delegates and trade experts said.     Only two weeks ago, world coffee prices slumped when International Coffee Organization members failed to agree on how coffee export quotas should be calculated. This week, many of the same experts gather in the same building here to try to agree on how the cocoa pact reached last summer should work.     The still unresolved legal wrangle surrounding the International Tin Council (ITC), which had buffer stock losses running into hundreds of millions of sterling, is also casting a shadow over commodity negotiations.     The ITC\'s failure has restricted negotiators\' ability to compromise as governments do not want to be involved in pacts with built-in flaws or unlimited liability, but want clear lines drawn between aid and trade.     A more hopeful sign of cooperation was agreement on basic elements of a new International Natural Rubber Agreement in Geneva at the weekend.     Some importing countries insist the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) buffer stock rules must not be muddied with quota type subclauses which might dictate the type of cocoa to be bought. One consumer country delegate said this would \"distort, not support\" the market.     Trade and industry sources blame uncertainty about the ICCO for destabilising the market as the recent collapse in coffee prices has made traders acutely aware that commodity pacts can founder. On Friday this uncertainty helped push London cocoa futures down to eight month lows. The strength of sterling has also contributed to the recent slip in prices.     The ICCO daily and average prices on Friday fell below the \"must buy\" level of 1,600 SDRs a tonne designated in the pact, which came into force at the last ICCO session in January but without rules for the operation of the buffer stock.     Consumers and producers could not agree on how it should operate and what discretion it should be given. The agreement limits it to trading physical cocoa and expressly says it cannot operate on futures markets.     A cash balance of some 250 mln dlrs and a stock of almost 100,000 tonnes of cocoa, enough to mount large buying or selling operations, were carried forward from the previous agreement.     Members finance the stock through a 45 dlrs a tonne levy on all cocoa they trade. It has an upper limit of 250,000 tonnes.     The key arguments being faced by the ICCO working group on buffer stock rules which is meeting today and tomorrow will be over non-member cocoa and differentials the buffer stock should pay when trading different types of cocoa. Another working group is scheduled to meet Wednesday to discuss administrative matters, and the full council meets on Thursday.     Producers have so far maintained that buffer stock funds should not help mop up surplus cocoa produced in non-member countries such as Malaysia.     Consumers say when this cocoa is the cheapest the buffer stock should buy it rather than compete with chocolate manufacturers for premium-priced high quality cocoas.     The argument over buying non-member cocoa is closely linked to the one over differentials for different qualities.     European industry and trade advisers have suggested as a compromise that the buffer stock have a maximum share that can represent non-member cocoa and that it use the London futures market\'s existing differentials for different qualities.     Currently, good West African cocoa is tendered at par onto the London market.     Discounts, which are currently under review, range up to 50 stg a tonne for Brazilian and Malaysian cocoa.     Consumer delegates said the same arguments in reverse would operate when prices are high - the buffer stock should sell the highest priced cocoa in most demand, forcing all prices lower.     The January talks were slowed by a split inside the European Community, a key ICCO consumer group, with France siding with producers. EC representatives met in closed session in Brussels on Friday in an attempt to reach a common ground and, a diplomatic source said, narrowed the range of positions among the 12 nations.     The source said the EC will be looking for signs of flexibility on the part of producers in the next few days and will be able to respond if they are there.     One ICCO delegate describing the producer/consumer split said consumer proposals mean buying more cocoa for less and backs the concept of the pact which is \"meant to support the market where trade buying is not.\"     In contrast, he said, producers seem to want to sell their cocoa to the buffer stock rather than consumers.     Other, more technical, issues still outstanding include whether the buffer stock should buy at a single announced \"posted price\" as in the previous pact or by announcing it is buying then accepting offers.     In either case, delegates said, it is accepted that producers must be given a clear opportunity to make offers of cocoa for forward shipment directly to the buffer stock in a way that is competitive with spot offers made by dealers.  \n',cocoa
'International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) talks on buffer stock rules have slowed during a crucial phase of negotiations, delegates said, but they remained confident about prospects for reaching agreement by Friday.     Cocoa producers, European Community (EC) consumers and all consumers separately reviewed technical details of a buffer stock rules package distributed yesterday.     The buffer stock working group of consumers and producers was set to meet later today to debate the proposal jointly for the first time, they said.     Delegates said major sticking points were likely to be the amount of non-member cocoa allowed to be bought for the buffer stock, and the fixed price differentials at which different origin cocoas will be offered to the buffer stock manager.     Producers would prefer that non-member cocoa not be included in the buffer stock because, if it is, countries such as Malaysia benefit from the cocoa agreement without joining it, the delegates said.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) buffer stock working group meeting set for 1130 GMT today was rescheduled for 1430, ICCO delegates said.     The meeting was delayed so a draft compromise proposal on buffer stock rules could be completed, they said.     ICCO Executive Director Kobena Erbynn was preparing the plan in consultation with other delegates for presentation to the full working group, they added.  \n',cocoa
'A 250 dlr spot charge will be added to the New York cocoa futures, July delivery, contract starting Wednesday, March 18, the Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange said.     The March delivery ceases trading March 17, making May and July the two nearby unlimited positions. Previously, March and May were unlimited.     The margin requirement for a May or July position will be 1,000 dlrs--750 dlrs original margin plus 250 dlrs spot fee.  \n',cocoa
'Total Dutch imports of cocoa beans rose to 17,978 tonnes in January from 13,961 in January 1986, while exports fell to 1,852 tonnes from 3,111, the Central Bureau of Statistics said.     Cocoa butter imports rose slightly to 1,699 tonnes from 1,507, while exports fell slightly to 6,211 from 6,293 tonnes.     Imports of cocoa powder fell to 316 tonnes from 469 and exports to 5,944 from 6,106 tonnes.  \n',cocoa
'The new International Cocoa Agreement should lead to a stabilisation of prices, both benefitting producer countries and promoting an equilibrium in international economic relations, European Community Development Commissioner Lorenzo Natali said.     He said in a statement welcoming the agreement on buffer stock rules reached last week in London that it resulted in large part from initiatives taken by the EC Commission after consumers and producers had reached deadlock in initial negotiations.  \n',cocoa
'The Ghana Cocoa Board said it purchased 1,323 tonnes of cocoa in the 21st week, ended February 26, of the 1986/87 main crop season, compared with 1,961 tonnes the previous week and 1,344 tonnes in the 21st week ended March six of the 1985/86 season, the board said.     Cumulative purchases so far this season stand at 216,095 tonnes, still up on the 201,966 tonnes purchased by the 21st week of last season, the Board said.  \n',cocoa
'The Ghana Cocoa Board said it purchased 214 tonnes of cocoa in the 24th week, ended March 19, of the 1986/87 main crop season, compared with 456 tonnes the previous week and 372 tonnes in the 24th week ended March 27 of the 1985/86 season.     Cumulative purchases so far this season stand at 217,449 tonnes, ahead of the 204,256 tonnes purchased by the 24th week of last season.  \n',cocoa
'The Ghana Cocoa Board said it purchased 456 tonnes of cocoa in the 23rd week, ended March 12, of the 1986/87 main crop season, compared with 684 tonnes the previous week and 784 tonnes in the 23rd week ended March 20 of the 1985/86 season.     Cumulative purchases so far this season stand at 217,235 tonnes, ahead of the 203,884 tonnes purchased by the 23rd week of last season, the board said.  \n',cocoa
'Haiti and Czechoslovakia have joined the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO), bringing membership in the United Nations charter body to 18 importing countries and 17 exporters, ICCO officials said.     Haiti has provisionally applied to the ICCO as an exporting member, and accounts for 0.92 pct of world cocoa exports, they said. Czechoslovakia joined as an importer.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) Council reached agreement on rules to govern its buffer stock, the device it uses to keep cocoa off the market to stabilise prices, ICCO delegates said.     The date on which the new rules will take effect has not been decided but delegates said they expected them to come into force early next week, after which the buffer stock manager can begin buying or selling cocoa.     Since prices are below the \"may-buy\" level of 1,655 Special Drawing Rights a tonne set in the cocoa pact, the manager is likely to buy cocoa sooon to support the market, they said.     Delegates and traders said they expected the manager, Juergen Plambeck, to intervene in the market within three weeks of the pact coming into force.     The rules permit him to buy and sell cocoa from origins or the second hand market on an offer system, not by means of a posted price as in the previous cocoa accord.     The cocoa will be priced according to a fixed set of differentials, ranging from 137 stg for most expensive Ghana cocoa to zero for Malaysian cocoa.     Purchases from non-members, such as Malaysia, will be limited to 15 pct of the total stock and those on any one day should be limited to 40 pct each in nearby, intermediate and forward positions.     The council meeting, which is expected to conclude two weeks of sessions involving various working groups and the council itself, was continuing, the delegates said.     The current cocoa agreement came into force on January 20 during a previous meeting of the council which was unable to agree on the rules to implement buffer stock operations.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, buffer stock working group began examining a draft proposal for buffer stock rules this afternoon, delegates said.     The plan, presented by ICCO Executive Director Kobena Erbynn, represented a compromise between producer, European Community, EC, and other consumer views on how the buffer stock should operate, they said.     The proposal involved three key principles. First, the buffer stock manager would be open to offers for cocoa rather than using fixed posted prices as previously, delegates said.     Under an offer system, the buffer stock manager would be free to choose cocoas of varying prices, they said.     The second provision was that non-ICCO member cocoa could comprise a maximum 10 pct of the buffer stock, while the third laid out a pricing system under which the buffer stock manager would pay differentials for different grades of cocoa, to be set by a formula, the delegates said.     After the plan was presented, working group delegates met briefly in smaller groups of producers, EC consumers and all consumers to look at the proposal. Producers gave no reaction to the scheme and will respond to it when the working group meets tomorrow at 1000 GMT, producer delegates said.     Consumer members accepted the proposal as a good base to work from, one consumer delegate said.     Delegates said the proposal was only a starting point for negotiations on buffer stock rules and subject to change.  \n',cocoa
'International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) producers and consumers accepted the principles of a compromise proposal on buffer stock rules as a basis for further negotiation, delegates said.     The buffer stock working group then asked ICCO Executive Director Kobena Erbynn, who wrote up the draft compromise, to flesh out details of the principles with the assistance of a representative group of delegates, they said.     The working group broke up for the day, into a smaller group of five producers and five consumers to discuss administrative rules and into the group headed by Erbynn to hammer out buffer stock rules details, delegates said.     Delegates said many differences of opinion still have to be ironed out. \"Whenever we start getting into details the clouds gather,\" one delegate said.     Erbynn is likely to present fleshed out details of the buffer stock rules proposal to the working group early tomorrow, delegates said.     The principles of the draft proposal included establishing an offer system for buffer stock purchases rather than a posted price system, a limit to the amount of non-ICCO member cocoa that can be bought, and differentials to be paid for different varieties of cocoa comprising the buffer stock, delegates said.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Council, ICCO, adjourned for the day after a detailed proposal on buffer stock rules was distributed and executive committee officials were elected, delegates said.     Producers, EC consumers and all consumers are scheduled to hold separate meetings tomorrow to review the proposal, written by ICCO executive director Kobena Erbynn, they said.     The buffer stock working group is to meet again on rules Monday morning, and the full council is to reconvene Tuesday, delegates said.     Heinz Hofer of Switzerland was elected executive committee chairman and Mette Mogstad of Norway vice chairman, they added.  \n',cocoa
'The International Cocoa Organization, ICCO, council adjourned after presenting divergent producer and consumer views on buffer stock rules and agreeing to examine a draft compromise proposal on the buffer stock issue tomorrow, delegates said.     ICCO Executive Director Kobena Erbynn will draw up what some delegates called a \"pre-compromise\" and present it to the buffer stock working group at 1130 hrs GMT Tuesday, they said.     While consumer and producer member nations disagree how a buffer stock should be implemented, both sides reiterated they were willing to compromise to come to agreement, they said.     \"I am optimistic we will be able to come to an agreement -- maybe not tomorrow or the next day, but some time later in the session,\" a consumer delegate said.     Producers say they want the buffer stock to consist only of ICCO member cocoa, comprise a representative basket of various grade cocoas and pay different prices for different grades, delegates said.     Some consumers would rather the buffer stock manager be able to buy non-member cocoa also, and pay a single price for the buffer stock cocoa without respect to origin.     Consumer members were not unified in their views on how the buffer stock should operate, with several countries backing different aspects of the producer stance, delegates said.     The semi-annual council meeting is scheduled to run until March 27. Consideration of the buffer stock rules is the most controversial topic on the agenda, delegates said.  \n',cocoa
'Edouard Kouame, Ivorian delegate to the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO), was chosen Executive Director of the ICCO, effective October 1, ICCO officials said.     Kouame will succeed Dr. Kobena Erbynn of Ghana in the post.  \n',cocoa
'A senior Ivory Coast Agriculture Ministry official confirmed his country\'s backing for a new international cocoa pact and said Ivorian delegates would be present at talks on its buffer stock starting this week.     The official tolds that Ivorian Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon would attend the opening of the talks, convened by the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO), in London on Monday.     While Bra Kanon is due to return home this week for funeral ceremonies for a sister of Ivorian President Felix Houphouet-Boigny, scheduled to be held in the country\'s capital Yamoussoukro between March 19-22, senior Ivorian delegates will be present throughout the London talks, the official said.     Bra Kanon is chairman of the ICCO Council and rumours that he or Ivorian delegates might be delayed because of public mourning in the West African nation helped depress already low world cocoa prices Friday.     The official said Ivory Coast continued to support the new pact, which was agreed in principle last year by most of the world\'s cocoa exporters and consumers.     He also said Bra Kanon would fulfil his duties as ICCO Council chairman during the talks, scheduled to end on March 27.     The meeting aims to set rules for the operation of the pact\'s buffer stock which producers hope will boost a market hit by successive world cocoa surpluses.     Ivory Coast did not participate in the last international cocoa pact and its decision to join the new accord has sparked hopes that it will be more successful in supporting prices.  \n',cocoa
'Ivorian Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon, chairman of the International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) council, will not be able to open the council session here tomorrow, an Ivorian ICCO delegate tolds.     He will arrive sometime later during the meetings here, the delegate said. The council session will be chaired instead by ICCO vice chairman Sir Denis Henry, the delegate from Grenada, ICCO officials said.     Ivorian officials last week said Bra Kanon was due to return home for funeral ceremonies for a sister of Ivorian President Felix Houphouet-Boigny March 19-22.  \n',cocoa
'Jacobs Suchard AG expects a world cocoa surplus of around 100,000 tonnes in 1987 compared with a 104,000 tonne surplus in 1986, Jens Sroka, head of commodity buying, told a news conference.     The company expects prices to remain at around current levels despite the likelihood of agreement on buffer stock rules at the forthcoming London cocoa talks, and believes market intervention by the buffer stock manager would stabilise prices.     Sroka said world coffee prices are expected to remain weak if any international coffee talks fail to produce agreement.     Sroka said stagnating consumption and slight overproduction will continue to weigh on coffee prices and he forecast a continued build-up in stocks.     The recent failure of the London coffee talks had surprised market observers.     Unless reason prevails and the major producers return to the conference table, the world coffee market will remain free and the consequences for some producers dependant on coffee for their foreign exchange earnings would be catastrophic, Sroka added.  \n',cocoa
'Japan is in the process of joining the International Cocoa Organisation (ICCO), which will bring the number of members in the body to 36, ICCO officials said.     Japan is completing constitutional procedures necessary to its accession to the ICCO and is expected to become an importing member in three to four months, they said.  \n',cocoa
'The first 23 members have been elected to the joint traded options facility of the London Commodity Exchange (LCE) and the International Petroleum exchange (IPE), the exchanges said in a statement.     More firms have applied and the final tranche will be admitted on April one and trading is planned to start in early June on the new trading floor on Commodity Quay.     Traded options need a volatile and liquid futures base to succeed and chairman of the joint formation committee Jack Patterson said the existing LCE cocoa, coffee, sugar and IPE gas oil contracts should have no difficulty in providing this.  \n',cocoa
'Leading cocoa producers will discuss whether newly-agreed rules on an international cocoa buffer stock will succeed in reversing a sharp fall in world prices when they start four day\'s of talks here later today, conference sources said.     Another topic likely to be discussed at the twice-yearly meeting of the Cocoa Producer Alliance (CPA) is the pact\'s second line of market support -- a witholding scheme under which exporters can take up to 120,000 tonnes of cocoa off the market if buffer stock purchases fail to defend prices.     The International Cocoa Organisation is due to discuss the scheme at a meeting in June, and exporters could use the Yaounde talks to work out a common position on the issue, the sources said.     Delegates will also be briefed on arrangements for an international cocoa research conference due to take place in Santo Domingo in the Dominican Republic next month, CPA secretary general D.S. Kamga said.     The 11-member CPA include the world\'s top three producers of Ivory Coast, Brazil and Ghana and accounts for around 80 pct of world output.  \n',cocoa
'Cocoa futures fell to session lows by midmorning, posting losses from last night of six to two stg a tonne in 1987 deliveries, dealers said.     Weekend profittaking by jobbers and general book-squaring featured the fall which was aided by steady sterling versus the dollar and lack of offtake in the physicals market.     Dealers said the market was switch and straddle-bound, in that any pressure on one particular month was certain to be reflected in adjacent deliveries.     The undertone, however, remained cautious as operators await an eventual start to ICCO buffer stock buying, dealers said.     The market was originally forecast to open with average five stg gains from last night following New York\'s firmer close yesterday, dealers said.     But this was largely counter-balanced by currency factors.     Near July traded at its session low of 1,327 stg after one hour versus 1,333 bid last night and an early high of 1,335.     Volume midmorning was 730 lots including 350 lots crossed and 108 switches.     There was no sign of any origin activity.  \n',cocoa
'Madagascar\'s cocoa production is estimated 13 pct higher this year at 2,720 tonnes, up from 2,400 in 1986, Agriculture Ministry officials said.     This improvement reflects the government\'s efforts over the last seven years to extend existing cocoa plantations and plant new higher yielding varieties, particularly at the northern tip of the island, they said.     Last year, Madagascar exported 2,189 tonnes of high quality cocoa, up from 1,624 in 1985, the Trade Ministry said.     This year\'s exports are estimated at 2,400 tonnes.  \n',cocoa
'Government officials in Malaysia, a major cocoa producer, have declined to say whether it will join the International Cocoa Agreement (ICCA) for which buffer stock rules were agreed in London last week.     Ministry of Primary Industries officials said in January the cabinet would decide on Malaysia\'s participation, but so far a decision has not been announced. The government is said to be in favour of joining the pact, but local cocoa growers and traders tolds they are against the idea because certain provisions in it may be to their disadvantage.     Malaysia is the world\'s fourth largest cocoa producer. The government feels that the pact, through its buffer stock mechanism, can help stabilise prices in a market which is labouring under surpluses, officials said.     But growers and traders are concerned Malaysia\'s participation in the pact will require them to pay a levy for exports of cocoa to non-member countries of the ICCA.     They estimate the levy at around 100 ringgit a tonne at current prices and said they are not prepared to accept it because a big portion of Malaysia\'s cocoa exports, officially estimated at 112,000 tonnes in 1986, goes to non-members.     Most growers and traders added they are also against a buffer stock measure under the agreement which requires withholding of cocoa stocks when prices slump.     Malaysia, which produced 117,000 tonnes of cocoa last year, might be forced to withhold up to 70,000 tonnes worth some 30 mln ringgit under such a measure in the long-term, and this might affect their economic viability, they said.     \"The cost of maintaining such a stock can be high and it will be a real messy business for the government and the trade if it ever occurs,\" an industry source said.     The growers and traders also said that under new buffer stock rules Malaysia can continue to benefit even if it is not a member of the pact, as the buffer stock manager is also allowed to buy from non-members for the stockpile.     Under the new rules purchases from non-members, such as Malaysia, will be limited to 15 pct of the total stock.     Malaysia has come under pressure from some producers to join the pact soon, officials said, but they noted that it need not rush to do so as there are provisions which allow countries to join the agreement even at a later date.  \n',cocoa
'New York cocoa traders reacted with caution to today\'s developments at the International Cocoa Organization talks in London, saying there is still time for negotiations to break down.     \"I would be extremely cautious to go either long or short at this point,\" said Jack Ward, president of the cocoa trading firm Barretto Peat. \"If and when a final position comes out (of the ICCO talks) one will still have time to put on positions. The risk at the moment is not commensurate with the possible gain.\"     ICCO producer and consumer delegates this morning accepted the outlines of a compromise proposal on buffer stock rules as a basis for further negotiation. A smaller group of representatives is now charged with fleshing out the details.     \"Market sentiment has reflected optimism, I would\'t put it any stronger than that,\" Ward said.     \"It seems to put them slightly closer to an agreement... but one shouldn\'t forget how much they have to negotiate,\" said another trader of today\'s developments.     Many dealers were sidelined coming into the negotiations and have remained so, traders said.     \"The dealers have got historically small positions in outright terms,\" one trader said.     Speculators have gone net long \"but only slightly so,\" he added.     The recent price strength -- gains of about 52 dlrs the last two days -- has been due in large part to sterling\'s rally against the dollar and in the process has attracted a measure of origin selling, traders said.  \n',cocoa
'Pessimism over the effects of a prolonged dry spell on the coming Bahian temporao cocoa crop is rising with trade forecasts generally in the 2.0 mln to 2.5 mln bag range against 2.5 mln to 3.0 mln a fortnight ago.     Trade sources tolds from the state capital of Salvador that despite scattered rains since mid-February, which broke a six week drought, plantations have not picked up as hoped and very little cocoa is expected to be gathered in the first three months of the May/September crop.     The sources said arrivals from May through July might only reach around 600,000 bags whereas in normal years a figure of 1.0 mln to 1.5 mln bags might be expected.     Arrivals from then should start to pick up sharply as pods from current flowering are gathered. However, the sources noted a late temporao is always more susceptible to pod rot, which flourishes if conditions turn cold and humid, and which is more likely from late July on.     This year\'s crop is doubly susceptible because poor prices mean farmers were not encouraged to invest in fertilisers and insecticides and are also unlikely to treat against pod rot.     A severe attack of pod rot can cause the loss of over 500,000 bags in a very short period, one source said.     Because of the increased exposure to pod rot damage, estimates of the final outcome of the temporao are extremely vulnerable and production could easily drop to below the 2.0 mln bag mark if the disease hits.     Although flowering was good following the start of the rains, pod setting was not up to expectations, possibly because the drought had caused a drop in the insect population which pollinates flowers, the sources said.     However, reports from farms indicate moisture levels are now generally back to near normal levels and that current flowering and pod setting is good, which should result in mature fruit from August through September.     The sources said they expect no break in the harvesting of beans between the end of the temporao and the beginning of the main crop, which officially starts on October 1.     \"The cut-off date is completely artificial. If things go well from now on we should see heavy harvesting without a break from August through November or even December,\" one said.     If predictions of a 2.0 to 2.5 mln bag temporao prove accurate this would be below the 2.7 mln bag average for the past 10 years. The last poor temporao was in 1984 when prolonged drought and later pod rot cut production to 1.79 mln bags, the lowest since 1974.     Good growing conditions the following year produced a temporao of 3.12 mln bags, just below the 1983 3.17 mln bag record, while last year\'s output, which also suffered some drought damage, was 2.77 mln bags.     Figures for the coming temporao might be distorted upwards by the inclusion of undeclared current main crop beans.     The sources said large quantities of beans are believed to have been undeclared from this year\'s record total harvest and they were unsure how much of this would be unregistered by the end of the official crop year on April 30.     Recent official arrivals figures have been swollen by the inclusion of beans which had been delivered previously to port warehouses but not declared.     Because of the high turnover of beans this year, significant amounts have deteriorated because they were stored too long at the back of warehouses. Some of these are expected to be held for mixing in with early temporao arrivals.     With official arrivals figures for the 1986/87 temporao and main crops totalling over 6.1 mln bags, and over seven weeks still to go to the end of the year, the total outturn should be at least a record 6.5 mln bags if all production is declared, the sources said.     This would compare with the previous record set last year of 6.03 mln.     However, there is no way of telling how many current crop beans will be declared after the May 1 start of the temporao and thus the true size of the 1986/87 harvest may never be officially registered.  \n',cocoa
'Trade estimates of the coming May/September temporao harvest in Brazil\'s main cocoa growing state of Bahia are now in the 1.5 mln to 2.0 mln 60-kilo bag range against 2.0 mln to 2.5 mln two weeks ago.     Traders in the state capital Salvador tolds the effects of a dry period in the first six weeks of the year had been harsher than thought earlier.     Although good flowering had followed the onset of rains in mid-February subsequent pod setting was dissappointing.     Last year\'s temporao, also hit by a dry spell, was 2.77 mln bags. In 1984 severe drought cut the crop to 1.79 mln bags.     The traders said another factor leading to lower crop predictions is that many farmers are not caring properly for plantations because of low returns on their investment.     Manpower, fertiliser and other costs have been cut back as farmers feel the pinch of the rise in interest rates over the past six months coupled with low bean prices.     If such economies continue into the winter months both the temporao and the developing October/April main crop could face serious damage from pod rot attacks on trees which would normally be treated against the disease.     Recent very wet weather has already caused some isolated incidences of pod rot but reports from the growing regions say these are not yet significant.     The traders said they expect very low deliveries of temporao beans in the first three months of the harvest and the bulk will not appear until the last month, September.     Despite the low loads, trees are said to be in excellent condition and recent flowering and pod setting - which will lead to late temporao/early main crop beans - has been good.  \n',cocoa
'The Algerian authorities have regulated the addition of chickpeas and barley used to make imported coffee go further, the official APS news agency reported.     Taking advantage of scarcity, private roasters were selling ground coffee mixtures which were 75 pct non-coffee, it said. Since the beginning of March, the coffee market has been strictly regulated by the state food marketing monopoly Enapal.     Now a third of imported coffee will be sold as pure beans and two thirds as a ground mixture with a choice of 30 pct chickpeas or 30 pct barley. In March private dealers will handle 2,050 tonnes of pure coffee and Enapal 6,050 tonnes of mixtures.  \n',coffee
'An 11-day-old strike by Brazilian seamen is affecting coffee shipments and could lead to a short term supply squeeze abroad, exporters said.     They could not quantify how much coffee has been delayed but said at least 40 pct of coffee exports are carried by Brazilian ships and movement of foreign vessels has also been disrupted by port congestion caused by the strike.     A series of labor disputes and bad weather has meant Brazil\'s coffee exports have been running at an average two weeks behind schedule since the start of the year, one source added.     By the end of February shipments had fallen 800,000 bags behind registrations, leaving around 2.4 mln bags to be shipped during March. By March 10 only 230,000 bags had been shipped, the sources said.     Given Brazil\'s port loading capacity of around 100,000 bags a day, even if normal operations were resumed immediately and not interrupted by bad weather, some March registered coffee will inevitably be shipped during April, they added.   \n',coffee
'Brazil\'s recent announcement of a suspension in interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of foreign debt gave the banking system the jitters and confirmed views among many international economists and commodities analysts that Brazil will continue to flex its trading muscles in 1987.     The developing world\'s most indebted nation is also its most prolific exporter of agricultural commodities such as coffee and soybeans, and might maximize foreign exchange revenue by selling hard on world markets, economists said.     \"That sounds like a reasonable strategy. But there is no way they can trade their way out of this situation,\" Aldo Roldan, Vice President for International Services at Chase Econometrics, said.     Roldan tolds that Brazil not only had to tackle the problems of satisfying domestic demand and competing on glutted world markets, but also had to work to make its position on foreign exchange markets more profitable.     \"Domestic costs have increased (due to inflation) and exporters have not had the same offsetting movement in exchange rates,\" Roldan said.     The Chase economist also said commodities markets were depressed and generally did not appear very promising for a country like Brazil, where pure commodities account for some 50 pct of exports and in 1986 had a total value of around 23 billion dlrs.     But he added: \"They are always pretty aggressive and they have good foreign marketing channels.\"     Analysts said a key factor in Brazilian trade will be coffee, and even without background pressure from foreign creditors the world\'s largest producer was expected to hit the market this year with a vengeance.     Negotiations between International Coffee Organization (ICO) members to re-establish producer export quotas broke up earlier this week with major producers and consumers accusing each other of intransigence.     \"Brazil would not tolerate a change in ICO regulations, which others wanted changed,\" one senior coffee dealer said.     The dealer, who declined to be named, said Brazil wanted to preserve its market share. At the end of the talks, he said Brazil hinted it could sell more than anyone else and others would suffer.     Brazil will be an aggressive seller under any scenario but as yet there is no sign of unusually heavy Brazilian sales, the dealer said.     \"If they do come into the market at this level it will go lower and you could breach a dollar, ninety or eighty cents,\" he said.     New York coffee futures for May delivery settled 2.29 cents lower Thursday at 104.68 cents a lb, while more distant deliveries fell the six-cent maximum trading limit.     President of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, Jorio Dauster told a press conference in Rio de Janeiro today that Brazil has no set target for its coffee exports following the breakdown of the ICO talks on export quotas.     Many economists and analysts believe soybeans could be the focus of possible stepped-up Brazilian marketing efforts. \"They will be more aggressive this year than they have ever been,\" according to Richard Loewy, analyst for Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.     Loewy believes the foreign debt problem, a good crop, plus difficulties with storage would help motivate selling of the Brazil soybean crop. \"Brazilian farmers also need cash flow and they can\'t afford to store the crops,\" he said.     The Chicago soybean complex has been nervous for some time about large South American crops developing under near ideal conditions towards record yields.     \"We are going to see a very rapid decline, earlier than usual, this year in our (U.S.) exports,\" Loewy said.     Tommy Eshleman, economist for the American Soybean Association (ASA), said this year\'s Brazilian soybean harvest could total 18 mln tonnes, versus 13.7 mln last year.     Marketings will be very aggressive this summer when prices are usually high relative to the rest of the year due to the vulnerability of the U.S. crop to bad growing weather.     Another incentive to sell might be trade anticipation of a reduction in the U.S. government soybean loan rate, offered to farmers who give crops as collateral, Eshleman said.     He said there has been some uncertainty this year about the soybean loan rate, which acts as an effective floor for prices by keeping supplies away from the free market. Farmers can forfeit their beans to the government rather than repay the loan.     \"We\'re getting into a period when they (Brazil) are starting to harvest and starting to export,\" Eshleman said. But he added it will be a while before U.S. exports fall to below 10 mln bushels a week from around 20 mln bushels currently.     Jose Melicias from the research department of Drexel Burnham Lambert said Brazil would be trying to export as much as it can this year because of its economic situation.     He said the debt situation was a major consideration. \"The Brazilian government also does not have enough money to pay for storage,\" he added.     Asked if a return to an inflationary environment in Brazil would make farmers inclined to hold onto crops, Melicias said it would not make a big difference.     On other commodity markets, Brazil\'s selling impact may be muted no matter its need to generate capital.     Brazil is faced with a poor 1986/87 sugar harvest, which could limit exports to the world market, analysts said. The country may have oversold and be unable to honor export commitments, and this plus higher domestic demand caused by consumer price subsidies on ethanol and refined sugar, will give it little room to stretch exports, they said.     Brazil\'s other major crop, cocoa, is in its third year of surplus. \"Cocoa consumption is basically flat and last year it fell, so I don\'t think they can start throwing out cocoa and find many more markets for it,\" one analyst said.     \"If they come out as aggressive sellers, the market would collapse and they can\'t afford to do that,\" she added.  \n',coffee
'Brazil has no set target for its coffee exports following this week\'s breakdown of International Coffee Organization talks on export quotas, President of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, IBC, Jorio Dauster said.     He told a press conference Brazil now had to reconsider its export plans and that the 15.5 mln bag export figure which it had proposed for itself earlier should no longer be taken as the country\'s export target to ICO-member countries.     The 15.5 mln bag offer had been made on the assumption an agreement would bring stability to world markets, he added.     It had been a gesture to ease negotiations, but the lack of an agreement leaves it no longer valid and exports could be above or below 15.5 mln bags, he said.     Dauster said he would talk to producers, exporters and market analysts before taking any decision on export policy, but any future policy would be flexible and adjusted to market conditions.     \"We will not take any short-term decisions which might cause markets to panic,\" Dauster added.     He said it would be a policy which shows Brazil has coffee to sell and that it could do so without an ICO agreement.     \"Brazil has coffee (to sell) and wants to show that it does not need an ICO agreement as a crutch,\" Dauster said.     Commenting on the breakdown of the talks, Dauster said consumer proposals would have implied a reduction of one to two mln bags in Brazil\'s export quotas.     \"It was a proposal which would lead to a substantial loss for Brazil and which would be difficult for the country to recover,\" he said.     The consumer proposal to base quotas on a six-year moving average of exportable production surpluses would lead to overproduction as countries boosted output to win higher quotas, he said.     Dauster rejected reports which said Brazil\'s inflexibility had been the cause for the breakdown of talks, noting that its stance had the backing of 85 pct of producing countries.     Close links would continue with these producers, particularly Colombia, Mexico and Francophone African countries, but Dauster said no joint marketing action was envisaged at present.     He also said Brazil currently had no plans to return to a system of roaster buying contracts, although \"no hypothesis has been abandoned.\"     Dauster said he had not yet decided when registrations for May shipment coffee will be opened.     He declined comment on whether the IBC will adopt a policy of opening registrations for up to six months in advance, as some exporters had suggested.     He noted export registrations for the first four months of the year totalled around 5.5 mln bags, more than half the 9.9 mln exported in 1986 when drought reduced the crop to between 11.2 mln and 12 mln bags.     He said that, although he had heard forecasts of 30 mln bags for the coming crop, the IBC would not make any estimate until late April.  \n',coffee
'The Treasury Department is due to release funds for the Brazilian Coffee Institute, IBC, to pay for the coffee purchased from local producers, the IBC said in a statement.     IBC production director Oripes Gomes said in the statement that payment would be made within the official guarantee prices.     The statement said the IBC is sending a document to the National Monetary Council asking the government to set a budget for the purchase by the Institute of up to five mln bags of coffee until June 30.     Gomes said in the statement there have been no problems in the concession of funds by the Treasury for payment of the coffee delivered to the IBC warehouses by the producers.     He said producers have already delivered 2.2 mln bags, of which 1.5 mln bags have been paid for.     In the future, according to an agreement to be signed with the Treasury, the Institute will no longer need to seek approval by the Treasury to seek the release of additional funds to buy coffee, the statement said.  \n',coffee
'THE FOLLOWING RAINFALL WAS RECORDED IN THE AREAS OVER THE PAST 24 HOURS     PARANA STATE: UMUARAMA NIL, PARANAVAI NIL, LONDRINA NIL, MARINGA NIL.     SAO PAULO STATE PRESIDENTE PRUDENTE NIL, VOTUPORANGA NIL, FRANCA NIL, CATANDUVA NIL, SAO CARLOS NIL, SAO SIMAO NIL.     MINAS GERAIS STATE: GUAXUPE 33.0 MILLIMETRES, TRES PONTAS 5.0 MM. \n',coffee
'Jorge Cardenas, manager of Colombia\'s coffee growers\' federation, said he did not believe any important decisions would emerge from an upcoming meeting of the International Coffee Organization (ICO).     The ICO executive board is set to meet in London from March 31 and could decide to call a special council session by the end of April to discuss export quotas.     \"It\'s going to be a routine meeting, an update of what has been happening in the market, but it\'s unlikely any major decisions are taken,\" Cardenas told journalists.     Earlier this month, talks in London to re-introduce export quotas, suspended in February 1986, ended in failure.     Colombian finance minister Cesar Gaviria, also talking to reporters at the end of the weekly National Coffee Committee meeting, said the positions of Brazil and of the United States were too far apart to allow a prompt agreement on quotas.     Brazil\'s coffee chief Jorio Dauster said yesterday Brazil would not change its coffee policies.     Cardenas said the market situation was getting clearer because the trade knew the projected output and stockpile levels of producers.     He said according to ICO statistics there was a shortfall of nine mln (60-kg) bags on the world market between October, the start of the coffee year, and February.  \n',coffee
'Uganda\'s state-run Coffee Marketing Board (CMB) has been suffering a cash crisis for the past two months due to a bottleneck in export shipments and administrative delays in handling payments, trade sources said.     The CMB needs between 10 and 15 billion shillings (the equivalent of seven to 10 mln dlrs) to pay farmers and processors for coffee already delivered, but its present export revenue is insufficient to cover such expenditure, they said.     The board\'s cash crisis has serious implications for the economy as a whole, since coffee accounts for 95 pct of Uganda\'s total exports.     The CMB\'s financial difficulties first started in January following delays in rail-freighting export consignments of coffee to the ports of Mombasa, Dar es Salaam and Tanga.     These delays were caused by a shortage of railway wagons in Uganda and bottlenecks on the ferries which transport Ugandan wagons across Lake Victoria to link up with the Kenyan and Tanzanian railway systems, the sources said     Marketing Minister John Sebaana-Kizito publicly acknowledged on February 19 that the CMB had run up arrears to local suppliers as a result of the shortage of transport for moving exports.     Sebaana-Kizito said at the time that the payments squeeze would be resolved in two weeks.     However, an accident to the rail ferry which plies between the Ugandan lake port of Jinja and Kisumu in Kenya put it out of action between February 21 and March 15, causing fresh delays in cargo movements.     Coffee exports are especially sensitive to the disruption of rail transport since president Yoweri Museveni has banned their haulage by road in a drive to save transport costs.     Transport difficulties meant that by early February the CMB was holding unsold coffee stocks of around 750,000 bags.     These stocks were equivalent to one quarter of Uganda\'s expected three mln 60-kilo bag 1986/87 (October-September) crop, the sources said.     According to the sources, the board\'s financial problems have been aggravated by long delays in processing export receipts.     The coffee board was taking about eight weeks to recycle export receipts into payments to local producers, whereas export bills handled by local banks took half that time to process, they said.     The sources said the CMB\'s price structure had been overtaken by Uganda\'s high inflation rate, unofficially estimated at about 200 pct, and that this was a further disincentive to producers, already owed large arrears.     \"The coffee pricing structure is wrong and three months behind, the foreign exchange rate is unrealistic, and the sooner the so-called economic package is put in top gear, the better for the coffee industry and the economy as a whole,\" one of the sources said.     The government is currently negotiating a package of economic reforms with the World Bank and International Monetary Fund aimed at underpinning a renewed inflow of foreign aid to help Uganda\'s economic recovery after 15 years of political strife.  \n',coffee
'A meeting of eight Latin American coffee producers ended with a call for continued talks aimed at arriving at an agreement to stabilize international prices.     A statement delivered by the conference\'s president, Nicaragua\'s External Trade Minister Alejandro Martinez Cuenca, said the object of future meetings would be to seek negotiations leading to basic export quotas.     The meeting was attended by representatives from Brazil, Mexico, Guatemala, El Salvador, Honduras, Costa Rica and Nicaragua. A Panamanian representative attended the meeting as an observer.     Representatives at the meeting said efforts would continue to be made to reach a regional consensus on export quotas which could be presented to the International Coffee Organization.     In opening the meeting, Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega said the lack of an accord on export quotas was behind falling coffee prices, which he said have caused billions of dollars in losses to countries in the region.     Jorio Dauster, president of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, said his government is committed to working towards an producers accord in order to bring about higher prices.  \n',coffee
'The sharp fall in international coffee prices will not affect Colombia\'s external credit situation, finance minister Cesar Gaviria tolds.     He said the current depression on world coffee markets was not totally unexpected and would have no immediate bearing on Colombia\'s financial state which he described as sound.     \"Our foreign debt is high, but we can pay and I hope the foreign banking community will maintain its position toward us,\" he said.     Colombia, the only major latin american country not to have rescheduled its external public debt, has a total foreign debt of 13.6 billion dlrs.     Calls for a rescheduling of the debt have come this week from the opposition conservative party and the biggest trade union following the coffee price drop. Gaviria said lower coffee prices this year could mean a loss of 1.5 billion dlrs in revenues for 1987.     Gaviria submitted to the world bank and the inter-american bank last week in new york a borrowing plan, for a total of 3.054 billion dlrs to be disbursed over the next four years, which he said was approved.  \n',coffee
'Coffee futures dipped further and closed below one dlr a pound for the first time in six years.     Coffee for delivery in May ended at 99.28 cents a pound on the New York Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange, down 0.76 cent and the lowest price since August, 1981.      Prices have fallen steadily since the International Coffee Organization failed in February to reach an agreement controlling exports by its members, and pressure was renewed this week as the executive board of the organization met in London without reopening debate on its export quotas.     The executive board has limited its current discussions to administrative matters and is set to adourn Thursday.     Burdensome supplies have pressed the market down from 1.30 dlrs a pound in February, when the organization\'s discussions aimed at re-establishing export quotas broke down.     Sandra Kaul, a coffee analyst in New York with Shearson Lehman Brothers, said supplies currently are at their high point for the year because most producing nations have just completed their harvests.     In addition, she said, many of those nations are faced with serious debt and need to sell coffee to raise capital.     \"This should keep substantial pressure on exporters to undertake sales despite the drop in prices,\" she said.     Further, U.S. demand could be sluggish because winter, the period of greatest consumption, is ending. Prices could fall another 10 to 15 cents a pound, analysts said.     Gold futures retreated from modest early gains and closed steady while silver prices rallied on the Commodity Exchange in New York.     The increase in U.S. banks\' prime rates prompted concern about renewed inflation but the strength of the U.S. dollar discouraged new buying.     \"The market is getting mixed signals and it doesn\'t know which way to go,\" one analyst said.     Cattle futures posted new highs on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, while live hogs rallied from early losses and frozen pork bellies finished sharply lower.     Cattle prices continued to draw support from the winter storm that swept the Plains states, leaving animals stranded in snowbound fields and feed lots in miserable condition.     Live hogs were pressured early by the Agriculture Department\'s report Tuesday that producers expanded their breeding herds more than the market expected last quarter. Prices recovered to keep pace with higher cash prices.     Frozen pork bellies fell sharply on the outlook for greater production and closed with limit losses.     Soybean futures posted sharp gains on the Chicago Board of Trade, while corn and wheat were lower.     Soybeans rallied in response to Tuesday\'s USDA report that farmers intend to plant 56.9 mln acres this year, down from 61.5 mln planted last year.     Corn prices were pressured by the outlook for 67.6 mln acres of corn, which is down from last year\'s 76.7 mln acres, but was larger than analysts expected.  \n',coffee
'Coffee prices may have to fall even lower to bring exporting and importing countries once more round the negotiating table to discuss export quotas, ICO delegates and traders said.     The failure last night of International Coffee Organization, ICO, producing and consuming countries to agree export quotas brought a sharp fall on international coffee futures markets today with the London May price reaching a 4-1/2 year low at one stage of 1,270 stg per tonne before ending the day at 1,314 stg, down 184 stg from the previous close.     The New York May price was down 15.59 at 108.00 cents a lb.     Pressure will now build up on producers returning from the ICO talks to sell coffee which had been held back in the hope the negotiations would establish quotas which would put a floor under prices, some senior traders said.     The ICO 15 day average price stood at 114.66 cents a lb for March 2. This compares with a target range of 120 to 140 cents a lb under the system operating before quotas were suspended in February last year following a sharp rise in international prices caused by drought damage to the Brazilian crop.     In a interview, Brazilian Coffee Institute, IBC, President Jorio Dauster urged producers not to panic and said they need to make hard commercial decisions. \"If we have failed at the ICO, at least we have tried,\" Dauster said, adding \"now it is time to go and sell coffee.\"     But Brazil is keeping its marketing options open. It plans to make an official estimate of the forthcoming crop next month, Dauster said. It is too difficult to forecast now. Trade sources have put the crop at over 26 mln bags compared with a previous crop of 11.2 mln. Brazil is defining details of public selling tenders for coffee bought on London\'s futures market last year.     A basic condition will be that it does not go back to the market \"in one go\" but is sold over a minimum of six months.     The breakdown of the ICO negotiations reflected a split between producers and consumers on how to set the yardstick for future quotas. Consumers said \"objective criteria\" like average exports and stocks should determine producer quota shares, Dauster said.     All elements of this proposal were open to negotiation but consumers insisted they did not want a return to the \"ad hoc\" way of settling export quotas by virtual horse trading amongst producers whilst consumers waited in the corridors of the ICO.     Dauster said stocks and exports to ICO members and non-members all need to be considered when setting quotas and that Brazil would like to apply the coffee pact with a set ratio of overall quota reflecting stock holdings.     It is a \"simplistic misconception that Brazil can dictate\" policy to other producers. While consumer countries are welcome to participate they cannot dictate quotas which are very difficult to allocate as different \"objective criteria\" achieve different share-outs of quota, Dauster said.     Other delegates said there was more open talking at the ICO and at least differences were not hidden by a bad compromise.     Consumer delegates said they had not been prepared to accept the producers\' offer to abandon quotas if it proves impossible to find an acceptable basis for them.     \"We want the basis of quotas to reflect availability and to encourage stock holding as an alternative to a buffer stock if supplies are needed at a later stage,\" one delegate said.     Some consumers claimed producer support for the consumer argument was gaining momentum towards the end of the ICO session but said it is uncertain whether this will now collapse and how much producers will sink their differences should prices fall further and remain depressed.     The ICO executive board meets here March 30 to April 1 but both producer and consumer delegates said they doubt if real negotiations will begin then. The board is due to meet in Indonesia in June with a full council scheduled for September.     More cynical traders said the pressure of market forces and politics in debt heavy Latin American producer countries could bring ICO members back around the negotiating table sooner than many imagine. In that case quotas could come into force during the summer. But most delegates and traders said quotas before October are unlikely, while Brazil\'s Dauster noted the ICO has continued although there were no quotas from 1972 to 1980.     A clear difference between the pressures already being felt by importers and exporters was that consumers would have been happy to agree on a formula for future quotas even if it could not be imposed now. At least in that way they said they could show a direct relationship between quotas and availability.     In contrast producers wanted stop-gap quotas to plug the seemingly bottomless market and were prepared to allow these to lapse should lasting agreement not be found.     \"Producers were offering us jam tomorrow but after their failure to discuss them last year promises were insufficient and we wanted a cast iron commitment now,\" one consumer said.  \n',coffee
'the sharp fall in international coffee prices will not affect colombia\'s external credit situation, finance minister cesar gaviria tolds.     \"our foreign debt is high, but we can pay, and I hope the foreign banking community will maintain its position toward us,\" he said.     He said the current decline on world coffee markets was not totally unexpected and would have no immediate bearing on colombia\'s financial state, which he described as sound.     Gaviria said the decline in coffee prices could mean a loss of 1.5 billion dlrs in revenues for 1987.     The conservative party and the country\'s largest trade union called this week for the debt to be rescheduled following the price drop.     Colombia, the only major latin american country not to have rescheduled its external public debt, has a total foreign debt of 13.6 billion dlrs.  \n',coffee
'This morning\'s sharp decline in coffee prices, following the breakdown late last night of negotiations in London to reintroduce International Coffee Organization, ICO, quotas, will be short-lived, Dutch roasters said.     \"The fall is a technical and emotional reaction to the failure to agree on reintroduction of ICO export quotas, but it will not be long before reality reasserts itself and prices rise again,\" a spokesman for one of the major Dutch roasters said.     \"The fact is that while there are ample supplies of coffee available at present, there is a shortage of quality,\" he said.     \"Average prices fell to around 110 cents a lb following the news of the breakdown but we expect them to move back again to around 120 cents within a few weeks,\" the roaster added.     Dutch Coffee Roasters\' Association secretary Jan de Vries said although the roasters were disappointed at the failure of consumer and producer ICO representatives to agree on quota reintroduction, it was equally important that quotas be reallocated on a more equitable basis.     \"There is no absolute need for quotas at this moment because the market is well balanced and we must not lose this opportunity to renegotiate the coffee agreement,\" he said.     \"There is still a lot of work to be done on a number of clauses of the International Coffee Agreement and we would not welcome quota reintroduction until we have a complete renegotiation,\" de Vries added.     With this in mind, and with Dutch roasters claiming to have fairly good forward cover, the buying strategy for the foreseeable future would probably be to buy coffee on a hand-to-mouth basis and on a sliding scale when market prices were below 120 cents a lb, roasters said.  \n',coffee
'A senior Nicaraguan official said a recent plunge in coffee prices was economically and politically disastrous for Latin American coffee-producing countries.     Nicaraguan Foreign Trade Minister Alejandro Martinez Cuenca was in London to brief International Coffee Organisation (ICO) executive board producer members after a meeting last weekend in Managua attended by eight Latin American coffee producers to discuss the fall in coffee prices.     London coffee prices slid 300 stg per tonne in March, to 1,279 stg from 1,580 stg at end-February.     Martinez told reporters the price fall since the ICO failed to agree export quotas on March 1 has had disastrous results on Latin America, both economically and politically.     He urged continued negotiations among coffee producers to pave the way for a coffee export quota agreement by September.     Coffee export quotas, used to regulate coffee prices under an International Coffee Agreement, were suspended a year ago when prices soared in response to a drought in Brazil.     Central American economic ministers have estimated the region will lose 720 mln dlrs in foreign exchange earnings in 1987 if coffee prices are not rescued by a quota arrangement, Martinez said.     He said ICO quota talks broke down last month because consumer members lack the political will to fully support commodity agreements, and because consumers tried to dictate to producers.  \n',coffee
'Coffee quota talks at the International Coffee Organization council meeting here continued this afternoon, but producers and consumers still had not reached common ground on the key issue of how to estimate export quotas, delegates said.     The 54 member contact group was examining a Colombian proposal to resume quotas April 1 under the ad hoc system used historically, with a pledge to meet again in September to discuss how quotas would be worked out in the future, they said.     Delegates would not speculate on the prospects for agreement at this time.     \"Anything could happen,\" one delegate said.  \n',coffee
'The International Coffee Organization (ICO ) council talks on reintroducing export quotas continued with an extended session lasting late into Sunday night, but delegates said prospects for an accord between producers and consumers were diminishing by the minute.     The special meeting, called to stop the prolonged slide in coffee prices, was likely to adjourn sometime tonight without agreement, delegates said.     The council is expected to agree to reconvene either within the next six weeks or in September, they said.     The talks foundered on Sunday afternoon when it became apparent consumers and producers could not compromise on the formula for calculating any future quota system, delegates said.     Coffee export quotas were suspended a year ago when prices soared in response to a drought which cut Brazil\'s crop by nearly two-thirds. Brazil is the world\'s largest coffee producer and exporter.  \n',coffee
'The collapse of International Coffee Organization, ICO, talks on export quotas yesterday removes the immediate need to reinstate U.S. legislation allowing the customs service to monitor coffee imports, analysts here said.     The Reagan administration proposed in trade legislation offered Congress last month that authority to monitor coffee imports be resumed. That authority lapsed in September 1986. A bill also was introduced by Rep. Frank Guarini (D-N.J.).     However, the failure of the ICO talks in London to reach agreement on export quotas means the U.S. legislation is not immediately needed, one analyst said. Earlier supporters of the coffee bill hoped it could be passed by Congress quickly.     \"You\'re going to have a hard time convincing Congress (now) this is an urgent issue,\" the coffee analyst said.  \n',coffee
'Failure of talks on re-establishing International Coffee Organization, ICO, coffee quotas last week may put political pressure on the United States, particularly the State Department, to reassess its position, but the U.S. is unlikely to back away from its basic demand quotas be set by \"objective criteria\", U.S. officials said.     Jon Rosenbaum, assistant U.S. trade representative and head of Washington\'s delegation to the talks, tolds on his return from London that the United States is willing to resume the coffee negotiations as early as April if necessary.     Rosenbaum said the United States will be \"flexible\" in discussing the method of establishing objective criteria and any transition to new quotas, but not on the basic aim of establishing an objective method of setting quotas.     At the ICO talks major consuming nations, led by the U.S., proposed that future coffee export quota shares be calculated by a formula incorporating a producer\'s recent exportable production and verified stocks, while large producers led by Brazil proposed maintaining the traditional ad hoc division of shares. The consumer position would have in effect reduced the market share of Brazil, by far the world\'s largest producer.     Rosenbaum said the administration would continue to support legislation now before Congress which would allow the U.S. customs service to monitor coffee imports, as a way to comply with any future coffee quotas.     He said the Reagan administration would be reviewing the coffee policy situation following the collapse of the London talks, but \"nobody is proposing we change our position.\"     However, other U.S. government officials involved in coffee policy said they are bracing for a diplomatic and coffee market offensive from producer countries, led by Brazil and Colombia, to soften the consumer position.     \"Knowing that its next crop is fairly large, Brazil will kind of want to test the resolve of other producers and consumers,\" said one U.S. official.     The U.S. official, who asked not to be identified, said Brazil and Colombia may flood the coffee market in the next few months in an effort to drive down prices and pressure other countries, particularly the splinter group of small producers who differed with the major producers in London.     This in turn could lead to urgent appeals from Latin American countries, faced with mounting debt problems, to the U.S. State department, and to the National Security Council in the White House, for an easing of the U.S. position, U.S. officials said.     The State department, a major player in setting U.S. coffee policy, may then face conflicting pressures, particularly from politically-sensitive U.S. allies in Central America, U.S. officials said.     El Salvador and Guatemala both backed Brazil and Colombia at the London talks in resisting pressures for quotas based on objective criteria. But the Dominican Republic and Costa Rica joined the splinter group, which said it would agree to objective criteria.     There is a strong feeling among some in the State Department that the United States should continue to support the splinter group of producers who have taken the politically-risky step of opposing Brazil on the objective criteria question, U.S. officials said.     Within the consuming countries there also is expected to be some pressure to reassess positions.     In London, the U.S. was supported by the U.K., the Netherlands, West Germany, Japan, Australia and New Zealand on the issue of objective criteria, U.S. officials said.     This bloc represented enough votes among consuming nations to successfully prevent adoption of the producer proposals.     However, U.S. sources said West Germany\'s support was at times qualified and there is some concern that the European Community could come under pressure to be more accommodative to producers in future talks. France backed the Ivory Coast and other African producers during the talks.     A softening of the EC stance would make it more difficult, although not impossible, for the U.S. to block producer plans.     While political manuevering by small producers and consuming countries will be important, U.S. officials said the key to any future outcome will be Brazil\'s position.     U.S. officials blamed Brazil\'s intransigence for the failure of the talks and said a more flexible position from Brasilia would be the most important step toward agreement.  \n',coffee
'The failure of the International Coffee Organization (ICO) to reach agreement on coffee export quotas could trigger a massive selloff in London coffee futures of at least 100 stg per tonne today, coffee trade sources said.     Prices could easily drop to as low as 1.00 dlr or even 80 cents a lb this year from around 1.25 dlrs now, they said.     A special meeting between importing and exporting countries ended in a deadlock late yesterday after eight days of talks over how to set the quotas. No further meeting to discuss quotas was set, delegates said.     Quotas, the major device used to stabilize prices under the International Coffee Agreement, were suspended a year ago after prices soared following a damaging drought in Brazil.     With no propects for quotas in sight, heavy producer selling initially and a price war among commercial coffee roasting companies will ensue, the trade sources predicted.     Lower prices are sure to trickle down to the supermarket shelf this spring, coffee dealers said.     The U.S. And Brazil, the largest coffee importer and exporter respectively, each laid the blame on the other for the breakdown of the talks.     Jon Rosenbaum, U.S. Assistant trade representative and delegate to the talks, said in a statement after the council adjourned, \"A majority of producers, led by Brazil, were not prepared to negotiate a new distribution based on objective criteria.     \"We want to insure that countries receive export quotas based on their ability to supply the market, instead of their political influence in the ICO.\"     Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) President Jorio Dauster countered, \"Negotiations failed because consumers tried to dictate quotas, not negotiate them.\"     Previously, quotas were determined by historical amounts exported, which gave Brazil a 30 pct share of a global market of about 58 mln 60-kilo bags. A majority of producers wanted quotas to continue under this basic scheme.     But most consumers and a maverick group of eight producers proposed carving up the export market on the basis of exportable production and stocks, which would reduce Brazil\'s share to 28.8 pct.     Consumer delegates said this method would reflect changes in many countries\' export capabilities and make coffee more readily available to consumers when they need it.     A last-minute attempt by Colombia, the second largest exporter, to rescue the talks with a compromise interim proposal could not bring the two sides together.     Delegates speculated Brazil\'s financial problems, illustrated by its recent suspension of interest payments on bank debt, have increased political pressure on the country to protect its coffee export earnings.     Developing coffee-producing countries that depend heavily on coffee earnings, particularly some African nations and Colombia, are likely to be hurt the most by the ICO\'s failure to agree quotas, analysts said.     The expected drop in prices could result in losses of as much as three billion dlrs in a year, producer delegates forecast.     The ICO executive board will meet March 31, but the full council is not due to meet again until September, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'The New York Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange (CSCE) elected former first vice chairman Gerald Clancy to a two-year term as chairman of the board of managers, replacing previous chairman Howard Katz.     Katz, chairman since 1985, will remain a board member.     Clancy currently serves on the Exchange board of managers as chairman of its appeals, executive, pension and political action committees.     The CSCE also elected Charles Nastro, executive vice president of Shearson Lehman Bros, as first vice chairman. Anthony Maccia, vice president of Woodhouse, Drake and Carey, was named second vice chairman, and Clifford Evans, president of Demico Futures, was elected treasurer.  \n',coffee
'Colombian finance minister Cesar Gaviria blamed an inflexible U.S. position for the failure of last week\'s International Coffee Organisation, ICO, talks on export quotas.     \"We understand that the U.S. Position was more inflexible than the one of Brazil, where current economic and political factors make it difficult to adopt certain positions,\" Gaviria tolds in an interview.     The U.S. and Brazil have each laid the blame on the other for the breakdown in the negotiations to re-introduce export quotas after being extended through the weekend in London.     Gaviria stressed that Colombia tried to ensure a successful outcome of the London talks but he deplored that intransigent attitudes, both from producing and consuming nations, made it impossible.     In a conversation later with local journalists, Gaviria said the U.S. attitude would have serious economic and political consequences, not necessarily for a country like Colombia but certainly for other Latin American nations and for some African countries.     He tolds that Colombia, because of the relatively high level of its coffee stocks, would probably suffer less.     According to Gaviria, Colombia can hope to earn about 1,500 mln dlrs this calendar year from coffee exports, which traditionally account for 55 pct of the country\'s total export revenue.     That estimate would represent a drop in revenues of 1,400 mln dlrs from 1986.     Colombia, which held stockpiles of 10.5 mln bags at the start of the current coffee year, exported a record 11.5 mln bags in the 1985/86 coffee year ending last September 30.  \n',coffee
'Private coffee exporters say Colombia\'s more pragmatic coffee marketing policy will ensure that the country does not suffer excessively from current depressed prices and erratic market conditions.     Gilberto Arango, president of the exporters\' association, said in an interview that Colombia, the world\'s second largest producer, was in a position to withstand a prolonged absence of International Coffee Organization (ICO) export quotas.     \"Colombia is one of the countries that will benefit most from this situation,\" he said.     Recent ICO talks in London failed to break a deadlock over re-introduction of export quotas, suspended in February 1986, and no date has been set for a new meeting on the issue.     Arango said that government measures adopted here last week, including a lower export registration price, indicated a major change but also disclosed a welcome pragmatism.     \"This is the start of a new era in Colombia because world market conditions are also new,\" he said.     The government lowered local taxes for exporters and said the export registration price, or reintegro, will be changed more often in order to closely reflect market trends.     Arango said an illustration of Colombia\'s new attitude was the decision on Friday to open export registrations for an unlimited amount.     But he added it did not imply the country would begin heavy selling of coffee.     \"Our marketing policy is to sell without haste but consistently. No targets for volume will be set. We will react to market factors adequately and Colombia has no intention of giving its coffee away.\"     Colombia\'s past records should be the basis for upcoming exports, he said.     \"We will certainly not export seven mln (60-kilo) bags but neither are we going to sell like mad. The trade knows full well what Colombia\'s export potential is,\" he said.     Colombia, with stockpiles standing at about 10 mln bags, exported a record 11.5 mln bags in the 1985/86 coffee year which ended last September, and 11.3 mln in calendar 1986.     Arango did not want to commit himself on export predictions but said that output for the 1986/87 coffee year would not exceed 10.5 mln bags, compared with 12 mln forecast by the National Coffee Growers\' Federation and 12.5 mln by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, a figure he said was \"ridiculous.\"     He said ageing plantations and rust, in particular in the number one producing province of Antioquia, meant output was likely to fall but that nationwide estimates were rare and oscillated between 9.5 mln and 11.5 mln bags.     On the failure of the recent ICO talks, Arango said Colombia understandably felt frustrated at not having managed to force a compromise.     Jorge Cardenas, manager of the national federation and head of his nation\'s delegation in London, has blamed the intransigence of some big countries, without naming them.     However, Arango, like Colombian Finance Minister Cesar Gaviria last week, was more explicit and said the United States would undoubtedly be under great political pressure in coming weeks to revise its policy.     \"Washington will have to take into account that for many countries, and some of its allies for instance in Central America, a sharp fall in coffee export revenue would have far-reaching political and economic consequences.\"     Arango ruled out a fresh Colombian initiative on export quotas saying producers had now to show a common resolve which could emerge from continuous contacts.  \n',coffee
'Colombia denied having sold 440,000 60-kg bags of old crop coffee below current market prices to clients in Europe and Asia.     A spokesman for the National Coffee Growers Federation, commenting on rumours which had circulated in market circles, said these were false.  \n',coffee
'Coffee producing countries must quickly map out a fresh common strategy following the failure of the International Coffee Organization, ICO, to reach agreement on export quotas, Gilberto Arango, president of Colombia\'s private coffee exporters\' association, said.     Arango tolds that the most intelligent thing now would be to seek a unifying stand from producers, including Brazil, in order to map out a strategy to defend prices.     An ICO special meeting ended last night in London with exporting and consuming nations failing to agree on a resumption of export quotas, suspended one year ago after prices soared following a prolonged drought in Brazil.     Arango said there would be no imminent catastrophe but predicted that over the short term prices would undoubtedly plummet.     However, he said the market should also take into account evident factors such as Brazil\'s low stocks and the sale of the near totality of the Central American crop.     Trade sources said Colombia\'s coffee was today quoted at 1.14 dlrs a lb in New York, its second lowest price in the past 10 years.     Cardenas said these countries apparently fail to understand the true impact of such a failure for coffee producing nations as well as for industrialized countries.     It is difficult to believe that while efforts are made to solve the problem of the developing world\'s external debt, decisions are being taken which cut earnings used for repaying those debts, he said.     \"In Colombia\'s case, we watch with consternation that, while we try to effectively combat drug trafficking, countries which support us in this fight seek to cut our jugular vein,\" Cardenas said.  \n',coffee
'Colombia will not attend a meeting of coffee producing countries scheduled for this weekend in Nicaragua, Jorge Cadenas, manager of the National Coffee Growers\' Federation, said.     \"We prefer to wait until things are better prepared,\" he tolds. He added the meeting could be postponed.     Colombia, Brazil and the Central American coffee producing countries were invited to the meeting in Managua to analyze the market situation     However, he did not dismiss the idea of dialogue and negotiation in preparation for meetings of the International Coffee Organization.     Gilberto Arango, president of Colombia\'s exporters\' association, speaking tos earlier this week, ruled out a fresh Colombian initiative on export quotas saying producers had now to show a common resolve which could emerge from continuous contacts.     The International Coffee Organization executive board is to meet in London between March 31 and April 2.  \n',coffee
'Colombia intends to improve the marketing of its coffee with the accent on more flexibility on setting export registration prices, finance minister Cesar Gaviria said.     Speaking to reporters after announcing a lower export registration price, or reintegro, of 1.10 dlr per lb ex-dock New York, Gaviria said export mechanisms would be more agile.     \"In the first stage, we decided not only to lower the reintegro but also to adopt a flexible policy of reintegro that will allow private exporters to participate more actively in Colombia\'s coffee export policy,\" he said.     Traders said this means the export registration price will change more often in a truer reflection of market trends.     Gaviria said the measures merely responded to new market factors since a return to a system of International Coffee Organisation (ICO) export quotas may not occur in the short term.     ICO talks last month in London failed to break a deadlock over re-introduction of export quotas, suspended in February 1986.     Gaviria stressed that Colombia will not necessarily suffer from depressed prices because it can compensate lower prices with increased volume.     \"Colombia will continue to export its traditional amount of coffee, between 9.6 and 10 mln bags (of 60 kilos), and will do so without an agreement among producers,\" he said.     He ruled out a much higher volume of exports, or up to 13.5 mln bags as mentioned in market circles, \"because the idea is precisely not to disrupt the market.\"     Colombia exported a record 11.5 mln bags in the 1985/86 coffee year which ended last September 30.     Echoing Gaviria\'s words, Jorge Cardenas, manager of the national coffee growers\' federation, said Colombia sought to adapt its coffee marketing policy to circumstances.     \"There is great expectation in the world for the policies that Brazil and Colombia will adopt. Ours is beginning to emerge and no agreement among producers is foreseeable in the immediate future,\" he told journalists.     Trade sources in Rio today said Brazil\'s future export policy was unlikely to be revealed before the end of next week.     Cardenas said a new ICO meeting could only take place when problems that hindered an agreement at the recent London talks have been resolved.     Asked to comment on a report from Jakarta saying Indonesia hoped Colombia could use its contacts with Brazil to suggest a compromise on the quota issue, Cardenas said the Brazilian stand was quite clear.     He said Brazil\'s current quota \"reflects the reality of the market, allows for an orderly supply and satisfies demand,\" but added more clarity was needed to assess the criteria that determined it.     Cardenas said lows registered immediately after the failure of the London talks were triggered by a widespread fear among dealers of an imminent price war and the belief that producers would go out and sell their coffee as quickly as possible, which did not happen.  \n',coffee
'Costa Rica\'s economy minister said he sees new hope for winning changes in the International Coffee Organisation system of export quotas.     Minister Luis Diego Escalante, who serves as president of the Costa Rican Coffee Institute, said he was hopeful because of the support offered Costa Rica and other smaller producing- nations by such major consumers as the United States, Britain and the Netherlands at last week\'s ICO meeting in london.     Escalante told a news conference here he \"carried the weight of the negotiations\" at the meeting by calling for larger export quotas for the smaller coffee-growing nations.     Costa rica is insisting, Escalante said, on a new quota system based on a producing nation\'s real export capacity, once it has satisfied internal demand.     \"There are countries such as our own whose sales possibilities are close to or above 100 pct of their current quotas,\" Escalante said.     At the same time, there are countries favoured by the current system that have been assigned quotas far above their export potential, he said.     The current ICO quota system is \"unfair and autocratic,\" Escalante said.     Escalante attributed the nosedive in international coffee prices over the last week to speculation rather than real matters of supply and demand.     \"Be careful,\" he warned, \"there\'s not as much coffee in the world as they say. What there is are bags of sawdust.\"  \n',coffee
'The nine creditor banks of the Singapore coffee trader Teck Hock and Co (Pte) Ltd are thinking of buying a controlling stake in the company themselves, a creditor bank official said.     Since last December the banks have been allowing the company to postpone loan repayments while they try to find an overseas commodity company to make an offer for the firm.     At least one company has expressed interest and negotiations are not yet over, banking sources said.     However, the banks are now prepared to consider taking the stake if they find an investor willing to inject six to seven mln dlrs in the company but not take control, the banking sources said.     Teck Hock\'s financial adviser, Singapore International Merchant Bankers Ltd (SIMBL), will work on the new proposal with the creditor banks, they said.     Major holdings are likely to be held by the two largest creditor banks, Standard Chartered Bank STCH.L and Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp Ltd OCBM.SI, they added.     Teck Hock owes over 100 mln Singapore dlrs and the creditor banks earlier this week agreed to let Teck Hock fufill profitable contracts to help balance earlier losses.     The nine banks are Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp Ltd, United Overseas Bank Ltd UOBM.SI, Banque Paribas, Bangkok Bank Ltd, Citibank NA, Standard Chartered Bank Ltd, Algemene Bank Nederland NV ABNN.AS, Banque Nationale De Paris BNPP.PA and Chase Manhattan Bank NA.  \n',coffee
'The Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange amended regulations governing expanded trading limits on coffee, cocoa and sugar contracts to provide uniformity.     Effective today, the exchange will permit normal daily price limits in those commodities to expand whenever the first two limited contract months move the limit in the same direction for two consecutive sessions.     The normal daily limits will be reinstated once the first two limited deliveries close by less than the normal limit for two successive trading days.     Previously exchange rules required the first three limited months to move the limit in coffee and cocoa. It had required the first two limited sugar deliveries to make such moves for three consecutive sessions.  \n',coffee
'An additional margin of 1,000 dlrs will be required on all July 1987 delivery coffee \"C\" contracts as of the opening of trade Monday, March 23, the Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange, CSCE, said.     The March contract ends trading this week, making May and July the two \"spot,\" or unlimited, contract months next week.     Members will then have to obtain a minimum 3,500 dlrs for net long or net short positions in the May and July contracts, including a 2,500 original margin plus the additional 1,000 dlr spot charge.  \n',coffee
'The Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange has expanded the normal daily trading limit in Coffee \"C\" contracts to 6.0 cents a lb, from the previous 4.0 cents, effective today, the CSCE said.     The new daily limits apply to all but the two nearby positions, currently May and July, which trade without limits.     In addition, the 6.0 cent limit can be increased to 9.0 cents a lb if the first two limited months both make limit moves in the same direction for two consecutive sessions, according to the CSCE announcement.     Before the rule change today, the CSCE required two days of limit moves in the first three restricted contracts before expanding the daily trading limit.     Under new guidelines, if the first two restricted deliveries move the 6.0 cent limit for two days the Exchange will expand the limit. The expanded 9.0 cent limit will remain in effect until the settling prices on both of the first two limited months has not moved by more than the normal 6.0 cent limit for other contracts in two successive trading sessions, the CSCE said.  \n',coffee
'Brazil will not announce any changes to its coffee export policy, Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) president Jorio Dauster said.     He tolds Brazil was not planning to modify the position it held before the recent International Coffee Organisation meeting.     Earlier this month, talks in London to set new ICO export quotas failed.     Commenting on the outcome of a coffee producers\' meeting in Managua last weekend, Dauster said that they discussed nothing involving the market.     \"In the meeting we agreed to work on behalf of the union of the producers in matters related to an international agreement,\" Dauster said.     The Managua meeting was attended by representatives from Brazil, Mexico, Guatemala, El Salvador, Honduras, Costa Rica, Nicaragua and Panama, the latter represented at the meeting merely as an observer.  \n',coffee
'Zimbabwe\'s projected coffee output of 13,000 tonnes for 1987/88 could be reduced by drought, growers said.     The main coffee growing areas in eastern Zimbabwe have received little rain since April 1986 and the Coffee Growers\' Association has begun a survey to assess the effects of the drought, a spokesman said.     Zimbabwe exported 11,000 tonnes of coffee in 1986, mainly to West Germany, Britain, Japan, the Netherlands, Switzerland and the United States.  \n',coffee
'Dutch green coffee imports fell to 10,430 tonnes in January from 13,506 tonnes in January 1986, and exports fell to 366 tonnes from 615, the Central Bureau of Statistics said.     Imports of Colombian coffee were 2,169 tonnes (3,025 in January 1986), Brazilian 483 (3,715), Indonesian 455 (145), Guatemalan 196 (126), Cameroun 464 (560) and Ivory Coast 353 (839).  \n',coffee
'The Bremen green coffee market attracted good buying interest for Colombian coffee last week, while Brazils were almost neglected, trade sources said.     Buyers were awaiting the opening of Brazil\'s export registrations for May shipment, which could affect prices for similar qualities, they said.     Colombia opened export registrations and good business developed with both the FNC and private shippers. Prices were said to have been very attractive, but details were not immediately available.     Central Americans were sought for spot and afloat.     In the robusta sector nearby material was rather scarce, with turnover limited, the sources said.     The following offers were in the market at the end of last week, first or second hand, sellers\' ideas for spot, afloat or prompt shipment in dlrs per 50 kilos fob equivalent, unless stated (previous week\'s prices in brackets) -     Brazil unwashed German quals 100 (102), Colombia Excelso 105 (110), Salvador SHG 110 (108), Nicaragua SHG 109 (same), Guatemala HB 111 (same), Costa Rica SHB 113 (112), Kenya AB FAQ 142 (134), Tanzania AB FAQ 120 (same), Zaire K-5 105 (unq), Sumatra robusta EK-1 91 CIF (same).  \n',coffee
'Guatemala will host a meeting of other milds coffee producers probably in May to discuss basic export quotas, the Guatemalan delegate to the International Coffee Organization, ICO, said.     No firm date has been set for the talks, Ambassador Rene Montes told reporters at the ICO executive board meeting here.     Producer countries Brazil, Colombia, and a member of OAMCAF, the African and Malagasy Coffee Organization, may also be invited for consultation, he said.     ICO producers and consumers could not agree on how to calculate export quota shares at a recent council meeting here.     Other milds coffee producers include Costa Rica, Dominican Republic, Ecuador, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, India, Mexico, Nicaragua, Papua New Guinea, and Peru.  \n',coffee
'The Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) tonight closed export registrations, exporters said.     They said they heard of the closure from IBC officials but no officials could be reached immediately for confirmation.     Earlier an IBC statement said registrations for May, the only month which was open, today totalled 1.4 mln bags of 60 kilos to bring the total registered for the month to 2.05 mln.  \n',coffee
'The Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) confirmed having closed May export registrations, effective April 6.     On Friday night exporters said they had heard of the closure from IBC officials, but the officials could not at the time be reached for confirmation.  \n',coffee
'The Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) could close May export registrations tonight following extremely heavy sales today, exporters said.     They estimated registrations today at between 1.0 mln and 1.2 mln 60 kilo bags. Yesterday 645,000 bags were registered.     The exporters said over 1.0 mln bags of total registrations could have been the declaration of sales made in the six weeks during which books were closed. The rest would be new sales.     When the IBC opened May registrations from yesterday it did not set any volume limit. April registrations opened and closed on February 16 when a daily record 1.68 mln bags were declared.  \n',coffee
'The Brazilian Coffee Institute, IBC, is expected to maintain its previous pricing system when it reopens export registrations, probably later this week, exporters said.     They said IBC President Jorio Dauster is likely to leave the basic formula for the minimum registration price unchanged but raise the contribution quota to partially offset the effects of cruzado devaluation since April registrations were closed in mid-February.     To fully compensate for devaluation the quota would have to be around 28 dlrs per bag against 7.0 when registrations closed.     However, even a 21 dlr per bag rise in the contribution quota would make Brazil coffees uncompetitive on world markets, and an increase to around 15 dlrs a bag is more likely, the exporters said.     They added that Dauster is keen to raise the contribution quota as the Institute needs money to repay Central Governmnet funds released to finance IBC purchases at the guaranteed producer price.     Although a vote in the Monetary Council to provide more funds for such purchases was deferred on technical grounds last week, funds are still being released for subsequent approval.     The sources said it is still unclear when registrations will be reopened, although most expect it to be by the end of this week.     \"Brazil owes it to its customers to make its intentions know. A country like Brazil cannot afford to be permanently closed down,\" one exporter said.     However, before announcing its export policy the IBC is likely to wait to see if tomorrow\'s meeting of the International Coffee Organisation, ICO, executive board in London decides to call a full council meeting to discuss reintroduction of export quotas, sources said.     There is also talk of the announcement this week of new measures to adjust the Brazilian economy, and the IBC could be awaiting clarification before making any move, the exporters said.     Another factor which could be delaying the opening of registrations is the current strike by bank workers which, while not affecting current shipments, could affect documentation and currency operations for new sales.     This would certainly be the case if the IBC was considering obliging exporters to pay the contribution quota within two or three days of registering a sale. \n',coffee
'Jorio Dauster, president of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, IBC, left Brazil early today to attend a weekend meeting of Latin American coffee producers in Managua, an IBC official said.     Carlos Brasil, an adviser to the IBC president, said Dauster had left Rio de Janeiro for Managua early this morning.     There were rumours on the London coffee market earlier today that Dauster would not attend the meeting.  \n',coffee
'Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) president Jorio Dauster said he will not attend the ICO executive board meeting and was surprised to hear that a report of his absence had a slightly depressing effect on the New York coffee market today.     \"I have too much work to accomplish here in Brazil at the moment. Besides the presence of the IBC president at an ICO executive board meeting is not a tradition,\" Dauster said.     Dauster said except in rare cases, Brazil has always sent its London-based representative to ICO board meetings. Ambassador Lindenberg Sette will attend the meeting, he said.  \n',coffee
'Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) president Jorio Dauster said he will attend a meeting in Managua this weekend.     He tolds by telephone from Brasilia that the meeting, involving Brazil, Colombia and Central American coffee producers, will be strictly to review the coffee market situation.     \"The meeting is set for Saturday but could also continue on Sunday,\" he said.  \n',coffee
'The Brazilian Coffee Institute today registered 1.4 mln 60 kilo bags of green coffee for May shipment, an IBC statement said.     This brings the total in the two days registrations have been open to 2.05 mln, including 4,868 bags of soluble.     Today\'s registrations comprised 1,076,226 bags to members and 326,259 to non-members of the International Coffee Organisation. No soluble sales were registered today.  \n',coffee
'The International Coffee Organization (ICO) executive board meeting scheduled for the end of this month has been delayed by one day and will now run from March 31 to April 2 and not March 30 to April 1, ICO officials said.     On March 30, the ICO ad hoc working group will meet to consider management consultants Ernst &amp; Whinney\'s report on the ICO secretariat. This report was commissioned late last year to report on the administrative structure of the ICO.  \n',coffee
'Executive board members of the International Coffee Organization, ICO, passed over the issue of export quota negotiations at its regular meeting here, delegates said.     No move was made to reopen dialogue on export quotas and no further discussion on the issue is likely during the three-day talks, they said.     Producer and consumer members of the ICO council failed to agree export quota shares in early March.     Neither Brazil, the largest producer, nor the U.S., the largest consumer, are ready to be flexible, delegates said.     \"The situation is unchanged,\" consumer spokesman Abraham Van Overbeeke told reporters. \"As long as Brazil sticks to its position there will not be quotas -- there is no point in meeting.\"     At the last council meeting, Brazil wanted to maintain its previous quota share of around 30 pct of the market. Consumers and a splinter group of eight producers favoured redistribution of export shares using \"objective criteria,\" which would likely have reduced Brazil\'s share.     Brazilian delegate Lindenberg Sette said that, if quota negotiations were to resume, the 1.0 mln bag shortfall Brazil was willing to give up in early March if the producer proposal was accepted would no longer be on the table.     \"As we said from the start...No agreement, no one million bags,\" he tolds.     Shortfalls of 200,000 bags offered by OAMCAF, the African and Malagasy Coffee Organization, and 20,000 bags offered by Angola, are also no longer valid, delegates said.     The closest the board came to discussing quotas was a briefing by the Guatemalan ICO delegate Rene Montes on a recent Latin American producers meeting in Managua, delegates said.     There, the producers expressed their political will to negotiate basic quotas, particularly in the face of the damaging drop in coffee prices after the council failed to agree quotas, Montes said.     The ICO board also reviewed export statistics and stock verification. They expected talks on stock verification to take up the remainder of today\'s session, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'Chances that the International Coffee Organization, ICO, executive board meeting this week will agree to resume negotiations on export quotas soon look remote, ICO delegates and trade sources said.     ICO observers doubted Brazil or key consuming countries are ready to give sufficient ground to convince the other side that reopening negotiations again would be worthwhile, they said.     ICO talks on quotas last month broke down after eight days when producers and consumers failed to reach agreement.      \"Since we have not seen signs of change in other positions, it\'s difficult to see a positive outcome at this stage,\" Brazilian delegate Lindenberg Sette said. But quotas must be negotiated sometime, he said.      The U.S. has indicated it is open to dialogue on quotas but that Brazil must be flexible, rather than refuse to lower its export share as it did in the last negotiations, delegates said.      At this week\'s March 31-April 2 meeting, the 16-member ICO board is scheduled to discuss the current market situation, the reintroduction of quotas, verification of stocks and some administrative matters, according to a draft agenda.     The fact that Brazilian Coffee Institute president Jorio Dauster, Assistant U.S. Trade Representative Jon Rosenbaum and chief Colombian delegate Jorge Cardenas are not attending the meeting has signalled to most market watchers that it will be a non-event as far as negotiating quotas is concerned.     \"I would imagine there will be a lot of politicking among producers behind closed doors to work up some kind of proposal by September (the next scheduled council meeting),\" Bronwyn Curtis of Landell Mills Commodities Studies said.     Traders and delegates said they have seen no sign that a date will be set for an earlier council meeting.     If the stalemate continues much longer, analysts expect the coffee agreement will end up operating without quotas for the remainder of its life, to September 30, 1989.     When talks broke down, the U.S. and Brazil, the largest coffee consumer and producer respectively, blamed one another for sabotaging negotiations by refusing to compromise.     Brazil wanted to maintain the previous export quota shares, under which it was allocated 30 pct of world coffee exports, but consumers and a small group of producers pressed for shares to be redistributed using \"objective criteria,\" which would have threatened Brazil\'s share.     At a recent meeting in Managua of Latin American producers, Costa Rica and Honduras said they were willing to put their objections as members of the group of eight ICO \"dissident\" producers aside, in order to stem the damaging decline in prices, Nicaraguan External Trade Minister Alejandro Martinez Cuenca told reporters Saturday. He was in London to brief producers on the Managua meeting.     However, other producers said they were not aware of this move toward producer solidarity.     London coffee prices closed at 1,276 stg a tonne today, down from around 1,550 at the beginning of March.  \n',coffee
'International Coffee Organization, ICO, producers will meet at 1500 GMT (0900 est) for a general discussion of the market situation, producer spokesman Lindenberg Sette said.     The Brazilian delegate said several producers requested the meeting but Brazil was not among them. The ICO executive board\'s regular session this week has so far been confined to routine matters, with no attempt by producers or consumers to revive export quota negotiations, delegates said.     Talks to restore quotas collapsed early last month when producers and consumers failed to resolve differences on how quotas should be allocated.     Producer delegates said there was no sense of urgency among producers to reopen quota talks with consumers, with most countries now prepared to wait for the ICO\'s annual September council session to restart negotiations.     Members of the Inter-African Coffee Organization called for today\'s producer meeting to exchange views on the market situation, the producer delegates said.     The lack of a new debate on export quotas here this week was cited as the reason for renewed weakness in coffee prices in London and New York futures, traders said.     Near May in London hit a five-year low this morning at 1,220 stg, about 50 stg below last night\'s close, they said.     The executive board session looks set to end today, following a final session at 1600 GMT (1000 est) when a consultancy report of the operation of the ICO will be presented to producers and consumers, delegates added.  \n',coffee
'A special meeting of the International Coffee Organization (ICO) council failed to agree on how to set coffee export quotas, ICO delegates said.     Producers and consumers could not find common ground on the issue of quota distribution in eight days of arduous, often heated talks, delegates said.     Export quotas -- the major device of the International Coffee Agreement to stabilise prices -- were suspended a year ago after coffee prices soared in reaction to a drought in Brazil which cut its output by two thirds.     Delegates and industry representatives predicted coffee prices could plummet more than 100 stg a tonne to new four year lows tomorrow in response to the results of the meeting.  \n',coffee
'International Coffee Organization (ICO) exporters will modify their new proposal on quota resumption before presenting it to importers tomorrow, ICO delegates said.     The change, which will be discussed tonight informally among producers, follows talks after the formal producer session with the eight-member producer splinter group and will affect the proposed quota distribution for 12 months from April one, they said.     The proposed share-out would still include shortfall declarations, they said.  \n',coffee
'The prospects of the International Coffee Organization (ICO) reaching an agreement on coffee export quotas before September appear dim, Alberto Hesse, former president of the European Coffee Federation, said.     \"There is no real goodwill in certain delegations to go to quotas,\" Hesse, who advises the Italian Foreign Affairs Ministry on coffee issues, tolds. He declined to name the delegations.     A special meeting between importing and exporting countries ended in a deadlock late yesterday after eight days of talks over how to set quotas.     The ICO executive board will meet from March 30 to April 1 but the full council is not due to meet again until September. \"I am not optimistic about an agreement soon,\" Hesse said.  \n',coffee
'International Coffee Organization, ICO, producing countries will present a proposal for reintroducing export quotas for 12 months from April 1 with a firm undertaking to try to negotiate up to September 30 any future quota distribution on a new basis, ICO delegates said.     Distribution from April 1 would be on an unchanged basis as in an earlier producer proposal, which includes shortfall redistributions totalling 1.22 mln bags, they said.     Resumption of an ICO contact group meeting with consumers, scheduled for this evening, has been postponed until tomorrow, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'Talks at the extended special meeting of the International Coffee Organization (ICO) on the reintroduction of export quotas continued, but chances of success were still almost impossible to gauge, delegates said.     Producer delegates were meeting to examine a Colombian proposal to resume historical quotas from April 1 to September, with a promise to define specific new criteria by which a new quota system would be calculated in September for the new crop year, they said.     Opinions among delegates over the potential for reaching a quota agreement varied widely.     Some consumers said the mood of the meeting seemed slightly more optimistic. But Brazil\'s unwillingness to concede any of its traditional 30.55 pct of its export market share looks likely to preclude any accord, other delegates said.     No fresh proposals other than the Colombian initiative had been tabled formally today, delegates said.     A full council meeting was set for 1900 hours for a progress report, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'The failure of International Coffee Organization talks on the reintroduction of quotas has paralysed business on the Hamburg green coffee market in the past week, trade sources said.     There was only sporadic activity for spot material, which was mainly requirement buying, they said, adding that pre-registered coffees were no longer available.     They said they expected Brazil and Colombia to open export registrations for May shipment next week. However, the president of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, Jorio Dauster, said yesterday he had not yet decided when its registrations would reopen.  \n',coffee
'The restoration of coffee export quotas before the end of the current 1986/87 coffee year (Oct 1/Sept 30) now seems unlikely, given reluctance by International Coffee Organization, ICO, producers and consumers to resume negotiations on an interim quota accord, producer delegates told reporters.     Consumers and most producers see no point in reopening the quota dialogue while Brazil\'s position remains unchanged, they said.     Brazil\'s refusal to accept a reduction in its previous 30 pct share of the ICO\'s global export quota effectively torpedoed talks here last month aimed at restoring quotas before October, the delegates noted.     Disappointment at the lack of progress on quotas forced coffee futures in London and New York to new lows today, traders here said. Near May in New York fell below one dlr in early trading at around 99.10 cents per pound, traders said.     Producer delegates said that while the possibility of reimposing quotas before October remained on the ICO agenda, in practice the idea had effectively been discarded.     The ICO\'s executive board session here this week has so far barely touched on the quota debate, demonstrating general unwillingness to revive talks while chances of success are still remote, producer delegates said.     Some producers are in no hurry to see quotas restored, despite the price collapse seen since the failure of last month\'s negotiations, they said.     \"With Brazil\'s frost season approaching, who wants to negotiate quotas,\" one leading producer delegate said.     Coffee prices normally rise during Brazil\'s frost season (mainly June-August) as dealers and roasters build up stocks as insurance against possible severe frost damage to Brazil\'s crop.     Many producers are more interested in working towards reimposing quotas from October 1, based on a new system of quota allocations valid until the International Coffee Agreement expires in 1989, they said.     Guatemala has already proposed the \"other oilds\" producer group should meet in the next two months to begin talks on how to allocate quota shares.     Producers still seem divided on how to overhaul the quota distribution system, with some producer delegates reporting growing support for a radical reallocation, based on the principle of \"objective criteria\" favoured by consumers.     At last month\'s council session a splinter group of small producers backed consumer demands for new quota shares based on exportable production and stocks, while Brazil, Colombia and the rest of the producers favoured leaving quota allocations unchanged, except for some temporary adjustments.     A delegate from one of the eight said more producers now supported their cause.     The delegate said unless major producers like Brazil showed readiness to negotiate new quota shares, prospects for a quota accord in October also looked bleak.     The U.S. and most other consumers are still determined to make reimposition of quotas conditional on a redistribution of quota shares based on \"objective criteria.\"     ICO observers remained sceptical that Brazil would be prepared to accept a quota reduction when the ICO council meets in September.     Brazil has adopted a tough stance with banks on external debt negotiations and is likely to be just as tough on coffee, they said.     They said Brazil\'s reluctance to open coffee export registrations might reflect fears this would provoke another price slide and force an emergency ICO council session, which would most likely end in failure.     Producers met this afternoon to review the market situation but had only a general discussion about how further negotiations should proceed, a producer delegate said.     Producers plan to hold consultations on quotas, and then may set a date for a formal producer meeting, but plans are not fixed, he said.     The ICO executive board reconvened at 1650 hours local time to hear a report from consultants on ICO operations. The board meeting looks set to end today, a day earlier than scheduled, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'Talks on coffee export quotas at the International Coffee Organization (ICO) special council session will resume at noon gmt today, following a last minute decision taken early this morning to extend the meeting 24 hours, ICO officials said.     An 18 member contact group will meet at midday to examine new ideas, and the full council is to convene at 1900gmt, they said.     The extension resulted from a last ditch effort by Colombia to salvage the talks, which by late yesterday looked perilously close to ending without agreement on quotas, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'The International Coffee Organization executive board meeting will end tomorrow without any move to reopen the debate on restoring coffee export quotas, delegates said.     Talks have focused on administrative matters and verification of stocks in producer countries, they said.     Producers met briefly today to exchange views on the market situation but there seems little chance discussion on quotas will begin much before the ICO\'s annual council session in September, they said.     Delegates earlier thought the meeting would end tonight, but a further session is scheduled tomorrow at 1030 GMT to complete reports on stock verification.     Meantime, the executive board will meet May 12 to discuss possible action on the consultancy report on the ICO presented today to the board, consumer delegates said.  \n',coffee
'India cut the export duty on coffee to 330 rupees per 100 kg from 600 rupees, effective March 23, a Coffee Board official said.     The reduction should help India reach its coffee export target of 90,000 tonnes in fiscal 1987/88 ending March 31, against provisionally estimated exports of 75,000 tonnes in 1986/87 and an actual 99,254 tonnes in 1985/86, he said.     India is likely to press for international export quotas at a meeting of coffee producers in London this week because of depressed prices, he added.     The International Coffee Organisation, which represents both consumers and producers, has so far failed to reach agreement on quotas.     India feels it will be useful to have quotas now because the slide in prices is unlikely to be halted immediately, he said.     Export quotas were suspended in February 1986 when market prices surged after a drought devastated Brazil\'s coffee crop.  \n',coffee
'Indonesian coffee exporters are preparing for a period of depressed prices while urging their government to lobby for a resolution of the deadlocked issue of export quotas, the chairman of the Association of Indonesian Coffee Exporters (AICE) tolds.     Dharyono Kertosastro said in an interview that Indonesia, the world\'s third largest producer, is trimming costs and improving its marketing while seeking a compromise on quotas.     \"But as long as Brazil sticks to its hardline position, we can never bridge the gap,\" Dharyono said.     Indonesia was one of a group of eight producing countries, along with Costa Rica, the Dominican Republic, Ecuador, Honduras, India, Papua New Guinea and Peru, which proposed a new quota system at last month\'s failed International Coffee Organistion (ICO) talks in London.     Brazil, which would have had its quota reduced under the Group of Eight scheme, blocked the proposal.     AICE officials are now hoping Colombia can use its contacts with Brazil to suggest a compromise.     Edward Muda, an AICE official who attended the ICO negotiations, said Latin American members of the Group of Eight were in contact with Colombia, the world\'s second largest producer, but gave no details.     \"Colombia has shown interest because they will gain from a compromise. Without one, they will suffer if the present market stays like it is,\" Muda said.     He said Indonesia was in contact with consumers such as the U.S., Japan, the Netherlands, West Germany and Canada ahead of an ICO executive board meeting scheduled for April 1.     Dharyono said the AICE will send delegations to the U.S. And Japan to brief Indonesian embassy officials there and press them to present Indonesia\'s case more firmly.     He urged the Indonesian government to do more to help the country\'s coffee traders through the ICO negotiations.     Muda said the Group of Eight had some common ground with the big consumers because they agreed on the need for basing quotas on what he termed \"realistic criteria.\"     The breakaway group believes the old quota system, which gives Brazil a 30 pct share of the quota exports, does not reflect up-to-date supply and demand trends.     Brazil has stuck rigidly to its insistence that the old system be applied.     Export quotas were suspended in February 1986 when market prices surged because of the failure of the Brazilian crop.     Although prices have long since come down to a point where export controls could be reintroduced, producers and consumers at the 75-member ICO have not been able to agree on new guidelines. Brazil and the U.S., The largest consumer, are both refusing to alter their positions.     Dharyono said if new quotas are not agreed he believed Indonesia was well placed to survive low prices.     Indonesian farmers are trimming production costs and the AICE is improving its marketing system, Dharyono said.     Indonesia\'s coffee output in 1986/87, ending September 30, is expected to stagnate or fall slightly from last year\'s level of 360,000 tonnes, he said.     He said stocks, at 90,000 tonnes, were about average for the time of year.  \n',coffee
'Indonesia\'s coffee production in 1986/87 ending September 30 may fall slightly from last year\'s level of 360,000 tonnes, Dharyono Kertosastro, chairman of the Association of Indonesian Coffee Exporters tolds.     He said shade trees had been damaged by pests and this may have affected the crop, though it remains to be seen how seriously. Indonesia\'s main crop is harvested next month.     He gave no figure for expected output, except to say it would probably be down a little from 1985/86. He said stocks were about normal at 90,000 tonnes.     Kertosastro predicted that exports were unlikely to rise much from last year\'s level of 320,000 tonnes. \"I expect exports will be a bit more, maybe 330,000 tonnes, but not above that,\" he said. Exports in 1985/86 were valued at 944 mln U.S. Dlrs, but the value could fall by 30 pct this year because of low prices, he added.     Dharyono said production was behind a five year plan target of 420,000 tonnes for the current year, but Indonesia is trying to boost output through introduction of higher yielding seeds, better training for farmers and increased use of fertilizers.  \n',coffee
'Ivory Coast today predicted that the present coffee price crash recorded after the collapse of the recent International Coffee Organisation (ICO) meeting in London would not last long.     Commenting on Monday\'s failure by producer and consumer nations to agree on new export quotas needed to tighten an oversupplied coffee market, Ivorian Agriculture Minister Denis Bra Kanon told reporters that traders would eventually be obliged to restore their positions.     \"I am convinced the market is going to reverse by April,\" he told a news conference here at his return from the failed London talks.     Robusta coffee beans for May delivery ended the day in London down about 50 sterling at 1,265 sterling a tonne, the lowest since 1982.     Bra Kanon estimated at at least 535 billion CFA francs (1.76 billion dlrs) the overall loss in revenues earned by Ivory Coast from all its commodities exports this year if the slide on the world markets continues.     He disclosed that his country - the world\'s biggest cocoa producer and the third largest for coffee -- would spearhead an African initiative to reach a compromise formula by the end of next month.     Ivory Coast has been chosen by the Abidjan-based Inter-African Coffee Organisation (IACO) to speak on behalf of the continent\'s 25 producer nations at the London talks.     \"An initiative from IACO is likely very soon,\" he said without elaborating.     \"Following the London collapse, we have immediately embarked on a concertation course to avoid breaking an already fragile market,\" he said.     Questioned by journalists, the minister said President Felix Houphouet-Boigny estimated for the moment that his government would not be forced to reduce the price guaranteed by the state to Ivorian coffee-growers for the current season.     Last year, the West African nation announced that the coffee producer price would stay at 200 CFA francs (65 cents) per kilo.     Bra Kanon said that his country would strive to diversify its agricultural production to avoid beeing too dependent from world market fluctuation.     A communique read over the state-run television tonight said that during today\'s weekly cabinet meeting, the veteran Ivorian leader reaffirmed \"his faith in Ivory Coast\'s bright (economic) future\" despite the commodities price slide.     The Agriculture Minister also announced the government decided to earmark a sum of 7.5 billion CFA francs (24.71 mln dlrs) to support the country\'s small farmers.     Financially-strapped Ivory Coast, long regarded as one of Africa\'s showpiece economies, is going through difficult times following the sharp slump in the world price of cocoa and coffee.     Ivory Coast\'s real gross domestic product is expected to grow only one pct this year compared to five pct in 1986, according to a recent Finance Ministry estimate.  \n',coffee
'Kenya\'s late coffee crop is flowering well, but the main coffee areas were generally dry and hot in the week ended Wednesday, trade sources said.     \"Machakos, Embu, Meru and Kirinyaga in eastern Kenya, and Nyeri and Thika in central, have been dry in the past week. The farmers expect rain this week. If it does not fall output of the late (October-November-December) crop will decline sharply,\" one source said.     He said that since most growers did not irrigate their crop they could do nothing but wait for rain, the main factor which determines Kenyan coffee production.     Two months ago the International Coffee Organization issued a forecast of Kenyan exportable coffee production in the 1986/87 (Oct-Sept) season at 1.82 mln bags.  \n',coffee
'The Kenyan economy is heading for difficult times after a boom last year, and the country must tighten its belt to prevent the balance of payments swinging too far into deficit, President Daniel Arap Moi said.     In a speech at the state opening of parliament, Moi said high coffee prices and cheap oil in 1986 led to economic growth of five pct, compared with 4.1 pct in 1985.     The same factors produced a two billion shilling balance of payments surplus and inflation fell to 5.6 pct from 10.7 pct in 1985, he added.     \"But both these factors are no longer in our favour ... As a result, we cannot expect an increase in foreign exchange reserves during the year,\" he said.     The price of coffee, Kenya\'s main source of foreign exchange, fell in London today to about 94 cents a pound from a peak of 2.14 dlrs in January 1986.     Crude oil, which early last year slipped below 10 dlrs a barrel, has since crept back to over 18 dlrs.     Moi said the price changes, coupled with a general decline in the flow of capital from the rest of the world, made it more difficult to finance the government\'s budget deficit.     Kenya was already spending over 27 pct of its budget on servicing its debts and last year it was a net exporter of capital for the first time in its history, he added.     \"This is a clear indication that we are entering a difficult phase as regards our external debts, and it is imperative that we raise the rate of domestic savings and rely less on foreign sources to finance our development,\" he said.     \"It will be necessary to maintain strict discipline on expenditure ... And members of this house will have to take the lead in encouraging wananchi (ordinary people) to be more frugal in satisfying immediate needs,\" the president added.  \n',coffee
'Representatives from Brazil, Colombia, Mexico and Nicaragua will meet here Friday to discuss the economic impact of falling coffee prices, a Nicaraguan official announced.     Vice-minister of foreign trade Bernardo Chamorro said that participating in the meeting will be the heads of the coffee associations from the four countries.     He did not say if the meeting would continue beyond friday.     Chamorro said Nicaragua supports the establishment of export quotas in an effort to boost sagging world prices.  \n',coffee
'This weekend\'s meeting of Latin American coffee producers here will call for the International Coffee Organisation (ICO) to start talks aimed at firming prices, Nicaraguan foreign trade minister Alejandro Martinez Cuenca said.     He said those countries which had confirmed their presence were Brazil, Mexico, Guatemala, El Salvador, Costa Rica and Panama. Colombia had been invited but he did not know if it would attend.     Martinez Cuenca told reporters central america alone had lost some 700 mln dlrs through the weakness of world coffee prices, partially caused by lack of an ICO quota agreement.  \n',coffee
'Madagascar\'s available coffee output is estimated at 80,725 tonnes this year, down from 82,210 in 1986, due to a rundown of government agricultural services and the poor state of feeder roads in rural areas, Agriculture Ministry sources said.     This is after accounting for the loss of some 15,000 to 20,000 tonnes due to the transport problems in the countryside, they said.     The sources did not give an estimate for exports in 1987, but they noted that shipments declined to 37,200 tonnes last year from 41,662 in 1985.     Low yields from the country\'s ageing coffee plantations and prevalence of the fungal disease Hemileia Vastatrix also contributed to the poor performance, the sources said.     They pointed out that 52 pct of Madagascar\'s coffee bushes were planted before 1930.     The sources said Madagascar was still a long way from reaching the production target of 110,000 tonnes per year and the export target of 63,000 tonnes outlined in the government\'s 1986-1990 five-year plan.     In order to reverse the decline in coffee production, the government has decided to plant 20,000 hectares with high-yielding arabica and canephora varieties, the sources said.     The planting programme will begin this year and is aimed at producing 300 to 360 kilos per hectare of beans with a low caffeine content.     The sources added that Madagascar\'s plan to export roasted coffee has failed to take off due to packaging problems. Only 650 tonnes of roasted coffee were exported last year.  \n',coffee
'Mexico has temporarily suspended overseas coffee sales due to falling prices triggered by the failure of the International Coffee Organisation (ICO) meeting to agree a quota system at its latest meeting, the official Notimex news agency said.     \"We\'re just waiting a while for prices to improve,\" an unidentified Mexican trader told the agency.     Mexico has already sold 80 pct of its export coffee produced in the year to last September, the source said. The country exports about 3.3 mln 60-kilo bags a year.  \n',coffee
'Several traders and analysts here tolds Latin American coffee producers will meet this weekend in Managua, Nicaragua. The purpose, they said, is to review the breakdown of International Coffee Organization quota talks last month and try to formulate a unified position ahead of possible future negotiations.     Two traders, who asked not to be named, said separately Brazil is expected to attend the meeting along with most or all of the Central American producers. The Central American attendees would include Costa Rica and Honduras, who were part of a minority producer group at the February talks that opposed Brazil\'s position, they said.     Another source, also requesting anonymity, said Colombia probably will not attend.  \n',coffee
'A decision by Colombia to open coffee export registrations for an unlimited amount does not imply the country will heavily sell coffee until recently withheld, Gilberto Arango, president of the private exporters\' association, tolds.     Colombia today opened export registrations for april and may, with the National Coffee Growers\' Federation setting no limit.     Since the start of the coffee year last october, private exporters were on average allowed 350,000 bags of 60 kilos per month.     \"Traders will initially interpret this measure as announcing heavy sales. Even today it pressured the market. But it will quickly become apparent that Colombia does not intend to go over the top,\" Arango said in an interview.     \"Colombia\'s marketing policy is to sell without haste but consistently. No targets for volume will be set. We will react to market factors adequately. Colombia has no intention to give its coffee away,\" he added.     Arango described measures adopted here yesterday, including a lower export registration price, as a major change in Colombia\'s coffee marketing policy.     The export registration price, or reintegro, was lowered to 1.10 dlr per lb ex-dock new york, or 155.83 dlrs per bag of 70 kilos, from 1.35 dlrs (194.33 dlrs).     The government announced a more flexible policy of reintegro, in order to closely reflect market trends, which arango warmly welcomed saying private exporters will undoubtedly be more actively present in the market.     A frequent gap between international market prices and the reintegro was unlikely to recur, he said.  \n',coffee
'The Brazilian Coffee Institute, IBC, is unlikely to disclose its future export policy until the end of next week at the earliest, trade sources said.     IBC president Jorio Dauster is meeting government ministers, producers, exporters and market analysts to assess Brazil\'s position in the light of the failure of talks in London earlier this month to set new International Coffee Organization, ICO, export quotas.     \"The failure of the talks means Brazil has got to rethink its position completely,\" one Santos exporter said.     A meeting of the National Coffee Policy Council is set for Thursday, March 19, and Dauster will almost certainly explain his plan to members then before announcing any new measures.     Dauster told reporters on his return from London last week that no decisions would be made on exports before he had held talks with all sectors of the industry.     Exporters said Dauster is not under any great pressure to start marketing coffee immediately. World prices have been recovering from the lows which followed the collapse of the ICO talks and Brazil has sold a reasonable 5.5 mln bags of 60 kilos for export in the first four months of this year.     The exporters said the key factor in the eventual opening of May and June export registrations will be the amount at which the contribution quota is set.     With little expectation of other sales incentive mechanisms such as discounts, bonuses and price fall guarantees being introduced, the level of the quota will be decisive in determining the competitiveness of Brazilian coffee on world markets, they said.     They noted that on February 16, the eve of a planned increase in the quota, April registrations were opened and closed after 1.68 mln bags were registered for export, a record amount for a single day.     If May/June registrations are opened under similar conditions as before, Brazil would have no difficulty in selling at least 2.0 mln bags per month.     \"The problem would be how to limit sales,\" one exporter said.     Brazil\'s present foreign trade and payments problems mean there are pressures from the government to boost exports to maximise foreign exchange earnings.     However, the sources said they expect the IBC to adopt a marketing strategy aimed at regaining Brazil\'s dominant position as an exporter, but without causing a price war.     General opinion among exporters was that Brazil would plan to export between 17 and 18 mln bags this year of which between 1.5 and 2.0 mln would be to non-members of the ICO.     The 15.5 mln to 16 mln bags sold to members would be around the figure Brazil had offered to ship if ICO quotas were reintroduced, although Dauster has said this offer expired with the breakdown of talks.     With the prospects of a crop of at least 28 mln bags this year, Brazil has the capacity to export up to 20 mln bags after meeting local consumption of around 7.0 mln, the sources added.     However, the sources said Brazil is unlikely even to consider exporting such quantities, as this would almost inevitably lead to a fall in world prices as Brazil tried to encroach on other producers\' markets.     Maximum export earnings would be achieved by orderly marketing of traditional amounts, thus re-establishing Brazil\'s market share after last year\'s unusually low exports of 9.9 mln bags, enabling it to rebuild stocks and maintaining cordial relations with the producer group which backed Brazil\'s stance at the ICO talks, they added.  \n',coffee
'New York coffee futures prices will probably fall to about 85 cents a lb in the next month before a consolidation trend sets in, according to market analysts.     Yesterday, prices for the spot May contract fell below 1.00 dlr a lb for the first time since August 1981 after the International Coffee Organization did not place new export quota discussions on its current agenda.     Talks aimed at renegotiating ICO export quotas, after five years of price-supporting agreements, broke down in February.     \"Short-term, it looks like a definite test of 90 cents, perhaps 85 cents,\" said William O\'Neill, coffee analyst with Elders Futures. \"But the additional downside may not be all that great from current levels.\"     \"At this price level the market is very vulnerable to bullish developments,\" O\'Neill added. \"Rather than us having a market that will plummet we\'ll kind of see prices erode -- probably to around 85 cents.\"     \"I definitely see 90 cents and would not rule out a brief drop to 85 cents,\" said Debra Tropp, a coffee analyst with Prudential Bache. But she said by June worries about a freeze in Brazil growing areas will become more of a market factor, with prices likely to consolidate ahead of that time.     A trader at a major international trade house, who asked not to be named, said he expects a 10 cent drop near term but believes if Brazil opens May registrations at a relatively high export price and requires a high contribution quota from exporters the market could steady at the lower levels.     Longer term, he added, producer pressure will mount on Brazil to agree to consumers\' export quota terms, and a new international agreement could come into force next fall.     Since the February talks broke down, the market has fallen from about 130.00 cents a lb to a low of 98.10 cents a lb today, as buyers and sellers sought to reassess supply and demand.     Generally, analysts say, producers have a large buildup of stocks, but U.S. roasters have drawn down supplies and will need to do some buying soon.     \"Most producing nations have just completed or are about to complete their annual harvests and exportable supplies are at their seasonal peak. Exports remain behind year ago and warehouses in producer nations are becoming increasingly overburdened,\" said Sandra Kaul, coffee analyst for Shearson Lehman, in that firm\'s forthcoming quarterly coffee report.     Kaul said producers\' need to procure hard currency to service foreign debt will put further pressure on them to sell, and \"this should keep substantial pressure on exporters to undertake sales despite the drop in prices to six year lows.\"     Kaul believes the market will drop to 80 cents a lb before Brazil\'s frost season begins in June.     Accurate assessments of roaster demand are hard to come by, though analysts note the peak winter consumption period is passed and demand usually slows this time of year.     Shearson\'s Kaul estimated U.S. roaster ending stocks as of January 31, including soluble and roasted, at 6.3 mln bags compared with 6.9 mln at end-September 1986, a small drawdown for the usually busy winter roasting season.     But Elders O\'Neill said, \"The roasters are not overstocked by any means.\"     Analysts said picking a bottom to the market is difficult, given the fact prices have fallen into uncharted territory below the long-term support at 1.00 dlr per lb, and several traders said the sidelines might be preferable for the short term.  \n',coffee
'Coffee producers belonging to the \"Other Milds\" group will meet May 4 in Guatemala to discuss the possibility of restoring export quotas, producer delegates told reporters after the closing session of the International Coffee Organization, ICO, executive board meeting.     The \"Other Milds\" group, comprising Costa Rica, Dominican Republic, Ecuador, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, India, Mexico, Nicaragua, Papua New Guinea and Peru, might consult with Brazil and Colombia on this meeting, but it was not certain whether these two countries would attend, they said.     The ICO board meeting ended without moves to restart negotiations on quotas, which broke down last month, producer delegates said.     Producers are expected to hold other consultations in the coming months on how to proceed with quota negotiations, but no date for a full producer meeting has been mentioned, they said.     The board completed reports on stock verification and the next regular board session will be in Indonesia June 1-5, delegates said.  \n',coffee
'U.S. roastings of green coffee in the week ended March 21 were about 250,000 (60-kilo) bags, including that used for soluble production, compared with 195,000 bags in the corresponding week of last year and about 300,000 bags in the week ended March 14, George Gordon Paton and Co Inc reported.     It said cumulative roastings for calendar 1987 now total 3,845,000 bags, compared with 4,070,000 bags by this time last year.  \n',coffee
'Recent heavy rains have not affected the Peru coffee crop and producers are looking forward to a record harvest, the president of one of Peru\'s four coffee cooperative groups said.     Justo Marin Ludena, president of the Cafe Peru group of cooperatives which accounts for about 20 pct of Peru\'s exports, tolds a harvest of up to 1,800,000 quintales (46 kilos) was expected this year. He said Peru exported 1,616,101 quintales in the year to September 1986.     A spokesman for the Villa Rica cooperative said flood waters last month had not reached coffee plantations, and the crop was unaffected.     Floods in early February caused extensive damage in Villa Rica, whose coffee cooperative exported 59,960 quintales last year, according to the state-controlled coffee organisation.     Marin said the rains would only affect the coffee crop if they continued through to next month, when harvesting starts.     He said Peruvian producers were hoping for an increase this year in the 1.3 pct export quota, about 913,000 quintales, assigned to them by the International Coffee Organisation, ICO.     He said Peru exported 1,381,009 quintales to ICO members last year with a value of around 230 mln dlrs, and another 235,092 quintales, valued at around 35 mln dlrs, to non-ICO members.  \n',coffee
'Philippine coffee exports are expected to fall sharply due to a combination of the International Coffee Organisation\'s (ICO) decision not to revive export quotas and higher local prices, ICO Certifying Agency official Dante de Guzman tolds.     He said exporter registrations dropped from an average weekly 500 tonnes in March to 45 tonnes last week, with exports in coffee year 1986/87, ending September, forecast to total about 8,000 tonnes against 48,000 in 1985/86.      \"Because of the relatively higher level of domestic prices, it has become difficult to service exports,\" de Guzman said, adding that most exporters are taking a wait and see attitude.     Coffee production was expected to drop slightly to about one mln bags of 60 kg each in the 1986/87 crop year ending June from 1.1 mln bags last year, he said.  \n',coffee
'Prices rose at the fortnightly export auction here on March 25 for sales of 1,907.1 tonnes of coffee from the 1986/87 and 1985/86 crops out of a total offering of 1,940.7 tonnes, the Coffee Board said.     Withdrawals amounted to 33.6 tonnes. The type and grade, quantity sold, average prices in rupees per 50 kilos, exclusive of sales tax, with previous prices at the March 11 auction in brackets -     1986/87 crop     Plantation \"A\" 592.2   1,284.50 (1,223.50)     Plantation \"B\" 74.1    1,095.50 (1,122.00)     Plantation \"C\"        208.2    1,019.00 (1,017.50)     Arabica Cherry \"AB\"    33.3      976.50  (NA)     Arabica Cherry \"PB\"    22.5      949.00  (NA)     Arabica Cherry \"C\"     58.2      889.50  (NA)     Robusta Cherry \"AB\"    90.9    1,256.00  (NA)     Robusta Cherry \"PB\"    43.8    1,039.50  (NA)     Robusta \"PMT AB\"       49.2    1,255.50  (NA)     Robusta \"PMT PB\"       13.5    1,200.00  (NA)     REP Bulk \"A\"           93.9    1,057.50 (908.50)     REP Bulk \"B\"          256.5    1,079.00 (930.00)     Robusta Cherry Bulk    40.2   1,082.50  (NA)     Robusta Cherry \"C\"      9.0     997.00  (NA)     Robusta Cherry \"BBB\"    9.6     700.00  (NA)     1985/86 crop     Arabica Cherry \"AB\"   123.3     961.00  (951.50)     Arabica Cherry \"BBB\"  160.8     635.50  (613.50)     Robusta Cherry \"BBB\"    4.2     735.00  (704.50)     Monsooned coffee     Monsooned Robusta \"AA\" 23.7   1,265.50  (NA)  \n',coffee
'Talks on the possibility of reintroducing global coffee export quotas have been extended into today, with sparks flying yesterday when a dissident group of exporters was not included in a key negotiating forum.     The special meeting of the International Coffee Organization (ICO) council was called to find a way to stop a prolonged slide in coffee prices.     However, delegates said no solution to the question of how to implement quotas was yet in sight.     World coffee export quotas -- the major device used to regulate coffee prices under the International Coffee Agreement -- were suspended a year ago when prices soared in reaction to a drought which cut Brazil\"s output by nearly two thirds.     Brazil is the world\"s largest coffee producer and exporter.     Producers and consumers now are facing off over the question of how quotas should be calculated under any future quota distribution scheme, delegates said.     Tempers flared late Saturday when a minority group of eight producing countries was not represented in a contact group of five producer and five consumer delegates plus alternates which was set up to facilitate debate.     The big producers \"want to have the ball only in their court and it isn\"t fair,\" minority producer spokesman Luis Escalante of Costa Rica said.     The majority producer group has proposed resuming quotas April 1, using the previous ad hoc method of carving up quota shares, with a promise to try to negotiate basic quotas before September 30, delegates said.     Their plan would perpetuate the status quo, allowing Brazil to retain almost all of its current 30 pct share of the export market, Colombia 17 pct, Ivory Coast seven pct and Indonesia six pct, with the rest divided among smaller exporters.     But consuming countries and the dissident producer group have tabled separate proposals requiring quotas be determined by availability, using a formula incorporating exportable production and stocks statistics.     Their proposals would give Brazil a smaller quota share and Colombia and Indonesia a larger share, and bring a new quota distribution scheme into effect now rather than later.     Brazil has so far been unwilling to accept any proposal that would reduce its quota share, delegates said.     Delegates would not speculate on prospects for agreement on a quota package. \"Anything is possible at this phase,\" even adjournment of the meeting until March or April, one said.     If the ICO does agree on quotas, the price of coffee on the supermarket shelf is not likely to change sinnificantly as a result, industry sources said.     Retail coffee prices over the past year have remained about steady even though coffee market prices have tumbled, so an upswing probably will not be passed onto the consumer either, they said.  \n',coffee
'The failure of talks to introduce new coffee export quotas within the International Coffee Agreement, ICA, was preferable to the alternative of Brazil having a sharply reduced quota, as had been proposed, President of the Rio de Janeiro Coffee Trade Association Carlos Calmon said.     He tolds proposals to reduce Brazil\'s quota to 25 pct of the world share from 30 pct at present were unacceptable as the country has large stocks and a good harvest is expected.     \"Brazil has the capacity to export 20 mln bags this year,\" Calmon added.     Calmon said, assuming a 58 mln bag global ICA quota, Brazil\'s share under the proposals would have been 14.5 mln bags, of which soluble would have accounted for 2.0 mln, leaving just 12.5 mln bags of green coffee for export.     \"It\'s a pity the talks broke down, but for Brazil this was better than such a quota reduction,\" he added.     In 1985 Brazil exported 19.6 mln bags of soluble and green coffee, including about two mln bags to non-members. A severe drought and marketing problems cut exports last year to under 10 mln bags.     Calmon estimated stocks as of January 1 at 18 mln bags, of which 5.0 mln have already been sold for export. The harvest this year should be around 30 mln bags, he added.     The latest Brazilian Coffee Institute estimate for last year\'s harvest is 11.2 mln bags, although many traders believe it was higher than this.  \n',coffee
'The onset of cooler weather in Brazil during the southern hemisphere winter is expected to have a stabilising effect on a weak coffee market, West German trade sources said.     \"The annual fear of frost in Brazil will probably grip the market sometime this month until June or early July,\" one trader said.     The trade believes the International Coffee Organization (ICO) is unlikely to tackle the re-introduction of quotas before its September meeting and until then the market will not see any unexpected sharp moves in either direction.  \n',coffee
'Efforts to break an impasse between coffee exporting and importing countries over regulating the world coffee market in the face of falling prices appear to have failed, senior delegates said after a contact group meeting. The full ICO council is due to meet this evening.     President of the Brazilian Coffee Institute (IBC) Jorio Dauster tolds after the contact group meeting there had been no agreement on quotas as consumers had tried to dictate market shares rather than negotiate them.     Dauster said there are no plans yet to renew negotiations at a later date.  \n',coffee
'Singapore\'s United Industrial Corp Ltd (UIC) has agreed in principle to inject 16 mln dlrs in convertible loan stock into Teck Hock and Co (Pte) Ltd, a creditor bank official said.     UIC is likely to take a controlling stake in the troubled international coffee trading firm, but plans are not finalised and negotiations will continue for another two weeks, he said.     Teck Hock\'s nine creditor banks have agreed to extend the company\'s loan repayment period for 10 years although a percentage of the new capital injection will be used to pay off part of the debt.     Teck Hock owes more than 100 mln Singapore dlrs and since last December the banks have been allowing the company to postpone loan repayments while they try to find an investor.     The nine banks are Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp Ltd, United Overseas Bank Ltd, Banque Paribas, Bangkok Bank Ltd, Citibank N.A., Standard Chartered Bank Ltd, Algemene Bank Nederland NV, Banque Nationale de Paris and Chase Manhattan Bank NA.  \n',coffee
'Thai coffee exports rose to 22,068 tonnes in 1986 from 20,430 a year earlier, the Customs Department said.  \n',coffee
'Thai coffee exporters said they hoped the International Coffee Organisation (ICO) would not reimpose export quotas even though this may lead to a further slump in world prices.     Susin Suratanakaweekul, president of the Thai Coffee Exporters Association, tolds that Thailand obtained little benefit from previous ICO quotas which represented only about 30 pct of its total annual exports.     Thailand expects increased overall coffee export revenue if there are no restrictions on sales to current ICO members who offer higher prices than non-members, he said.     The Customs Department said Thailand exported 21,404 tonnes of coffee last year, up from 20,602 in 1985.     Thai coffee production is projected to fall to about 25,000 tonnes in the 1986/87 (Oct/Sept) season from 28,000 the previous year.     However, a senior Commerce Ministry official said the Thai government supports coffee producers\' lobbying for reimposed ICO quotas which, he said, would help lift world prices.     Somphol Kiatpaiboon, director general of the Commercial Economics Department, said an absence of ICO quotas would encourage producers to rapidly release coffee on to the market, further depressing prices.     He said Indonesia is expected to export a substantial amount of coffee this month without such restrictions.  \n',coffee
'The green coffee market saw some demand for high quality coffees in the past week, but business was described as generally unsatisfactory, trade sources said.     Especially sought were spot East African and Ethiopian and some Brazils, they said, adding that some high grade robustas also met some demand.     Sporadic business was noted in the second hand which offered Kenya coffee for May/June shipment up to 25 dlrs below origin levels.     Roasters are said to be well covered and are not expected to enter the market for larger purchases in the near term.  \n',coffee
'The amount of coffee stored in New York and New Orleans warehouses and certified for delivery against the New York Coffee \"C\" futures totalled 585,555 bags as of April 3, compared with 585,794 bags the previous week, a net decrease of 239 bags, the New York Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange said.     The total comprised 392,845 bags in New York, an increase of 261 bags, and 192,710 bags in New Orleans, a drop of 500 bags.     The exchange said there were nil bags pending classification. There were 56,578 bags pending certification, including 32,553 in New York and 24,025 in New Orleans, the exchange said.  \n',coffee
'The United States does not expect the executive board meeting of the International Coffee Organization, ICO, to call for a new round of negotiations on reinstating coffee quotas, a U.S. government official said.     The official, a member of the U.S. delegation to ICO talks earlier this year, said no new coffee agreement talks are expected because there is no indication the negotiating positions of major producers and consumers have changed.     The U.S. still demands, as a condition of reimposition of coffee quotas, that \"objective criteria\" be set for establishing quotas, said the U.S. official, who asked not to be identified. Brazil, the major producer, insists on quotas based on a traditional formula.     The U.S. remains open to a negotiating meeting but only if some new flexibility is apparent from major countries, the official said.     The ICO executive board meets tomorrow in London.  \n',coffee
'Uganda, Africa\'s second largest coffee producer, was disappointed by the stalemate in recent coffee talks in London, the chairman of the state-run Coffee Marketing Board, CMB, said.     \"This has not been good for coffee producers, more so in a situation where the prices dropped by 200 pounds per tonne of robusta coffee,\" J. Makumbi said when he returned from London on Friday.     Producers and consumers failed to agree on a quota formula to share the world\'s coffee production during International Coffee Organisation, ICO, talks that ended last week.     Makumbi blamed the failure to set quotas, which were suspended in Feburary last year, on Indonesian demands that its quota be increased dramatically.     Uganda -- which earns about 400 mln dlrs annually from coffee exports, over 95 pct of its foreign exchange earnings -- had sought to raise its ICO quota to 3.0 mln from 2.45 mln 60-kilo bags, according to sources close to the CMB.     The CMB has estimated that production will rise 20 to 25 pct in the current 1986/87 October-September season to over three mln bags.     For several years Uganda had been unable to meet its ICO export quota as rebel activity disrupted the coffee industry.     The Ugandan government depends on coffee export duties for about 60 pct of its sales tax revenue and the industry employs over half of salaried manpower.     In Dar es Salaam, Tanzania\'s Agriculture and Livestock Development Minister Paul Bomani said today Third World countries would suffer from the failure of the London coffee talks.     \"It is only the middlemen who will benefit, he said.     Bomani called on the ICO to convene another meeting within two months, saying, \"Once tempers have cooled and delegations have had time to report back to their headquarters, common sense will prevail.\"  \n',coffee
'Long delays at the railway crossing on the Kenyan border have led Uganda to re-route its coffee exports through a ferry link with the Kenyan port of Kisumu across Lake Victoria, Ugandan officials based in Kenya said.     Uganda has a direct rail link with the Kenyan port of Mombasa through which it conducts 70 pct of its external trade but there is a chronic shortage of railway wagons, they said.     Customs at Kisumu take less than a day compared with two to three at the Malaba rail border crossing, a Ugandan Railways official said. \"Malaba is now handling only 10 pct of the trade and all the coffee and oil goes through Kisumu,\" he said.     However, an accident recently damaged the wagon ferry which plies between Kisumu and the Ugandan port of Jinja, causing bottlenecks on the lake route too.     Sources at the Coffee Marketing Board in Kampala reported delays in coffee export shipments last January due to congestion on the lake ferries.     Coffee accounts for about 95 pct of Uganda\'s export earnings and last November President Yoweri Museveni ordered all coffee shipments to be carried by rail in order to avoid the higher costs of road haulage.  \n',coffee
'Vietnam will resettle 300,000 people on state farms known as new economic zones in 1987, to create jobs and grow more high-value export crops, the communist party newspaper Nhan Dan said.     Yesterday\'s edition, received here today, said Vietnam would invest one billion dong, including the costs of relocation, in 272 new economic zones. About one third of that sum would be spent on export crops such as coffee, tea, rubber and pepper in the Central Highlands, it said.     Since 1975, Vietnam has resettled about three million people from cities and crowded river deltas to the zones.  \n',coffee
'West German gross green coffee imports in January fell sharply to 38,616 tonnes from 54,576 in January last year, figures from the Federal Statistics Office show.     Imports of decaffeinated unroasted coffee were 396 tonnes against nil a year earlier.  \n',coffee
'Zimbabwean coffee output will reach 13,000 tonnes this year, up on just over 11,000 tonnes produced in 1986, the Commercial Coffee Growers Association said.     Administrative Executive Robin Taylor told the domestic news agency ZIANA that Zimbabwe earned the equivalent of 33 mln U.S. Dlrs from coffee exports last year. He would not say how much the country would earn in 1987.     Taylor said the 173 commercial coffee growers under his association had increased production from 5,632 tonnes in 1980 to more than 11,000 tonnes in l986.  \n',coffee
'Some 40 miners were trapped underground today by a fire in a copper mine in the Gaspe area of eastern Quebec, officials said.     There were no reports of any deaths.     A mine official said that the fire broke out last night and about 25 of the miners made it to safety.     He said telephone contact had been established with the trapped miners but they could not be brought to the surface until the fire was extinguished.     The cause of the fire was not known.  \n',copper
'Asarco Inc said it is decreasing its domestic delivered copper cathode price by 1.50 cents to 67.0 cents a lb, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'The Chilean state copper corporation, Codelco, the privately-owned Chilean copper fabricator Madeco and Chinese interests are to establish a copper tube plant in Peking, Codelco\'s U.K. Subsidiary Chile Copper Ltd said.     The plant is designed to produce 5,000 tonnes in the first five years and 8,000 tonnes as from year six. Total investment is estimated at 10 mln dlrs, of which the Chileans will contribute two mln.     Codelco and Madeco have formed the Chilean Wrought Copper Company to take a 50 pct stake in a new company called Peking Santiago Tube Company with the Chinese holding the other half.  \n',copper
'Chilean left-wing leaders were elected by the copper workers union for the first time since the left-wing government of Salvador Allende was overthrown in a 1973 coup.      Nicanor Araya, a member of the Popular Democratic Movement (MDP), was named president of the Chilean Confederation of Copperworkers (CTC), which groups 22,000 workers employed in the state-owned copper mines, union officials said.     Other members of the MDP, which includes the communist party and a faction of the socialist party, took five of the principal positions on the union\'s directorate.     The state-owned copper company of Chile (CODELCO) produces around 90 pct of the country\'s copper output of some one mln tonnes per year. Chile is the world\'s leading copper exporter and sales account for just under 50 pct of its export income.     The MDP won six out of the 14 places on the union\'s directorate in elections earlier this month, with the christian democratic party holding five and the remainder being won by independents.     But the left-wing was left in control of the union after the christian democrats and independents failed to reach agreement on a joint candidate for the presidency and withdrew from negotiations.     Union elections were called following the resignation of former president Rodolfo Seguel last October.     Seguel, a christian democrat and Chile\'s best-known union leader, said he was forced to step down after repeated court actions brought by CODELCO prevented the union from operating.     The labour leader, who now heads the inter-union national workers command (CNT), was among 500 workers sacked by CODELCO following a strike in 1983.     The strike, the only copper industry stoppage staged in the past 13 years, marked the start of a wave of protests against the military rule of President Augusto Pinochet.      CODELCO argued that Seguel could not continue as union leader when no longer employed by the company.  \n',copper
'Representatives of the International Wrought Copper Council (IWCC) and major copper producers have told the London Metal Exchange (LME) a clear statement of its forward strategy would lead to a better understanding between industry and the LME.     In a press release the IWCC said that at the latest meeting between the copper industry and the LME to discuss the new clearing house system, industry expressed grave concern about latest proposals made by at least one LME member for a cash cleared market to replace the planned clearing system which will retain the prompt date settlement basis.     Copper industry delegates told the LME a decision to change (the planned clearing system) would indicate a fundamental change in the function of the LME and in its service to the industry, the release said.     By deterring industry use of the Exchange for hedging and physical needs it would remove many of the unique advantages currently offered by the LME and make it indistinguishable from non-trade orientated markets such as Comex.     The LME had to decide whether dealer convenience should take a higher priority over customer satisfaction, industry delegates said.     The IWCC release also said the LME had confirmed that no change would be made to the clearing system planned to start on May 29. But it had indicated that consideration would be given in due course to the cash clearing proposal, made by Amalgamated Metal Trading at a LME members meeting last week.     A copper industry spokesman suggested that some assurance of permanence in the new clearing system would remove industry fears of uncertainty resulting from an endless process of review and change, the press release said.  \n',copper
'The world\'s major copper producing and consuming countries have reached \"a degree of consensus\" on objectives and functions of a future study group aimed at reviewing the world copper market, officials said.     Governments represented at a meeting to consider a proposed forum for copper have recommended that another session be held in September to consider further the nature of such a group, a spokesman for the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD) said.     The one-week meeting, which ended today, was held to examine a U.S. Initiative to set up a copper study group.     The new body would not aim at negotiating measures to stabilise depressed world prices.     Its objectives would include increasing market transparency, through improved statistics, and undertaking activities aimed at developing the copper market and contributing to improvement of demand.     UNCTAD\'s spokesman said, \"Once they have agreed on detailed functions and objectives, then the way will be cleared to setting up the body.\"  \n',copper
'Refined copper stocks held by refineries outside the U.S. increased to a preliminary 277,500 short tons at the end of December from a preliminary 270,000 short tons (revised higher) at the end of November, the American Bureau of Metal Statistics said.     London Metal Exchange stocks fell to 193,100 tons in December from 194,400 tons in November. Combined refinery and LME stocks rose to a preliminary 470,600 tons from 464,400 tons (revised higher). January LME stocks were 193,400 tons.     Preliminary figures showed refined production outside U.S. lower at 377,300 tons in December versus 384,000 tons in November. Crude output decreased to 421,500 tons from 427,000 tons (revised higher). Refined copper deliveries decreased to 359,800 tons from 375,400 tons (revised lower).  \n',copper
'Major copper producing and consuming countries are considering a U.S. proposal to set up a study group to review the world copper market, delegates said.     The U.S. initiative was introduced last December at a meeting held here under the auspices of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD).     The U.S., the world\'s largest copper consumer and second biggest producer after Chile, has proposed setting up a body to improve statistics and market transparency of the copper economy, and provide a forum for discussion.     The new body would not aim at negotiating measures to stabilise depressed world prices.     This week\'s meeting, which began yesterday, is due to end Friday.  \n',copper
'Cyprus Minerals Company said it is decreasing its electrolytic copper cathode price by 1.25 cents to 67.0 cents a pound, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'Cyprus Minerals Company said it is decreasing its electrolytic copper cathode price by one cent   to 66.0 cents a pound, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'The London Metal Exchange, LME, issued turnovers for March 1987, with figures for corresponding period 1986 in brackets.     All in tonnes except Silver which in troy ounces.     Copper higher grade nil (2,526,425), Standard cathodes nil (6,325), Grade A 2,429,200 (nil), Standard Copper 17,050 (nil), Lead 443,850 (538,750), Zinc High grade 598,550 (304,825), Silver large 10,350,000 (17,400,000), Small nil (2,000), Aluminium 1,693,375 (1,301,850), Nickel 62,004 (65,040).     Cumulative figures for January-March were as follows - Copper higher grade nil (7,703,625), Standard cathodes nil (24,700), Grade A 6,455,525 (nil), Standard Copper 62,075 (nil), Lead 1,567,000 (1,979,750), Zinc High grade 1,746,675 (1,356,400), Silver large 41,770,000 (65,620,000), Small nil (8,000), Aluminium 4,984,650 (4,974,950), Nickel 199,944 (179,328).  \n',copper
'Magma Copper Co, a subsidiary of Newmont Mining Corp, said it is cutting its copper cathode price by 0.75 cent to 66 cents a lb, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'Magma Copper Co, a subsidiary of Newmont Mining Corp, said it is lowering its copper cathode price by 0.25 cent to 65.50 cents a lb, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'Magma Copper Co, a subsidiary of Newmont Mining Corp, said it is lowering its copper cathode price by 0.50 cent to 65.50 cents a lb, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'Magma Copper Co, a subsidiary of Newmont Mining Corp, said it is raising its copper cathode price by 0.50 cent to 66.00 cents a lb, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'Nippon Mining Co Ltd said it lowered its selling price for electrolytic copper by 10,000 yen per tonne to 260,000, effective immediately.  \n',copper
'The earthquake which hit northern Chile today, registering 7.0 on the open-ended Richter scale, caused no damage to the copper mine at Chuquicamata, a mine spokesman said.     Chuquicamata public relations director Guillermo Barcelo tolds by telephone from the mine that the quake had caused no problems and operations continued as usual.     A spokesman for the state Chilean Copper Commission in Santiago confirmed there had been no damage at Chuquicamata.  \n',copper
'Noranda Inc said a copper mine fire that killed one miner and trapped 44 others for nearly a day caused an estimated 10 mln Canadian dlrs in damage.     The fire, which started Wednesday and burned for more than 24 hours, destroyed the mine\'s three-year-old conveyor system, officials said.     Michel Lefebvre, vice president of operations, said Noranda will operate the mine at about one-third of its normal 72,000 metric ton annual finished capacity, using above ground reserves, until it decides whether to keep the mine open.     \"The events we sustained yesterday and the day before are a very serious setback for Gaspe Mines operations,\" Lefebvre said. Gaspe Mines is the name of the Noranda division that operates the Murdochville mine.     He said it would take four or five months to bring operations up to full capacity if the company decides to do so, adding that he believes there is a good chance Noranda will fully reopen the mine.  \n',copper
'Noranda Inc said production will remain shut down at its fire-damaged copper mine here until it can completely examine the mine.     If it decides to keep the mine open it would take four or five months before it could resume full production.     Company spokesman Dale Coffin said the investigation could take from a few days to several weeks but would not be more specific.     Noranda said when it resumes production it plans to operate the mine at about one-third of the normal 72,000 tonnes annual finished capacity.     The fire, which started Wednesday and burned itself out late yesterday weakened part of the mine\'s support structure, Coffin said.     One miner was killed and 56 others were trapped underground for about 24 hours before being brought safely out.  \n',copper
'Noranda Inc said a copper mine fire that killed one miner and trapped 44 others for nearly a day caused an estimated 10 mln Canadian dlrs in damage.     The fire, which started Wednesday and burned for more than 24 hours, destroyed the mine\'s three-year-old conveyor system, officials said.     Michel Lefebvre, vice president of operations, said Noranda will operate the mine at about one third of its normal 72,000 short ton annual finished capacity, using above ground reserves, until it decides whether to keep the mine open.     \"The events we sustained yesterday and the day before are a very serious setback for Gaspe Mines operations,\" Lefebvre said. Gaspe Mines is the name of the Noranda division that operates the Murdochville mine.     He said it would take four or five months to bring operations up to full capacity if the company decides to do so, adding that he believes there is a good chance Noranda will fully reopen the mine.  \n',copper
'Noranda Inc said production will remain shut down at its fire-damaged copper mine here until it can completely examine the mine.     The fire, which started Wednesday and burned itself out late yesterday, killed one miner and trapped 56 others underground for about 24 hours. The 56 were eventually brought safely out of the mine.     Company spokesman Dale Coffin said the investigation could take from a few days to several weeks, but would not be more specific.     Noranda said that, when it resumes production, it plans to operate the mine at about one-third of the normal 72,000 metric tons annual finished capacity.     The fire weakened part of the mine\'s support structure, Coffin said.     Noranda said if it decides to keep the mine open, it would take four or five months before it could resume full production.  \n',copper
'Finland\'s mining and metals group Outokumpu Oy OUTO.HE, which last week reported a 1986 loss of 83 mln markka after three successive years of profits, said it restructured its key copper processing division in an attempt to rationalize production and improve profitability.     Outokumpu\'s Managing Director Pertti Voutilainen told a news conference the reorganization involved a split of the division into a new independent division with six profit centres.     Outokumpu group had a 1986 loss before appropriations and taxes of 83 mln markka after a profit of 355 mln in 1985. It had profits in 1984 and 1983 but a loss, 171.2 mln, in 1982.     Outokumpu acquired two Swedish copper manufacturers in January 1986, Metallverken Ab and Wirsbo Bruks Ab, that were merged into its copper processing division.     The division had a turnover of 3.2 billion markka last year, 42 pct of Outokumpu\'s group turnover of 7.58 billion.     The new Outokumpu division, called Copper Products Industry, is to incorporate Outokumpu\'s copper production plants, including its two U.S. Subsidiaries Nippert Co and Valleycast Inc, as well as Metallverken and part of Wirsbo.     Outokumpu is planning to make Wirsbo an independent division in the Outokumpu group and transfer only Wirsbo\'s copper tube production into one of the new division\'s profit centres. A definite decision on Wirsbo will be taken later this year.     The new division will have production plants in Finland, Sweden, Norway, the Netherlands and the U.S.  \n',copper
'Maoist guerrillas using dynamite derailed two locomotives and four train wagons, interrupting traffic on Peru\'s sole railway line linking the capital to the central Andes, where most of the country\'s mining centres are located, authorities said.     Damages was estimated at 800,000 dlrs in the dynamite blast yesterday at Chacapalca, where the explosion wrecked the train laden with minerals and 45 metres of the railway line.     Crews hoped to restore traffic to the line later today after clearing the damaged train and repairing the tracks at Chacapalca, 225 km east of the Capital, Lima.     An official at Mineroperu comercial (Minpeco), Peru\'s state minerals marketing firm, said the agency was assessing the situation. There had not been a declaration of force majeure on contracts to ship minerals abroad.     Foreign sales of silver, copper, zinc and other minerals earn Peru over half of its export income. Most of the minerals, extracted and refined in the central peruvian andes, are shipped down the central railway to the lima port of callao.  \n',copper
'Peru\'s biggest state mining firm, Centromin SA, said today there was no immediate force majeure possibility on its copper shipments after guerrillas blew up a railway line, interrupting train traffic from the Cobriza copper mine to the Pacific coast.     A Centromin spokesman said the managers of the mine at Cobriza could always ship the the mineral by road to the coast for export if the train line continued interrupted. Cobriza produced the equivalent of around 40,600 fine tonnes of copper last year.     Maoist guerrillas using dynamite interrupted train traffic two days ago when they blew up railway tracks and derailed a train laden with minerals 225 km (135 miles) east of Lima at Chacapalca, between the coast and Cobriza.     An official at Minero Peru Comercial, Minpeco, Peru\'s state minerals marketing firm, confirmed there had been no declaration of force majeure on the shipments from Cobriza.     Officials at National Train Company, Enafer, headquarters in Lima, the Peruvian capital, declined to comment on when train traffic would be restored to Cobriza.     But an Enafer official, reached by telephone in the central Andean city of Huancayo, near Chacapalca, said traffic could be restored by Saturday.  \n',copper
'Copper shipments are likely to be delayed because of power problems at Philippine Associated Smelting and Refining Corp (PASAR), the country\'s only smelter, a company official said.     Asked to confirm reports by New York copper trade sources about PASAR\'s shipment problems, marketing manager Deogracias Madrid tolds, \"They are partly correct. There could be a probable delay.\"     Madrid declined to give more details, or production and export figures, saying the information could lead to speculation.     PASAR\'s smelter is in the central province of Leyte.     The New York trade sources said if PASAR\'s shipments were delayed, customers might have to turn to the London Metal Exchange for supply.     \"We have a commitment to our customers and I would not like to comment on that,\" Madrid said.     A spokeswoman for the Chamber of Mines said Philippine copper production amounted to 222,644 tonnes in 1986, down slightly from 226,157 tonnes in 1985. She said production in the first two months of 1987 totalled 34,550 tonnes, compared with 36,462 tonnes in the same 1986 period.  \n',copper
'The Renison Goldfields Consolidated Ltd RGFJ.S (RGC) Mt Lyell copper mine in Tasmania will stay open for an extra five years following a new aid package from the state government, RGC said in a statement.     The mine had been scheduled to close in 1989 after the 40 series stopes were mined, but will now stay open until the deeper 50 and 60 series have played out, probably in 1994.     The Australian dollar\'s fall since 1985 also improved the local dollar copper price, making the company profitable and justifying the mining of deeper reserves at a copper grade of about 1.95 pct against about 1.60 pct now, the firm said.     Ore output will be cut, but the higher grades will keep contained-copper output at current levels of about 24,000 tonnes a year, it said. Capital expenditure of about 18 mln dlrs will be required over the life of the new plan, RGC said.     The latest aid package is the third since 1977 for RGC, a major employer in Queenstown on the thinly populated west coast of Tasmania.     The mine was kept open in 1985 after Tasmania gave RGC 10 mln dlrs in aid. The new package includes an eight mln dlr advance to RGC at the long-term bond rate, power concessions and deferred royalties and payroll taxes.  \n',copper
'Total copper stocks held by U.S. rod mills and refiners (including wirebars, cathodes, scrap, rod and in-process material) dropped to 155,467,000 lbs at the end of January from 203,513,000 lbs at the end of December, the American Bureau of Metal Statistics said.     Rod stocks held by refiners and rod mills decreased to 61,384,000 lbs in January from 69,986,000 lbs in December.     Cathode inventories at rod mills fell to 86,456,000 lbs in January from 124,409,000 lbs in December, while wirebar stocks were lower at 3,508,000 lbs versus 4,913,000 lbs in December.     December rod mill wirebar use nearly doubled to 3,148,000 lbs in January from 1,540,000 lbs in December. Cathode use by mills and refiners increased to 255,266,000 lbs in January from 238,821,000 lbs in December.  \n',copper
'U.S. brass mill copper stocks fell to 185,400 short tons (copper content) at the end of January from 191,200 short tons at the end of December, according to the American Bureau of Metal Statistics.     Consumption by brass mills increased to 60,700 short tons in January from 48,900 short tons in December.     Mills consumed 29,600 tons of refinery shapes in January versus 24,000 tons in December. Scrap consumption increased to 31,100 tons in January from 24,900 tons in December.     Total brass mill shipments increased to 69,600 tons in January from 54,400 tons in December, while receipts rose to 63,800 tons from 47,100 tons.  \n',copper
'The U.S. Mint said it is seeking offers on 3,701,000 lbs of electrolytic copper and 629,000 lbs of electrolytic cut nickel cathodes or briquettes that it intends to purchase.     It said both metals are for delivery in the week of May 11 to Olin Corp, East Alton, Ill.     Offers for the copper are due by 1100 hrs EDT, April 21, while offers on the nickel are due at 1100 hrs EDT on April 14.     The Mint said that firms, in submitting their offers, select to receive payment by standard check or be wire transfer. Awards are determined by whichever of the two methods is most cost advantageous, based on the cost of money at that time.     The minimum acceptance periods for each solicitation is three calendar days for the copper and 10 calendar days for the nickel, the Mint said.  \n',copper
'Refined copper stocks held by U.S. refineries fell to 109,200 short tons at the end of January from 145,400 short tons at the end of December, the American Bureau of Metal Statistics reported.     Commodity Exchange (Comex) copper stocks climbed to 103,000 tons in January from 93,300 tons in December. Combined refinery and Comex stocks eased to 212,200 tons in January from 238,700 tons in December.     U.S. refined production declined to 117,600 tons in January from 137,400 tons in December. Crude output increased to 98,600 tons in January from 93,300 tons (revised lower) in December.     Preliminary figures showed U.S. refined deliveries rose to 151,800 tons in January from 124,800 tons in December.  \n',copper
'Zambia has stopped sending its copper exports through South Africa, the official Times of Zambia said.     The newspaper yesterday quoted highly placed sources as saying the state-owned Zambia Consolidated Copper Mines (ZCCM) was diverting its mineral exports away from South Africa, but it did not say which alternative routes were being used.     ZCCM officials declined to comment on the report, but Standwell Mapara, general manager of the Tanzania-Zambia Railway Authority (TAZARA), tolds recently virtually all Zambian mineral exports had been channelled along the TAZARA line to Dar es Salaam for the last three months.     During that period no Zambian copper had been shipped through Zimbabwe to the Mozambican port of Beira - the only other available route which avoids South Africa, Mapara said.     Last December TAZARA carried 36,000 tonnes of Zambian mineral ore, the line\'s record for any one month period, he added.     Copper, cobalt and other mineral exports account for 95 to 98 pct of Zambia\'s foreign exchange earnings and President Kenneth Kaunda tolds in a recent interview it was vital for his country to assure new outlets for them, avoiding the traditional route through South Africa.     Referring to Zambia\'s preparations for a possible cut in economic links with South Africa, Kaunda tolds in an interview on March 1, \"My main concern, of course, is the mines because whatever happens we must continue to run the mines.\"     According to Mapara, TAZARA handled 1.1 mln tonnes of freight last year and is still working well below its present 1.4 mln capacity. Kaunda said that once preparations had been completed for evacuating Zambia\'s mineral exports on safe and dependable routes his government would look to increase its usage of TAZARA for other types of cargo.     The 1986 annual report of Zambia\'s state-run Metal Marketing Corporation said 81 pct of the country\'s metal exports were channelled through Dar es Salaam last year, versus 79 pct in 1985. The report said Zambian copper production fell to 463,000 tonnes last year from 526,000 in 1985.     Despite the official optimism about diversifying Zambia\'s export routes, diplomatic sources in Lusaka expressed reservations about the capacity of Dar es Salaam and Beira ports to handle all of Zambia\'s mineral exports, even if they could be hauled there by train.     \"The two ports cannot in any way and in their present form handle the huge exports of Zambian copper,\" one western diplomat said.     \"A serious disruption in copper movement to the markets could be brought about as it would pile up at the two ports which lack the facilities and space to handle the copper tonnage,\" he added.  \n',copper
'Zambian copper production rose 3.2 pct to 113,275 tonnes in fourth quarter 1986 from 109,767 in the same 1985 period but sales fell 18.7 pct to 119,967 tonnes from 147,537, Zambia Consolidated Copper Mines, ZCCM, said.     A spokesman for the government-controlled mining company said the country\'s cobalt production fell 24 pct to 879 tonnes over the same period, while cobalt sales rose 92 pct to 1,734 tonnes. He did not give figures for the fourth quarter of 1985.     Lead production fell 22.9 pct to 1,670 tonnes from 2,165 and zinc production dropped 14 pct to 4,830 tonnes, he added.     ZCCM, which monopolises copper mining in Zambia and accounts for about 90 pct of the country\'s foreign exchange earnings, made a net loss of 718 mln kwacha in 1986 compared with a net profit of 19 mln kwacha the previous year.     The 1986 losses were after taking into account net interest payments of 426 mln kwacha, an exchange loss of 412 mln kwacha and taxes of 235 mln kwacha.  \n',copper
'Minister of Mines Patrick Chitambala confirmed that Zambia had ended copper shipments through South Africa and announced that its state-run mining company had closed down its liaison office in the white-ruled republic.     He told the official Times of Zambia newspaper in an interview the government was diverting all mineral exports along rail routes to Dar es Salaam in Tanzania and Beira in Mozambique. Chitambala declined to say what volume of copper and other minerals were being shipped through these two ports, but he said there had not been any problem with the new arrangements.     \"So far our copper has been reaching its destinations without hindrance,\" he told the Times.     The Times of Zambia quoted unnamed sources as saying Zambia exported 100,000 tonnes of copper through Dar es Salaam and 17,000 through Beira in the last quarter of 1986. Diplomatic sources in Lusaka had earlier expressed doubts over Zambia\'s ability to ship all its copper through Beira and Dar es Salaam without causing massive bottlenecks at the ports.     Chitambala also said that the state-run Zambia Consolidated Copper Mines (ZCCM) had closed its liaison office in Johannesburg, since it was now redundant.  \n',copper
'The 50 European Currency Unit gold coins which go on sale tomorrow in Belgium will be priced at a premium of seven pct to the value of the gold they contain, a Finance Ministry spokesman said. The price will be calculated daily, based on the daily gold fixing in London.     Belgium is minting an initial 50,000 gold coins to celebrate the 30th anniversary of the European Community\'s founding Treaty of Rome, but final production is expected to be around 200,000. Each 17.27 gram coin will contain 55 grams of fine metal.     Two mln silver coins, face value five Ecus, will be sold at 500 francs each.  \n',gold
'The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.S (BHP) said it plans a renounceable one-for-three issue of rights to float a new company, BHP Gold Mines Ltd (BHPGM), which will hold most of BHP\'s gold interests.     In a statement BHP said the 25-cent par rights would be priced at 50 cents for 430 mln of the BHPGM shares on offer. BHP will subscribe for the remaining 540 mln shares, or 56 pct of issued capital, on the same terms.     BHPGM will pay 440 mln dlrs for BHP\'s gold interests, excluding its stake in Papua New Guinea\'s Ok Tedi Mining Ltd and those interests held by BHP\'s Utah International Inc.     The BHP statement said the issue will be made to shareholders registered on March 27. It opens April 4 and closes April 29, and is underwritten by J.B. Were and Son. Rights will be traded on Australian stock exchanges from March 23 to April 22, and the new shares will be quoted from June 4.     BHP said the new company will be one of Australia\'s larger gold producers, with annual output exceeding 170,000 ounces. It said there are plans to boost production to 300,000 ounces by the early 1990s. BHPGM\'s portfolio will include several Australian mines -- 30 pct of Telfer, 100 pct of Ora Banda and Browns Creek and 20 pct of the new Boddington development.     The statement said BHPGM would also hold BHP\'s 45 pct stake in the Coronation Hill Property in the Northern Territory, and its 55 pct stake in a new venture near Gympie, Queensland.     BHPGM chairman-designate John Gough said it was a quality gold stock.     \"The diversity and depth of BHP Gold\'s portfolio ... Give the company a sound foundation in current gold production and an exciting potential for growth,\" he said.  \n',gold
'Thousands of black mineworkers roared support for a union proposal to seize control of South Africa\'s gold, uranium, platinum and coal mines if the owners refuse to improve conditions for migrant black workers.     About 15,000 miners attended a rally here to endorse moves proposed by last week\'s annual meeting of the 200,000 strong National Union of Mineworkers (NUM).     They also supported a proposal for a national strike at the end of this month if the owners refused to begin negotiations.     Migrant workers from surrounding countries make up more than half of the labour force in the mines.     It was not stated how the union would \"seize control.\"     The miners\' leaders also demanded an end to the system of single sex hostels for migrant workers, to be replaced by housing schemes so that workers could live with their families.     The crowd, one of the largest to attend a meeting since South Africa declared a state of emergency last June, also shouted approval of a proposal to work closely with anti-apartheid movements such as the United Democratic Front (UDF) which claims two mln members. They also shouted their support for a demand that jailed black nationalist leader Nelson Mandela be released.  \n',gold
'British Petroleum Co PLC said based on a feasibility report from Ridgeway Mining Co, its joint venture Ridgeway Project in South Carolina could start commercial gold production by mid-1988.     The company said the mine would produce approximately 158,000 ounces of gold per year over the first four full years of operation from 1989 through 1992 and at an average 133,000 ounces a year over the full projected 11 year life of the mine.     BP\'s partner is Galactic Resources Ltd of Toronto.     BP said subject to receipt of all statutory permits, finalization of financing arrangements and management and joint venture review, construction of a 15,000 short ton per day processing facility can start. Capital costs to bring the mine into production are estimated at 76 mln dlrs.  \n',gold
'Canamax Resources Inc and Pacific Trans-Ocean Resources Ltd said they conditionally approved starting production at their jointly owned Ketza River gold deposit in the Yukon after a study recommended the move.     They said production was conditional on approval of a water license and arrangement of appropriate financing. They estimated development costs for the mine and mill would total 21.1 mln dlrs, including three mln dlrs of working capital.     The feasibility study anticipated gold production of 49,600 ounces a year at a cost of 129 Canadian dlrs a short ton, they said.     Canamax and Pacific Trans-Ocean said the project would yield a 40 pct after-tax real rate of return at a gold price of 400 U.S. dlrs an ounce.     They said they would mine 460,000 tonnes of proven and probable mineable reserves of oxide ore grading 0.45 ounce gold ton at a yearly rate of 112,000 tonnes for a mine life of 4.25 years.     Possible reserves of 75,000 tonnes grading 0.38 ounce gold ton at the break zone would extend mine life by a year, with considerable potential for development of further oxide ore reserves at the deposit, they said.  \n',gold
'Carolin Mines Ltd said recent assays of tailings at its Hope, British Columbia mine ranged from 0.50 to 0.64 ounces of gold per ton.      There were only trace amounts of platinum and palladium, the company said.     Carolin said the results sharply disagreed with an earlier assay performed by Intergold U.S.A. Inc which showed 1.0 ounce of gold per ton and 0.50 ounce of platinum per ton.     Carolin also said it expects to receive results of further tests and assays of the tailings within two to three weeks.  \n',gold
'Gold output in the northeast China province of Heilongjiang rose 22.7 pct in 1986 from 1985\'s level, the New China News Agency said. It gave no figures.     It said the province, China\'s second largest gold producer after Shandong, plans to double gold output by 1990 from the 1986 level. China does not publish gold production figures.     However, industry sources estimate output at about 65 tonnes a year, with exports put between 11 and 31 tonnes.     China is selling more gold abroad to offset large trade deficits in recent years, western diplomats said.  \n',gold
'Consolidated TVX Mining Corp said it agreed to issue 7.8 mln treasury shares to acquire interests in three gold mining companies in Brazil and an option to increase the company\'s interest in a platinum property.     The company said the transactions will bring immediate production and earnings to Consolidated TVX, enhance its precious metal potential and is expected to improve cash flow and earnings on a per share basis. The company did not give specific figures.     Consolidated TVX said it will acquire 29 pct of CMP, a public gold mining company in which TVX already holds a 15 pct interest, making TVX the largest single shareholder.     The company also agreed to acquire a 19 pct stake in Novo Astro, a private company, and a 16 pct interest in Teles Pires Mining, increasing the TVX\'s ownership to 51 pct.     In addition, Consolidated TVX said it will acquire the right to add a 10 pct interest to a platinum property in which it already owns a 29.4 pct stake.     CMP earned 11 mln Canadian dlrs in 1986 and expects to produce 42,000 ounces of gold in 1987 at a cost of 160 U.S. dlrs an ounce, Consolidated TVX said.     Novo Astro operates Brazil\'s richest gold mine located in Amapa State, with an average grade of 0.8 ounces of gold a ton in a hardrock quartz vein, Consolidated TVX said. Mining of eluvial surface material produced 25,000 ounces in 1986 and is expected to produce 60,000 ounces in 1987.     It also said Teles Pires Mining controls rights to a 350 kilometer section of the Teles Pires River, where one dredge is expected to produce 10,000 ounces of gold in 1987.  \n',gold
'Currency fluctuations may reassert their influence on the bullion market in the near future, bullion bankers Samuel Montagu and Co Ltd said in a market report.     But the firm said silver may lag behind gold in any reactions to movements on foreign exchanges.     \"OPEC\'s failure to address the recent decline in oil prices remains a worrying factor however, and on balance it appears that the market should be approached cautiously,\" Montagu said.     The bank said the US economy has shown no noticeable long-term improvement and that both Latin American debt and the Iranian arms affair could undermine confidence in the dollar.  \n',gold
'East Rand Proprietary Mines Ltd said that barring any major disruption in production, it expects 1987 gold output to top 10 tonnes after dropping to 9.223 tonnes last year from 10.251 in 1985.     Chairman Clive Knobbs said in the annual report the mine was expected to mill a higher tonnage while capital expenditure during 1987 will be around 118.5 mln rand.    The decline in gold production last year was due to a four pct drop in tonnage milled and a seven pct decline in grade.  \n',gold
'Echo Bay Mines Ltd said it discovered a gold deposit in the Cove area near its McCoy gold mine in Nevada.     Echo Bay said it encountered gold in 39 of 42 drill holes at Cove. It said seven holes averaged 0.185 ounce gold a short ton and 1.8 ounces of silver, with the seven intersections averaging 118 feet in thickness beneath 25 feet of overburden.     The discovery is on the McCoy property, one mile northeast of the McCoy open pit, heap leach gold mine, which is expected to produce about 85,000 ounces of gold this year, Echo Bay said.  \n',gold
'The public prosecutors and police here arrested five former senior executives of a bankrupt gold deposit business group for defrauding about 450 clients of about 1.5 billion yen for gold bars which were never delivered, police said.     The case involving the Toyota Shoji Company was highlighted when its 32-year-old Chairman Kazuo Nagano was stabbed to death here in public view in June, 1985.     Television crews which had been waiting outside Nagano\'s home filmed two men smashing their way into the home and later emerging with a bloodstained bayonet.     The company, established here in 1981, undertook to hold gold on deposit for investors. It grew into a nationwide business operation with 87 branch offices and 7,000 employees at its peak in early 1985.     Toyota Shoji\'s business group collected an estimated 200 billion yen from about 30,000 clients, many of them pensioners and housewives, before the firm went bankrupt in July, 1985, according to lawyers.     Of them, some 18,000 clients cla&#127;imed they could get back neither gold or money, suffering an aggregate loss of 150 billion yen, local press reports said.     Police said the five arrested on charge of fraud today included Hiroshi Ishikawa, 47, former Toyota Shoji president, and a sixth former executive was placed on a wanted list.     They were suspected of having collaborated with the late Nagano in swindling about 1.5 billion yen from about 450 people in Osaka and n&#127;earby Kobe during a six month period just before the firm\'s bankruptcy, they said.     To&#127;&#127;day\'s arre&#127;st came a&#127;&#127;fter narly two years of joint&#127; investigation by the public prosecutors and police, who &#127;had questioned about 3,000 of&#127;&#127; the firm\'s former employees&#127;, police sou&#127;rces &#127;&#127;said.  \n',gold
'Franco Nevada Mining Corp Ltd said the gain in its stock price today is related to deep drilling being conducted by American Barrick Resources Corp at the Goldstrike claims in the Carlin camp in northern Nevada.     Franco Nevada stock is up two at seven dlrs per share on the Toronto Stock Exchange.     Franco Nevada said American Barrick announced on March nine that the drilling indicated a number of significant intersections of sulfide gold mineralization below a depth of about 1,000 feet.     One vertical drill hole intersected gold continuously from 1,100 feet to 1,730 feet averaging 0.30 ounces per short ton, the announcement said.  \n',gold
'The price of gold bullion is likely to rise in the second half of the year on increased private investor demand, West German analysts said.     Gold could rise as high as 500 dlrs per ounce later this year, said Peter Witte, director of Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale\'s trading division, after a presentation by the U.S. Mint to promote its gold and silver Eagle series coins.     \"A lot will depend on oil prices and developments on stock exchanges,\" Witte said, adding he saw gold positioned for further rises once it breaks out above 450 dlrs.     Gold was fixed this morning in London at 411.30 dlrs.     Despite current strong interest in gold mine stocks, many investors still want to buy physical gold, Witte said.     Interest in gold mine stocks may also wane if stock exchange rallies under way in many countries start to waver.     Hermann Strohmeyer, vice president of Commerzbank AG\'s foreign exchange trading and treasury department, said gold is poised to rise to 460 to 470 dlrs an ounce in the second half of this year.     The price is unlikely to fall much below 380 or 390 dlrs an ounce, and probably will continue in a range between 380 and 430 dlrs in the first half of this year, he said.  \n',gold
'The price of gold bullion is likely to rise in the second half of the year on increased private investor demand, West German analysts said.     Gold could rise as high as 500 dlrs per ounce later this year, said Peter Witte, director of Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale\'s trading division, after a presentation by the U.S. Mint to promote its gold and silver Eagle series coins.     \"A lot will depend on oil prices and developments on stock exchanges,\" Witte said, adding he saw gold positioned for further rises once it breaks out above 450 dlrs.     Gold was fixed this morning in London at 411.30 dlrs.     Despite current strong interest in gold mine stocks, many investors still want to buy physical gold, Witte said.     Interest in gold mine stocks may also wane if stock exchange rallies under way in many countries start to waver.     Hermann Strohmeyer, vice president of Commerzbank AG\'s foreign exchange trading and treasury department, said gold is poised to rise to 460 to 470 dlrs an ounce in the second half of this year.     The price is unlikely to fall much below 380 or 390 dlrs an ounce, and probably will continue in a range between 380 and 430 dlrs in the first half of this year, he said.  \n',gold
'Gold is expected to continue its rise this year due to renewed inflationary pressures, especially in the U.S., Hamburg-based Vereins- und Westbank AG said.     It said in a statement the stabilisation of crude oil prices and the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries\' efforts to achieve further firming of the price has led to growing inflationary pressures in the U.S.     Money supplies in the U.S., Japan and West Germany exceed central bank limits and real growth of their gross national products, it added.     Use of physical gold should rise this year due to increased industrial demand and higher expected coin production, the bank said.     Speculative demand, which influences the gold price on futures markets, has also risen, the bank said.     These factors and South Africa\'s unstable political situation, which may lead to a temporary reduction in gold supplies from that country, underscore the firmer sentiment, it said.     However, Australia\'s output is estimated to rise to 90 tonnes this year from 73.5 tonnes in 1986.  \n',gold
'Canamax Resources Inc and Pacific Trans-Ocean Resources Ltd said they conditionally approved starting production at their jointly owned Ketza River gold deposit in the Yukon after a study recommended the move.     They said production was conditional on approval of a water license and arrangement of appropriate financing. They estimated development costs for the mine and mill would total 21.1 mln dlrs, including three mln dlrs of working capital.     The feasibility study anticipated gold production of 49,600 ounces a year at a cost of 129 Canadian dlrs a short ton, they said.     Canamax and Pacific Trans-Ocean said the project would yield a 40 pct after-tax real rate of return at a gold price of 400 U.S. dlrs an ounce.     They said they would mine 460,000 tonnes of proven and probable mineable reserves of oxide ore grading 0.45 ounce gold per ton at a yearly rate of 112,000 tonnes for a mine life of 4.25 years.     Possible reserves of 75,000 tonnes grading 0.38 ounce gold per ton at the break zone would extend mine life by a year, with considerable potential for development of further oxide ore reserves at the deposit, they said.  \n',gold
'Golden North Resource Corp said said surface and underground drilling on the Canty project and Mascot fraction at its Nickel Plate Mountain property in British Columbia returned encouraging gold assays.     It said one Canty hole encountered several mineralized intervals including 11 feet grading 0.342 ounce gold a short ton from 86 to 97 feet and 17 feet grading 0.756 ounce gold ton from 170.5 feet to 187.5 feet.     A Mascot fraction hole returned assays including 0.190 ounce gold ton over seven feet between 57 and 64 feet, it said.  \n',gold
'The  Ministry of Mines has announced the discovery of a major gold field in Grand Bois in Haiti\'s mineral-rich North.     At a press conference yesterday, a Ministry spokesman reported the deposit contained an estimated 44 mln tons of ore, with each ton capable of containing 7,666 grams of gold. The spokesman gave no estimate of what he thought the find, discovered on Wednesday, was worth.     However, mining could only begin after foreign partners invest eight mln dlrs needed for technical equipment, the spokesman said.     The Haitian government has never before operated a gold mine, but the United Nations has recently completed a three year feasibility study which lists Grand Bois and Morne Bossa as sites of important gold deposits.     In 1971, the Sedren copper mine in Gonaives, operated by a Canadian firm, closed down after years of mining a concentrate containing gold as well as copper.     \"The new Grand Bois mine represents large amounts of money,\" said a former official of Sedren Mine.     \"But like everything else there\'s a catch. The gold has to be extracted, and first someone has to come up with the money to finance the operation,\" the official, who asked not to be named, tolds.  \n',gold
'About 8,000 black miners returned to work after a week-long industrial action at South Africa\'s largest gold mine, mine owner Anglo American Corp of South Africa Ltd ANGL.J said.     A spokesman for the mining house said the action started on Wednesday last week when thousands of miners staged a go-slow at One underground shaft of the Free State Geduld division of Free State Consolidated Gold Mines Ltd FSCN.J.     The action later escalated into an underground sit-in at the mine over the weekend, prompting management to close the affected shaft because of what the company described as \"the creation of unsafe working conditions.\"     Anglo American spokesman John Kingsley-Jones said the company held talks with the National Union of Mineworkers (NUM), South Africa\'s biggest trade union which claims a membership of 360,000 black workers, but failed to establish the cause of worker dissatisfaction. He acknowledged that the mine suffered a loss of production, but declined to give estimates.     Free State Consolidated last year produced 104 tonnes of gold from 28 underground shafts.     The NUM was not immediately available for comment on the action. But a spokesman for the union earlier told the South African Press Association that miners had been locked out of the mine at the weekend after staging a strike in protest against being ordered to carry bags containing explosives as well as food for white miners.  \n',gold
'The cabinet has approved a bill making it easier for the government to issue commemorative coins, a Finance Ministry official said.     The bill, which must still be approved by parliament, would take effect in April 1988. It would allow the government to issue 1,000, 5,000 and 10,000 yen coins without special legislation, although higher-valued coins would still need a special law, the official said. At present it can only issue coins of 500 yen or less.  \n',gold
'Dowa Mining Co Ltd said it will start commercial production of gold, copper, lead and zinc from its Nurukawa Mine in northern Japan in April.     A company spokesman said the mine\'s monthly output is expected to consist of 1,300 tonnes of gold ore and 3,700 of black ore, which consists of copper, lead and zinc ores.     A company survey shows the gold ore contains up to 13.3 grams of gold per tonne, he said.     Proven gold ore reserves amount to 50,000 tonnes while estimated reserves of gold and black ores total one mln tonnes, he added.  \n',gold
'Levon Resources Ltd said re-checked gold assays from the Howard tunnel on its Congress, British Columbia property yielded higher gold grades than those reported in January and February.     It said assays from zone one averaged 0.809 ounces of gold a ton. Levon previously reported the zone averaged 0.226 ounces of gold a ton. Levon said re-checked assays from zone two averaged 0.693 ounces of gold a ton.     Levon Resources said the revised zone two assays compared to previously reported averages of 0.545 ounces of gold a ton.     The company also said it intersected another vein 90 feet west of zone two, which assayed 0.531 ounces of gold a ton.  \n',gold
'Lac Minerals Ltd and Cambior Inc said they completed a second hole at their jointly owned Doyon mine in Quebec, which showed two significant gold intersections.     One intersection graded 0.33 ounce gold per short ton over 44 feet at depth of 1,411 feet, while the other graded 0.22 ounce gold per ton over 23 feet at 2,064 feet, the companies said. The hole is 460 feet east of the previously reported first hole.     Another hole is being drilled 460 feet to the west of the first drill hole and results are expected in late March or early April.  \n',gold
'Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New York plans an issue of 12,000 warrants for gold bullion at 425 dlrs an ounce, lead manager Morgan Guaranty (Switzerland) AG said.     Each warrant, priced at 955 Swiss francs, entitled holders to acquire five-ounce bars of .999 gold in the period from April 30, 1987, to July 31, 1991, exercisable on Wednesdays.     The warrants represented unsecured, unsubordinated liabilities of the borrower. Payment was due April 16, and a quotation on the Luxembourg bourse was planned.     The warrants, when exercised, would be repaid in current dollars based on the value of gold on the exercise date.     The conditions represent a premium of about 145 dlrs an ounce to the current gold price.     A Morgan (Switzerland) official said that on the basis of the maturity of four years and three months, the pricing involved an implicit volatility of gold of 24.5 pct before the warrants were in the money, compared with implicit volatility of 30 pct for the Indosuez gold warrants and 26 pct for the Citibank gold warrants recent issued with maturities of 18 and 24 months.  \n',gold
'A new market has emerged in warrants to buy gold, a vehicle which bankers say brings some of the play of commodity options into the field of securities.     Over the past three weeks, Swiss offices of American banks have launched a total of four issues of warrants with varying conditions, drawing on renewed inflationary worries and the recovery of the gold price last year.     And Credit Suisse and Credit Suisse-First Boston each issued Swiss franc bonds with warrants for gold which have a similar character, though they are aimed at a less professional market.     The market is still small. Taken together, the four American-led warrant issues raised only about 50 mln Swiss francs.     But banks believe the vehicle meets a need of investors and predicted a lively future.     Andrew Barrett of Citicorp Investment Bank (Switzerland) AG said: \"The warrants give smaller investors a chance to have a long-term investment in gold with limited risk.\"     Citicorp in Zurich launched the first of these warrants on February 27, following it up with a second issue less than a week later. The issuer in both cases was Citibank NA.     The idea found some quick copies. Goldman Sachs in Zurich organized and co-led an issue for the Swiss branch of Banque Indosuez on March 9 and last night Morgan Guaranty (Switzerland) AG did another for Morgan Guaranty Trust Co of New York.     The four issues now offer investors striking prices for gold ranging from the Indosuez issue at 410 dlrs an ounce, the same price as the underlying commodity, to a 430 dlr level on the first one for Citibank.     The premiums range from 22 pct to 36 pct and maturities from 18 months to four years and three months, in all cases longer than gold futures and options on U.S. Markets.     The bankers traced the inspiration for the market back to the February report of U.S. Consumer prices for January, when a jump of 0.7 pct raised again the threat of inflation.     \"Many people are worried about inflation again,\" said Mats Joensson of Goldman Sachs. \"Money supply in Germany and the United States has grown very strongly in the last year and people want to take a ride on gold.\"     The gold market, having seen strong gains in 1986, has languished just above 400 dlrs an ounce over the past few weeks. But the banks saw in warrants the vehicle for a more highly leveraged play where the downside risk was limited.     Barrett said it was natural that the market developed in Switzerland. \"People here understand gold, and they understand warrants,\" he said.     Citicorp (Switzerland) pioneered warrants with a series of equity-linked covered issues based on Japanese company shares over the past two years, and last autumn, Swiss banks launched covered warrants in Swiss registered shares in a bid to give foreign investors a chance to play in a market otherwise closed to all but Swiss citizens, and to play it with higher leverage.     But after a quick flurry of issues, that market dried up when Swiss shares prices fell from their January peaks.     The issues are being marketed not on the basis of simple premiums, but on implicit volatility models devised to provide scientific comparisons between titles in the options market.     Martin Bachem of Morgan Guaranty said his bank\'s issue was competitive despite its relatively high premium. The issue, for five ounces at 425 dlrs, was priced at 955 Swiss francs, making a premium over the spot gold price of nearly 36 pct.     Using a Black Sholes options model, he said the issue\'s long, 4.3-year maturity meant the warrants needed an implicit volatility of gold of only 24.5 pct for the option to pay off, which he claimed was lower than the other issues.     But Barrett said the Black Sholes variant Citicorp used pointed to a higher volatily for the Morgan issue and emphasized that the models were at best an inexact science.     And each bank, using its own model, put the implicit volatility needed for its own issue at close to 25 pct.     Whatever the calculation, the issues have received a warm welcome from investors.     Joensson of Goldman Sachs said there was a lot of demand, even among small investors, who were buying 15 or 20 warrants apiece. \"The most sophisticated ones wouldn\'t buy these because the premiums are too high,\" he said.  \n',gold
'Newmont Gold Corp expects gold sales in 1987 to rise about 22 pct to 577,000 ounces from 1986\'s 474,000 ounces, the company said in its annual report.     Newmont Gold, 95 pct owned by Newmont Mining Corp, said it expects significant increases in gold sales in 1988 and 1989 as well.  \n',gold
'Pyongyang and a group of Tokyo-based North Korean businessmen plan to resurrect a North Korean goldmine and boost annual output to almost one tonne within two years from 600 pounds at present, said Li Sangsu, a spokesman for Unzan Mine Development Co, the venture partner.     Work will begin on April 3 and the company aims to increase output to 10 tonnes within a decade to pay off Pyongyang\'s 70 billion yen debt to 30 Japanese companies, Li added.     \"We expect this mine to be worth about 2,000 billion yen in gold deposits,\" he said.     The mine, started in 1896 by a U.S. Company, is one of six or seven virtually untapped mines in the Unzan area, 94 miles north of Pyongyang, Li said.     Li said modern equipment and advanced technology would increase yields. \"Up to now, the mining was done with antiquated methods and basic equipment.\"     The gold mine scheme is the latest in a series of moves by North Korea to clear its debts to Japanese creditors.     Earlier this year, Pyongyang tried and failed to pay off part of its debt with several tonnes of fish.  \n',gold
'President Alan Garcia said Peru has found gold deposits worth an estimated 1.3 billion dlrs in a jungle region near the Ecuadorean border about 1,000 km north of here.     He told reporters yesterday the deposits, located at four sites near the town of San Ignasio, contained the equivalent of 100 tonnes of gold.     Garcia said the government would soon install a two mln dlr treatment plant at Tomaque. It will extract enough ore to provide an estimated 25 mln dlr profit by the end of this year, he added.     Garcia said the other gold-bearing deposits are located at Tamborapa, Pachapidiana, and a zone between the Cenepa and Santiago rivers.  \n',gold
'President Alan Garcia said Peru has found gold deposits worth an estimated 1.3 billion dlrs in a jungle region near the Ecuadorean border about 1,000 km north of here.     He told reporters the deposits, located at four sites near the town of San Ignasio, contained the equivalent of 100 tonnes of gold.     Garcia said the government would soon install a two mln dlr treatment plant at Tomaque. It will extract enough ore to provide an estimated 25 mln dlr profit by the end of this year, he added.     Garcia said the other gold-bearing deposits are located at Tamborapa, Pachapidiana and a zone between the Cenepa and Santiago rivers.  \n',gold
'The Pioneer Group Inc said its 70 pct-owned Teberebie Goldfields Ltd venture was granted an additional concession of land in Ghana to seek and mine gold.     The State Gold Mining Corp of Ghana granted the venture an additional 14.5 square kilometers in Teberebie, Ghana, contiguous to 11.5 square kilometers granted earlier.     The original concession appears to have a substantial amount of gold bearing material containing about 2 grams, or 6/100 ounces, of gold per tonne. But the venture has no firm estimate on the costs of extracting the gold and no assurances can be given that the reserves can be mined profitably, the company said. It said Teberebie Goldfields has not conducted tests on the newly granted land but added the land seems to be similar in geological characteristics to the original land.  \n',gold
'Placer Pacific Ltd said it hopes the Papua New Guinea government will approve development of the Misima gold project next month, following the submission of its final environmental plan in Port Moresby today.     This completes the major documentation required to gain official approval to proceed, Placer said in a statement.     Placer has estimated the epithermal deposit, located on the eastern half of Misima Island off the southeastern coast of Papua New Guinea, contains proven and probable reserves of 62.1 mln tonnes grading 1.35 grams/tonne gold and 20 grams/tonne silver, and exploration is continuing.  \n',gold
'Placer Pacific Ltd said it will undertake a full feasibility study of Western Australia\'s Big Bell gold prospect.     Results of an economic evaluation of the find, in which Placer has an option with Australian Consolidated Minerals Ltd (ACM) to earn a 50 pct interest, were encouraging enough to warrant a full study, Placer said in a statement.     Big Bell, in the Murchison goldfield 540 km north east of Perth, was founded in 1904. Between 1937 and 1955 it yielded 22.8 tonnes of gold and 7.8 tonnes of silver while milling about 30,000 tonnes of ore a month.     Placer has said the prospect has an estimated 14 mln tonnes of ore with a three-gram-per-tonne concentration accessible by open-pit mining and a further 4.5 mln tonnes with a 4.4-gram-a-tonne concentration between 300 and 600 meters underground.     It said it was obliged to produce the feasibility study no later than December 31 this year by which time it would have spent three mln dlrs on Big Bell.     If the results are positive and a commitment to develop made then construction would take about 12 months, Placer said.  \n',gold
'The climate for precious metals is improving with prices benefiting from renewed inflation fears and the switching of funds from dollar and stock markets, brokers Samuel Montagu and Co Ltd said.     Silver prices in March gained some 15 pct in dlr terms due to a weak dollar and silver is felt to be fairly cheap relative to gold, Montagu said in its monthly silver newsletter. In March the gold/silver ratio narrowed from 74 to less than 67.     The supply/demand position has improved in the past year, and despite a silver market surplus, the quantity of silver is modest enough to be absorbed by investors, it added.     The report said the firmness in oil prices was likely to continue in the short term.     A period of consolidation might be necessary before prices attempted to move significantly higher,it said, but so long as the dollar remains under pressure then the outlook for silver was positive.     However silver was less likely to continue to outpace the other metals by such a margin, Montagu said.  \n',gold
'A proposed sales tax on gold transactions could put a damper on the Tokyo market and encourage a shift of trading to Hong Kong and Singapore, senior vice president and Tokyo branch manager of Credit Suisse Paul Hofer told a press conference.     \"If you impose five pct on both buy and sell transactions, Tokyo participants in the gold market could be out of business,\" he said. The tax would create such a spread that Japanese would be unable to compete in the international market, he added.     \"How can the government really raise taxes if the system they impose is prohibitive of generating business?\" he said.     The government now imposes a 15 pct tax on physical trades exceeding 37,500 yen for gold jewellery and coins and a 2.5 yen tax per 10,000 yen on futures transactions, gold dealers said.     The new five pct tax would be imposed on companies trading more than 100 mln yen a year and apply to paper gold trades, gold deposits with banks and trading of gold bars as well as that of jewellery and coins, dealers said.     However, the tax would lower the rate on jewellery and coins to only five pct from the current 15 pct, they said.     Hofer said in 1982 Switzerland had imposed a 5.6 pct gold turnover tax on Jan 1, 1980, but abolished it on Oct 1, 1986.     A study by one of the Swiss banks showed that in early 1980, the first year of the tax, the volume for all Swiss banks fell by up to 25 pct compared with 1978 and 1979, Hofer said.     Transactions of paper gold also fell up to 75 pct of the volume prior to imposition of the tax, he said.     While gold transactions in Switzerland decreased, the volume of trades outside the country, particularly in London and Luxembourg, increased between 10-25 pct, Hofer said.     Japan is a major importer of gold, buying a yearly average just under 200 tonnes, gold dealers said.     Last year Japan imported about 600 tonnes of gold, but the government had bought about 300 tonnes for minting coins to commemorate the 60th year of Emperor Hirohito\'s reign, dealers said.     Gold trading in Tokyo is dominated mainly by Japanese trading companies, while Credit Suisse is the major foreign participant.     Daily turnover in the Tokyo spot market ranges between one and 10 tonnes with the average around three tonnes, while futures turnover amounts to about four tonnes, gold dealers said.     \"All of us are concerned daily with the fact that the Tokyo market is growing, that Japan is becoming one of the three major financial markets in the world ... And in my personal opinion I think it would be a very big mistake to put a damper on this positive growth or developments by imposing such a tax,\" Hofer said.     \"I don\'t think it fits the philosophy of an internationalising market,\" he added.     Officials of several major Japanese trading houses, attending the press conference, said they supported Credit Suisse\'s call for the government not to impose the gold tax.  \n',gold
'Gold rose by about 50 U.S. Cents an ounce, following a statement by President Ronald Reagan that the arms-for-hostages deal with Iran \"was a mistake,\" dealers said.     Bullion rose to 409.40/90 dlrs from an initial low of 408.90/409.40. This compares with the opening of 409.00/50 and New York\'s close of 410.00/50.     Dealers noted mild short-covering in the metal after some initial selling by local investors. Trading was fairly quiet this morning partly owed to the slow U.S. Dollar activities, they added.     However, Reagan\'s remarks had only a short-lived bullish impact on the gold price, which is now stabilising at 409.10/60 dlrs, dealers said.     On the local market, the metal traded in a narrow range of 3,800 and 3,805 H.K. Dlrs a tael against yesterday\'s 3,778 close.  \n',gold
'Seven managers and employees at General Mining Union Corp Ltd\'s Kinross Mines Ltd will face charges of culpable homicide following last year\'s disaster when 177 gold miners died, the Attorney General\'s Office said.     The mineworkers were killed last September at Kinross when a fire set off toxic fumes which suffocated miners underground.     Three of the accused face alternative charges of breaking safety regulations set out in the Mines and Works Act.     The spokesman said the case would probably be heard in Witbank Regional Court, near Kinross, in mid-May.  \n',gold
'The gold mining industry had another \"exceptional year\" in 1986 with tonnage milled, revenues and profits reaching high levels, the Chamber of Mines said.     Nearly 108 mln tons of ore was milled, three pct higher than the prior year, while revenues rose 17 pct to 16.5 billion rand and profits increased 6.5 pct to 8.31 billion rand, the Chamber reported.     The profit rise was achieved despite substantial cost increases and a 26.1 pct rise in capital expenditures to 2.42 billion rand, it said.     The chamber said that a \"comparatively buoyant gold price allowed mines to continue the practise of mining lower grade ores which has characterised recent years.\"     It said the industry now mines to an average grade of 5.63 grams per ton compared with 6.09 grams per ton in 1985.     Gold output for the year declined five pct to 638 tons compared with the previous year\'s 671 tons.  \n',gold
'Sigma Mines (Quebec) Ltd, 65 pct owned by Dome Mines Ltd, said its Sigma Mine had proven and probable reserves at the end of 1986 of 4,902,940 tons, with an average grade of 0.139 ounces of gold a ton.     Sigma said the reserves are equivalent to 10 years future production at current milling rates.     The reserves comprise 1,640,779 tons proven reserves grading an average of 0.163 ounces of gold a ton and 3,262,161 tons probable reserves grading an average of 0.127 ounces of gold a ton.     Sigma said it changed its 1986 reserve reporting method following Dome Mines\' previously reported move to adopt general industry practice of reporting proven and probable ore reserves.     Prior to 1986, Sigma conservatively reported only proven reserves that could be mined without future development costs.     Proven reserves as of December 31, 1985 were 978,000 tons grading an average of 0.194 ounces of gold a ton, equivalent to about two years future production.  \n',gold
'Some 7,000 black miners went on strike at South African gold and coal mines, the National Union of Mineworkers (NUM) said.     A NUM spokesman said 6,000 workers began an underground sit-in at the Grootvlei gold mine, owned by General Union Mining Corp, to protest the transfer of colleagues to different jobs.    He said about 1,000 employees of Anglo American Corp\'s New Vaal Colliery also downed tools but the reason for the stoppage was not immediately clear. Officials of the two companies were not available for comment and the NUM said it was trying to start negotiations with management.  \n',gold
'Some 7,000 black workers returned to work after staging one-day strikes at two mines on Monday, the National Union of Mineworkers and the companies that own the mines said.     About 6,000 miners resumed work at the Grootvlei gold mine east of Johannesburg after protesting the transfer of colleagues to other jobs at the same mine, owners General Mining Union Corp Ltd GENM.J said.     The union said about 1,000 mineworkers at a new coal facility owned by Anglo American Corp of South Africa Ltd ANGL.J also returned to their jobs on Tuesday.     The workers at Anglo\'s Vaal Colliery south of Johannesburg had struck to protest the alleged refusal of officials of the South African homeland of Transkei to allow miners to attend a funeral in the homeland, a union spokesman said.  \n',gold
'South Africa gold holdings rose 172.56 mln rand to 4.17 billion rand in March after rising 39 mln rand to 4.0 billion in February, Reserve Bank figures show.     In volume terms gold holdings rose to 5.51 mln ounces in March from 5.26 mln ounces in February, valued at 757.24 rand an ounce for March versus 754.59 rand an ounce for February.     Total gold and foreign assets rose to 6.30 billion rand from 6.22 billion, of which the gold content increased to 66.22 pct from 64.3 pct.     Foreign bills remained at zero in March while investments fell slightly to 105.69 mln rand from February\'s 106.56 mln rand and other assets to 2.02 billion rand from 2.11 billion, the figures showed. Total liabilities fell to 12.21 billion rand in March after rising to 13.62 billion in February.  \n',gold
'St. Joe Gold Corp said it plans to proceed with development of its Golden Patricia gold property in northwestern Ontario.     It said about five mln dlrs will be spent to continue underground development and obtain operating permits and another 10.2 mln dlrs is expected to be required to complete underground development, construct a mill and provide the infrastructure needed to put the mine into commercial production.     St. Joe Gold said if the necessary operating permits were granted in time, it would start gold production in the second half of the year ending October 31, 1988 at an annual rate of about 40,000 troy ounces.     The company said the property is estimated to contain over 500,000 troy ounces of gold, and the initial mining project covers only seven of 192 claims, with drill-indicated reserves of 293,000 short tons grading 0.88 troy ounce of gold per ton.     It said initial mine output is expected to be about 150 tons of ore daily.     St. Joe Gold said the Golden Patricia vein has not been tested at depth or along strike to the east and west and exploration is continuing on the Golden Patricia property and the adjacent wholly-owned Muskeg Lake property.     The company also said its Richmond Hill gold and silver deposit in the Carbonate district of western South Dakota has been shown by drilling to contain about 3,900,000 tons grading 0.055 troy ounce of gold and 0.23 troy ounce of silver per ton.  It said preliminary results are encouraging and a feasibility study is nearing completion.  \n',gold
'Starrex Mining Corp Ltd said a sharp  rise in its share price is based on speculation for favorable results from its current underground diamond drilling program at its 35 pct owned Star Lake gold mine in northern Saskatchewan.     Starrex Mining shares rose 40 cts to 4.75 dlrs in trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange.     The company said drilling results from the program which started in late February are encouraging, \"but it is too soon for conclusions.\" Starrex did not disclose check assay results from the exploration program.  \n',gold
'Syngold Exploration Inc and Corp Falconbridge Copper said they defined undiluted reserves of 911,000 tons of ore with an average grade of 0.43 ounces of gold per ton in two separate deposits on the Deka property located at Noranda, Quebec.     Assay results from 20 suface holes drilled on 250 foot centers indicate that the Donalda number one deposit contains possible reserves of 611,000 tons at an average grade of 0.48 ounces of gold per ton.     The number one deposit\'s reserves are contained between a vertical depth of 750 and 1200 feet at a strike length of 900 feet.     Reserves of the Donalda number-two deposit, located 1,000 feet below the number-one deposit, were recalculated at 300,000 tons with an average grade of 0.33 ounces of gold per ton.     Syngold has earned a 20 pct interest in the Deka property from the operator, Corp Falconbridge Copper.  \n',gold
'Technigen Platinum corp said initial results of a 13-hole drilling program on its R.M. Nicel platinum property in Rouyn-Noranda, Quebec, indicate extensive near-surface zones highly enriched in gold, platinum and palladium.     The metals were found in rocks on the periphery of a sulphide deposit.     It said values of up to 0.073 ounce of platinum, 0.206 ounce palladium, three pct copper and 4.5 pct nickel were found over a drill section of 13 feet.  \n',gold
'American Eagle gold bullion coin sales are projected at 3.1 mln troy ounces in their first year on the market, well above the target of 2.2 mln, Donna Pope, director of the U.S. Mint, told journalists.     World sales, which began on October 20, 1986, reached 2.193 mln ounces in less than six months of sales. This made it world market leader with a share of 37 pct in 1986, Pope said.     Pope said that in volume terms, nearly half of all gold Eagle sales were within North America, roughly 40 pct were in Europe and about eight pct in Asia.     She said despite introduction of several new gold bullion coins on the market recently, the Mint is aiming to preserve the Eagle\'s strong market share with extensive publicity.     The Mint uses mainly newly mined U.S. Gold for the coins, as long as this is available at market prices. The remaining gold is taken either from U.S. Treasury stocks, or from the open market, Pope said.     Gold analysts said the Eagle is facing competition here from the Canadian Maple Leaf, and also to a lesser extent from the South African Krugerrand. Some estimated the Maple Leaf\'s West German market share at 60 pct.     The figures may be distorted, as many German investors buy gold bullion in Switzerland or Luxembourg to escape the 14 pct value-added tax imposed here. Including the tax, the one-ounce coins traded today at 906 marks, they said.     Competition may also come from new gold coins, including Belgium\'s ECU, which began sales today. Britain and Australia also have plans to mint gold bullion coins, the analysts said.  \n',gold
'U.S. mine production of gold rose to 244,900 troy ounces in December from 244,749 ounces in November, the U.S. Interior Department\'s Bureau of Mines said.     U.S. imports of gold in December were 692,700 ounces, vs 2,011,754 ounces in November and 611,811 ounces in December, 1985.     Gold exports totaled 243,191 ounces in December, vs November\'s 374,468 ounces and 350,078 ounces in December a year earlier.     Mine production of gold in the 12-month period Jan-Dec, 1986, totaled 2,951,151 ounces, vs 2,475,436 ounces over the same period in 1985.     Gold imports in Jan-Dec, 1986, totaled 15,749,447 ounces, vs 8,225,999 ounces for the same period in 1985, while exports stood at 4,612,919 ounces and 3,966,678 ounces over the respective periods, the bureau said.  \n',gold
'Viceroy Resource Corp said recent drilling on the Lesley Ann deposit extended the high-grade mineralization over a width of 600 feet.     Assays ranged from about 0.35 ounces of gold per short ton over a 150-foot interval at a depth of 350 to 500 feet to about 1.1 ounces of gold per ton over a 65-foot interval at a depth of 200 to 410 feet.  \n',gold
'Westmin Resources Ltd said it plans to increase capacity at its Myra Falls, British Columbia, base and precious metal mine and mill complex by 33 pct to 4,400 short tons of ore a day, subject to regulatory approvals.     The company said the expansion will cost about 24 mln dlrs and could be in operation by 1988.     Economies of scale from the expansion should pay back net expansion cost in less than one year, Westmin said.     The Myra Falls complex processed 3,257 tons of ore a day during 1986. Myra Falls 1986 production was 44,000 ounces of gold, 966,266 ounces of silver, 45.5 mln lbs of copper, 96.2 mln lbs of zinc and 777,000 lbs of lead, a company spokesman said.     Myra Falls 1986 production was 44,000 ounces of gold, 966,266 ounces of silver, 45.5 mln pounds of copper, 96.2 mln pounds of zinc and 777,000 pounds of lead, a company spokesman said.  \n',gold
'A grain elevator in Burlington, Iowa, exploded today, leaving five injured.     The elevator, operated by Archer Daniels Midland Co. of Decatur, Ill., is a terminal elevator on the Mississippi River, Doug Snyder, assistant to the vice president said.     The cause of the explosion and the extent of damage to the elevator was not immediatley known.  \n',grain
'The directors of the American Farm Bureau, the nation\'s largest farm organization, voted Tuesday to urge Congress to leave the 1985 farm bill in place without alterations.     \"We are solidly opposed to opening up the 1985 farm bill,\" said Dean Kleckner, president. \"The current farm bill has been in place for just a little over a year and in our judgment there is more to be gained at the present time from maintaining the legislation.     \"Several independent studies ... indicate the 1985 farm bill is better on balance than any of the alternatives being advanced,\" Kleckner said.     The Farm Bureau also urged Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng to adjust the loan rate for 1987 crop soybeans as much as he deems possible under the farm bill to keep soybeans competitive in the world market.     A Farm Bureau proposal suggests that producers should be eligible for supplemental payments in the form of PIK certificates for the difference between 5.02 dlrs a bushel and the new loan rate.     The organization also urged Lyng to authorize deficiency payments to farmers who were unable to plant 1987 winter wheat because of adverse weather.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Undersecretary Daniel Amstutz indicated the world wheat supply/demand situation has become more bullish recently because of developments in the world market and increased consumption.     Speaking to a House Agriculture Appropriations subcommittee, Amstutz cited three factors which have improved the wheat outlook.     He said world consumption of wheat is increasing by about 20 mln tonnes this year, primarily for feed use. There are also reports from Australia, Canada and Argentina that plantings have been reduced, he said. Furthermore, he cited reports of greater than normal winterkill in the Soviet Union.     \"It seems reasonable to expect production and consumption to be in far better balance than a year ago,\" Amstutz said.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union\'s winter grain crop is likely to have suffered losses due to dry planting conditions last fall and severe cold this winter, an analyst of world weather and crop conditions said.     Grain analyst and meteorologist Gail Martell, author of the EF Hutton publication \"Global Crop News,\" said in her latest report that the Soviets may import more grain, possibly wheat, from the U.S. due to potential crop damage.     \"Compared with last year, the outlook (for the Soviet winter grain crop) is far more pessimistic,\" she said. \"But it\'s still too early to talk about disastrous losses. A lot will depend on spring weather, not only for the outcome of the troubled winter grain crop, but also for spring planting.\"     Martell said the dry weather conditions last fall probably prevented optimal seed germination for winter grains. Key wheat growing areas of the southern Ukraine and North Caucasus received on 25-35 pct of autumn precipitation, she said.     The bitter winter cold temperatures -- which broke record lows that had stood for four decades -- also may have taken its toll on Soviet winter crops, she said.     However, she noted that most of the southern grain belt had ample snow cover, which should have well-insulated the majority of crop areas from severe frost damage.     The USSR has already bought 20 to 21 mln tonnes of grains in the July 1986/June 1987 marketing year, primarily from Canada, the European Community, Argentina and Australia, Martell said.     She cited a number of reasons besides possible crop problems that might point to additional Soviet import demand.     Last fall\'s dry weather may limit livestock grazing on moisture-depleted pastures, while the cold winter weather necessitated supplemental feeding to keep livestock healthy.     Martell was also skeptical of a Soviet claim for a 1986 grain harvest of 210 mln tonnes, and said the Chernobyl accident may have contaminated more grain than originally thought and have to be made up with imports.     However, she said the U.S. remains a supplier of last resort for the Soviet Union, noting that the Soviets have only just recently begun their first U.S. grain purchases of the 1986/87 season by buying 2.25 mln tonnes of corn.     Martell cited USDA statistics showing that since the 1980 grain embargo the U.S. is only a major supplier of grain to the USSR during years of heavy Soviet demand.     In 1984/85, the U.S. supplied 41 pct of record Soviet grain imports of 55.5 mln tonnes. But in 1985/86, the Soviet Union bought 29.9 mln tonnes of grain and turned to the U.S. for only 24 pct of that total.     While the USDA Soviet import target for grain for 1986/87 was 22 mln tonnes, many U.S. grain analysts have revised their estimates of Soviet imports up to 25-28 mln tonnes, she said.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union would likely be more interested in purchasing new crop wheat than in booking any grain for immediate shipment if offered a subsidy on U.S. wheat, an executive with a major grain export company said.     Lower prices and the desire to delay any big purchases until the condition of winter and spring crops is better known make new crop wheat more attractive, said George Hoffman, director of commodity analysis for The Pillsbury Company.     \"Pillsbury is assuming that they (Soviets) will be offered a subsidy and that it will be a subsidy that they can respond to,\" Hoffman tolds in an interview at an agribusiness education conference here. But if there are too many constraints placed on a subsidy offer, the USSR will take less than an anticipated four mln tonnes, he said.     Hoffman said Pillsbury\'s internal statistics put Soviet Union wheat purchases at only two mln tonnes under a subsidy offer. However, if a subsidy is offered at competitive levels, Moscow would likely buy more, he said.     \"If we give the Soviets the same deal as the Chinese, I expect they\'ll take it,\" said Vernon McMinimy, director of commodity research for A.E. Staley Manufacturing Co.     McMinimy tolds spring weather and its impact on crops will determine how much wheat Moscow would buy under a subsidy offer.     Soviet winter crops did not get off to a good start because of a dry autumn last year, and because of the severe winter \"they probably have had more damage due to winter weather than normal,\" McMinimy said.  \n',grain
'A government official said that a decision by Brazil not to import maize because it forecast a record harvest would not affect Argentina\'s exports.     \"We have heard nothing about this, but if Brazil has decided not to import maize that is no problem for us as it is not one of our main customers,\" Agriculture, Livestock and Fisheries Under-Secretary Miguel Braceras said.     Private sources also said Argentina\'s exports would not be affected by Brazil\'s decision, which Agriculture Minister Iris Resende announced yesterday in Sao Paulo.     Brazil had not asked for any Argentine maize, they said.     They also said a smaller crop and adverse weather this summer in Argentina had reduced production.     Braceras said that last year Brazil bought 800,000 tonnes of Argentine maize but in some years it had not imported any from Argentina.     The Soviet Union was Argentina\'s main customer and Japan was also becoming a bigger importer of the country\'s maize, he said.  \n',grain
'The Argentine Grain Board issued the following figures covering shipments of major export grains in the week to April 1, in tonnes, with comparisons for the previous week and the same week in 1986.     Bread wheat        235,800    205,700    115,500     Maize              158,400    189,000    272,700     Sorghum             26,500     18,700     39,900     Soybean                nil        nil        nil     Sunflowerseed        1,800     18,800        nil     Cumulative figures for April 1 and this calendar year, with the previous year\'s figures in brackets, are as follows, in thousands of tonnes:     Bread wheat        64.3   (44.5),    3,074.4   (2,851.4)     Maize              48.3  (107.7),      486.1     (922.4)     Sorghum             5.1   (22.2),      108.1     (188.8)     Soybean             nil    (nil),        nil       (nil)     Sunflowerseed       0.9    (nil),       43.2       (nil)  \n',grain
'Argentine grain growers reduced their estimates for maize and soybean production in the current harvest in the week to yesterday, trade sources said.     Soybean production for 1986/87 is now estimated to reach between 7.7 and eight mln tonnes, versus 7.8 to 8.2 mln tonnes estimated a week ago and eight to 8.4 mln tonnes estimated in mid-February.     But even the lowest of those estimates would be 8.5 to 12.7 pct greater than last year\'s total of 7.1 mln tonnes, according to official figures, and would be a new record.     The total area planted with soybeans for this harvest was a record 3.7 to 3.8 mln hectares and increased 10.8 to 13.8 pct compared to the 3.3 mln hectares planted last year.     The change in yield estimates is due to very high temperatures and inadequate rainfall since early in the year in the soybean-producing belt of southern Cordoba and Santa Fe and northern Buenos Aires province.     The heat and lack of rain combined to leave many soybean pods empty, especially in Cordoba.     Intense rains in recent weeks did not affect crops, since rainfall was slight in most main soybean-producing areas.     Rains in the week to yesterday were isolated and weak in Buenos Aires province, totalling between one and 10 mm. There was no recorded rain in other grain-producing provinces.     With clear skies and seasonable temperatures, fields were able to dry in areas that had received heavy rains in recent weeks, allowing growers to accelerate the pace of maize, sunflower and sorghum harvesting.     Crops were considered in generally good condition, though it is still too early to judge whether the intense rains of recent weeks caused any long-term damage.     The maize harvest advanced to between 20 and 22 pct of the total area planted, compared to 13 to 15 pct a week ago.     Total area planted with maize for this harvest stood at 3.58 to 3.78 mln hectares, down two to seven pct from the 3.85 mln hectares planted in the previous harvest.     Total production for the current maize harvest is expected to reach between 9.9 and 10.1 mln tonnes, versus 10 to 10.2 mln tonnes estimated a week ago. The new figure is 21.1 to 22.7 pct lower than the 12.8 mln tonnes produced in the last harvest, according to official figures.     The sunflower harvest advanced to between 20 and 23 pct of total planted area, versus 15 to 18 pct a week ago.     Total area planted with sunflower for this harvest was two to 2.2 mln hectares, or 29.9 to 36.3 pct lower than the record 3.14 mln hectares planted in the 1985/86 harvest.     The current harvest\'s volume was again expected to be between 2.3 and 2.6 mln tonnes, or 34.1 to 41.5 pct lower than last harvest\'s record 4.1 mln tonnes.     Yields varied widely from area to area, and growers feared that heavy rains in recent weeks may have taken their toll on crops and, consequently, on total production volume.     The sorghum harvest reached between nine and 11 pct of total planted area, compared to four to six pct a week ago.     Total area planted with sorghum stood at between 1.2 and 1.3 mln hectares, or 10.3 to 15.2 pct lower than the 1.4 mln hectares planted in the previous harvest.     Estimates for total sorghum production this harvest remained at 3.2 to 3.5 mln tonnes again this week, or 16.7 to 22 pct lower than last harvest\'s total volume of 4.1 to 4.2 mln tonnes.  \n',grain
'Argentine grain producers again reduced their estimates for the total yield of the 1986/87 soybean crop, which will begin to be harvested in mid-April, trade sources said.     They said growers now forecast soybean production this season at between 7.5 and 7.8 mln tonnes, down from last week\'s estimate of 7.7 to eight mln tonnes and the 8.0 to 8.4 mln tonnes forecast in mid-February.     The new forecast is still higher than last season\'s record total production.     Private sources put 1985/86 production at a record 7.2 to 7.3 mln tonnes -- 4.2 to 6.4 pct lower than the new forecast for the current crop. The official figure for 1985/86 is 7.1 mln tonnes, 5.6 to 9.9 pct below this season\'s new estimates.     Growers in the past week discovered more empty soybean pods in the main producing areas of southern Cordoba and Santa Fe provinces and northern Buenos Aires.     The crop since January has been hit by high temperatures and inadequate rainfall. Growers fear they may find more empty pods and have to further reduce their forecasts of total yield.     The area sown to soybeans this season was a record 3.7 to 3.8 mln hectares, 10.8 to 13.8 pct higher than the 1985/86 record of 3.34 mln hectares.     The state of the crop continued to be good in general until last week but intense, heavy rains since could have caused damage in areas where rainfall was higher than 100 mm.     Where the rains were less heavy they were considered beneficial although too late to improve yield estimates.     The rains also benefitted maize and sorghum crops in southern Buenos Aires province but are not expected to influence production forecasts.     In other areas, especially western Buenos Aires, where rainfall was more than 200 mm, parts of the sunflower, maize and sorghum crops not yet harvested may have been damaged.     The coarse grain crop harvest was interrupted last week by rains which also reached over 100 mm in parts of Cordoba, La Pampa and Santa Fe and almost 90 mm in parts of Entre Rios.     The area sown with maize this season was between 3.58 and 3.78 mln hectares, two to seven pct less than the 3.85 mln hectares in 1985/86.     The yield of 1986/87 maize continued to be forecast at between 9.9 and 10.1 mln tonnes.     This estimate is 19.8 to 20.2 pct lower than the 12.4 to 12.6 mln tonnes at which private sources put 1985/86 production and 21.1 to 22.7 pct lower than the official 12.8 mln tonnes.     The sunflowerseed harvest has covered 23 to 26 pct of the area sown and continues in parts of central Buenos Aires although at a standstill elsewhere due to rain and floods.     A resumption of full harvesting and assessment of damage is impossible until rains stop and a spell of a week to 10 days of sunshine dries the fields.     The area sown this season was 2.0 to 2.2 mln hectares, down 29.9 to 36.3 pct on last year\'s record 3.14 mln hectares.     Sunflowerseed 1986/87 production is still forecast at 2.3 to 2.6 mln tonnes, 34.1 to 41.5 pct below the 1985/86 record of 4.1 mln tonnes.     The grain sorghum harvest was the least affected by the rains, advancing steadily in Santa Fe and Cordoba and starting in La Pampa to cover 14 to 16 pct of the total area sown.     The area sown was 1.23 to 1.30 mln hectares, 10.3 to 15.2 pct less than the 1.45 mln hectares the previous season.     Yield estimates remained at 3.2 to 3.5 mln tonnes, 16.7 to 22 pct down on 1985/86 production of 4.1 to 4.2 mln tonnes.  \n',grain
'The Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service (ASCS) bought 25.7 mln pounds of wheat flour at a cost of 2.8 mln dlrs for domestic shipment April 1-15 and April 16-30, an ASCS spokesman said.     ASCS also bought 11.1 mln pounds of bakers flour for 1.1 mln dlrs, 1.9 mln pounds of pasta for 408,258 dlrs, 1.4 mln pounds of processed cereal products for 304,043 dlrs, 4.8 mln pounds of corn products for 474,944 dlrs, and 16.3 mln pounds of milled rice for 2.0 mln dlrs.  \n',grain
'The Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service (ASCS) is seeking offers to process rough rice owned by the Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) and deliver about 27.0 mln pounds of milled rice for export shipment May 6-20 and May 21-June 5, an ASCS spokesman said.     Offers must be received by 1300 CDT April 7, and successful offerors will be notified April 10.  \n',grain
'The Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service (ASCS) has established these unit values for commodities offered from government stocks through redemption of Commodity Credit Corporation commodity certificates, effective through the next business day.     Price per bushel is in U.S. dollars. Sorghum is priced per CWT, corn yellow grade only.      WHEAT     HRW   HRS    SRW   SWW   DURUM  Chicago       --    3.04   2.98  --    --  Ill. Track    --    --     3.16  --    --  Toledo        --    3.04   2.98  2.90  --  Memphis       --    --     3.05  --    --  Peoria        --    --     3.11  --    --  Denver        2.62  2.63  --    --    --  Evansville    --    --    2.99  --    --  Cincinnati    --    --    2.96  --    --  Minneapolis   2.65  2.71  --    --    3.70  Baltimore/  Norf./Phil.   --    --    3.06  2.98  --  Kansas City   2.87  --    3.17  --    --  St. Louis     3.03  --    3.03  --    --  Amarillo/  Lubbock       2.64  --    --    --    --                HRW   HRS   SRW   SWW   DURUM  Lou. Gulf     --    --    3.16  --    --  Portland/  Seattle       3.07  3.08  --    3.10  3.70  Stockton      2.78  --    --    --    --  L.A.          3.23  --    --    --    4.05  Duluth        2.65  2.71  --    --    3.70  Tex. Gulf     3.10  --    3.16  --    --               CORN  BRLY  OATS  RYE   SOYB  SORG  Chicago     1.47  --    --    --    4.81  2.49  Ill. Track  1.49  2.04  --    --    4.85  2.52  Toledo      1.41  2.04  1.50  --    4.78  2.39  Memphis     1.59  1.95  1.71  --    4.90  2.86  Peoria      1.51  ---   --    --    4.80  2.60  Denver      1.56  1.56  --    --    --    2.54  Evnsvlle    1.54  2.04  1.50  2.17  4.90  2.61  Cinci       1.52  2.04  1.50  2.17  4.85  2.58  Mpls        1.34  1.75  1.50  1.85  4.68  --  Balt/Nor/  Phil        1.70  1.80  --    --    4.98  3.12  KC          1.49  1.56  1.64  --    4.76  2.58  St Lo       1.54  --    1.66  --    4.90  2.91  Amarlo/  Lubbck      1.84  1.40  --    --    4.75  2.92  Lou Gulf    1.73  --    --    --    5.05  3.12  Port/  Seattle     1.87  2.10  1.68  --    --    --  Stockton    2.18  2.23  2.10  --    --    4.00  LA          2.54  2.50  --    --    --    4.38  Duluth      1.34  1.75  1.50  1.85  4.68  --  Tex Gulf    1.73  1.48  1.73  --    5.05  3.12  \n',grain
'The Australian Government will likely reimburse the Australian Wheat Board, AWB, about 132 mln (U.S.) dlrs to pay wheat farmers for their 1986/87 crop, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its report on Export Markets for U.S. Grains, the department said the sharp fall in world wheat prices has reduced the export sales revenue of the AWB to levels insufficient to cover its breakeven export price estimated at around 98 dlrs per tonne.      For example the recent large sales of wheat to China (1.5 mln tonnes) and Egypt (2.0 mln tonnes) were well below the breakeven export price, it said.     Australian wheat farmers normally receive an advance payment known as the Guaranteed Minimum Price, GMP, calculated at 90 pct of the average of estimated returns in the current year and the two lowest of the previous three years, the department said.     In addition, deductions for taxes, freight, handling and storage are deducted from the GMP the farmer receives.     But the department said the Australian Bureau of Agricultural Economics, BAE, predicts wheat production will drop sharply from 17.8 mln tonnes in 1986/87 to 13.5 mln in 1989/90.     The decline will result from low world grain prices leading to shifts to livestock and other crops which could benefit U.S. wheat exports, the department said.  \n',grain
'Australian wheat plantings are forecast to fall to 10.40 mln hectares in 1987/88 from 11.72 mln sown in 1986/87, Australian Wheat Forecasters Pty Ltd (AWF) said in its first preliminary crop forecast.     But there was no reason to expect Australian production in 1987/88 would be less than the 16.5 mln tonnes of last year, the private forecaster said, as crops in New South Wales and Queensland suffered from poor yields last season.     Most of the fall in plantings was expected in Western Australia while state average yields would be assisted by growers sowing wheat on fallows and rest paddocks, it said.     The main reason for a low Western Australia estimate was a poor profit outlook under cost, credit and yield pressures. But in the eastern states the wheat area should hold up provided that rainfall between now and June is not less than average, AWF said.     Although some farmers were saying they intended to cut back wheat area by 20 pct, AWF said this was unlikely since they needed cash flow and there were problems with alternative crops.     \"The lack of statutory marketing for oilseeds, pulses and oats is a cause for concern if those crops are to comprise a high proportion of growers\' income,\" AWF said.     AWF\'s state area forecasts in mln hectares, with 1986/87 production in mln tonnes, are as follows (crop forecasts were not given for the new wheat year)                    Area         Crop              1987/88  1986/87  1986/87  Queensland    0.82     0.82     0.95  N.S.W.        3.07     3.17     4.40  Victoria      1.53     1.63     3.25  S.Australia   1.45     1.64     2.30  W.Australia   3.53     4.46     5.60  \n',grain
'The Australian Wheat Board (AWB) expects to sell about 900,000 tonnes of wheat to the Japanese Food Agency this year after renewing its annual supply agreement, AWB general manager Ron Paice said.     Under the agreement, the AWB makes the wheat available and sells into the Food Agency\'s regular tenders, he said in a statement.     He noted that the Board has sold more than three mln tonnes to Japan in the past three years.  \n',grain
'Australian wheat shipments rose to 1.33 mln tonnes in February from 1.01 mln in January, an Australian Wheat Board official said.     February\'s shipments were down on the 1.54 mln tonnes shipped in February 1986.     Cumulative shipments for the first five months of the October/September wheat year were 6.12 mln tonnes, as against 6.54 mln a year earlier, the official said.     The major destinations in February were: China (419,196 tonnes), Egypt (301,909), Iraq (142,055), Japan (110,261), South Korea (100,847) and the Soviet Union (100,056 tonnes).  \n',grain
'Australia is risking wheat export sales by not providing enough specific quality grades to meet buyer requirements, the Australian Wheat Board (AWB) said.     \"Many AWB customers are becoming increasingly quality conscious, demanding strict adherence to contractual quality specifications,\" the board said in a submission to the Royal Commission into Grain Storage, Handling and Transport.     \"Many of the specifications are more specific than the current categories used in Australia,\" it said.     The commission is trying to identify ways of saving costs and boosting efficiency of the grain handling system.     Australia must rely on quality to retain its wheat market share because its competitors are supplying cheaper but lower-quality grades, the AWB submission said.     It stressed the need to segregate wheat categories at every stage from receival to shipping.     Better industrial relations at grain terminals, more uniform transport systems across the states and extensive stock control were vital to improved marketing, it said.     The submission also said Australia\'s federal system impeded the AWB\'s role of coordinating and managing the marketing of wheat.     The AWB called for an end to physical and legislative constraints at state borders that prevent the efficient transport of grains to other states for shipment.     \"It is essential that wheat moves by the most economic mode to the nearest efficient port, irrespective of the state in which the wheat is grown or stored,\" it said.     For example, wheat grown in northern New South Wales (NSW) might move more efficiently to Brisbane, in Queensland, than to Sydney or Newcastle in New South Wales, it said. Similarly, southern NSW wheat might better be shipped to Portland or Geelong, in Victoria.     Legislation giving state rail authorities a monopoly over grain shipments was one notable impediment, it said.     The AWB said the current approach of state-based bulk handling authorities is not essential, although it said it favoured the authorities maintaining at least their current level of control of storage and transport as long as quality was maintained.     An appendix on port loading costs showed it cost between 26,500 and 34,700 U.S. Dlrs to load a 50,000-tonne vessel at various Australian ports compared with 21,200 dlrs at Houston and 16,300 at Port Cartier, Quebec, for a 60,000-tonner.  \n',grain
'The Australian Wheat Board\'s (AWB) 1986/87 export program is well advanced with over 10 mln tonnes already sold, AWB general manager Ron Paice said.     \"We are certainly within reach of our 15 mln tonne export target for the year,\" he said in a statement.     He did not detail the commitments already made, but an AWB spokesman said they include sales to Egypt, China, Iran, the Soviet Union and Iraq.     In the 1985/86 wheat year ended September 30, the AWB exported a record 15.96 mln tonnes.     Paice also said the 1986/87 Australian wheat harvest has ended after a long, cool summer with 15.14 mln tonnes delivered to the AWB.     The season produced another good crop, with only 0.2 pct of receivals being downgraded to feed quality, he said.     However, it is likely that some weather-damaged grain was still being held on farms and further milling and feed wheat may be delivered following the recent announcement of the final Guaranteed Minimum Price for 1986/87, he said.     Paice did not give a crop estimate, but the AWB\'s February Wheat Australia publication put the crop at 16.7 mln tonnes.     But the AWB spokesman said it is likely this estimate could turn out to be too high, based on the receivals level, and the final crop figure would probably be nearer to 16.2 mln tonnes. The official estimate is not yet available.     In the 1985/86 season, the AWB received 15.08 mln tonnes of the 16.13 mln tonne crop.     Another 422,000 tonnes was retained on-farm and 620,000 sold under the permit system introduced in 1984/85 to allow farmers to sell feed wheat to the grain trade outside the AWB\'s receival system, according to Bureau of Agricultural Economics data.  \n',grain
'Bangladesh passed on its weekend tender for 100,000 tonnes of optional origin soft wheat, private export sources said.  \n',grain
'Trade sources here confirmed earlier tentative reports that Bangladesh had bought 200,000 tonnes of optional origin feed wheat late last week and over the weekend.     They said the Continental Grain Co, of the United States, won the contract to supply the wheat from the EC and other parts of Europe.     It will supply 100,000 tonnes at a rate of 96.92 U.S. Dlrs a tonne as a first consignment by April 7. It will supply the remaining 100,000 tonnes at a rate of 93.42 dlrs by April 16.  \n',grain
'Enrollment in the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s fourth conservation signup is expected to be announced tomorrow, and USDA officials said the figure may be higher than total enrollment for the first three signups.     Enrollment will be in the range of seven to 12 mln acres, USDA conservation specialists said. Total enrollment so far in the 10-year conservation program is 8.9 mln acres.     Producers submitted bids to enter 11 to 12 mln acres into the program, Milton Hertz, administrator for USDA\'s Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service said at a congressional hearing yesterday. Not all the bids will be accepted, Hertz said, but enrollment is expected to be high.     As in the first three signups, the Great Plains area is expected to attract the greatest enrollment.     \"The Great Plains area will be the predominate area which we\'ll get signup in,\" a USDA conservation specialist said.     Marginal corn acreage will likely be the bulk of the acreage pulled from that area, he said.     Fringe soybean acres in the southeast and some bean acreage in the midwest are also expected to be taken out of production, but the USDA source said this would be a relatively small percent of the total.     A special two dlr bonus to corn producers who enroll part of their corn base acreage into the program has sparked more interest in this latest signup, USDA officials said.     Under the program, USDA pays farmers annual rents to take land out of production for 10 years. The average rent payment accepted in the first three signups was 43.50 dlrs per acre.  \n',grain
'Brazil rejected all offers at tonight\'s wheat tender, a Brazilian Wheat Board spokesman said.     He said no date had been set for the next tender.  \n',grain
'Brazil has suspended the importation of 500,000 tonnes of maize ordered last year because of the excellent domestic maize harvest expected this year, Agriculture Minister Iris Resende said.     The Agriculture Ministry expects a record maize crop of 27.7 mln tonnes, a 36 pct increase on last year\'s crop of 20.3 mln tonnes.     Brazil\'s total grain crop is expected to be 65.3 mln tonnes. \"This is a record in the history of Brazilian agriculture,\" a ministry spokesman said.     Resende announced suspension of the maize imports at a news conference in Brasilia yesterday.     The ministry spokesman said he had no other details on the maize transaction.  \n',grain
'A total of 1.886 mln hectares was sown to wheat in Britain, excluding Northern Ireland, up to December 1, 1986 for the 1987 crop, a Ministry of Agriculture census shows.     It compares with 1.925 mln planted in the same period 1985.     The barley area was unchanged at 952,000 ha, but oilseed rape increased to 393,000 from 333,000 ha.  \n',grain
'U.S. trade representative Clayton Yeutter said Canada\'s finding announced today that U.S. corn imports injure Canadian farmers is \"totally unjustified.\"     \"U.S. corn exports to Canada are so small that it is inconceivable that they injure Canadian corn farmers by any reasonable measure,\" Yeutter said in a statement.     He said if other countries follow Canada\'s lead it could result in \"a rash of protectionist actions throughout the world.\" French corn growers have recently indicated they will challenge U.S. corn gluten feed shipments to Europe.     Yeutter said the U.S. will examine the Canadian decision closely and if the U.S. believes the decision was not based on facts, \"will carefully evaluate appropriate responses.\" Yeutter did not say what steps the U.S. may take in response.  \n',grain
'The Canadian government is expected to announce later this week its final ruling whether U.S. corn exports to Canada have injured Ontario corn growers, U.S. government and farm group representatives said.     The deadline for a final determination is March 7.     U.S. officials said they are encouraged by the outcome in a similar case covering European pasta imports. In that case, Canada decided pasta imports, which take about ten pct of the Canadian market, did not injure domestic producers. U.S. corn exports represent only about five pct of the Canadian market.     Canada slapped a 1.05 dlrs per bushel duty on U.S. corn imports in November 1986, but reduced the duty to 85 cts last month because the Canadian government said U.S. subsidies to  corn producers were less than Canada earlier estimated.  \n',grain
'The Canadian Import Tribunal ruled today subsidized U.S. corn imports were injurious to Canadian growers and upheld a countervailing duty of 84.9 U.S. cts a bushel set earlier this year.     The ruling is the result of trade action launched in 1985 by the Ontario Corn Producers Association that contended U.S. subsidies were driving American corn prices below Canadian production costs.     A spokesman for the Department of Revenue said a study of the level of the duty will be undertaken in the next six months to determine if it should be adjusted.  \n',grain
'The Canadian Wheat Board has advised the federal government to sharply cut initial prices paid to farmers for their wheat, oats, and barley in the crop year beginning August 1, a board spokesman said.     The spokesman declined to give the size of the recommended price drops but said it would not be good news for western Canadian grain growers.     \"They\'re all lower,\" he said. \"This is really getting pretty serious. We\'re talking nuts and bolts economic survival and whether it\'s worthwhile for farmers to put in a crop.\"     Farm leaders and economists have estimated the board will recommend cuts of around 20 pct in the initial prices.     Farmers receive the initial payment when the grain is delivered to the elevators used by the wheat board.     If the wheat board, which markets most of Canada\'s grain, obtains higher than expected prices on world markets, the farmers receive a final payment at the end of the crop year. If prices are lower, the federal treasury makes up the difference.     The final decision on the initial prices, usually made in April, rests with Wheat Board Minister Charles Mayer and the federal cabinet.     Last year Mayer cut the initial prices between 19 and 27 pct but last fall the government announced a one billion Canadian dlr aid program to compensate for the price cuts.     But federal agricultural officials have already warned farmers not to depend on additional government aid this year.  \n',grain
'Canadian and Egyptian wheat negotiators failed to conclude an agreement on Canadian wheat exports to Egypt during talks last week, but the Canadian team will return to Cairo for further negotiations, Canadian embassy officials said.     An embassy official declined to identify which issues remained to be resolved and when the talks would resume.     In a five-year protocol signed in 1985, Cairo agreed to purchase 500,000 tonnes of Canadian wheat a year.  \n',grain
'The use of generic in-kind commodity certificates has helped ease storage problems and is a necessary part of export promotion programs, a senior executive for the world\'s largest grain company said.     Testifying before the House Agriculture subcommittee on wheat, soybeans and feedgrains, Robbin Johnson, vice president of Cargill, Inc., disputed claims that U.S. grain companies have made huge profits from certificate trading.     \"The certs program is not in any way a windfall to the trade,\" he said. Johnson said that Cargill has been dealing with a two pct spread in certificate transactions, and that this is within the normal grain marketing levels.     Johnson recognized current concern over the cost of certificates as compared to cash, but said that critics need to look more closely at the savings caused by certs, noting for example that widespread use of certs in the PIK and Roll marketing technique last summer helped ease storage costs.     Certificates are also an important part of any export promotion program, he said.     \"The more you look at ways to expand export markets, the more you have to look at ways to expand certs to put more grain into the market to meet demand,\" he said.     Subcommittee chairman Dan Glickman (D-Kans.) said his committee would be looking at the certificate program later this year and studying the General Accounting Office report on certificate costs.  \n',grain
'Chicago Board of Trade (CBT) agricultural and financial futures markets could be in for a period of major upheaval later this year if the exchange goes ahead with planned renovation.     A CBT spokesman tolds the exchange was looking at a number of options to identify the most cost effective and efficient way to proceed, including one which would involve moving the entire grains floor out of the building and into the nearby MidAmerica Commodity Exchange.     \"One of (CBT Chairman) Karsten Mahlmann\'s agenda items has been to proceed with renovation in the financial futures room,\" the spokesman said.     Another CBT official, executive vice president George Sladoje, said the issue would be discussed this Friday at a special meeting on the exchange floor.     A number of presentations have been made with regard to renovating the financial futures room, Sladoje said. \"We\'ve looked at five or six different alternatives, involving such things as flip-flopping the trading rooms,\" he added.     It is conceivable that under a couple of these plans, we might use the MidAmerica Exchange temporarily for some CBT markets, Sladoje said.     \"If we move out of one floor entirely, then the construction period will be about a year,\" he said, adding that the issue was likely to go to a membership vote first and then be on the drawing board for eight months to a year.     The CBT spokesman stressed that discussions were very preliminary at this stage and nothing was likely to begin until this summer at the earliest.     In order to renovate the crowded financial futures pits, exchange officials have discussed providing them a temporary home next door in the present grains-dominated area.     This could involve moving CBT markets in U.S. Treasury Bond futures, Treasury Notes, Muni-bonds, and options on T-Bonds and T-Notes through an adjoining corridor, while utilizing the MidAmerica floor for such CBT futures contracts as corn, wheat, soybeans, soybean products and agricultural options.     Any such moves could meet with opposition among some CBT members.     One senior floor trader said the financial futures room badly needs renovating.     \"There is talk the grains floor will shift to the MidAm and the financials will move to the grains area,\" he said.     The CBT spokesman said another option being discussed was to renovate the financial floor in quadrants, one quarter at a time. \"The first step, after deciding the most effective way to proceed, would be to get architectural and engineering drawings,\" he said.     He added that it was difficult at present to determine an exact time frame for any possible moves. \"This is a major undertaking and a process that would spread out over next year,\" he said.     Floor traders at the MidAmerica Commodity Exchange, which merged with the CBT about a year ago, said they were preparing to vacate their floor at the end of this month.     Space has recently been cleared for them at the CBT by moving its Major Market Index pit into the area once reserved for lightly-traded CBT gold and silver futures, which now share their trading area.     The MidAm specializes in mini-contracts in grains, livestock, metals, financials and foreign currencies as well as some options contracts.     \"Rumor has it that the CBT grains are coming over here because the bonds are too crowded,\" one MidAm trader said.     Another source at the MidAm said this change could take place by July or August.  \n',grain
'February volume at the Chicago Board of Trade, CBT, declined 14 pct from the year-ago month to 8,191,266 contracts, the exchange said.     A relatively steady interest rate climate reduced volume in the most active contract, Treasury bond futures, by 17.5 pct from a year ago to 4,307,645 contracts.     However, trading in most agricultural futures contracts increased last month, led by oats and corn futures.     Oats volume tripled to 27,662 contracts, and corn volume increased 35 pct to 580,204 contracts. Wheat and soybean oil futures activity also rose from a year ago, while soybean and soybean oil volume slipped, the exchange said.     Major Market Index futures increased activity 37 pct during the month with 194,697 contracts changing hands.  \n',grain
'Chicago Board of trade grain traders and analysts voiced a lot of interest in how farmers planned to handle their upcoming spring plantings, prompting sales of new crop months of corn and oats and purchases in new crop soybeans in the futures markets.     Professionals in the grains trade think that farmers will be more willing to stick with corn acres than soybeans because corn is protected by the acreage reduction program. That gives deficiency payments to farmers if corn prices stay low.     Farmers can place soybeans under the loan program if they sign-up for reduced acreage, but they have no price guarantees.     With the price outlook for both commodities so dismal, traders believe farmers will want to stick with a sure thing rather than gamble on soybeans, even though the new crop soybean/corn ratio of 2.9/1 would make planting soybeans more attractive under normal circumstances.     An announcement late Friday that the USDA will lift the limited cross-compliance requirement for the 1987 oats crop, means farmers will be able plant an estimated two to three mln more oat acres this year than last without being penalized, traders said.     Here too, acres some farmers may have been thinking of shifting to soybeans will now be planted with oats, due to the more attractive deal from the government, they added.     Cotton prices are almost twice what they were just six months ago, which should prompt many farmers in the South to put soybean land back into cotton.     One of the reasons for the steady increase in soybean production in recent years has been a general shift of acres in traditional cotton producing regions of the South to soybeans, which are easier to grow, one commercial trader said.  \n',grain
'The 11,254,837 acres of highly erodable farmland submitted to the U.S. Department of Agriculture for the conservation reserve program was within trade guesses of 10-12 mln and should have an overall neutral impact on grain and soybean prices Monday, grain traders said.     Farmers enrolled 1,894,764 acres of corn base acreage in the conservation program to take advantage of a corn bonus rental payment that was offered by the USDA, which may underpin new crop futures, they said.     New crop corn prices firmed earlier this week on ideas of a large sign-up in the program. But traders noted that the poor yielding acres being set-aside will result in only a modest decrease in final production figures, since farmers will concentrate on high yielding land.     Of a total 11,254,837 erodoble acres submitted, usda accepted 10,572,402 acres into the program at an average rental payment of 51.17 dlrs per acre.     Farm land signed up to date now totals 19,488,587 acres.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted bids for export bonuses on 36,000 tonnes of durum wheat to Algeria, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the bonuses awarded averaged 40.42 dlrs per tonne and will be paid to exporters in the form of commodities from CCC inventories.     The bonuses were made to Cam USA, Inc, the department said.     The wheat is for shipment May 1-10, 1987.     An additional 264,000 tonnes of durum wheat are still avaiable to Algeria under the Export Enhancement program initiative announced on March 16.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has accepted a bid on an export bonus to cover the sale of 8,000 tonnes of barley to Cyprus, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The barley is for shipment May 5-20 and the bonus of 39.32 dlrs per tonne was made to Harvest States Cooperatives, the department said.     The bonus will be paid in the form of commodities from the inventory of CCC stocks.     The department said an additional 42,000 tonnes of U.S. barley are still available to Cyprus under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced on August 26, 1986.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover a sale of 2,000 tonnes of semolina to Egypt, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the bonus was 233.91 dlrs per tonne and was made to International Multifoods Corp. The bonus will be paid in the form of commodities from CCC stocks.     The semolina is for shipment during June 1987, it said.     An additional 13,000 tonnes of semolina are still available to Egypt under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced on August 6, 1986, it said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted bids for export bonuses to cover sales of 25,000 tonnes of wheat flour to Iraq, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the bonuses awarded averaged 116.84 dlrs per tonne.     The shipment periods are March 15-April 20 (12,500 tonnes) and April 1-May 5 (12,500 tonnes).     The bonus awards were made to Peavey Company and will be paid in the form of commodities from CCC stocks, it said.     An additional 175,000 tonnes of wheat flour are still available to Iraq under the Export Enhancement Program initative announced January 7, 1987, the department said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted one bonus offer from an exporter on the sale of 4,400 tonnes of barley malt to Nigeria, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the bonus awarded was 100.00 dlrs per tonne and was made to Rahr Malting Co and will be paid in the form of commodities from the inventory stocks of the CCC.     The barley malt is scheduled for shipment during April, 1987.     An additional 76,300 tonnes of barley malt are still available to Nigeria under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced December 10, 1986, it said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover the sale of 30,000 long tons of barley to Israel, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the barley is for delivery April 15/May 15 and the bonus awarded was 41.24 dlrs per ton.     The bonus was made to Cargill, Inc and will be paid in the form of commodities from CCC stocks.      An additional 133,800 tons of U.S. barley are still available to Israel under the Export Enhancement Program announced June 17, 1986, it said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover a sale of 6,000 tonnes of semolina to Egypt, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the semolina is for shipment April-October, 1987, and the bonus awarded was 224.87 dlrs per tonne.     The bonus was made to International Multifoods Corp and will paid to the exporter in the form of commodities from CCC stocks, the department said.     An additional 7,000 tonnes of semolina are still available to Egypt under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced August 1, 1986, it said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corportion, CCC, has accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover the sale of 15,000 tonnes of U.S. wheat to West African countries, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The dark northern spring wheat is for shipment May 15-June 15, 1987.     The bonus of 40.05 dlrs per tonne was made to Peavey Company and will be paid in the form of commodities from the CCC inventory, it said.     An additional 315,500 tonnes of wheat are still available to West African countries under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced October 30, 1986, it said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has reallocated 5.0 mln dlrs in credit guarantees previously earmarked for sales of U.S. wheat to provide coverage for sales of U.S. vegetable oil to Bangladesh, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     USDA said the action was taken at the request of the Bangladesh government and reduces the guarantee line authorized for wheat sales from 25.0 mln dlrs to 20.0 and creates a new line of 5.0 mln dlrs for vegetable oils.     To be eligible for coverage under the CCC\'s Intermediate Export Credit Program, credit terms must be in excess of three years, but not more than seven years.     All sales covered by the credit guarantees must be registered and shipped by September 30, 1987, USDA said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) announced 1.5 mln dlrs in credit guarantees previously earmarked to cover sales of dry edible beans to Honduras have been switched to cover sales of white corn, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the action reduces coverage for sales of dry edible beans to 500,000 dlrs and creates the new line of 1.5 mln dlrs for sales of white corn.     All sales under the credit guarantee line must be registered  and shipped by September 30, 1987, it said.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has switched 10 mln dlrs in credit guarantees to Mexico to cover purchases of U.S. wheat, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The credit guarantees were previously earmarked for sales of U.S. dry edible beans and rice, it said.     The action reduces the guarantee lines previously authorized of dry edible beans to by five mln dlrs to 45 mln dlrs and for rice from five mln to zero and increases coverage for wheat sales from five mln to 15 mln dlrs.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has authorized 25.0 mln dlrs in credit guarantees to North Yemen to cover purchases of U.S. wheat under the Intermediate Export Credit Guarantee Program (GSM-103), the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     Under the program credit terms extended must be in excess of three yeras, but not more than seven years.     All sales under the line must be registered and exports completed by September 30, 1987, the department said.  \n',grain
'Monetary compensatory amounts, MCA\'s, will be unchanged for the week starting April 6, EC Commission officials said.     Cereals MCA\'s are plus 2.4 points for West Germany and the Netherlands, minus two points for Denmark, minus eight points for France, minus nine for Ireland, minus 5.7 for Italy, minus 25.7 for Britain, minus 44.1 for Greece and minus 10.5 for Spain.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Futures Trading Commission has approved the Minneapolis Grain Exchange\'s application to trade high fructose corn syrup-55, HFCS-55, futures contracts, the commission said.     The contract provides for the delivery of 48,000 lbs, plus or minus two pct, of bulk HFCS-55 meeting specified standards regarding its physical and chemical properties.     CFTC said the exchange plans to begin trading a July 1987 HFCS-55 contract on April 6.     CFTC said the soft drink industry currently buys at least 95 pct of all U.S.-produced HFCS-55, a liquid food and beverage sweetener produced through the processing of corn starch by corn refiners.  \n',grain
'China has added 90,000 tonnes of U.S. wheat to its purchases for delivery in the 1987/88 season and cancelled 30,000 tonnes of wheat purchases for delivery in the 1986/87 season, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     According to the department\'s Export Sales Report covering transactions in the week ended February 26, China has outstanding wheat commitments for the 1986/87 season of 30,000 tonnes and 420,000 tonnes for delivery in the 1987/88 season.     The wheat season begins June 1.     China has total corn commitments for 1986/87 of 1,011,200 tonnes and soybeans commitments of 157,500 tonnes.     The season for corn and soybeans began September 1.  \n',grain
'Private exporters said China bought a total of 550,000 tonnes of U.S. wheat under the export enhancement program, with final confirmation by the U.S. Department of Agriculture of the subsidies still awaited.     The purchase consisted of a total of 340,000 tonnes of hard red winter wheat for various May/Aug shipments, with 210,000 tonnes of soft red winter for Aug/Sept, the exporters said.  \n',grain
'The grain output of a major Chinese grain-producing province is not increasing, because farmers lack incentives, production costs are rising, storage facilities are poor and there is not enough state investment in grain, the province\'s vice-governor said.     The China Daily quoted Yang Jike, vice-governor of Anhui, as saying farmers could earn twice as much growing cotton as they could growing grain, and three times as much growing cash crops like flax. He said production costs had risen to 40 pct of farmers\' earnings, from 20 pct in 1982, and lower investment had caused the area of irrigated land to fall.     Yang said investment in agriculture fell in 1985 to 9.9 pct of the province\'s total investment, from 26 pct in 1978.     He said an estimated 1.5 billion yuan worth of grain was hit by mildew or rot in state granaries every year, and a further 1.5 mln tonnes was eaten annually by rats.     He said government measures to deal with the problem dealt with trifles, rather than the essentials. He called for more investment in grain production, an immediate ban on illegal use of or damage to farmland and a reversal of what he called the tendency to rely on grain imports.     The New China News Agency quoted Zhang Yan, a delegate to the National People\'s Congress, attacking grain policy. He said the government had cut agricultural investment to three to four pct from 11 pct.     \"With the abundance of grain and cotton in the past few years, some people got carried away, relaxing their attention to grain and cotton production,\" he said.     On Saturday, vice-premier Tian Jiyun said China aimed to be self-sufficient in grain. Now it exports corn from the northeast, but it imports wheat.     \"Grain consumption is rising every year. Even if we reach the 1987 target of (405 mln tonnes), it cannot be considered adequate,\" Tian said.  \n',grain
'China\'s summer grain harvest may be good despite a serious drought because the State Council (cabinet) has spent one billion yuan on irrigation and other anti-drought work, a Hong Kong newspaper said.     Wen Hui Bao said the drought, which has affected Shanxi, Hebei, Henan and Shandong the most, has eased with March rains in south China and March snowfall in the north and as some new irrigation projects have come into use.     \"If the drought does not worsen, there is hope for a bumper harvest,\" it quoted experts of the Ministry of Electric Power as saying. They gave no figures.     The 1986 summer grain harvest was a record 93 mln tonnes, up from 92 mln in 1985, out of a total 1986 grain harvest of 391 mln. The 1987 target is 405 mln.  \n',grain
'China\'s grain imports will rise in 1987 because of a serious drought and increasing demand, but will be not be as large as in the past, Chinese officials and Japanese traders tolds.     They said foreign exchange constraints and national policy would not allow a return to large-scale imports, which peaked at 16.15 mln tonnes in 1982.     An agricultural official of the Shanghai government put maximum imports at about 10 mln tonnes this year, against 7.73 mln in 1986 and 5.97 mln in 1985.     Officials said grain imports rose in 1986 because of a poor harvest and rising domestic demand, but remained below exports, which rose to 9.42 mln tonnes from 9.33 mln in 1985.     \"China is short of foreign exchange,\" the Shanghai official said. \"We cannot rely on imports, even at current low world prices. Only if there is a major disaster will we become a major importer.\"     A Japanese trader in Peking said Chinese grain imports would rise and exports fall this year because of the drought, low world prices and rising domestic demand for human and animal consumption.     \"At current prices, China loses yuan on every tonne of grain it exports, though it earns foreign exchange which it badly needs,\" the trader said.     The People\'s Daily said last Saturday a serious drought is affecting 13.3 mln hectares of arable land, which will reduce the summer grain harvest from last year\'s level.     The paper added that leaders in some areas were not paying enough attention to agriculture, especially grain, making it difficult to achieve the 1987 grain output target of 405 mln tonnes against 391 mln in 1986.     \"All areas must spare no effort to raise the autumn harvest area, especially of corn, sweet potatoes, paddy rice and high-yield cash crops,\" it said.     It added factory production might have to be reduced to provide electricity for agriculture if it was needed to fight the drought.     Since January, the press has devoted much attention to grain, stressing that growth in output is vital to China\'s economic and political stability and that prices paid to farmers are too low.     Officials in east China have repeatedly said stable grain production is a key state policy and outlined the measures being taken in their areas to encourage output.     The Shanghai official said that in one suburb, 10 pct of the pre-tax profits of factories are used to subsidise agriculture. He said rural industries in other suburbs also set aside money for grain and pay the salaries of some of the 70,000 workers available to help farmers.     Chu Jinfeng, an official of Fengbing county outside Shanghai, said factory workers get 60 yuan a month and three years unpaid leave to grow grain and can keep the profits.     Pan Huashan, an official of the agricultural department of Zhejiang Province, said rural industry also subsidises grain output in his province.     \"In addition, we are setting up grain production bases, raising the level of science and technology on the farms and improving the supply of raw materials, roads and other infrastructure,\" he said.     The Shanghai official said rural residents who work in industry or commerce usually keep their land to farm in their spare time, or let other family members farm it. In some cases, they lease the land to grain farmers.     The China Daily said last month that grain output should reach between 425 and 450 mln tonnes by 1990 and between 480 and 500 mln by 2000. It said growing grain should be made profitable.     \"The advantages the state promises grain growers actually yield tangible profits for them and are not siphoned off by intermediate agencies because of bureaucracy or corruption. Only this will boost enthusiasm,\" it said.  \n',grain
'China\'s grain exports in January totaled 386,157 tonnes, down 22.1 pct from January 1986, customs figures show.     They gave no detailed breakdown.     The official China Economic News quoted the figures as showing tea exports rose 9.7 pct to 8,474 tonnes during the month.     Imports of wool rose 117.6 pct to 10,248 tonnes over the same period, the figures show.  \n',grain
'Wheat and rapeseed crops in east China suffered considerable damage because of frost during a spell of unusually cold weather in late March, the China Daily said.     It said average temperatures for the last 10 days of March in most of east China were three to five degrees centigrade below average. Snow fell in Jiangsu, Anhui, Hubei and Henan, making early rice sowing difficult.     Heavy snow blanketted central and south Jilin and north Liaoning, leaving farmland too muddy for spring ploughing and sowing, the paper said.     The paper said rainfall during the last 10 days of March in areas south of the Yangtze had been much higher than normal.     Heavy rain fell last Sunday in parts of Guangdong, ending a particularly arid dry season and marking the start of the flood season, it said. It gave no further details.     The New China News Agency said rain and snow in Henan had improved the prospects for wheat, sown on 4.8 mln hectares, and caused a drop in grain prices at rural fairs since late February. It gave no 1986 figures for comparison.  \n',grain
'China\'s wheat crop this year is seriously threatened by plant pests and diseases, the New China News Agency said.     More than 5 mln hectares of wheat-producing land in North China could be affected because relatively warm and dry weather had allowed bacteria and insect eggs to survive the winter, the agency added.     China\"s Ministry of Agriculture, Animal Husbandry and Fisheries has called for measures including the timely supply of pesticides to farmers to combat the threat, it said.  \n',grain
'Colombia recently bought 25,000 tonnes of French soft wheat at 108 dlrs per tonne, c and f, for end-April shipment, trade sources said.     This follows the country\'s tender for 25,000 tonnes of optional origin wheat for shipment April 20-30, they said.     France had not sold wheat to Colombia for several years.  \n',grain
'Kansas Republican Congressman Pat Roberts urged the Reagan administration to offer export enhancement program, eep, subsidies to the Soviet Union.     Speaking at a House foreign agriculture subcommittee, Roberts said the U.S. has offered eep to China and Poland, and should also include the Soviet Union.     Rep. Roberts said there had been some talk that the issue of an eep to Moscow had not been raised within the Reagan administration recently because Secretary of State George Shultz was out of the country.     \"That very well may be the case,\" said Tom Kay, U.S. Agriculture Department Foreign Agricultural Service administrator. However, Kay tolds later that his reply to Roberts was not based on any particular knowledge.     Rep. Roberts urged Kay to convey to top officials of the USDA that some in Congress favor a wheat eep to Moscow.     \"I\'d be delighted to deliver the message,\" Kay replied.     Earlier, Kay had repeated Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng\'s statement last week that \"the door is not yet closed on an eep to the Soviet Union.\"  \n',grain
'Congress, eager to find budget savings, launches a review of the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s generic commodity certificate program tomorrow, amid signs USDA and the General Accounting Office, GAO, are at odds over how much the program has cost U.S. taxpayers.     The GAO concluded in a preliminary report last week that payment-in-kind, or PIK, certificates cost between five and 20 pct more than cash outlays, administration officials who asked not to be identified said.     USDA officials, however, took issue with the report, saying it did not take into account storage, handling and transport savings that accrue to the government. The GAO then decided to re-examine the costs, sources said.     The issue is an important one, because congressional budget committees are known to be considering limiting the use of certificates as a means of cutting spending.     Agriculture Under Secretary Daniel Amstutz and GAO Senior Associate Director Brian Crowley are set to testify before the Senate Agriculture Committee tomorrow.     Amstutz is expected to tell the committee that there are uncertainties in determining the cost of certificates compared to cash outlays, and that savings to the Commodity Credit Corp, CCC, almost equal costs, department sources said.     USDA estimates that it costs the government about 75 cents to store, handle and transport each bushel of commodity put in government storage.     It was unclear whether the GAO, Congress\' investigative arm, would stick by its original analysis that it costs the government more to use certificates instead of cash in farm price and income support programs, Reagan administration sources said.     The GAO is expected to point out that use of payment-in-kind, PIK, certificates has helped relieve tight storage by moving grain that otherwise might not have been sold.     The testimony by Amstutz and GAO Senior Associate Director Brian Crowley comes as congressional budget committees intensify their efforts to pinpoint ways to cut the federal budget deficit -- including considering limits on the use of PIK certificates.     The CCC issues dollar-denominated PIK certificates, or certs, as a partial substitute for direct cash outlays to farmers or cash subsidies to exporters. Certs can be used to repay nonrecourse loans or exchanged for CCC commodities or cash.     Between April and December 1986, CCC issued 3.8 billion dlrs worth of certificates, according to USDA. Up to another 6.7 billion dlrs worth could be issued between January and August 1987, according to USDA.     Certs can cost the government more than cash primarily because recipients can use the certificates to pay back government loans at levels below the loan rate.     Eliminating this practice, called \"PIK and roll,\" would save the government 1.4 billion dlrs between 1988-92, according to the Congressional Budget Office, CBO. That estimate, according to a CBO official, was based on an assumption that certificates cost the government about 15 pct more than cash payments.     The Senate and House Budget Committees are known to be considering curbs on PIK-and-roll transactions among other savings alternatives.     The GAO last week reached the tentative conclusion that the estimated three billion dlrs of certificates redeemed to date have cost the federal government between 150 mln and 600 mln dlrs, or between five and 20 pct, more than cash outlays, one administration official said.     However, the GAO has decided to reassess those estimates based in part on USDA criticism, department officials said.     The broad range of the cost estimate is partly attributable to the different effect certificates can have on market prices over the course of a crop year.     USDA\'s Economic Research Service, for example, has found that between June and August last year, the 215 mln bushels of corn exchanged for certificates lowered the price of corn by between 35 and 45 cents per bushel.     Between September and November, however, certificates had only a marginal impact on corn prices, according to the ERS study, obtained bys.  \n',grain
'CPC International Inc officials said the sale of the company\'s European corn wet milling business will remove about 700 mln dlrs of debt and liabilities from CPC\'s balance sheet.     They told analysts the deal, expected to close in September, and cash flow from other operations will reduce total debt by about one-third this year. At the end of 1986, CPC\'s debt totaled about 1.5 billion dlrs.     The officials also said the company has no current plans to sell its U.S. or North American corn wet milling businesses.     CPC\'s 1987 capital spending is budgeted at about 250 mln dlrs, down from about 361 mln dlrs last year, the officials told analysts.  \n',grain
'China\'s top leader Deng Xiaoping said China must not import more than 10 mln tonnes of grain, Ming Pao newspaper of Hong Kong said.     Customs figures show that China imported 7.73 mln tonnes of grain in 1986, up from 5.97 mln in 1985 but down from a record 16.15 mln in 1982.     The newspaper quoted Deng as saying that grain output is one of several key issues that will influence the whole development of the economy. It did not give the context of his remarks. The 1987 grain production target is 405 mln, up from 391 mln in 1986.     The newspaper quoted Deng as saying that the situation has reached the point where \"pigs are not fed, there is not enough grain and increases in output have slowed.\"     \"We should in our overall economic planning put agriculture in its proper place to reach our target of 480 mln tonnes by the year 2000,\" he said. \"We must avoid the situation in recent years of importing more than 10 mln tonnes of grain.\"     The paper quoted Deng as saying that the State Council has decided to raise the price of five grains, including corn and rice, unchanged since 1978, but it gave no details.  \n',grain
'Drought has resulted in a reduction in China\'s estimated wheat crop this year to 87.0 mln tonnes, 2.0 mln below last year\'s harvest, the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s officer in Peking said in a field report.     The report, dated March 25, said imports in the 1987/88 season are projected at 8.0 mln tonnes, 1.0 mln tonnes above the the current season\'s estimate.     Imports from the United States are estimated at 1.5 mln tonnes compared to only 150,000 tonnes estimated for the 1986/87 year, it said.     After travelling to major wheat producing areas and obtaining more information on the planted area, the total planted area was estimated down 290,000 hectares due to the dry fall, it said.     The report said to compensate for the below normal precipitation irrigation has increased as has the use of fertilizer.     While there are pockets where irrigation is not possible, most of the wheat crop has access to some water and therefore has emerged from dormancy and is doing well, the report said.     It said scattered rain in many parts of China in the past 10 days has improved the situation but information on hail damage in Anhui is incomplete.  \n',grain
'Rainfall in the past few days has eased the threat of drought in the south China province of Guangdong, the New China News Agency said.     It said 75 pct of early rice fields are ready to be planted and seedlings have already been transplanted on 90 pct of rice fields in Hainan island. Some 840,000 hectares of farmland have been planted with cash crops including sugar cane, peanuts and soybeans, 67,000 ha more than in 1986.     The provincial government has increased investment in grain and taken effective measures to combat natural disasters this year, the agency said, but gave no further details.  \n',grain
'A large Dutch animal feed compounder will begin formal legal proceedings early next month as a test case on the way the EC grain co-responsibility levy is applied, a spokesman for Dutch grain and feed trade association, Het Comite, tolds.     Het Comite has been co-ordinating national actions against alleged distortions caused by currency factors in the levy and, since December, has lodged more than 80 individual cases with the Business Appeal Court in The Hague.     The basic complaint is that the levy does not take account of currency cross-rates of exchange and therefore compounders in countries with strong currencies may have to pay more in their own currency than is paid to them by producers in another country.     Het Comite has obtained a temporary agreement that companies can pay the amount they receive toward the levy rather than paying a full guilder amount to the Dutch grain commodity board.     The spokesman said Het Comite will provide financial and legal backing to the test case in the Business Administration Court in the Hague. Oral proceedings are to begin on April 10.     The spokesman said Het Comite finally selected the company for the test case from among the 80 lodged \"because the bill (the firm) received from the commodity board for payment of the levy contained significant currency distortions and involved grain from a wide variety of origins.\" The name of the company is not being made public.     The Administration Court is not expected to make a final ruling on the case in the near future. The Het Comite spokesman said it was very likely it would refer questions to the Appeal Court in Luxembourg, and \"as a result it could easily be another nine to 12 months before the matter is finally resolved.\"     Meanwhile, the actions by Dutch animal feed compounders are putting pressure on the commodity board to urge the Dutch government to follow through on earlier statements and seek a complete review in Brussels of the way in which the levy is collected, the spokesman said.     Het Comite, as a member of FEFAC, the association of European animal feed manufacturers, is also a party to actions protesting the whole levy in the Luxembourg appeal court.  \n',grain
'Winter wheat crops in the western Soviet Union, Poland and eastern Czechoslovakia through northern Romania may suffer some winterkill over the next two nights, private forecaster Accu-Weather Inc said.     Western USSR winter wheat areas have had only light and spotty snow and winterkill is possible tonight and tomorrow night as temperatures drop to minus 10 to 0 degrees F.     Snow cover is scant in Poland, with only about 50 pct of the winter wheat areas reporting one to two inches of snow as of this morning.     The remaining 50 pct of winter wheat crops do not have snow cover, making winterkill possible on each of the next two nights. Lowest temperatures will be minus 10 to 0 degrees F.     Winter wheat areas from eastern Czechoslovakia through northern Romania had light snow flurries yesterday and last night, but amounts were an inch or less. With temperatures expected to fall to near 0 degrees F over the next two nights, some light winterkill is possible, Accu-Weather added.  \n',grain
'The European Community authorised the export of 25,000 tonnes of barley yesterday, bringing the cumulative total at weekly tenders since the series started last June to 3.33 mln tonnes, close to the 3.37 mln under licence in the same year ago period, traders said.     All bids for wheat were rejected. However, the total to date of 5.06 mln tonnes is still substantially more than the 3.03 mln under licence a year ago. The 80,000 tonnes of French maize granted for export moved the total to 135,000 tonnes since the tender opened in February this year. There were no facilities for maize in the previous weekly grain export series.  \n',grain
'Emergency action to distribute European Community (EC) food surpluses to the poor has proved so successful that the EC executive Commission may propose a permanent scheme, a Commission spokesman said.     Almost 60,000 tonnes of food was taken out of EC stores between January 20, when Agriculture Ministers approved the scheme, and March 13, according to latest commission figures.     The food, including 30,000 tonnes of cereals, 6,000 tonnes of sugar, 4,000 tonnes of beef and 13,300 tonnes of butter, has been distributed to the needy through charities.     The present scheme was approved as an emergency measure to help poor people affected by this year\'s unusually cold winter and will end on March 31.     But the spokesman said the commission will consider whether to propose it be replaced by an all-year-round system.     The commission estimates that up to March 13 the temporary scheme cost between 63 and 68 mln European currency units (72/78 mln dlrs). This is above the 50 mln Ecu (57 mln dlr) ceiling originally envisaged by the Ministers.     However, commission sources said the real cost was small if account is taken of the expense of keeping food in store until its quality and value deteriorates.     On the other hand, the impact of the temporary scheme on EC food surpluses has been slight. EC surplus food stocks at January 31 included 1.28 mln tonnes of butter, 520,000 tonnes of beef and over 10 mln tonnes of cereals.  \n',grain
'The European Community\'s, EC, cereal management committee granted export licences for 5,000 tonnes of quality soft bread-making wheat at a maximum export rebate of 134.75 European currency units, Ecus, per tonne, traders said.     The committee also granted export certificates of 35,000 tonnes of barley at 137.35 Ecus per tonne, but rejected all bids for the export of soft feed wheat, they said.     Certificates were also granted for the export of 15,000 tonnes of maize at a maximum rebate of 132.90 Ecus per tonne, the traders said.  \n',grain
'The EC Commission will decide shortly precisely how to arrange the import of third country maize and sorghum into the EC in fulfilment of its agreement with the United States, Commission sources said.     Under the accord, reached following U.S. complaints about the impact on its agricultural exports of Spanish EC membership, the EC will import two mln tonnes of maize and 300,000 tonnes of sorghum a year up to end of 1990.     All this produce will be imported into Spain at special levy levels likely to be below those applying for imports into other EC countries.     The sources said it was possible that the Spanish intervention board would be asked to buy the produce directly this year, as it was rather late to make other arrangements.     They added that the choice for future years appears to lie between a system of regular tenders and the setting of a daily special levy applicable to Spanish imports.     There will initially be no tax on re-exports of maize and sorghum from Spain to other EC countries, although such a tax could be imposed later, the sources added.  \n',grain
'The agreement between the U.S. And the European Community (EC) on special imports of maize and sorghum provides an equal chance for all non-EC countries to supply the Spanish market, an EC Commission spokeswoman said.     She denied that any unpublished clause of the agreement guaranteed the bulk of the maize export business would go to the U.S., As one EC official tolds yesterday.     Under the agreement, the EC will import two mln tonnes of maize and 300,000 tonnes of sorghum a year into Spain at specially reduced levy rates for the next four years.     The Commission has yet to decide whether the maize will come in through direct purchases by the Spanish intervention board or by a tender system.  \n',grain
'The European Community, EC, sold 75,000 tonnes of soft wheat at a subsidized price of between 85 and 89 dlrs per tonne FOB for March delivery in a continuing bid to establish itself in the Brazilian wheat market, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The sale sharply undercut the U.S. offer of 112 dlrs per tonne FOB for 33,000 tonnes of wheat, it said in its latest report on Export Markets for U.S grains.     EC sales to Brazil total about 225,000 tonnes during 1986/87 (July-June) in stark contrast to only 50,000 tonnes in the 1985/86 season, it said.     The increasing presence of EC wheat in Brazil comes at a time when the Brazilian Wheat Board, BWB, expects the wheat import market will expand to 3.4 mln tonnes from the current forecast of 3.0 mln in the 1986/87 year.     The BWB cites record consumption and an eventual decline in domestic production, and says government plans to lower the guaranteed price of wheat from 242 dlrs per tonne to 180 dlrs will contribute to greater import demand, the USDA said.     It said the BWB expects the U.S. to be major supplier of the additional 400,000 tonnes, but commitments for purchase of U.S. wheat through two-thirds of 1986/87 year total only 600,000 tonnes versus 700,000 a year ago.  \n',grain
'European Community (EC) member states have generally given a cool initial reaction to proposals by the European Commission for cereal price changes and related measures in the coming season, EC diplomats said.     They said that in meetings of the EC Special Committee on Agriculture representatives of most member states had said the changes, taken together, would have too harsh an impact on farmers\' incomes.     Only Britain and the Netherlands had shown willingness to accept the commission\'s overall package, they said.     As well as cuts of over two pct in common prices for most cereals, the commission proposes a limitation of intervention to the February to March period and reduced monthly increments in intervention prices.     EC Farm Ministers will have a first discussion of the proposals at a meeting beginning next Monday.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Senate Finance Committee approved nonbinding resolutions urging the Reagan administration oppose Canada\'s ruling on U.S corn imports and a proposed new European Community tax on vegetable oils.     The resolutions, approved by voice vote, now will be sent to the Senate floor were they are expected to be approved.     The EC oils measure, offered by Sen. John Danforth, R-Mo., urges the administration to take strong retaliatory measures if the tax is approved by the EC Council of Ministers.     Sen. David Durenberger, R-Minn., offered the corn amendment which urges the administration to file a complaint with the GATT if the U.S. believes the corn decision by Canada was unjustified. Canada recently imposed a permanent duty of 85 cents per bushel on U.S. corn imports.  \n',grain
'The EC Commission decided to open a special daily export rebate today for maize exports to Morocco, Israel, Canary Islands and zone 5c (Sub-Saharan Africa), trade sources said here.     The rebate was set at 153 European currency units per tonne for March and 133 for April through July.  \n',grain
'The European Community\'s cereal management committee rejected all bids to export free market soft wheat at today\'s weekly tender, traders said.     The committee awarded 123,000 tonnes of free market barley export licences at a maximum export refund of 138.75 Ecus per tonne. \n',grain
'The European Community Commission awarded export licences for 20,000 tonnes free market French maize at a maximum export rebate of 129.40 European currency units (Ecus) per tonne, trade sources said here.     All requests for export licences for free market feed wheat and barley were rejected, they said.  \n',grain
'The European Commission has not taken a decision on applications from the British government for the release of 200,000 tonnes of intervention feed wheat onto the British market in May and June, Commission sources said.     They said last week\'s cereals management committee agreed to release 70,000 tonnes of feed wheat through weekly tenders between April 14 and May 26. It also indicated it planned to allow the release of another 30,000 tonnes from April 23.     However, it decided to leave consideration of the release of further wheat until later.     The British government had applied for the release of a further 100,000 tonnes in both May and June from British intervention stores to prevent market prices rising.     However, the sources said, the Commission wanted to review the market situation nearer the time before giving its approval.     The Commission was given new powers last year to control the release of intervention cereals onto the market, the sources noted.     Following last week\'s committee meeting, the U.K. Ministry of Agriculture said the Commission had given an assurance that additional quantities of intervention wheat would be made available in May and June. It also said that it was envisaged that monthly releases would be at least 100,000 tonnes, depending on the state of the market.     This lead to the widespread assumption that the Commission had actually approved the release of 300,000 tonnes during the three months of April, May and June at last week\'s meeting.  \n',grain
'The European Community Commission has decided to abolish a special tax of eight Ecus per tonne imposed on exports of Spanish maize, Commission sources said.     They said the tax, which applies to Spanish sales to EC and non-EC countries alike, would no longer be required on exports from Spanish ports south of Valencia.     The decision was taken at a meeting of the authority\'s cereals management committee today.     The tax had been introduced last September at the same time as a subsidy of eight Ecus per tonne was brought in for exports of maize to Spain from other EC member countries.     The aim of the tax was to prevent the maize imported into Spain from the other EC states with the help of subsidies from being reexported back to them.     The sources added that Spain had received no answer from the committee to its request that tenders be opened for the sale to third countries of 450,000 tonnes of maize.     The request will be considered at the committee\'s next meeting, the commission sources said.     Madrid estimates that it needs to import 1.7 mln tonnes of maize this year, while an EC-U.S. accord guarantees non-EC producer sales to Spain of two mln tonnes of maize and 300,000 tonnes of sorghum annually for the next four years.  \n',grain
'The European Commission is to consider proposed new higher minimum standards for sales of durum wheat into intervention stores, European Community sources said.     They said a document drawn up by Commission officials proposes a reduction in the maximum humidity level to 13 pct from 14, an increase in the minimum weight to 78 kilos per hectolitre from 76, a tightening of other technical standards and introduction of some new ones.     Current public stocks of durum wheat in the EC are 1.15 mln tonnes, of which almost 1.12 mln are in Italy.  \n',grain
'Three geographically diverse droughts in Asia are being linked by some scientists to a reintensification of the complex and little-understood El Nino weather pattern, Accu-Weather Inc, a commercial weather forecasting service, said.     Rice and wheat farmers in China, wheat and sugarcane growers in Australia and tea planters in Sri Lanka all face serious losses to their respective harvests unless rains arrive in time to break the droughts, offical reports, government officials and meteorologists said.     Wen Wei Po, a Hong Kong daily with close Peking links, said the drought is the worst in over 20 years and some provinces have been without adequate rainfall for more than seven months.     Rice planting is threatened in eight provinces, it added.     Rainfall in the key farming provinces of Henan and Sichuan was 70 pct below average during February, the lowest figure for over 20 years, the paper said.     The dry weather has cut stored water volumes by over 20 pct compared with last March and lowered the water levels of many rivers, it added.     This has resulted in reduced hydro-electric power, causing shortages to industry and households. The upper reaches of the Yangtze are at their lowest levels in a century, causing many ships to run aground, Wen Wei Po said.     Unusually high temperatures have also been reported across China, media reports said. The People\'s Daily said Sichuan has recorded temperatures three degrees Celsius higher than average since early February.     The New China News Agency said the average December temperature in Harbin in the northeast was six degrees higher than last December and 14 degrees higher than December 1984.     Severe drought is affecting about one-third of Sri Lanka and threatens to reduce the country\'s tea crop, Ministry of Plantation Industries officials tolds     In Australia, concern is growing about below-average rainfall levels in parts of the sugarcane belt along the Queensland coast and in Western Australia\'s wheat belt, local Meteorological Bureau officials said.     For many farmers and government officials the fear is that while the present low rainfall does not yet pose a major threat, the prospect of a dry autumn/winter season when the wheat crop is in its early stages certainly does, they added.     Concern is heightened by the memory of the 1982/83 drought which devastated the wheat crop and coincided with the occurrence of the barely understood weather phenomenon known as El Nino, they said.     Although meteorologists are cautious about linking the Asia-Pacific region\'s disrupted weather patterns to any single cause, El Nino\'s role is being closely studied, they said.     Accu-Weather Inc, which specialises in providing data for agriculture and shipping interests, said each El Nino \'event\' was unique.     The El Nino does not always produce the same effects and the present occurrence is much less pronounced than the last major event in 1982/83, it said.     El Nino, Spanish for \"Christ Child\" because it appears around Christmas, is formed by the action of warm air, bearing clouds and rain, shifting from the Indonesian archipelago to the coast of Peru, where it mingles with the cold waters associated with the Peru current and returns across the Pacific as the trade winds, meteorologists said.     The winds, strengthened by El Nino\'s \"pump\" effect, raise the sea level off Australia and Indonesia, they said.     When the winds drop, the ocean, seeking equilibrium, sends a surge of warmer water back across the Pacific where it collides with the cold seas off Peru, they said.     One effect of this heat exchange is to deflect the rain-bearing clouds away from Australia and Indonesia into the Pacific, where they further disrupt other weather patterns.     The prospects for an end to the droughts vary, Accu-Weather said.     China, where the affected areas have received between 40 and 75 pct of normal rainfall, will have to wait for the May-September rains, it said.     The May-September rains normally provide the drought-striken areas with 80 pct of annual rainfall.     In Australia, areas of Queensland\'s coastal strip have received less than half the normal rainfall during the current wet season, but prospects for increased rains are diminishing as the rainy season draws to an end.     In Sri Lanka, the drought has come when rainfall should be at its maximum for the year. The year\'s secondary rains usually occur between April and June, although it is not possible at this stage to forecast whether they will arrive as usual.  \n',grain
'\"If we go on using up farmland as we have done since 1980, there will be none left in 20 years to grow grain on.\"     Xu Jinfeng, a middle-aged official in Fengbang village on the edge of Shanghai, sums up the dilemma China faces as it tries to feed its more than one billion people and at the same time let them get richer by building factories and new homes.     China has to feed one quarter of the world\'s population, but only one seventh of its land is arable.     Sharp increases in farm output since 1979 turned China into a net grain exporter for the first time in 1985, and again in 1986.     But the rapid industrialisation of the countryside which has occurred at the same time, has gobbled up arable land for factories and homes for peasants who can now afford them.     Official figures show that China lost just under one pct of its arable land to other uses in 1985 and a slightly smaller amount last year. It gained 26 mln new mouths to feed during the two years.     \"We lost very little land prior to 1980 when the industrialisation began,\" official Xu said. \"Since then, nearly all the families in the county have built new homes and many factories have gone up.\"     \"Last year we lost land to a new railway line,\" Xu said. But land losses in future should fall because nearly all families already have new houses, she added.     The issue of land loss is a matter of major concern to the Peking leadership, which announced earlier this month that China will issue nationwide quotas for conversion of grain land for the first time this year.     \"The present situation of abusing, occupying unlawfully, wasting and destroying land and land resources is serious,\" said an article in the official press explaining the new measures.     \"It has resulted in great losses of cultivated farmland,\" it said. \"China has a large population and its land resources are badly deficient.\"     An official of the Shanghai city government said county authorities could approve conversion of only 0.3 hectares of arable land to other uses, while anything more than that must be approved by the city government.    The Peking government faces another major obstacle in its efforts to ensure China\'s people get enough grain to eat. The prices the state pays to farmers for grain are too low, making it more profitable for them to grow other crops.     To offset this, the state offers farmers cheap fertiliser and diesel oil and payment in advance for grain it contracts to buy. The state then sells the grain at subsidised prices to China\'s 200 mln city residents. Rural factories also subsidise grain output, paying farmers bonuses to grow it.     Some officials argue that the simplest solution to the problem would be for the state to raise city grain prices.     Chen Zuyuan, Communist Party secretary of a village in the eastern province of Zhejiang, said the government listened too much to the demands of \"selfish city people\" and could raise city grain prices without any problem.     But the government has ruled out a price rise. \"Raising the price of grain would directly conflict with the goal of social stability,\" said a China Daily editorial this month.     The Shanghai official said prices must be reformed over the long term. \"We must be very careful. We have a very large population which is used to price stability and will object to price rises,\" he said. \"The problem is how to do it.\"     The Shanghai official said a rise in grain prices might also affect the prices of hundreds of food products made with grain and consumed by city residents.     In addition, the state faces the problem of inadequate investment by farmers in land and in grain in particular.     The official press has reported that farmers fear farm policy may change and they are putting their new wealth into building graves, memorial halls for ancestors and homes.     Under reforms introduced in the late 1970s, farmers sign contracts with the state requiring them to grow certain crops, but they have considerable freedom in how to use their land.     \"As the expiration date of the 15-year contract is almost at the halfway mark, farmers are beginning to worry about the future,\" the China Daily said in an editorial last month.     Their anxieties stem from the fact that they are allowed to use the land but not own it. For most of the period of Communist rule, the land was organised into collectives where there was little room for individual initiative.     \"New measures are needed to reassure them of the consistency of government policies and make them interested in long-term investment,\" the newspaper said.  \n',grain
'U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said the Export Enhancement Program, EEP, should be used as a \"tactical tool\" and not as a general policy.     Yeutter made the comment in response to a question whether the U.S. should expand the EEP to cover grain sales to the Soviet Union.     He did not comment directly on the Soviet question, replying that any decision would be made at the highest levels of the Reagan administration, and \"I don\'t want to preempt that.\"     Yeutter told the National Grain and Feed Association EEP should continue to be used as a tactical tool against the European Community but not as a general policy. He said selective EEP use has been successful in pressuring the E.C.  \n',grain
'Egypt has cancelled its Export Bonus tender for 200,000 tonnes of soft red winter wheat for May-June shipment after failing to bid a price acceptable to USDA, private export sources said.  \n',grain
'Egypt will tender Thursday for 200,000 tonnes of optional origin corn, U.S. number two or equivalent, 14.5 pct moisture, for late April shipment, private export sources said.     Shipment will be from the Gulf or Great Lakes if U.S. origin, they said.  \n',grain
'The size of French 1986/87 carryover barley stocks, estimated at 1.72 mln tonnes compared with 700,000 tonnes in 1985/86 is worrying, French Cereals Intervention Office (ONIC) Director Bernard Vieux said.     He told journalists these estimates were unchanged at the end of February from the previous month while export forecasts were lowered to 4.5 mln tonnes from 5.76 mln in 1985/86.     Vieux called on the EC Commission to help by awarding a larger volume of export certificates and said if no outlets are opened for French barley a large amount could be put into intervention.     A small amount of French barley has already been put into intervention, Vieux said without detailing the amount.     The outlook for French maize is better with 1986/87 exports to non-EC countries now put at 700,000 tonnes against 200,000 tonnes at the end of January and against 155,000 tonnes in 1985/86.     The higher estimate is due to the EC Commission\'s decision to hold special export tenders for French maize, he said.  \n',grain
'Upcoming changes being considered in the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s transportation and loan programs were outlined by a USDA official today.     Addressing the annual meeting of the National Grain and Feed Association, Tom VonGarlem, assistant deputy administrator for USDA\'s state and county operations, said the following changes are under consideration by USDA.     Termination of USDA\'s Transportation Assistance Program for wheat, barley and sorghum would be proposed this week.     Changes in USDA\'s reserve rotation program are also under consideration, VonGarlem said. While the department has not made any final decision, banning the use of pik and roll grain in reserve rotation is under heavy consideration, he said.     Changes in loan rates will definitely be looked at for next year\'s crop, he said, with the option of making soybean loans partially in cash and in certificates under consideration.     VanGarlem said he will definitely not extend the 1987 crop program signup, saying he sees no reason to do so at this time.     He also said wheat will not be considered for a cash bonus under the Conservation Reserve Program.  \n',grain
'France has sold between 50,000 to 100,000 tonnes of wheat flour to China, the Director General of France\'s Cereal Intervention Board (ONIC) Bernard Vieux said.     He gave no further details of the sale, but added French millers were worried about the unfair competition facing French flour due the lack of end-of-season storage premiums for wheat.     ONIC raised its estimate of 1986/87 flour exports to 1.70 mln tonnes compared 1.65 mln forecast in March and the 1.87 mln exported in 1985/86.  \n',grain
'French maize producers will ask the EC Commission to grant permanent maize export rebates following the recent EC/U.S. Accord guaranteeing the U.S. An annual export quota of two mln tonnes of maize for Spain over four years, the French maize producers association, AGPM, said.     The Commission has already decided to accord rebates for the export of 500,000 tonnes of French maize, of which rebates for around 100,000 tonnes have been granted.     The request will be made when export certificates have been granted for all the 500,000 tonnes, the AGPM said.     The association said that the request would cover exports to all destinations, adding that the Soviet Union, which has important maize needs, is currently excluded from the list of destination countries for the 500,000 tonnes of French maize.     The U.S. Agriculture Department has forecast Soviet maize imports for the 1986/87 campaign at 4.90 mln tonnes against 10.40 mln in 1985/86.  \n',grain
'French Agricultural Minister Francois Guillaume warned that France would flatly reject proposed reforms of the European Community, EC, cereals, sugar and oilseeds sectors, which he said would disrupt these markets.     The EC Commission\'s proposals to shorten the intervention period and lower monthly premiums for cereals and increase the financial burden on the sugar producers will also result in lower real prices for producers, he told farmers here.     \"I give you my word that France, while it will not reject technical adjustments or serious discussion, will simply reply in the negative to these bad reforms,\" Guillaume told the annual conference of the country\'s major farm union, FNSEA  (Federation Nationale des Syndicats Dexploitants Agricoles).     Community agricultural ministers are due to meet again Monday to try and agree a package of reforms to curb spiralling EC output and fix farm prices for 1987/88.     Relations between the government and farmers have become strained in France in recent months.     There have been sporadic but frequent demonstrations by farmers protesting over sharp falls in meat and pork prices and further cutbacks in Community milk output.     But Guillaume\'s warning that he would reject reorganisation of the EC cereal and sugar markets -- France being a major producer of both crops -- won him warm applause from the FNSEA\'s farmers.     His pledge to fight the EC proposals and push for the complete dismantling of the system of cross border taxes designed to smooth out currency differences known as Monetary Compensatory Amounts, MCA\'s, however, are unlikely to avoid further protests by producers.     Farm leader Raymond Lacombe said the union planned to go ahead with a series of major protests both in France and abroad against the EC Commission\'s proposals to overhaul the farm sector.     \"The Minister\'s proposals back up our determination to organise union action in the coming weeks,\" he told reporters, adding that this could also act in Guillaume\'s favour on a ministerial level.     Guillaume was head of the FNSEA for many years before being appointed farm minister last spring.     Lacombe refused to say whether the farmers felt that Guillaume was doing a good job as farm minister.     There have been certain advances on cutting production costs, reducing fiscal costs and awarding drought aid, but there are still areas where more could be done such as on farmers\' indebtedness, he said.     Guillaume told the conference the government will make available 2.4 billion francs (396 mln dlrs) to help producers reduce milk output and to encourage older farmers to retire.     The government has already announced financial aid for the milk sector and it was not clear how much of the package announced today was new aid, Lacombe said.  \n',grain
'French cereal exports through the port of Rouen fell 6.4 pct to 725,023 tonnes during the period February 1 to 25, from 774,704 for the period February 1 to 26 last year, trade sources said.     Main destinations were Saudi Arabia with 158,109 tonnes of barley, the Soviet Union 147,214 of wheat, Italy 104,704 of wheat, Spain 91,381 of wheat and maize, China 52,500 of wheat and Algeria 41,000 of wheat.     Between February 26 and today, five ships have loaded 137,000 tonnes of cereals, the sources added.     The 137,000 tonnes comprised 59,500 tonnes of wheat for China, 53,000 of wheat for the Soviet Union and 24,500 of wheat for Algeria.     By this Friday, sources estimated a further 233,600 tonnes of cereals will have been loaded, comprising 47,000 tonnes of barley, 78,600 of wheat and 25,000 of rapeseed for the Soviet Union, 30,000 of wheat for Sri Lanka, 28,000 of wheat for China and 25,000 of wheat for Poland.  \n',grain
'French exporters estimated that around 600,000 tonnes of French soft wheat has been sold to China for delivery in the 1986/87 (July/June) year.     Around 300,000 tonnes were exported to China between July 1986 and February this year.     Another 100,000 to 150,000 tonnes will be shipped during this month and around the same amount in April, they said.     France sold around 250,000 tonnes of soft wheat to China in 1985/86, according to customs figures.     However, certain exporters fear China may renounce part of its contract with France after being offered one mln tonnes of U.S. soft wheat under the Export Enhancement Program in January and making some purchases under the initiative.  \n',grain
'French operators have requested licences to export 422,000 tonnes of free market maize, 212,000 tonnes of barley and 20,000 tonnes of feed wheat at today\'s EC tender, trade sources said.     For the maize, rebates requested range between 129.25 and 138.74 European currency units per tonne, for the barley between 138.94 and 145 Ecus and for feed wheat 141.75 Ecus.  \n',grain
'Syria may have bought 80,000 tonnes of French soft wheat, some traders here said.     But others said it may instead have given payment guarantees to allow for the shipping of an old contract to go ahead.     Syria has bought around 320,000 tonnes of soft French wheat since the beginning of the 1986/87 campaign, of which only 121,000 tonnes had been exported by the end of last month.     The country also bought around 30,000 tonnes of EC soft wheat 12 days ago at 80 to 81 dlrs a tonne, fob, they said.  \n',grain
'French soft wheat exports to other European Community countries fell 18 pct to 4.13 mln tonnes in the first seven months of the 1986/87 season to January compared with 5.04 mln in the same 1985/86 period, the French Cereals Intervention Office (ONIC) said.     According to latest ONIC statistics, the main buyers were Italy with 1.89 mln against 1.63 mln in the same 1985/86 period, West Germany 480,450 tonnes against 717,689, the Netherlands 462,048 (532,299) and Belgium 417,887 tonnes (919,337).     British and Greek imports of French soft wheat during this period were below year-ago levels. Between July 1 last year and January 31, Britain bought 274,665 tonnes against 642,800 tonnes, ONIC figures showed.     But Spanish purchases were up sharply at 258,507 tonnes against 2,751 tonnes in the same 1985/86 period and Portugal bought 37,599 tonnes compared with zero.     ONIC said the drop in French exports to other Community countries was due to British competition.  \n',grain
'Poland\'s winter wheat is likely to survive recent frosts but the impact of the cold will not be known until late April, the Polish meteorology institute said.     Some varieties of winter wheat sown in Poland can survive ground temperatures as low as minus 20 degrees C, Spokesman Teresa Tomaszewska tolds.     Even though an earlier thin protective layer of snow mainly melted in February, air temperatures down to minus 30 C should not be harmful, she said, but added that wheat can still be damaged by cold spells in March and April, when young shoots may be exposed to night frosts.  \n',grain
'A study on grain certificates due out shortly from the Government Accounting Office (GAO) could show that certificates cost the government 10 to 15 pct more than cash outlays, administration and industry sources said.     Analysis that the GAO has obtained from the Agriculture Department and the Office of Management and Budget suggests that certificates cost more than cash payments, a GAO official tolds.     GAO is preparing the certificate study at the specific request of Sen. Jesse Helms (R-N.C.), former chairman of the senate agriculture committee.     The report, which will focus on the cost of certificates compared to cash, is scheduled to be released in mid March.     The cost of certificates, said the GAO source, depends on the program\'s impact on the USDA loan program.     If GAO determines that certificates encourage more loan entries or cause more loan forfeitures, then the net cost of the program would go up. However, if it is determined that certificates have caused the government grain stockpile to decrease, the cost effect of certificates would be less.     GAO will not likely suggest whether the certificates program should be slowed or expanded, the GAO official said.     But a negative report on certificates \"will fuel the fire against certificates and weigh heavily on at least an increase in the certificate program,\" an agricultural consultant said.     The OMB is said to be against any expansion of the program, while USDA remains firmly committed to it.  \n',grain
'Over 240 mln bushels of government grain have been allocated in redemptions for commodity certificates since the program began April 30, according to the Commodity Credit Corporation.     Redemptions included 11.4 mln bushels of corn valued at 17.0 mln dlrs, or an average per-bushel price of 1.492 dlrs, since the current grain catalogs were issued December 1 by CCC.     Wheat redemptions totaled 9.6 mln bushels, valued at 23.7 mln dlrs, since December 1.  More \n',grain
'The U.S. grain planting intentions and stocks reports bear optimistic news for U.S agriculture, a grain analyst on a Chicago Board of Trade panel said.     The decline in intended soybean acreage and lower stocks are \"the first report we\'ve had for a long time that shows any optimism for anybody,\" said John \"Bud\" Frazier, grain analyst and executive vice president for Balfour MacLaine, Inc.     \"I\'m really excited about it,\" Frazier said.     The U.S. Department of Agriculture said farmers intend to plant 67.6 mln acres of corn, down from 76.7 mln planted last year, and 56.8 mln acres of soybeans, down from 61.5 mln.     The report showed March 1 stocks of 1.4 billion bushels of soybeans, 8.3 billion bushels of corn, and 2.3 billion bushels of wheat, all below trade guesses.     Frazier was joined by Susan Hackmann, senior grain analyst with AgriAnalysis, and Mark Meyer, a grain analyst with Shearson Lehman Brothers, Inc., on a Chicago Board of Trade panel to discuss the reports.     Frazier said the stocks reports in particular were friendly for the market, and soybean prices would jump three to five cents a bushel \"if the bell rang right now.\"     \"We\'re getting our disappearance up. We have less (corn and soybeans) than we thought we had,\" he said, noting that hog and poultry production is up.     \"We\'re seeing low prices generate some interest in demand,\" said Meyer, adding that feed use was up 13 pct last quarter and 15 pct in the preceding quarter.     However, Hackmann said production could continue to exceed consumption.     She noted that most of the reductions in soybean acres came in southeastern states, where yields are usually low.     \"We have the potential for record breaking soybean yields this year, (which) will temper the enthusiasm on tomorrow\'s opening,\" she said.     Hackmann said record corn yields also are possible, and the crop could reach 7.1 billion bushels, which would be down from last year\'s 8.25 billion bushels.     \"We\'ll need very good disappearance next year to reduce stocks,\" she said. The USDA estimated disappearance last year at 6.7 billion bushels.     Hackmann said the stocks report was positive for the long term, \"But we still have a long way to go to bring stocks down to where we could start rebuilding prices.\"     Frazier also cautioned that the soybean acreage report could prompt farmers to change their plans and plant more soybeans.     The panelists agreed that the reports should discourage talk of revising the 1985 farm bill.     \"There seems to be no desire ... to change the farm law we\'re working under today, and this report should reinforce that,\" Frazier said.     \"We are seeing the program beginning to work,\" said Meyer.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department gave a preliminary breakdown of grain in the Farmer-Owned Grain Reserve as of April 1, with comparisons, based on telephone reports from farmers filed with the department\'s Kansas City field office, in mln bushels --            April 1   Previous  Wheat     657.6      659.7  Corn    1,406.5    1,397.0  Sorghum    95.8       95.5  Barley    122.1      122.0  Oats        3.7        3.7    \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department gave the following breakdown of grain remaining in the farmer-owned grain reserve as of April 1, in mln bushels, by reserve number --              I    II  III    IV      V      VI  Wheat      nil  nil  0.1   0.3    10.5  479.7  Corn        --   --   --   4.1 1,231.9     --  Sorghum-x   --   --   --   0.1    38.8     --  Barley      --   --   --   0.1    73.9     --  x - mln cwts. Note - USDA says above totals may not match total in reserve numbers.  \n',grain
'There were six grain ships loading and six ships were waiting to load at Portland, according to the Portland Merchants Exchange.     \n',grain
'Nine grain ships were loading and 16 were waiting to load at New Orleans elevators, trade sources said.  ELEVATOR                     LOADING  WAITING  Continental Grain, Westwego     1      5  Mississippi River, Myrtle Grove 1      0  ADM Growmark                    1      2  Bunge Grain, Destrehan          1      0     ELEVATOR                LOADING  WAITING  ST CHARLES DESTREHAN         1      1  RESERVE ELEVATOR CORP        1      0  PEAVEY CO, ST ELMO           1      1  CARGILL GRAIN, TERRE HAUTE   1      4  CARGILL GRAIN, PORT ALLEN    0      0  ZEN-NOH                      1      3  \n',grain
'Fresh, heavy rains caused further damage to the Argentine 1986/87 coarse grains crop in the week to yesterday, particularly in Buenos Aires province, trade sources said.     They said the sunflower, maize, soybean and sorghum crops were damaged and yield estimates affected. New production forecasts were made for all these crops.     The rains over the weekend and up to yesterday registered more than 200 mm on average in western Buenos Aires and worsened the flooding in various parts of the province.     The weather bureau said the rains, which in Buenos Aires have surpassed 750 mm in the last 30 days, could continue.     The northeast of the country was also hit by heavy rains.     In Corrientes province the rains also passed an average of 200 mm in some parts, notably the Paso de los Libres area bordering on Uruguay.     In Santa Fe and Entre Rios provinces they were over 100 mm in places, in Misiones and San Luis 90 mm and in Cordoba 80 mm.     The rains were less intense in Chaco and Formosa.     Harvesting in areas not actually under water could also be further delayed due to dampness in the earth, the sources said.     The excessive humidity might also produce rotting of the crops, further dimishing the yield, the sources added.     Sunflower harvesting before the weekend rains reached 26 to 30 pct of the area sown in Santa Fe, Cordoba, La Pampa and Buenos Aires provinces.     The production forecast for 1986/87 sunflowerseed has been lowered to between 2.2 and 2.4 mln tonnes, against 2.3 to 2.6 mln tonnes the previous week, making it 41.5 to 46.3 pct lower than the record 4.1 mln tonnes produced last season.     The area sown was two to 2.2 mln hectares, down 29.9 to 36.3 pct on the record 3.14 mln hectares in 1985/86.     The maize harvest advanced to within 26 to 28 pct of the area sown in Cordoba, Santa Fe and northern Buenos Aires. It will begin in La Pampa within about 10 days, weather permitting.     Maize yield this season is now estimated at 9.6 to 9.9 mln tonnes, against last week\'s 9.9 to 10.1 mln tonnes, down 21.4 to 22.6 pct on the 12.4 to 12.6 mln tonnes at which private producers put 1985/86 production.     The new forecast is 22.7 to 25 pct down on the official figure of 12.8 mln tonnes for last season\'s production.     The grain sorghum harvest reached 17 to 19 pct of growers\' targets, against 14 to 16 pct the previous week.     The production forecast was reduced to between three and 3.3 mln tonnes, against 3.2 to 3.5 mln tonnes last week, 21.4 to 26.8 pct down on last season\'s 4.1 to 4.2 mln tonnes.     The area sown with sorghum in 1986/87 was 1.23 to 1.30 mln hectares, down 10.3 to 15.2 pct on the 1.45 mln in 1985/86.     The forecast for soybean yield this season was the least changed in relation to last week. It was put at a record 7.5 to 7.7 mln tonnes, against the previous 7.5 to 7.8 mln tonnes.     These figures are 4.2 to 5.5 pct higher than last season\'s record of 7.2 to 7.3 mln tonnes, according to private sources, and 5.6 to 8.5 pct up on the official 7.1 mln tonnes.     The adjustment to the production forecast is due to the rains and overcast conditions which have greatly reduced the sunlight needed for this crop, sources said.     Producers fear estimates may yet have to be adjusted down further.     The humidity could induce rotting and growers are still finding more empty pods due to excessively dry weather earlier in the season.     Soybean harvesting is due to start in mid-April in southern Cordoba and Santa Fe and northern Buenos Aires.  \n',grain
'With less than a week remaining to enroll in the 1987 feedgrains program, Agriculture Department officials said that final signup will probably exceed last year\'s level of 85 pct.     Enrollment in USDA\'s basic acreage reduction program will likely total close to 90 pct, Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service, ASCS, officials said, with 50 to 70 pct of the enrolling farmers also expected to sign up for the paid land diversion program.     The signup period of the 1987 feedgrains program officially ends at the close of the business day on March 30.     USDA will release its official signup report around April 15, an official said.     USDA personnel in the corn belt states of Iowa, Illinois, and Indiana have been reporting heavy signup activity, an ASCS official tolds.     A surge of acitivity is expected during this final week of signup, the official said.     \"A lot of farmers have been dragging their feet because they were anticipating some changes in the program, but that doesn\'t look very likely now,\" he said.     To enroll in the 1987 feedgrains program, farmers have to set aside 20 pct of the program acreage base, and have the option to idle an additional 15 pct under a paid land diversion program.  \n',grain
'Honduras has been authorized to buy about 75,000 tonnes of U.S. wheat, about 15,000 tonnes of U.S. corn, and about 6,000 tonnes of U.S. tallow under an existing PL 480 agreement, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said it may buy the wheat, valued at 8.5 mln dlrs, the corn, valued at 1.5 mln, and the tallow, valued at 2.0 mln dlrs, between March 24 and August 31, 1987, and ship it from U.S. ports and/or Canadian transshipment points by this September 30.     The purchase authorizations cover the entire quantity provided under the agreement, signed March 11.    \n',grain
'The 1988 agriculture budget will have to be cut by an additional one to two billion dlrs, the chairman of a key house agriculture subcommittee said.     Implementation of a 0/92 program, a tightening up of the use of commodity certificates, and reconstitution of farms are possibilities that will be studied to reduce farm spending, said Dan Glickman, D-Kans., chairman of the House agriculture subcommittee on wheat, soybeans and feedgrains.     Speaking at the annual meeting of the National Grain and Feed Association, Glickman said he learned this week from the House budget committee that the agriculture committee will have to reduce the fiscal year 1988 farm budget by up to two billion dlrs from the 30 billion dlrs level already approved.     Decisions on how to cut the farm budget will have to be made very quickly in order to make any impact on the FY 1988 budget, Glickman added.     Glickman also said his committee will not approve USDA\'s  proposal to cut target prices by ten pct per year.     \"The administration\'s target price proposals are dead in the water,\" he said.     To cut the budget, Glickman said, \"everthing is on the table,\" except those moves that would reduce farmers\' income.     Glickman offered a list of possibilities that his committee will study in order to cut farm spending.     Implementation of a 0/92 program for 1987 winter wheat and 1988 feedgrains crops has been introduced by Glickman, which he said would result in a 150-200 mln dlr savings for one year.     Tightening up on the use of generic (in-kind, or \"pik\') certificates will also be another option his committee will study, Glickman said.     While not committing himself for or against such action, he said lawmakers have to examine recent government findings which indicate certificates cost more than cash payments.     Glickman said rules for the reconstitution of farms and tightening up of the person definition for annual payment limitations is another option and could save 100-200 mln dlrs.     He also said increasing acreage set-aside requirements by five pct for wheat and feedgrains at program sign-up was a move that could save about one billion dlrs, but added that he would not be in favor of such a change.     Glickman also said that the Export Enhancement Program\'s, EEP, spending authority of 1.5 billion dlrs is quickly being used up, and Congress will have to decide whether to expand this program while making cuts in other areas.     Cuts in the EEP program are unlikely, he said.     \"I don\'t see right now that the EEP will be on the chopping block,\" Glickman said.  \n',grain
'The shareholders of Illinois Cooperative Futures Co., the futures trading arm of many Midwest farm cooperatives for more than 25 years, will vote Wednesday on its possible dissolution.     The directors of the company called a special meeting and recommended its dissolution last month, citing falling volume and increasing costs.     Sources close to the organization tolds the pullout of Growmark, Inc., which holds more than 70 pct of the capital stock, led to the call for dissolution.     The possible demise of the cooperative has set clearing houses scrambling for the trading business of the 85 regional and local cooperatives that comprise its membership.     Ironically, it was Growmark, at that time a regional farm cooperative with major river terminal elevators, that founded Illinois Cooperative Futures on December 1, 1960.     But Growmark became affiliated last year with Archer Daniels Midland of Decatur, Ill., and markets its grain through a joint subsidiary of the two companies, ADM/Growmark.     With that relationship, Growmark no longer needs to trade futures through the cooperative, said Tom Mulligan, president of the co-op.     Membership in the company, which Mulligan termed a cooperative of cooperatives, has declined from 99 in 1982. A notable loss was AgriIndustries of Iowa, which became affiliated with Cargill, Inc.     Illinois Co-op\'s other members include such regional cooperatives as Indiana Grain, based in Indianapolis, Goldkist, of Atlanta, Ga., Midstates in Toledo, Ohio, Farmland Industries in Kansas City, Mo., Farmers Commodities, Des Moines, and Harvest States in Minneapolis.     Some observors said the demise of Illinois Cooperative Futures Co. is a serious blow to the cooperative system.     Instead of banding together, the individual cooperatives are forced to go their own ways, said the floor manager of one cash house at the Chicago Board of Trade.     Such a move would destroy the cohesiveness that gives farm cooperatives an advantage in the market at a time that a few major commercial companies are growing dominant, he said.     Don Hanes, vice president for communications with the National Council of Farm Cooperatives, said 5,600 cooperatives exist today, down from 6,700 five years ago.     \"The period we\'ve gone through in the past five years has been quite a crunch,\" he said. \"There\'s been a lot of consolidation in the marketing co-ops.\"     One problem, he said, is the co-ops sell the grain to the major commercials for export, rather than exporting it themselves, losing potential profits.     But exporting grain requires heavy investments, and the multi-million-dollar loss posted six years ago by Farmers Export Co., a co-op set up to export grains, served \"to make folks gun-shy,\" Hanes said.     Mulligan said he believes the dissolution, if it is approved, is a result of change in the futures industry rather than a change in U.S. agricultural economics.     A grain dealer at one member co-op said the futures arm \"was a convenience, something that saved us a little bit of money. (Its dissolution) will force us to change our way of doing business.\"     \"We\'re sorry to see the co-op go by the wayside,\" he said. \"But there are lot of people out there to do business with. There are plenty of capable firms.\"     Steven W. Cavanaugh, vice president for grain marketing with Indiana Grain, said he would prefer to trade futures through a Chicago-based cooperative.     \"In terms of clearing our business as a unit as opposed to individuals, there would be economic savings,\" he said but added, \"The times change and with changing times, come different opinions of what businesses ought to be around.\"     Cavanaugh said the possible demise of the futures arm had nothing to do with its profitability. \"I would guarantee you that this company is not in trouble. It is a sound, healthy organization.\"     In the year ended February 28, 1986, the Illinois Cooperative reported income of 10.2 mln dlrs and members\' equity, or net worth, of 8.3 mln dlrs. The annual report for the most recent year has not been filed.     Under the cooperative system, income from operations is returned as \"patronage refunds\" to the members.     Income and refunds in the past five years have been declining. In the year ended February 28, 1982, the co-op reported income of 17.4 mln dlrs and patronage refunds of 17.0 mln dlrs. Patronage refunds in the year ended February 28, 1986, totalled 9.5 mln dlrs.     \"You\'re dealing with substantially lower volume,\" Mulligan said. \"Lower volume translates into higher costs.\"     According to the company\'s 1986 annual report, Growmark owns 90 pct of the preferred shares and four pct of the common shares of Illinois Cooperative Futures Co.     Mulligan declined to speculate on how much of the capital Growmark is entitled to. He said he could not determine the figure unless the shareholders decide in favor of dissolution. Equity is distributed according to each member\'s trading volume and, as a result, changes from year to year.     However, Mulligan said the company could continue to meet minimum capital requirements to trade futures even if Growmark pulled out.  \n',grain
'Indonesia\"s agriculture sector will grow by just 1.0 pct in calendar 1987, against an estimated 2.4 pct in 1986 as the production of some commodities stagnates or declines, the U.S. Embassy said in a report.     Production of Indonesia\"s staple food, rice, is forecast to fall to around 26.3 mln tonnes from an embassy estimate of 26.58 mln tonnes in 1986, according to the annual report on Indonesia\"s agricultural performance.     The government officially estimates 1986 rice production at 26.7 mln tonnes, with a forecast 27.3 mln tonnes output in 1987.     The report says wheat imports are likely to fall to 1.5 mln tonnes in calendar 1987 from 1.69 mln tonnes in 1986 because of a drawdown on stocks.     \"Growth prospects for agriculture in 1987 do not look promising as rice production is forecast to decline and the production of sugarcane, rubber and copra show little or no gain,\" the report says.     \"The modest overall increase which is expected will be due to significant gains in production of corn soybeans, palm oil and palm kernels.\"     Constraints to significant overall increases in agricultural output include a shortage of disease resistant seeds, limited fertile land, insect pests and a reluctance by farmers to shift from rice production to other crops, the report underlines.     The fall in rice production is caused by an outbreak of pests known as \"wereng\" or brown plant hoppers in 1986 which largely offset gains in yields.     The outbreak has forced the government to ban the use of 57 insecticides on rice because it was believed the wereng are now resistant to these varieties, and to use lower-yielding, more resistant rice types.     The government is depending on increased production of export commodities such as coffee, tea, rubber, plywood and palm oil to offset revenue losses brought on by falling crude oil prices.     Palm oil production is expected to increase by over 7.0 pct in 1987 to 1.45 mln tonnes from 1.35 mln, with exports rising to an estimated 720,000 tonnes from 695,000 tonnes in 1986, the report says.     But while production of soybeans in 1987/88 (Oct-Sept) will rise to 1.075 mln tonnes from 980,000 in 1986/87, imports will also rise to supply a new soybean crushing plant.     The report says that imports of wheat, soybeans, soybean meal and cotton are not likely to decline as a result of last September\"s 31 pct devaluation of the rupiah because of a rise in domestic demand.     The report said that Indonesia\"s overall economic performance in calendar 1986 was about zero or even a slight negative growth rate, the lowest rate of growth since the mid-1960s. It compares with 1.9 pct growth in 1985 and 6.7 pct in 1984.     The dramatic fall in oil prices last year was responsible for the slump.  \n',grain
'Indonesia\'s wheat imports are expected to fall to 1.5 mln tonnes in calendar 1987 from 1.69 mln in 1986, the U.S. Embassy\'s annual agriculture report said.     It said the drop was expected, because there will be a drawdown on stocks built up near the end of 1986.     It said wheat stocks at the end of 1986 were 390,000 tonnes, up from 223,000 at end-1985. It forecast end-1987 stocks at around 290,000 tonnes.     The main suppliers in 1986 were Australia (44 pct), the U.S. (29 pct), Canada (12 pct), Argentina (8 pct) and Saudi Arabia (5 pct).  \n',grain
'An explosion and fire today damaged a grain elevator in Bancroft, Iowa, destroying thousands of bushels of grain, authorities said.     The pre-dawn explosion ripped the wooden elevator open, and a fire that followed continued burning at late morning but had been contained, according to a dispatcher at the Algona Police Department.     No injuries were reported at the Lone Rock Coop facility.     The dispatcher said the elevator was filled with corn, and a nearby drying building holding soybeans was on fire.     The explosion was the second in four days in Iowa following the destruction of an Archer Daniels Midland elevator in Burlington last Friday.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has transferred 21.0 mln dlrs in credit guarantees previously earmarked for sales of U.S. corn and 5.0 mln dlrs for sales of oilseeds to increase available coverage on sales of U.S. poultry meat to Iraq, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the action was taken at the request of Iraq\'s State Trade Organization for Grains and Foodstuffs.     The guarantee line for sales of corn has been reduced from 78.0 mln dlrs to 57.0 mln and the line for oilseeds from 5.0 mln dlrs to zero.     The guarantee line for sales of frozen poultry has been increased from 30.0 mln dlrs to 56.0 mln dlrs, USDA said.  \n',grain
'Italy has shown interest in British new crop wheat recently but the actual volume booked so far by Italian buyers has not been large, traders said.     They put purchases at around 50,000 tonnes for Sept/Dec shipments but said some of the business was transacted at the start of the year.     Italian interior home markets have been active in recent weeks and traders said around 200,000 tonnes have traded between dealers and home consumers. Some of this has been covered in the market here and more possibly will be, traders said.  \n',grain
'Ivory Coast maize output has risen steadily during the last two decades and the country aims to produce two mln tonnes annually \"very rapidly,\" the official daily Fraternite Matin reported.     It said the country reached self-sufficiency in maize three years ago and harvested a record 530,000 tonnes in 1985 compared with only 200,000 tonnes 20 years earlier.     The daily did not detail 1986 output but said further production increases are anticipated in the years ahead as part of a policy of boosting domestic output to cut grain imports.  \n',grain
'The International Wheat Council (IWC) lifted its estimate for 1986/87 world wheat and coarse grain production by one mln tonnes to a record 1,377 mln, compared with 1,351 mln tonnes the previous season.     In its monthly market report, the IWC said it is leaving unchanged its forecast of world wheat production for the coming 1987/88 season at between 520 and 530 mln tonnes against a record 534 mln in 1986/87. The one mln tonne upward revision in 1986/87 wheat production reflects several minor adjustments. The IWC raised the 1986/87 coarse grain trade figure two mln to 87 mln tonnes. It left wheat trade unchanged at 86 mln.     The IWC 1986/87 estimate for world trade in wheat and coarse grain is thus estimated two mln tonnes higher at 173 mln against 169 mln the previous season with the forecast three mln rise in Soviet imports offset by small reductions elsewhere.     The IWC said the area harvested for wheat in 1987/88 is likely to be down from last year as low world prices and restrictive national policies measures begin to take effect.     At least four of the five major exporters expect to see a drop in wheat sowings without offset in other countries. There is still potential for even higher average wheat yields but the IWC said there are increasing signs world output may level off.     Although it is still early to assess the coarse grain outlook, the IWC said barley acreage is likely to fall in the European Community but increase in Canada. U.S. Maize area is expected lower but oat sowings could rise.     After damage to its maize crop last year, the Soviet Union plans to expand this area by as much as 50 pct to over six mln hectares in a year when many frost damaged wheat fields are likely to be resown to this and other spring crops. Improved weather and a further increase in the use of intensive cultivation methods could therefore see a marked rise in Soviet maize output in 1987, the IWC said.     Any reduction in world coarse grain output would be bolstered by the large carryover stocks from 1986/87, the IWC said.     It left its estimates of wheat and coarse grain stocks at end&#127;of different marketing years unchanged at 178 and 210 mln tonnes, respectively, against 160 and 167 mln a year earlier.     After record world durum wheat production of 218.8 mln tonnes last season, the IWC said there are already signs of another large crop this coming season with higher output expected in the EC, Canada, the U.S. And North Africa.  \n',grain
'Efforts by governments to control wheat surpluses by cutting support prices have met with only partial success, the International Wheat Council (IWC) says in its latest monthly report.     Faster results could be achieved by a policy of reducing both price and areas, as employed in the United States, the IWC says in a survey of support prices in the five main wheat exporters - Argentina, Australia, Canada, the EC and the U.S.     In some countries, for example Australia and Argentina, which are highly dependent on wheat shipments for export income, there may be problems in reducing production.     A policy of cutting wheat production could lead to unemployment, with job prospects outside agriculture limited. Alternative crops may offer inferior returns which could then lead to lost export revenue and balance of payments problems.     The IWC outlines three courses of action open to governments in wheat exporting countries.     They could continue to support prices in the hope that when the world economy improves demand for wheat will rise and surpluses wil be reduced or eliminated.     Alternatively, support could be limited to wheat which could be easily sold, without needing to be stored for a long period.     This option may prove to be the most politically unattractive and would result in many producers abandoning wheat production, the report said.     The third option would be for governments to distinguish between the commercial and social aspects of agriculture, possibly varying support prices according to farm size or overall production.     The IWC review covers support prices in the major exporting countries since 1982. At some time during that period all the producers cut support prices in response to growing surpluses.     These changes did not always result in lower export subsidies as on several occasions currency fluctuations more than offset lower prices in the domestic currency.     For example between 1985/86 and 1986/87 the EC intervention price for bread wheat fell from 209.30 to 179.44 European currency units (Ecus). It dollar terms, the currency in which most export transactions are denominated, the intervention price however rose to 193 dlrs from 168. The high cost of supporting farm prices has put a strain on national exchequers and some governments are now searching for ways to cut expenditure, the report says.     The proportion of world wheat output produced by the five major exporters declined in the period covered by the survey from 40 pct in 1982 to 35 pct in 1987. This was partly due to increased production in China and India.     The period saw an upward trend in yields, although this was countered in the Argentina, the U.S. And Australia by lower acreages.     In Argentina a reduction in the sown area of about 20 per cent was put down to low prices causing producers to switch to other enterprises, particularly livestock while lower U.S. Acreages are attributed to official incentives.  \n',grain
'The government daily Izvestia said a considerable amount of Soviet winter crops need to be reseeded and the state 1987 grain harvest target of 232 mln tonnes will not be easy to fulfil.     Without giving figures, the newspaper said: \"A considerable part of the winter crops must be reseeded, but that creates extra effort in the fields in spring.\"     The Soviet Union has previously said nine mln hectares of winter grain will have to be reseeded because of winterkill.     A U.S. Department of Agriculture analyst in Washington has said the figure of nine mln hectares would equal about 25 pct of the total winter crop and would be the second highest winterkill in 10 years.     \"The planned task of bringing in no less than 232 mln tonnes of grain is not simple,\" Izvestia said.     This week\'s sudden fall in temperatures has affected large parts of the country and has caused fieldwork to stop in the Ukraine, it said, adding that temperatures fell to as low as minus 30 centigrade in Byelorussia.  \n',grain
'Jamaica has been authorized to purchase about 56,000 tonnes of U.S. wheat under an existing PL 480 agreement, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     It may buy the wheat, valued at 7.0 mln dlrs, between March 25 and August 341 and ship it from U.S. ports and/or Canadian transshipment points by September 30, 1987.  \n',grain
'Jamaica bought U.S. corn, wheat and rice at its tender earlier this week using PL-480 funds, a U.S. Department of Agriculture official said.     The purchase consisted of the following cargoes -  - Cargill sold 1,503.5 tonnes of number two soft red winter (SRW) wheat for May 5/30 shipment at 117.44 dlrs per tonne FOB Gulf ports.  - Continental Grain 8,250 tonnes of number two northern spring/dark northern spring (NS/DNS) wheat (14.5 pct protein) for April 15/May 10 at 123.97 dlrs FOB Gulf, excluding Brownsville.  - Nichemen 10,000 tonnes number two SRW wheat for June 12/July 7 at 103.43 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Nichemen 10,000 tonnes number two NS/DNS wheat (14.0 pct protein) for May 25/June 20 at 121.89 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Cargill 10,000 tonnes number two SRW wheat for April 10/May 5 at 120.88 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Cargill 8,469.5 tonnes number two SRW wheat for May 5/30 at 117.44 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Louis Dreyfus 4,500 tonnes number three yellow corn (15.0 pct maximum moisture) for April 10/May 5 at 76.09 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Louis Dreyfus 5,300 tonnes same corn April 20/May 15 at 75.89 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Louis Dreyfus 5,300 tonnes same corn May 10/June 5 at 75.49 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Louis Dreyfus 5,300 tonnes same corn June 1/25 at 75.49 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Loius Dreyfus 3,700 tonnes number two yellow corn (14.5 pct maximum moisture) for Apirl 10/May 5 at 76.29 dlrs FOB Gulf.  - Louis Dreyfus 3,700 tonnes same corn for May 10/June 5 at 75.68 dlrs FOB Gulf.     Exporters have not received final PL-480 approval on their sale of a total of 9,500 tonnes of U.S. number five or better long grain brown rice (10 pct maximum broken) for April 10/May 25 shipments.     But the USDA official said he saw no hold-up in obtaining that approval.  \n',grain
'Japanese feed and starch makers actively bought U.S. Corn last week, C and F basis, for July/September shipment in view of bullish freight rates following active inquiries by the Soviet Union, trade sources said.     Some said the makers were seen buying some 30 pct of their requirements, estimated at about three mln tonnes for the three-month shipment period.     \"Belief is growing that freight rates will not decline sharply from current high levels even in the usually sluggish summer season because the Soviet Union\'s chartering is seen continuing five to seven months from April,\" one source said.     The sources said Japanese trading houses were seen covering a total of 500,000 tonnes of Chinese corn for shipment in May to October. But they are believed to have not yet sold most of the corn to end-users in anticipation of further corn price rises in the world market.     Supply from Argentina and South Africa for July/September is still uncertain. But the sources forecast supplies from Argentina may fall to 400,000 to 500,000 tonnes from an anticipated 800,000 in calendar 1987 and from South Africa to 700,000 to 800,000 tonnes from an estimated one mln in light of tighter export availability.  \n',grain
'A Japanese real estate company said it will launch a campaign to sell land in U.S. Farming areas to rich Japanese.     Higashi Nippon House said it would offer around 2,200 acres of land in Illinois, California, Florida and Indiana from early April to gauge response. It set up International Farm Corp of America in Chicago last September to oversee the operation.     American farmers would continue as working tenants and part of the profits from harvests of rice, corn, soybean and oranges would go to the Japanese investors as rental.     Japanese Agriculture Ministry officials tolds sales were limited to farmers to keep land in agricultural use.     \"Two years ago, I began to seek my own farmland in Japan,\" said Isao Nakamura, president of Higashi Nippon. \"However, sale of Japanese farmland is strictly controlled by the government, so I began to look for the land in the U.S to make my dream to own farm land come true.\"     Nakamura said hundreds of companies exist in the U.S. To sell farmland to investors as more and more farmers face difficulties due to the recession in U.S. Agriculture.  \n',grain
'Japan should increase foreign access to its farm products market, while encouraging further development of domestic agriculture, a government report said.     The white paper on agriculture for the year ended March 31 said active participation in writing world farm trade rules at the next round of General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) talks will help prepare Japan to improve access.     Agriculture Ministry sources said the paper marked an easing in Japan\'s tough position on agricultural imports which stressed the need for strict controls on some products to maintain self-sufficiency in food.     Japan now produces only 30 pct of its annual grain needs, down from 61 pct some 20 years ago, official figures show.     The paper said Japanese agriculture has been slow to improve productivity and demand/supply imbalances.     The relative shortage of farmland in Japan is mainly responsible for higher domestic prices, it said.     The strong yen has meant lower input material prices but has also resulted in higher agricultural imports which has worsened working conditions among part-time farmers, the paper said.     This could make it difficult to improve the industry\'s structure, the paper said.     To solve these problems and to reduce farm product prices to more reasonable levels, Japan should try to restructure the the agricultural sector to improve productivity and make it self-supporting, it said.  \n',grain
'Jordan has boosted its bids for U.S. soft and hard wheat under Export Bonus, private export sources said.     Jordan today bid 74 dlrs per tonne for soft wheat and 75 dlrs per tonne for hard red winter wheat in its tender for 225,000 tonnes of hard and soft wheat for April through November shipment. Earlier today, USDA rejected its bids of 70 dlrs for both varieties, they said.  \n',grain
'Kampuchea harvested more than two mln tonnes of rice paddy in 1986, up on the crops of the previous two years, the official SPK news agency said yesterday.     Diplomats said estimates put the 1985 harvest at less than one mln tonnes, slightly up on 800,000 in 1984.     SPK said Kampuchea planned to expand planting from 1.5 mln to 1.93 mln hectares and boost rice paddy output to 2.5 mln tonnes this calendar year.     Two mln tonnes of paddy would produce some 1.3 mln tonnes of milled rice, above the 1.25 mln tonnes Kampuchea says is the minimum its 7.5 mln people need.  \n',grain
'The Kansas City Board of Trade, KCBT, has asked federal futures regulators to modify a proposal to raise the Chicago Board of Trade\'s, CBT, speculative position limits on wheat futures contracts, saying the plan would put the the Kansas exchange \"at a serious competitive disadvantage.\"     The Commodity Futures Trading Commission, CFTC, last month proposed raising CBT wheat speculative limits to 1,200 contracts all months net from 600 contracts, and to 900 contracts for any single month from 600 contracts.     At the same time, CFTC proposed leaving KCBT\'s wheat speculative position limits unchanged.     \"Higher limits for CBT wheat than for KCBT wheat would significantly impair the KCBT\'s ability to compete with the CBT for speculative interest,\" Michael Braude, president of the Kansas exchange, said in a letter to CFTC.     A CFTC spokesman said the commission took into account open interest affected by existing speculative limits in proposing to raise CBT\'s limits.     KCBT said the CFTC proposal would reduce hedging efficiency, constrain growth of intermarket spreading and of the exchange\'s wheat options contract and impair its ability to attract large speculators.     The Kansas City exchange asked the commission to amend its proposal to change the limits for KCBT wheat to the exact same bushel amount as specified for CBT wheat.     CFTC will consider public comments on the proposal until June 3.  \n',grain
'Rep. Pat Roberts, R-Kan., predicted the Reagan administration within the next ten days to two weeks will offer subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union under the Export Enhancement Program, EEP.     Roberts made the comment at a press conference held by Republican members of the House Agriculture Committee.     He did not say on what he based the comment, but an aide said Roberts had been in touch with top Republican officials recently.     The possibility of an expansion of EEP to include wheat to Moscow has been rumored for some time, and some industry sources believe a decision on the issue will be made by the Reagan administration before Secretary of State George Shultz goes to Moscow in April.  \n',grain
'The West German Intervention Board said it accepted 962,192 tonnes of grain from the start of the current agricultural year to the end of last month, compared with 1.8 mln tonnes during the July/February period in 1985/86.     It said it accepted 336,097 tonnes of bread wheat (nil in the year-earlier period), 16,818 (nil) tonnes of high quality wheat, 33,623 (523,625) tonnes of feed wheat, 3,426 (168,682) tonnes of rye, 88,494 (32,766) tonnes of high quality rye, 2,313 (105,005) tonnes of summer barley and 481,421 (972,794) tonnes of winter barley.  \n',grain
'Rio Grande/Azores and Leixoes 26,000 mt hss 14 dlrs basis one to two 4,000/1,500 Azores and 3,500 Leixoes 25/4-5/5.     Paranagua/one-two ports Spanish Med 35,000 mt hss 11.50 dlrs basis one to one 10 days all purposes 20-30/4.     USG/Taiwan 54,000 mt hss 10,000 shex/4,000 shex 20/4-5/5.     USG/ARA-Ghent option Seaforth 40,000/45,000 long tons hss 10 days all purposes 9-15/4 try later.     Dieppe/one-two ports Italian Adriatic 9,500/11,000 mt bulk wheat 3,000/2,000 6-12/4.     St Lawrence/one-three ports Marseilles-Manfredonia range 20,000/35,000 mt bulk wheat 5,000/222,500 10-15/4.     Chimbote/Kaohsiung 9,500 mt bulk/bagged fishmeal 250 ph/200 ph 20/4-5/5.     Immingham or Foynes/Red Sea 25,000 mt bulk barley 4,000/3,000 10-15/4 alternatively try t/c.     USG/Maracaibo 10,000 mt wheat (three grades) three days/1,000 1-15/4.  \n',grain
'The Louisiana weekly USDA state crop report said there were 2.4 days suitable for fieldwork.     Soil moisture supplies rated 41 pct adequate and 59 pct surplus.     Winter Wheat - fair to good condition. eight pct headed vs 27 pct a year ago and 17 pct average.     Corn - eight pct planted vs 64 pct a year ago and 51 pct average. two pct emerged vs 45 y/a and 23 avg.     Spring Plowing - seventeen pct completed vs 66 pct a year ago and 48 pct avg.  \n',grain
'The Agriculture Department\'s widening of Louisiana gulf differentials will affect county posted prices for number two yellow corn in ten states, a USDA official said.     All counties in Iowa will be affected, as will counties which use the gulf to price corn in Illinois, Indiana, Tennessee, Kentucky, Missouri, Mississippi, Arkansas, Alabama and Louisiana, said Ron Burgess, Deputy Director of Commodity Operations Division for the USDA.     USDA last night notified the grain industry that effective immediately, all gulf differentials used to price interior corn would be widened on a sliding scale basis of four to eight cts, depending on what the differential is.     USDA\'s action was taken to lower excessively high posted county prices for corn caused by high gulf prices.     \"We\'ve been following this Louisiana gulf situation for a month, and we don\'t think it\'s going to get back in line in any nearby time,\" Burgess said.     Burgess said USDA will probably narrow back the gulf differentials when and if Gulf prices recede. \"If we\'re off the mark now because we\'re too high, wouldn\'t we be as much off the mark if we\'re too low?\" he said.     While forecasting more adjustments if Gulf prices fall, Burgess said no other changes in USDA\'s price system are being planned right now.     \"We don\'t tinker. We don\'t make changes lightly, and we don\'t make changes often,\" he said.  \n',grain
'Rising demand for U.S. rice may gradually reduce surpluses while a marketing loan should help increase the U.S. share of the world rice market despite sluggish trade this year, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its quarterly rice outlook and situation summary, the department said U.S. rice use may surpass production during the 1986/87 marketing year, causing stocks to fall about 10 mln hundredweight from a year earlier to an estimated 67 mln cwt on July 31.     Long grain acreage as a percentage of total acreage is expected to decline this year, the report said.     USDA said factors once supportive of increased long grain acreage have turned around. Domestic prices of medium grain relative to long grain have increased, the loan differential has been greatly reduced and increases in long grain yields relative to those of other classes have leveled off.     With the drop in domestic prices resulting from the marketing loan, domestic rice use is expected to grow at a faster rate, USDA said.     \"Development of new products and increased promotion have helped make rice more available and visible to a wider range of consumers,\" USDA said.     USDA said world trade is expected to fall in 1987 because of large production and stocks but a weaker market should affect competing exporters more than the U.S.     \"The United States has already recovered a substantial share of the European Community market and made inroads into markets in the Middle East and Africa,\" the report said.     World rice consumption is projected to reach record levels in 1986/87, the report said, as higher per capita incomes, increased domestic production and low import prices have allowed people in many countries to substitute rice for coarse grains.     China, India and South Korea have increased output, while the Middle East and Africa have doubled imports since the mid-1970s, the report said.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said he is \"very disappointed\" by a Canadian government finding that U.S. corn has injured Ontario Corn growers.     \"This action is not helpful in the context of the ongoing U.S.-Canada free trade talks or in the new round of multilateral trade negotiations,\" Lyng said in a statement.     The Canadian government today said Ottawa would continue to apply a duty of 84.9 cents per bushel on U.S. corn imports.     Lyng said the U.S. made a case that U.S. corn imports are not the cause of any problem of Canadian corn producers, adding that U.S. corn exports to Canada are declining.     \"Apparently they (Canada) have ignored the fact that Canadian corn and other coarse grain production is rising faster than consumption,\" Lyng said.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng declined to confirm statements made today by a farm state congressman that the United States will offer subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union within the next 10 days to two weeks.     When asked to clarify comments by Rep. Pat Roberts of Kansas that the administration would soon offer Export Enhancement wheat to the Soviet Union Lyng said, \"well it won\'t be today,\" and then added, \"we have no official comment one way or the other.\"     Lyng would not comment on whether a wheat subsidy offer to the USSR is under more active consideration at the USDA, saying that any remarks by him would be tantamount to an official announcement and could be construed inappropriately.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng told representatives of several of the largest grain exporting firms and two farm organizations that he was not in a position to comment on their request that the Reagan administration offer subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union, according to participants in today\'s meeting.     \"He (Lyng) simply told us he was not in any position to talk about an EEP (export enhancement program) initiative to the Soviet Union,\" said Glen Hofer, vice president of the National Council of Farmer Cooperatives.     Another participant in the meeting, who asked not to be identified, said Lyng was \"unresponsive\" to the group\'s request.     Participants in the meeting included Cargill Inc, Continental Grain Co, Louis Dreyfus Corp, Union Equity Cooperative Exchange, the National Association of Wheat Growers, the National Council of Farmer Cooperatives, among others, participants said.     Deputy Agriculture Secretary Peter Myers and Under Secretary Daniel Amstutz also attended the 30-minute meeting.     Hofer described Lyng as \"sympathetic but noncommittal,\" and said he thought he detected \"a sense of frustration\" on Lyng\'s part at not being able to respond more positively to the group\'s urging.     A grain industry representative said some participants were \"puzzled\" by USDA\'s apparent reluctance to bring before the cabinet council an EEP wheat offer to the Soviets.     \"There is a feeling that there is more receptivity (to the idea) within the cabinet council now than there ever has been,\" this official, who asked not to be identified, said, referring to an EEP wheat offer to the Soviets.     This official said there was not a significant amount of pressure being exerted by lawmakers on Lyng to make an EEP offer to Moscow.     Reminded that Senate Agriculture Committee Chairman Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.) had written two letters to Lyng urging such an offer, this official said Lyng had received virtually no phone calls from lawmakers on the subject.     But Hofer said other important matters at the White House, rather than an absence of political pressure, might have restrained Lyng.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said the Reagan administration had not decided on offering the Soviet Union subsidized wheat but that such an offer had not been ruled out.     In an interview withs, Lyng also said that he had no knowledge of any upcoming discussion of the matter within the cabinet.     Asked if the administration had ruled out offering to subsidize wheat exports to the Soviet Union under the department\'s export enhancement program, Lyng said, \"No. We haven\'t made a decision on it, haven\'t even talked about it, haven\'t even looked at it.\"     Reminded that there have been reports that Moscow would buy U.S. wheat if competitively priced, Lyng responded, \"If they (the Soviets) would offer to buy some wheat, would we accept it? It would depend on what price they offered.\"     Lyng added that he did not think the price of U.S. wheat was far off the world price.     Asked about persistent speculation that the administration would offer Moscow a wheat subsidy, Lyng said, \"Some people think they\'re doing it to see if they can get a little spurt in the market.\"     Agriculture Undersecretary Daniel Amstutz last week asked the Commodity Futures Trading Commission to investigate reports that wheat prices were being manipulated by reports that a U.S. wheat subsidy offer was imminent.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said no decisions were taken today at a White House Economic Policy Council meeting.     Speaking to reporters on his return from the meeting, Lyng said only about five minutes of the session dealt with agriculture issues.     \"It was not a decision making meeting,\" Lyng said.     Aides to Lyng earlier said the administration\'s agriculture legislative proposals would be the farm-related topic on the agenda. Lyng would not comment on what farm issues were discussed.     Asked how he would respond to farm groups and Congressmen urging the U.S. to offer a wheat bonus to the Soviet Union, Lyng said he would be listen but be \"non-committal.\"  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said it is too late to implement a full 0/92 acreage provision, or \"decoupling,\" for 1987 grain crops.     \"I think there\'s a chance we\'ll see that legislation (0/92) passed, (but) not for 1987 crops. It\'s too late,\" Lyng told the National Grain and Feed Association convention here.     Lyng added that there seems some support in Congress for 0/92 and there was a good chance a pilot 0/92 program will be passed as part of a pending disaster bill.     But he indicated that it is already too late in the year to alter the 1987 crop program. Sign-up for spring crops closes the end of this month.     Overall, Lyng predicted very little change will be legislated in the 1985 farm bill this year.  \n',grain
'Secretary of Agriculture Richard Lyng will meet with representatives from major grain exporting companies today, and the subject of subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union will likely be discussed, an aide to Lyng said.     Today\'s meeting, set to begin at 1500 EST (2000 gmt), was scheduled at the request of the exporters, the aide said.     \"The EEP (export enhancement program) is pretty obviously one of the things they (the exporters) want to talk about, but they haven\'t any agenda as far as I know,\" Lyng\'s aide said.     Private industry export officials have met periodically with Lyng to discuss farm policies and the export situation. Whether this meeting will prompt any U.S. action on the issue of whether Moscow will be offered export bonus wheat is uncertain, the aide said.     \"I don\'t know what they\'ll tell us that we don\'t already knwo, but we\'ll hear what they have to say,\" Lyng\'s aide said.     The USDA official said that as far as he knows there has been no further action on offering the Soviet Union wheat under the EEP.  \n',grain
'Madagascar\'s vital rice crop is estimated at 2,286,000 tonnes of paddy this year, up from 2,138,000 in 1986, the Ministry of Agriculture said.     The Trade Ministry said rice imports quadrupled in local currency value during the first nine months of last year as the government established a buffer stock of the country\'s staple food.     Rice imports increased to 82.4 billion Malagasy francs during the first nine months of last year from 20 billion in the same period of 1985, the ministry said, without disclosing the tonnages involved.  \n',grain
'Seven major U.S. farm groups took the unusual step of releasing a joint statement urging congressional leaders not to tinker with existing farm law.     Following meetings with House Agriculture Committee Chairman Kika de la Garza (D-Tex.) and Senate Agriculture Committee Chairman Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.), the groups issued a statement saying lawmakers should \"resist efforts to overhaul the 15-month-old law, which is operating in its first crop marketing year.\"     The farm groups included the American Farm Bureau Federation, American Soybean Association, National Cattlemen\'s Association, National Corn Growers Association, National Cotton Council, National Pork Producers Council and the U.S. Rice Producers Legislative Group.     The statement said Congress should not modify the 1985 farm bill \"so the law might have its intended impact of making agriculture more competitive in export markets while at the same time maintaining farm income.\"     \"We strongly believe American farmers now need predictability and certainty in farm legislation in order to have any opportunity of making proper production and marketing decisions,\" the groups said.  \n',grain
'Grain analysts said the increase of three mln tonnes in 1986/87 Soviet grain imports is unlikely to affect the market Tuesday.     They said the market already has discounted higher Soviet imports, partly on news last month that the Soviet Union bought one mln tonnes of U.S. corn, and on rumors that the Reagan administration is pushing for authority to sell the Soviets U.S. wheat under the Export Enhancement Program.     In its supply-demand report, the USDA raised its estimate for 1986/87 Soviet grain imports to 26 mln tonnes from 23 mln.     \"That was business already done, for all practical purposes,\" said Drexel Burnham analyst Dale Gustafson, reflecting similar statements made by other analysts.  \n',grain
'The staff of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, CFTC, recommended that the regulatory agency approve the Minneapolis Grain Exchange\'s application to trade high fructose corn syrup-55, HFCS-55, futures contracts.     The commission is expected to approve the application at a meeting tomorrow.     The proposed contract would provide for the delivery of 48,000 lbs, plus or minus two pct, of bulk HFCS-55, a liquid food and beverage sweetener produced through processed corn starch by corn refiners.     Under proposed rules, a shipping certificate has a limited life, as it expires 30 days following the last day of trading of the expiring contract month. A premium charge of 14.40 dlrs per contract per day would be assessed under the proposal.  \n',grain
'Cash grain dealers reported slow country movement of corn and soybeans across the Midwest, with even corn sales from PIK-and-roll activity seen earlier this week drying up.     Some dealers said the USDA may further adjust the posted county price at the Gulf to take into account high barge freight rates as a way to keep corn sales flowing, but added the current plan probably will be given a few weeks to see if it will work as hoped.     Corn and soybean basis values continued to drop on the Illinois and MidMississippi River due to the strong barge freight rates. Toledo and Chicago elevators were finishing loading the first corn boats of the new shipping season, supporting spot basis values at those terminal points.   \n',grain
'Heavy rains fell again in Argentina\'s main grain growing areas in the week to yesterday, trade sources said.     Rains fell heaviest early in the week, and in particularly high volume in Buenos Aires province, Cordoba, La Pampa and Santa Fe provinces.     Rainfall totalled between 20 and 290 mm in Buenos Aires, heaviest in western sectors of the province, 20 to 145 mm in La Pampa, 25 to 120 mm in Cordoba, and 10 to 75 mm in Santa Fe. Rainfall was lighter in other provinces.     Rainfall totalled from five to 50 mm in Corrientes, five to 31 mm in San Luis, five to 30 mm in Entre Rios, three to 20 mm in Misiones, 11 to 17 mm in Formosa and one to eight mm in Chaco.     Growers said it was still too early to tell whether the rains had damaged crops, though they said maize and sunflower crops may have suffered.     Harvesting of both those crops and sorghum was paralysed by the bad weather. For harvesting to resume as normal, the rains would have to stop long enough for the soil to dry and allow farm machinery to operate.     The rains caused flooding in western and northwestern Buenos Aires, as more than 750 mm have fallen in some areas there since February 23 while the annual average is 1,200 mm.     Flooded areas total between 1.2 and 1.5 mln hectares, Buenos Aires province governor Alejandro Armendariz said after flying over the flooded area.     Agriculture Secretary Ernesto Figueras said only 500,000 hectares of the area now flooded had been planted, and that 200,000 to 300,000 hectares could be lost. Growers said large parts of the flooded areas were not planted because they are low-lying and flood easily.     Trade sources said it was certain crops were damaged by the heavy rains but it was too early to tell the exact extent of the damage. They said it was likely rain combined with high winds uprooted many sunflower and maize plants.     The sunflower harvest moved forward in the centre and south of Cordoba and Santa Fe and got underway in a few isolated areas of northern Buenos Aires. Growers have harvested between 15 and 18 pct of total planted area, up from seven to nine pct a week ago.     Estimates of the total volume of the sunflower crop were revised downward in light of the bad weather.     Estimates for total crop ranged from 2.3 to 2.6 mln tonnes, down from 2.4 to 2.7 mln tonnes estimated last week and down 34.1 to 41.5 pct from last year\'s record harvest of 4.1 mln tonnes.     Maize harvesting also advanced, reaching between 13 and 15 pct of total planted area compared to seven to nine pct a week ago. The maize harvest is expected to total between 10 and 10.2 mln tonnes, down from the 10 to 10.4 mln tonnes estimated a week ago.     Last year\'s maize harvest totalled 12.8 mln tonnes, according to official figures.     Soybean production estimates were revised downward, to 7.8 to 8.2 mln tonnes compared to estimates of eight to 8.4 mln tonnes a week ago. Last year\'s soybean harvest totalled 7.1 mln tonnes, according to official figures.     Sorghum harvesting moved slowly forward, reaching between four and six pct of total planted area, compared to two to four pct a week ago.     Sorghum production estimates remained steady at 3.2 to 3.5 mln tonnes, down 16.7 to 22 pct from the 4.1 to 4.2 mln tonnes produced in the last harvest.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation has approved an additional 45.0 mln dlrs under its interemdiate export credit guarantee program, GSM-103, for sales of U.S. wheat to Morocco, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The action increases Morocco\'s cumulative fiscal year 1987 program for wheat under GSM-103 to 75.0 mln dlrs.     The credit terms extended for exports under the program must be in excess of three years but no more than seven years to eligible for credit coverage. All sales under this line must be registered and exported by September 30, 1987.     The department also said the guarantee line for sales of U.S. wheat under the Export Credit Guarantee Program, GSM-102, has been decreased 45.0 mln dlrs to 60.0 mln.  \n',grain
'Whether the Soviet Union will fulfill its buying obligations under the U.S./USSR grains agreement depends entirely on the United States, a Soviet trade official tolds.     \"How can I tell that we are ready to fulfill the agreement if the United States does not want to offer us grain at competitive prices?\" said Albert Melnikov, deputy trade representative of the Soviet Union to the United States.     \"We are in the market for grains, but it is up to the United States to be the seller ... to offer Soviets competitive prices,\" he said in an interview.     Melnikov said that the United States has not lived up the agreement by failing to make available to Moscow U.S. grain at prevailing market prices.     \"We are being accused of not implementing this agreement. We do not consider we are at fault,\" Melnikov said.     Article I in the agreement states that \"purchases/sales of commodities under this Agreement will be made at the market price prevailing for these products at the time of purchase/sale and in accordance with normal commercial terms.\"     \"The United States should supply to the Soviet Union definite quantities of grain at competitive prices ... Is the United States ready to supply this?\" he said.     The Soviet official said that near-term corn demand has been met by the recent Soviet purchases of U.S. corn, which he confirmed at 1.5 mln tonnes, but said that if U.S. corn prices remain competitive, the Soviets will buy more if they need it.     Wheat buying, however, is a different story, Melnikov said.     \"If the United States is interested in selling its wheat, then they must offer competitive prices, and it\'s up to the United States to decide how these competitive prices will be offered,\" he said.     Last year\'s U.S. offer of subsidized wheat to the Soviets was rejected because of an insufficient subsidy, Melnikov said. He said that at the time of the 13 dlr per tonne subsidy offer, U.S. wheat prices were 26 dlrs over world levels.  \n',grain
'More generic grain certificates should be released onto the market in order for the U.S. certificate program to have its full effect on commodities, according to a study by Sparks Commodities Inc.     The Agriculture Department should make grain deficiency payments and paid land diversion payments in a two-third certificate, one-third cash ratio through fiscal year 1989,  Carroll Brunthaver, president of Sparks Commodities, told a House agriculture subcommittee hearing on certificates.     Thereafter, government payments should be issued in roughly a 50-50 split between cash and certificates, Brunthaver said.     The Sparks study on certificates examined two possible scenarios through the 1990 growing season -- a \"zero certificate case,\" where no certificate program was assumed, and an alternative case labeled \"adequate certificate case\" in which sufficient certificates would be released so that grain prices would not be artificially supported by market shortages due to acreage reduction programs or government holdings.     The study showed that total grain use under the adequate certificate scenario would exceed the zero certificate scenario by 11.2 pct.     Usage would be markedly more in 1989 and 1990, when grain usage under a certificate program was estimated to exceed the zero certificate case by 15 to 19 pct.     For the five-year period examined, government expenditures under the adequate certificate case were 7.0 billion dlrs, or 7.5 pct less than under the zero certificate case.     The Sparks study said that 5.1 billion dlrs, or 70 pct of those savings resulted from smaller government storage costs.     The study also estimated that government grain stocks under the adequate certificate case would be 4.7 billion bushels below the zero certificate case at the end of the period examined.     The Sparks study said that while certificates permit market prices to fall below loan levels, these lower prices increase commodity usage and reduce the net costs of certificates versus cash.  \n',grain
'Morocco will tender Thursday for 120,000 to 210,000 tonnes of U.S. wheat, cheapest variety preferred, for May and June shipments under PL 480, private export sources said.     The tender will consist of three lots of up to 70,000 tonnes each for shipment May 1-30, May 10-June 10, and May 25-June 25, they said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department reported the farmer-owned reserve national five-day average price through February 25 as follows (Dlrs/Bu-Sorghum Cwt) -          Natl   Loan           Release   Call          Avge   Rate-X  Level    Price  Price  Wheat   2.55   2.40       IV     4.65     --                             V     4.65     --                            VI     4.45     --  Corn    1.35   1.92       IV     3.15   3.15                             V     3.25     --  X - 1986 Rates.            Natl   Loan          Release   Call           Avge   Rate-X  Level   Price  Price  Oats     1.24   0.99        V    1.65    --   Barley   n.a.   1.56       IV    2.55   2.55                              V    2.65    --   Sorghum  2.34   3.25-Y     IV    5.36   5.36                              V    5.54    --      Reserves I, II and III have matured. Level IV reflects grain entered after Oct 6, 1981 for feedgrain and after July 23, 1981 for wheat. Level V wheat/barley after 5/14/82, corn/sorghum after 7/1/82. Level VI covers wheat entered after January 19, 1984.  X-1986 rates. Y-dlrs per CWT (100 lbs). n.a.-not available.  \n',grain
'U.S. exporters will have the opportunity to sell an additional 300,000 tonnes of U.S. durum wheat to Algeria under the Export Enhancement Program, EEP, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the sales will be subsidized with commodities from the Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, inventory and the subsidy will enable U.S. exports to compete at commercial prices in the Algerian market.     Algeria has already purchased 300,000 tonnes of U.S. durum wheat under a previous export enhancement initiative announced November 10, 1986, it said.     Details of the latest initiative, including an invitation for offers from exporters, will be issued in the near future, the department said.  \n',grain
'New Zealand may need about 100,000 tonnes of wheat this year, which would normally come from Australia, but may be from the United States, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its report on Export Markets for U.S. Grains, the department said with the deregulation of the New Zealand Wheat Board, which normally imports wheat from Australia, there is the possibility of wheat purchases from the united states since the shipping cost between New Zealand and the Eastern Coast of Australia and the West Coast of the United States are about equal.  \n',grain
'There were no shipments of U.S. grain or soybeans to the Soviet Union in the week ended March 19, according to the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s latest Export Sales report.      The USSR has purchased 2.40 mln tonnes of U.S. corn for delivery in the fourth year of the U.S.-USSR grain agreement.      Total shipments in the third year of the U.S.-USSR grains agreement, which ended September 30, amounted to 152,600 tonnes of wheat, 6,808,100 tonnes of corn and 1,518,700 tonnes of soybeans.  \n',grain
'There were no shipments of U.S. grain or soybeans to the Soviet Union in the week ended March 12, according to the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s latest Export Sales report.      The USSR has purchased 1.0 mln tonnes of U.S. corn for delivery in the fourth year of the U.S.-USSR grain agreement.      Total shipments in the third year of the U.S.-USSR grains agreement, which ended September 30, amounted to 152,600 tonnes of wheat, 6,808,100 tonnes of corn and 1,518,700 tonnes of soybeans.     Shipments to the USSR in the second year of the agreeement amounted to 2,887,200 tonnes of wheat and 15,750,100 tonnes of corn.      \n',grain
'Western agricultural attaches in Moscow said they had no evidence to substantiate rumours that last April\'s Chernobyl nuclear disaster had a worse effect on Soviet grain than first reported.     Current Soviet interest in chartering ships to carry grain from the U.S. Helped prompt the rumours on world markets. But the diplomats said they had seen no reports in the state press and heard no comments from officials to substantiate them.     The official media was initially slow in reporting the accident but, under Kremlin leader Mikhail Gorbachev\'s campaign for openness, gradually gave more and more details.     Land around the nuclear plant was contaminated to varying degrees. Some is now being used to grow industrial crops instead of grain.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng does not intend to discuss a wheat export enhancement initiative to the Soviet Union at a cabinet-level Economic Policy Council meeting set for tomorrow, an aide to Lyng said.     \"He (Lyng) does not intend to bring it up,\" the aide said, adding that the subsidy offer remains \"dormant.\"     Lyng plans to spend \"about five minutes\" reviewing the status of farm legislation on Capitol Hill before the Economic Policy Council, which is responsible for guiding the administration\'s economic policy, the aide said.     The USDA secretary met this morning with members of the House Foreign Affairs Committee, but the handful of lawmakers present did not ask whether the administration intended to offer Moscow a wheat export bonus, the aide said.  \n',grain
'A greater than anticipated need, competitive prices and political motivations could be sparking Soviet interest in U.S. corn, industry and government officials said.     As rumors circulated through grain markets today that the Soviet Union has purchased an additional 1.5 mln tonnes of U.S. corn, industry and government sources noted a number of factors that make Soviet buying of U.S. corn likely.     First, there are supply concerns. Some trade sources said recent speculation has been that last year\'s Soviet grain crop be revised to only 190 mln tonnes, rather than the 210 mln announced, therby increasing the Soviet need for grain.     A drop in Argentine corn crop prospects could also affect Soviet corn buying, an Agriculture Department source said.     Dry weather in Argentina -- a major corn supplier to the USSR -- and reported crop problems prompted USDA to lower its Argentine 1986/87 corn crop estimate this week to 11.0 mln tonnes, down from 11.5 mln. Argentina corn exports were also cut by 500,000 tonnes to 6.8 mln tonnes.     Argentina has already committed four mln tonnes of this year\'s corn for export, a USDA official said, with two mln tonnes of that booked for April-June delivery to the USSR.     \"Significant downside potential\" still exists for the Argentine crop, the official said, which will decrease the amount of additional corn that country can sell to Moscow.     \"If the Soviet needs are greater than we have been thinking, then they might need more than what Argentina can provide during the April to June period,\" he said.     Current competitive prices for U.S. corn have also sparked Soviet buying.     U.S. corn was reported to be selling on the world market earlier this week for around 71 dlrs per tonne, Argentine corn for 67 dlrs -- a very competitive price spread, U.S. and Soviet sources said.     \"This price difference makes American corn competitive,\" Albert Melnikov, commercial counselor for the Soviet Union, tolds.     Impending crop problems in Argentina will likely cause those prices to rise, and with the recently strong U.S. corn futures prices, the Soviets might feel corn prices have bottomed and that this is a good time to buy, sources said.     Finally, some industry sources said that by buying the minimum amount of corn guaranteed under the U.S./USSR grains agreement (four mln tonnes), the Soviet Union may be hoping to convince the USDA to offer Moscow a subsidy on wheat.     In an inteview withs this week, USDA secretary Richard Lyng said that no decision had been made on a wheat subsidy offer, but that such an offer had not been ruled out.  \n',grain
'The results of a controversial study of farm subsidies conducted by the Paris-based Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development, OECD, show Japan has the highest agriculture subsidies in the world, and that dairy farmers benefit more than any other commodity producers from subsidies.     Results of the study, which has not been released by OECD because of objections from some countries, were provided tos by officials of several countries on condition they not be identified.     The OECD study calculates the level of farm subsidies for the years 1979-81 using a new measure called the producer subsidy equivalent, PSE.     The study shows that on dairy products Japan\'s PSE, or the amount of aid to farmers expressed as a percentage, averaged 83.3 pct over 1979-81, with the European Community at 68.8 pct and the United States 48.2 pct.     For wheat Japan\'s PSE averaged 95.8 pct, the EC 28.1 and the U.S. 17.2. Japan\'s rice PSE was 68.8 pct compared to the EC 13.6 and the U.S. 5.4 pct, the OECD calculations show.     In coarse grains, Japan\'s subsidies reached 107.1 pct compared with 27.9 pct for the EC and 13.1 pct for the U.S. Japan\'s beef subsidy was 54.9 pct versus 52.7 pct for the EC and 9.5 pct for the U.S., OECD concluded.     For sugar, Japan\'s PSE was 48.4 pct versus 27.9 pct in the EC and 13.1 pct for the U.S., the study shows.     The OECD calculated farm subsidies for other industrial countries such as Canada, Australia and New Zealand but in most cases the results were much lower than for the U.S., EC and Japan, the sources said.     Subsidies in Argentina and Brazil, two major developing country producers of commodities, were not included in the OECD work.     Officials said they hope to persuade reluctant countries to release the study soon, perhaps coinciding with the OECD ministerial meeting in Paris during May.     Some officials hope the OECD results will be used as a  basis for negotiations during the Uruguay round of global trade talks now underway in Geneva.     British Agriculture Minister Michael Jopling during a visit to Washington this week endorsed the OECD work as a starting point for the Uruguay round negotiations on agriculture.     He said the PSE calculations provide a tool to negotiate down domestic farm support levels, which are a major cause of the present crisis in world agriculture.     However, the OECD study results are controversial because they highlight the levels of assistance to farmers, officials familiar with the study said.     The U.S. Agriculture Department\'s Economic Research Service recently published a study of farm subsidies in an attempt to verify the OECD results and update them to 1982-84.     In some cases the results were substantially different than the OECD\'s, in part because farm policies in both the U.S. and elsewhere had changed markedly by 1982-84 from the OECD base period of 1979-81, U.S. officials said.     For example, the USDA study found the United States subsidies to corn producers were higher in 1982-84, at 25 to 49 pct, than in the EC, at zero to nine pct.     French Maize Producers Association president Marcel Cazale, citing the result of the USDA calculation for corn, told reporters last week that the United States subsidizes its farmers more than the EC.     However, the sources said EC corn subsidies are probably higher than the U.S. now because of increases since 1984.     Officials of several countries have been asked to contribute data to OECD so that the study can be updated to 1985 subsidy levels, a much more relevant measure of the current world farm situation.     The updated calculations, which may take several months to complete, are expected to show substantial increases in U.S. subsidy levels for sugar because the U.S. imposed restrictive import quotas in 1982 as aid to the domestic industry.     U.S. subsidy levels also are increased by the 1985 farm bill, which sharply boosted government deficiency payments to grain farmers and applied a marketing loan for rice, officials added.  \n',grain
'The government\'s industry aid and protection review body, the Industries Assistance Commission (IAC), will hold a 12-month inquiry into the Australian wheat industry, Primary Industry Minister John Kerin said.     The IAC has been asked to report on the need for assistance to the industry and the nature, duration and extent of any aid, he said in a statement.     He said the inquiry will be the first step in setting marketing arrangements to apply after June 30, 1989, when the underwriting and pricing provisions of the 1984 Wheat Marketing Act expire.     Kerin said the broad-ranging reference would allow a full examination of all aspects of the wheat-marketing system.     \"The inquiry will be required to take into account changes which have taken place in the industry as a result of the agricultural policies of major wheat producing countries and the industry\'s capacity to adjust to any recommended changes,\" he said.     \"The inquiry is at an important time for the wheat industry, as the substantial fall in world prices is likely to trigger underwriting support from the government for the first time,\" he said.     Kerin was referring to the government\'s underwriting of the guaranteed minimum price paid to wheatgrowers by the Australian Wheat Board near the start of the season.     The IAC\'s report will be due at the same time as the findings of the current Royal Commission into Grain Storage, Handling and Transport, Kerin said.     He said the timing of the IAC inquiry would allow its findings and those of the Royal Commission to be considered in later negotiations on wheat-marketing arrangements between the federal and state governments and the industry.  \n',grain
'The Oklahoma weekly USDA crop report said cold weather slowed crop development and caused some cattle deaths.     Wheat growth was halted by cold weather, and rain early in the week prevented fertilizer application and weed spraying. Fields in the west were short of nitrogen, and moderate insect activity was noted in the southwest region.     Wheat condition was rated 15 pct fair, 84 pct good and one pct excellent.     Row crop activity was very slow amid wet conditions. Topsoil moisture was rated 30 pct adequate and 70 pct surplus, and subsoil moisture was rated 100 pct adequate. Only two days were suitable for fieldwork.  \n',grain
'One offer but no bid was posted for SRW wheat on the call session at the St Louis Merchants Exchange today. There were no bids or offers for milo.     June 15-July 15 bill of lading for wheat was offered at 17 over July, no comparison, no bid.  \n',grain
'The Panamanian bulk carrier Juvena is still aground outside Tartous, Syria, despite discharging 6,400 tons of its 39,000-ton cargo of wheat, and water has entered the engine-room due to a crack in the vessel bottom, Lloyds Shipping Intelligence Service said.     The Juvena, 53,351 tonnes dw, ran aground outside Tartous port basin breakwater on February 25 in heavy weather and rough seas.  \n',grain
'The EC Commission rejected all bids for free market bread-making and feed wheat and all bids for the special West German tender at today\'s weekly EC cereals tender, trade sources said here.     It granted export licences for 123,000 tonnes of free market barley at a maximum rebate of 138.75 Ecus per tonne and 25,000 tonnes of maize at a maximum rebate of 133.75 Ecus, they said.     Licences for 100,000 tonnes of the barley were awarded to French trade houses, they added.  \n',grain
'The United States has signed a Public Law 480 agreement with Honduras to provide for the sale of 12.0 mln dlrs worth of U.S. agricultural commodities, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The agreement, signed March 11, provides for the sale of about 75,000 tonnes of wheat/wheat flour worth 8.5 mln dlrs, 15,000 tonnes of corn/sorghum worth 1.5 mln dlrs and 6,000 tonnes of tallow worth 2.0 mln dlrs, the department said.     The commodities will be supplied in the current fiscal year, ending September 30, and sales will be by private U.S. traders on a competitive bid basis.     Purchase authorizations will be announced as issued.  \n',grain
'A Portuguese court has made a preliminary ruling that the state grain buying agency EPAC should not be allowed to take part in public import tenders open to private importers, grain traders and officials said.     Under the terms of Portugal\'s January 1986 accession to the European Community, EC, a grain import monopoly held by EPAC (Empresa Publica de Abastecimento de Cereais) is being reduced by 20 pct annually until all imports are liberalised in 1990.     Private traders protested last year that EPAC was being permitted to take part in tenders open to them for the first liberalised 20 pct share of the country\'s annual import needs. The grain and oilseed importers association ACICO opened legal proceedings to stop EPAC participating in the public tenders.     Miguel Ascensao of ACICO tolds that Lisbon\'s civil court, in a preliminary ruling, had decided EPAC should not be allowed to take part in tenders open to private traders.     Trade sources said the ruling, though effective immediately, was subject to appeal and would have to be confirmed in further proceedings.     A member of the government Cereals Market Commission said that, as a result of the court\'s decision, the Commission would not be able to accept offers from EPAC in a public tender being held today for the import of 80,000 tonnes of corn.     Ascensao said the court ruling stated that EPAC\'s participation in the public tenders violated the clauses of Portugal\'s EC accession treaty dealing with the gradual dismantling of the state agency\'s import monopoly.     It also said the participation of EPAC, which still controls the national grain storage and distribution network, was unfair competition to the private traders.     Traders said they believed the EC\'s Executive Commission was unlikely to get involved in the dispute, preferring to leave the case to be resolved as an internal Portuguese issue.     \"They (the EC Commission) will be keeping a low profile,\" one trader said.     ACICO says it is ready to take its case to Brussels if necessary.  \n',grain
'Portugal may have purchased a 30,000 tonne cargo at its tender today for up to 43,000 tonnes of number two yellow corn (14.5 pct maximum moisture) for arrival by April 30, shipment via Gulf ports, U.S. exporters said.  \n',grain
'Portugal\'s Agriculture Minister Alvaro Barreto said he disagreed with a court order barring the state grain buying agency EPAC from taking part in cereals import tenders open to private traders.     Barreto told reporters his aim was to have EPAC readmitted to the tenders.     Under the terms of Portugal\'s January 1986 accession to the European Community (EC), a grain import monopoly held by EPAC (Empresa Publica de Abastecimento de Cereais) is being reduced by 20 pct annually until all imports are liberalised in 1990.     Following legal proceedings by private importers, Lisbon\'s civil court decided in a preliminary ruling earlier this month that EPAC should not be allowed to take part, as it had done, in tenders for the liberalised share of annual grain imports.     As a result of this ruling, EPAC was excluded from a March 12 tender for the import of 80,000 tonnes of maize.     Barreto said, \"My objective is put EPAC into the tenders because it has a right to take part.\" He added the government would be studying the court order to see whether or not the ruling could stop EPAC from participating in future tenders.     Barreto said there was no reason to exclude any operator, whether public or private, from the tenders. Private traders had argued that EPAC, given its dominant position in the Portuguese grain market, had an unfair advantage over them.     \"There is no reason to make EPAC a martyr of the system,\" Barreto said. He said the EC\'s executive commission had accepted the government\'s view that EPAC should be eligible.     The Lisbon court ruling stated that EPAC\'s participation in the public tenders was unfair competition and violated the clauses of Portugal\'s EC accession treaty dealing with the gradual dismantling of the state agency\'s import monopoly.  \n',grain
'A ban by a Portuguese court on the state buying agency EPAC taking part in cereals import tenders open to private traders will remain unless it is reversed in Portugal or challenged in the European Court of Justice, European Commission sources said.     They denied a statement yesterday by Portuguese Agriculture Minister Alvaro Barreto that the commission had accepted that EPAC should be eligible, saying it had taken no view in the matter.     Under the terms of Portugal\'s accession to the European Community, a grain import monopoly held by EPAC is being reduced by 20 pct annually until all imports are liberalised in 1990.     Lisbon\'s civil court decided in a preliminary ruling earlier this month that EPAC should not be allowed to take part, as it had done in the past, in tenders for the liberalised share of annual grain imports.  \n',grain
'Rain over wide areas has raised the prospect of good food crops throughout Ethiopia, which suffered a disastrous drought and famine two years ago.     Aweke Aynalem, head of the government\'s Agriculture Development Department, told reporters prospects were good for attaining the target of 250,000 tonnes of grain in the present growing season, one of two each year in Ethiopia.     Normal crop production in Ethiopia is about 648,000 tonnes a year, of which 250,000 tonnes are produced from the \"belg\" (small) rains which fall at this time of year.     The belg rains are used to plant quick-maturing crops like maize and barley. Any shortfall during this period affects production in the main rainy season, because farmers eat their stocks of seed.     Aweke said peasants in Wello, Tigre and Hararghe -- regions which suffered severely from drought -- were now able to sow their crops because of the favourable rains.     The government had distributed large quantities of seed and fertiliser, and the rains should ensure a good crop.  \n',grain
'The volume of contracts traded on the New Zealand Futures Exchange (NZFE) reached a record 25,559 contracts in February, the International Commodities Clearing House (ICCH) said.     The previous high was 22,583 contracts in December 1986.     The ICCH said the value of the contracts traded in February was 2.90 billion N.Z. Dlrs.     The seven contracts currently traded on the NZFE are: five-year government bonds, the share price index, 90-day bank bills, 90-day prime commercial paper, the U.S. Dollar, crossbred wool, and wheat.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department\'s report on Export Markets for U.S. Grain, scheudled for release today, has been delayed until Wednesday, April 1, a department spokeswoman said.     No reason was given for the delay in releasing the monthly report.  \n',grain
'Results were awaited on Egypt\'s tender today for 200,000 tonnes of U.S. soft or white wheat for April shipment under PL 480, private export sources said.  \n',grain
'Rice and corn farmers will receive the largest payments from the U.S. government during 1987 if the subsidies are calculated per planted acre, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     USDA said government outlays to rice farmers in 1987 are expected to reach 403 dlrs per acre planted, followed by corn at 135 dlrs per planted acre. Government outlays include mainly deficiency payments and price support loans.     On a per acre basis, cotton payments will reach 73.24 dlrs in 1987, wheat 60.30 dlrs, sorghum 54.38 dlrs, barley 27.41 dlrs and oats 2.31 dlrs, USDA said.     USDA estimates farm subsidies will reach 25.3 billion dlrs in 1987. The figures were given by USDA officials at a Senate Agriculture Appropriations hearing yesterday.  \n',grain
'Graan Elevator Mij said its balance in port of grains, oilseeds and derivatives rose to 136,000 tonnes on March 7 from 31,000 a week earlier, after arrivals of 523,000 tonnes and discharges of 418,000 tonnes last week.     The balance comprised 38,000 tonnes of grains and oilseeds and 98,000 tonnes of derivatives.     This week\'s estimated arrivals total 194,000 tonnes, of which 45,000 are grains/oilseeds and 149,000 derivatives.     The figures cover around 95 pct of Rotterdam traffic in the products concerned.  \n',grain
'Grain handling at Rotterdam port\'s main grain terminal was at a standstill today as members of the largest Dutch transport union FNV staged a lightning strike for the third day running.     Pieter van der Vorm, managing director of Graan Elevator Mij (GEM), which handles 95 pct of grain passing through the port, said their main Europoort terminal was out of action because of a strike by technical staff.     The actions, in support of union demands in negotiations over a new labour agreement, began on Wednesday when grain handlers stopped work.     Van der Vorm said that if strikes continued on today\'s scale for some time vessels coming to unload grain in Rotterdam would face delays, but this was not happening yet.     Wednesday\'s actions left GEM\'s facilities 40 pct operational, and there were only limited strikes yesterday.     Talks between unions and employers yesterday and today produced no result, but FNV spokesman Bert Duim said the union was prepared to put their key demand, for a 36 hour working week, at the bottom of the agenda.     Van der Vorm said, however, the union\'s demands on a range of issues were far in excess of the management\'s final offer.  \n',grain
'The Senate voted unanimously to seek an expedited U.S. probe of Canadian tariffs on corn imports to determine if the United States should retaliate.     By 99 to 0, the Senate went on record against the 84.9 cents per bushel tariff approved by the Canadian Import Tribunal.     The non binding measure asked for a probe by the U.S. Trade Representative to determine within 30 days whether the tariff violates the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, and if so recommend within 60 days to President Reagan retaliatory action against Canada.  \n',grain
'Secretary of State George Shultz has decided not to oppose any U.S. wheat subsidy offer to the Soviet Union and has left the final decision on whether to sell subsidized wheat to Moscow up to President Reagan and the Agriculture Department, a State Department official said.     \"Shultz feels like he fought the battle against a subsidy last summer, and he\'s not going to the mat again. It\'s now basically the USDA who has to make their decisions as to what they want to do,\" the official said.     If USDA decides to go ahead with a subsidy offer to the Soviet Union, he said, \"Shultz will not wage a vigorous campaign against it. He might not come out in favor of it, but he won\'t go to the President and voice his objections.\"     In an official statement clarifying Shultz\'s remarks yesterday to leaders of the National Association of Wheat Growers, the State Department said, \"Secretary Shultz expressed his belief that whenever possible, U.S. grain should be competitive on world markets, including the Soviet Union.     The Agriculture Department is in the best position to determine whether consideration should be given at this time to extending to the Soviets a subsidy under the Export Enhancement Program.\"     Although Shultz will not oppose a wheat subsidy to the Soviets, there remain obstacles to another subsidy offer to Moscow, the State Department official said.     \"Everyone in the government agrees that if there is a subsidy to be offered, we would not offer it unless we had a firm commitment from the Soviets that they would buy.\"     USDA does not want a repetition of last summer when the USSR baulked at its offer of four mln tonnes of subsidized wheat, the official, who asked not to be identified, said.     The Soviets rejected the U.S. offer then on the grounds that the 13 dlr per tonne subsidy was insufficient to bring U.S. prices down to competitive levels.     The Soviets want a higher subsidy offer this time, the State Department source said.     \"What the Soviets want is something equivalent to the lowest price being paid by anyone in the world,\" he said.     The Soviets argue that they are the best customer of the U.S. and that they are entitled to the best price, he said.     Government and commodity sources also said there are elements in the USDA, most notably undersecretary Daniel Amstutz, who remain opposed to a wheat subsidy to the Soviets.     \"Subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union is still not a foregone conclusion,\" the State Department official said.  \n',grain
'Asked what the U.S. State Department\'s policy is on offering subsidized wheat to Moscow, Secretary of State George Shultz told a group of farm leaders that U.S. products must be competitive in the world market.     \"If we are going to sell our products, whatever they may be, wheat or anything else, then we have to meet the market,\" Shultz told the board of directors for the National Association of Wheat Growers.     \"We have to be competitive. It\'s ridiculous to say that somebody is going to buy your product if they can get the same thing at a lower price somewhere else. They just aren\'t,\" he said.     \"That is our approach in the negotiations with the Soviets, and it must be our approach as we look at the American farm program and try to figure out what we should do to make it better,\" Shultz told the Wheat Growers.     Schultz said that while he does not favor a situation that would allow the Soviet housewife to buy food cheaper than the American housewife, he realizes the importance of American agricultural products being competitively priced.     Speculation has been in the market for some time that the United States is considering offering wheat to the Soviet Union at subsidized prices.     Soviet officials have said they would buy U.S. wheat if it were competitively priced. Agriculture Department officials have declined to take any official position on the issue.  \n',grain
'The Sichuan government has ordered that any work or meeting which interferes with the fight against drought must be cancelled or postponed to save time, energy and manpower, the People\'s Daily domestic edition said.     Sichuan is one of six provinces threatened by drought.     Wen Wei Po, a Hong Kong daily, said the drought, the worst for more than 20 years, is affecting nearly two mln hectares in 100 counties in Sichuan, the country\'s biggest agricultural producer.     Sichuan has experienced temperatures three degrees Centigrade higher than normal and rainfall up to 70 pct less than normal since early February, affecting wheat, oil-bearing crops, rice planting and dryland cash crops, it said.     The paper said 43,000 hectares in Meixian county in Guangdong are seriously short of water.     The People\'s Daily said Henan, Shaanxi, Gansu and Hebei are also suffering from drought.     Henan\'s grain output fell by 2.5 mln tonnes last year from the 1985 level because of drought which has been affecting the province since May.  \n',grain
'A total of 2,435 tonnes of British intervention feed wheat were sold at today\'s tender for the home market out of requests for 3,435 tonnes, the Home Grown Cereals Authority, HGCA, said.     Price details were not reported.     No bids were submitted for intervention barley.  \n',grain
'Despite earlier optimistic indications, the South African corn crop is at a critical stage in its development and recent reports of heat stress could reduce production and therefore exportable supplies, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its report on Export Markets for U.S. Grains, the department said South Africa\'s corn exports in the 1986/87 (Oct-Sept) season are estimated at 2.5 mln tonnes, up 40 pct from the previous year.     The re-emergence of South Africa as a competitor follows a period of severe droughts, which at one point required South Africa to import 2.7 mln tones of U.S. corn in 1983/84, it said.     Since those imports in 1983/84, the U.S. has been facing increased competition from South Africa in Taiwan and Japan.     But if South Africa is perceived as lacking available supplies, purchases of U.S. corn may be further stimulated, the department said.  \n',grain
'The South African government\'s maize production estimate of 7.8 mln tonnes for the current year is \"rather too conservative,\" leading grain and produce merchants Kahn and Kahn Pty Ltd said.     The company, in a detailed report, estimated the harvest as high as 8.3 mln tonnes and said if this forecast is met the ostensible surplus for export will be approximately 2.25 mln tonnes.     \"This paradoxically is creating a problem for the Maize Board,\" Kahn and Kahn said.     It said the maize export price currently is depressed and the board is \"probably confronted with the necessity to maintain or slightly increase the internal price of maize again...To offset the ostensible loss which must be faced\" on exporting surplus amounts.  \n',grain
'The heaviest rains for seven months are believed to have saved more than one mln hectares of drought-threatened crops in southeast China, the official New China News Agency said.     This week\'s rains have alleviated drought conditions in Guangdong Province, the agency said.     China has warned that this year\'s harvest will be affected by drought in many areas.  \n',grain
'Posted county prices in 99 southern Texas counties have been changed to reflect only one market differential instead of the usual two-terminal market pricing system, a senior Agriculture Department official said.     Interior grain and soybean prices in the affected counties will now be based solely against the Texas Gulf. Prior to the change, county prices were also priced against the Amarillo market.     The changes were made to better reflect local market conditions, said Ralph Klopfenstein, deputy administrator for commodity operations at USDA.     \"The Texas Gulf has always been the dominant market in those counties. Amarillo never became effective for that area,\" Klopfenstein tolds.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Communist Party has criticised the country\'s Grain Products Ministry for failing to ensure proper grain storage, turning out poor quality bread and for unsatisfactory book keeping, Pravda said.     The party daily said that losses in the industry owing to waste and theft amounted to 7.3 mln roubles over the last two and a half years.     The situation was particularly bad in the Central Asian republic of Kazakhstan, which has been severely criticised since the ousting of its veteran leader Dinmukhamed Kunayev last December.     Its new leader, Gennady Kolbin, has said that at times the grain-growing republic has performed so badly that it has been obliged to seek grain supplies from national reserves.     Tass news agency announced yesterday that Grain Products Minister Grigory Zolotukhin, 75, was being retired and replaced by Alexander Budyka, a senior food industry official.     Pravda added today that the crisis in the industry had been drawn to Zolotukhin\'s attention and two of his deputies reprimanded.  \n',grain
'Soviet winter grains could be off to a faulty start this spring after enduring an usually dry fall and cold winter, weather and crop analysts said.     Prospects for another near-record grain harvest in the Soviet Union appear dim at this point, but it is premature to forecast any major crop problems, analysts said.     But the situation bears careful watching over the next six weeks and will ultimately impact the Soviet grain supply and future buying plans, analysts of the Soviet Union said.     \"From a weather standpoint, you can say with certainty that the Soviets are not getting off to a good start and will have a lower crop (than last year),\" Gail Martell, chief meteorologist for E.F. Hutton said.     The next six weeks in the USSR\'s grain growing areas will be the crucial period that will determine the final outcome of the winter crops, Martell and other analysts said.     \"Where the crop is really made or broken is still ahead of us,\" an Agriculture Department authority on the USSR said.     The Soviet Union recently reported that nine mln hectares of winter grain will have to be reseeded due to winterkill. This would be equal to about 25 pct of the total winter crop and would be the second highest winterkill in ten years, the USDA analyst said.     With a timely spring, Soviet farmers would probably be able to reseed the damaged acreage with spring crops, but analysts noted that spring crops normally yield lower than winter crops -- sometimes as much as 30-35 pct lower.     Normally winterkill is caused by inadequate snowcover combined with cold temperatures. This winter, however, snowcover in Soviet grain areas has generally been excellent, so the bulk of winterkill, analysts speculate, likely has been due to a very dry fall and subsequent poor crop germination.     \"Fall dryness may be a problem. There\'s a good correlation between mediocre crops and fall dryness,\" Martell said.     Precipitation last fall was as little as 25 pct of normal in southern and northern Ukraine, and below normal over the entire winter crop area, she said.     Recent cold temperatures in grain areas in which the snowcover has been gradually melting could also have caused  problems of ice-crusting and winterkill, Jim Candor, senior forecaster for Accu Weather, said.     Livestock feed needs have probably increased because of the fall and winter, analysts said. The dry fall damaged pastures, the cold winter raised feed demands and a late spring would require longer off-pasture feeding, they said.     \"The Soviets are not in a desperate situation ... they don\'t have to buy (grains) now,\" a USDA official said.     But if the Soviets are worried about their winter crops and if they feel that last year\'s huge crop of 210 mln tonnes was a one-time fluke brought on by perfect conditions, more Soviet buying might occur to insure crop supplies, he said.     Bad weather during the next six weeks could push the Soviets back into the market, weather analysts said.     \"A lot of winterkill could occur during the next month and a half,\" Martell said.  \n',grain
'Current interest by Soviet charterers in taking Panamax vessels on timecharter, mainly from the U.S. To carry grain, is seen as the chief factor behind the recent surge in values on the Baltic International Freight Futures Exchange (BIFFEX), dealers said.     Futures soared through the 1,000 points barrier today for the first time in the spot position since the market opened in May 1985. However, the market tends to be nervous, with values some 100 points above the Baltic Freight Index, which is calculated on spot physical rates.     No specific figure has been put for Soviet bookings but they have been sufficient to drain Panamax tonnage (about 50,000 to 65,000 tonnes dw) from the U.S. Gulf which would normally operate on the trip to Japan, dealers said.     \"It appears that the Chernobyl disaster had a worse effect on its (the Soviet) grain harvest than reported,\" one said.     Freight rates on the Gulf/Japan grain route have subsequently been the main beneficiary of current chartering conditions, with very few, if any, Panamax sized ships left for the remainder of this month in the Gulf. Rates have risen steadily for vessels loading next month.     Dealers said there is even talk that owners are considering taking older vessels out of lay-up to meet current demand.     Sentiment has also been aided by suggestions that Chinese operators may be in the market for similar timecharter business later in the year, they said.     They anticipate this would appear around June and it has prompted keen demand in the July BIFFEX contract, despite it normally being a slack time in the shipping year.     Market sentiment has fluctuated in recent weeks. Rates turned down as an earlier rise in bunker prices, which had supported the market at the start of the year, faltered but then recovered on the reported Soviet interest.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union featured prominently in U.K. Grain exports outside the EC for the period July 1/March 13, taking a combined total of 1.10 mln tonnes of wheat and barley out of all-destination U.K. Exports of 7.16 mln tonnes, the Home Grown Cereals Authority said, quoting provisional Customs and Excise figures.     The Soviet total comprises 634,000 tonnes of wheat and 472,000 tonnes of barley. Grain traders said the figures understate shipments already made by several thousand tonnes and they expect total U.K. Grain exports to the USSR this season to reach 2.5 mln tonnes, comprising 1.5 mln wheat/1.0 mln barley.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union is rumored this morning to have bought up to 1.5 mln tonnes of U.S. corn, export trade sources said.     The amount was not confirmed, but the talk was widespread through the trade. Gulf cash barge basis levels jumped two to three cents this morning on the rumors, which were expected to boost futures prices on today\'s open.     The Soviet Union recently bought over 1.0 mln tonnes of U.S. corn, ostensibly as a conciliatory gesture ahead of trade talks with U.S. agriculture officials.     Purchases rumored today were seen as a positive factor in light of a Soviet trade official\'s statement that the previous purchase had satisfied near-term needs.  \n',grain
'The intensive technology concept for grain production has put a new floor under USSR grain production, the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s officer in Moscow said in a field report.     The report, quoting a broadcast on Radio Moscow, said that due to intensive technology grain production in a \"bad year\" will not fall below 200 mln tonnes, and in a \"good year\" grain production could reach 250 mln tonnes.     The U.S. Agriculture Department currently forecasts this year\'s USSR crop at 210.1 mln tonnes, and if realized this would be the third year since 1975 that the Soviet Union\'s grain harvest has exceeded 200.0 mln tonnes.     The largest crop since 1975 was 237.4 mln tonnes harvested in 1978, according to USDA data.  \n',grain
'Spain will shortly sign with Saudi Arabia an order for barley for April/May delivery, trade sources said.     They gave no details on amounts or prices, but said it would be a \"major\" order.     Saudi Arabia bought 500,000 tonnes of Spanish barley last year.  \n',grain
'Sri Lanka has appealed to 24 countries for emergency aid to help 2.4 mln villagers affected by the country\'s worst drought in 36 years, government officials said.     Embassies received letters over the weekend outlining aid needed for a sixth of Sri Lanka\'s population in 13 districts.     The letter said the government had to step in \"to avert serious economic hardship\" and because the Social Services Ministry had already used up its entire 1987 budget provision of 23 mln rupees by distributing help to the worst hit areas.     The letter said 548.76 mln rupees were needed for a six month period, at least until the May-September (Yala) rice crop was harvested. Over 25,000 tonnes of wheat, rice, flour and other cereals were required, it said, along with supplies of sugar, lentils, dried or canned fish and milk.     In some of the most seriously affected districts, the Maha (October 1986-April 1987) crop had been \"almost completely devastated,\" the letter said. Maha paddy output was now estimated at 70 mln bushels, 20 mln less than originally expected.     There were two scenarios for the Yala crop, with a high forecast of around 40 mln bushels conditional on adequate rainfall within the next three to four weeks.     \"Should the present drought continue, however, production is estimated at around 20 mln bushels,\" the letter added.     Total estimated paddy output for 1987 would be between 90 and 110 mln bushels, or 1.35 to 1.65 mln tonnes of rice. Last year\'s output was 124 mln bushels, down from 127 mln in 1985.     The letter said villagers in most seriously affected districts had been deprived of any means of subsistence because subsidiary crops had also failed.     It said the government\'s current budget did not permit it to provide sustained and adequate relief to those affected. \"Revenue has been adversely affected by depressed commodity prices and slowing of the economy. Defence commitments continue to exert pressure on the expenditure side.\"     The 548.76 mln cash would cover payments of 150 rupees per month for each family, as well as handling, transport and distribution of emergency food. But such an outlay of funds by the government would not be possible without seriously impairing development projects, or \"greatly fuelling inflation\" in the economy, the letter said.     The letter said the Food Department would be able to release wheat and rice from the buffer stock to meet the immediate cereal requirements \"provided such stocks are replaced subsequently.\"     The Meteorological Department said the country was experiencing its worst drought since 1951 and the four-month dry spell prevailing in most of the areas would only break when the monsoon rains fell in late May.     The letter said some areas had been experiencing the drought since August, and in the rice growing district of Kurunegala there had been no effective rainfall since June 1986.  \n',grain
'Sri lanka will tender overnight for 52,500 tonnes of U.S., Canadian and/or Australian wheats for April 8/16 shipment, under the Export Enhancement Program if U.S. origin, U.S. exporters said.  \n',grain
'Authorizations to purchase 50 mln dlrs worth of U.S. wheat and wheat flour under Public Law 480 were issued to Sudan today, the Agriculture Department said.     The authorization provides for 34 mln dlrs -- about 309,000 tonnes -- worth of wheat, grade U.S. number two or better (except durum which shall be number three or better).     It also provides for 16 mln dlrs -- about 73,000 tonnes -- worth of wheat flour.     The contracting period for both commodities is March 20 through August 31, 1987. The delivery period for wheat is March 20 through September 30, 1987 and for wheat flour is April 10 through SEptember 30, 1987, USDA said.  \n',grain
'The joint committee of Taiwan\'s maize importers awarded contracts to five U.S. Companies for seven shipments totalling 340,000 tonnes of maize for delivery between September 1 and December 20, a committee official said.     United Grain Corp of Oregon won two contracts for the supply of 110,000 tonnes, priced between 92.44 and 96.00 dlrs per tonne, for September 1-15 and November 5-20 delivery.     Cargill Inc of Minnesota also took two shipments totalling 110,000 tonnes, priced between 93.45 and 94.65 dlrs per tonne, for October 1-15 and December 5-20 delivery.     ADM Export Co of Minnesota received a 54,000 tonne cargo, at 93.75 dlrs per tonne, for November 1-15 delivery.     Cigra Inc of Chicago won a contract to supply 33,000 tonnes, at 96.89 dlrs per tonne, for November 25-December 10 delivery.     Elders Grain Inc of Kansas took a 33,000 tonne shipment, at 96.06 dlrs per tonne, for December 1-15 delivery.     All shipments are c and f Taiwan.  \n',grain
'Taiwan overnight bought 450,000 tonnes of U.S. number two corn, 14.5 pct moisture, for Gulf and West Coast shipment in 11 cargoes between May and October, private export sources said.     Gulf shipment ranged in prices from 75.17 to 78.45 dlrs per tonne stowed and trimmed, FOB euqivalent, and West Coast shipments ranged from 79.41 to 81.02 dlrs per tonne, stowed and trimmed, FOB equivalent, they said.  \n',grain
'The joint committee of Taiwan\'s maize importers awarded contracts to five U.S. Companies to supply a total of 462,000 tonnes of maize for delivery between May 10 and October 10, a committee spokesman said.     Cigra Inc won a contract for a cargo of 56,000 tonnes, priced at 79.41 U.S. Dlrs per tonne fob pacific northwest port, for delivery on July 5 and 20.     Continental Grain Co of New York received three shipments, totalling 143,000 tonnes, price ranging from 90.95 to 95.75 U.S. Dlrs per tonne c and f Taiwan for delivery between May 10 and October 10.     Cargill Inc of Minnesota took two shipments, totalling 83,000 tonnes priced between 92.00 and 92.93 U.S. Dlrs per tonne c and f Taiwan for September 5-20/September 10-25 delivery. United Grain Corp of Oregon won three contracts to supply 93,000 tonnes priced from 92.32 to 93.19 U.S. Dlrs per tonne c and f Taiwan for delivery between May 10 and July 30.     Garnac Grain Co Inc of New Jersey received two shipments, totalling 87,000 tonnes at 88.90 to 92.29 U.S dlrs c and f Taiwan for delivery between July 10 and August 10.  \n',grain
'The joint committee of Taiwan\'s maize importers has awarded contracts to two U.S. Companies to supply two shipments of maize, totalling 60,000 tonnes, a committee spokesman tolds.     Continental Grain Co of New York received the first 30,000 tonne cargo contract, priced at 93.86 U.S. Dlrs per tonne, while Peavey Co of Minneapolis won the second shipment, also 30,000 tonnes, at 93.36 dlrs per tonne.     Both shipments are c and f Taiwan and are set before March 16, the spokesman said.  \n',grain
'Taiwan passed on its tender overnight for 25,000 tonnes of U.S. corn and 49,000 tonnes U.S. sorghum, private export sources said.     Taiwan will retender for the corn, for May 15-30 shipment if via the Gulf, or June 1-15 via Pacific northwest, on March 6, but has not rescheduled a tender for sorghum, they said.  \n',grain
'The Taiwan Flour Mills Association will import 81,000 tonnes of wheat from Canada in calendar 1987, unchanged from the 1986 level, an association spokesman tolds.     He said the total will be delivered in three shipments. The first will be shipped to Taiwan between March 20 and April 20 and the other two will be made later this year, he said.     The total wheat import target this year has been set at 700,000 tonnes, down from actual imports of 758,770 last year.     Most of Taiwan\'s wheat imports come from the U.S., The spokesman said.  \n',grain
'Taiwan will tender Thursday, March 26, for a total of 356,000 tonnes of U.S. number two yellow corn (14.5 pct moisture) for various Sept/Dec shipments via Gulf or Pacific Northwest ports, U.S. exporters said.  \n',grain
'Taiwan is scheduled to tender tonight for 450,000 to 475,000 tonnes U.S. corn, export sources said.     The tender calls for 11 cargoes for delivery from April through October with early shipments FOB or Pacific Northwest, they said.  \n',grain
'Taiwan\'s maize import commitments are expected to rise to 970,000 tonnes in the first four months of 1987 from 870,000 tonnes a year earlier, a spokesman for the Joint Committee of Maize Importers tolds.     He said more than 75 pct of the imports come from the U.S. And the rest from South Africa.     The maize import target for calendar 1987 is set at well over 3.4 mln tonnes compared with an actual 3.07 mln in 1985, he added.  \n',grain
'Tanzania seeks to export a surplus of 200,000 tonnes of maize from last year\'s bumper harvest, agriculture minister Paul Bomani said yesterday.     The 1986 maize crop was officially estimated at 2.1 mln tonnes, but only a fraction of this was marketed, with most grain consumed by the farmers who grew it.     The state-owned National Milling Corp (NMC) meanwhile said it is trying to sell 190,742 tonnes of maize stored in different parts of the country.     NMC acting general manager John Rubibira said Tanzania has only 56,000 tonnes of silo storage capacity, concentrated in Dar es Salaam, Arusha in the north and Iringa in central Tanzania.     In addition, the country has 450,000 tonnes of flat storage capacity, he added.     Rubibira said the government is planning to build new silos in the main maize producing areas of Iringa, Mbeya, Ruvuma and Rukwa.  \n',grain
'The Texas weekly USDA state crop report said stormy winter weather limited fieldwork before conditions improved later in the week.     A snowstorm caused some cattle deaths in the Panhandle, and cold, wet weather covered many areas. Windy weather followed to dry fields and limit planting delays.     Small grains made good progress despite cool temperatures which slowed growth. Additional moisture was needed in some areas. Many fields were booting and some were beginning to head. Wheat was rated 16 pct fair, 56 pct good and 28 pct excellent.     Corn and sorghum planting progressed, and land preparation was ahead of schedule in the Plains despite snowy weather. Cotton planting progressed in the Lower Valley.  \n',grain
'Thailand exported 75,160 tonnes of rice in the week ended March 31, down from 88,785 tonnes the previous week, the Commerce Ministry said.     It said the government and private exporters shipped 36,552 and 38,608 tonnes respectively.     Private exporters concluded advance weekly sales for 22,086 tonnes against 44,483 tonnes the previous week.     Thailand exported 1.23 mln tonnes of rice in January/March, down from 1.29 mln tonnes a year ago. It has commitments to export another 381,171 tonnes this year.  \n',grain
'Thailand exported 84,960 tonnes of rice in the week ended February 24, up from 80,498 the previous week, the Commerce Ministry said.     It said government and private exporters shipped 27,510 and 57,450 tonnes respectively.     Private exporters concluded advance weekly sales for 79,448 tonnes against 79,014 the previous week.     Thailand exported 689,038 tonnes of rice between the beginning of January and February 24, up from 556,874 tonnes during the same period last year. It has commitments to export another 658,999 tonnes this year.  \n',grain
'Thailand\'s main paddy crop is expected to fall to 15.4 mln tonnes in the 1986/87 (Nov/Oct) season from a previous 15.68 mln estimate in November and an actual 17.35 mln a year ago, the Thai Rice Mills Association said.     It said a joint field survey late last month by the association, the Commerce Ministry and the Bank of Thailand indicated that paddy output in Thailand\'s northeast region is lower than expected because of a drought in several provinces.     The association said rice growing areas in Nakhon Ratchasima, Chaiyaphum, Khon Kaen and Mahasarakam were especially affected by low rainfalls in the second half of 1986.     It said last November that the drought reduced total national areas sown with paddy to some 8.25 mln hectares this year, down from 8.84 mln a year ago.     The main crop represents about 85 pct of Thailand\'s paddy output.  \n',grain
'Torrential rains throughout Argentina\'s grain-producing areas virtually paralysed coarse grain harvesting in the week to yesterday, trade sources said.     Sunflower, maize and sorghum harvests were particularly affected, they said. But the rains proved to be a great aid to soybean crops as their harvesting will not begin until April or May.     The rains did no damage to maize, sunflower and sorghum crops though fresh rains in similar volume could reduce yields and cut the total volume of this year\'s harvest.     Rainfall measured between 15 and 270 mm in Buenos Aires, with the heaviest rains in the province\'s western sectors, between 15 and 100 mm in Cordoba, 15 and 120 mm in La Pampa, 10 and 75 mm in Santa Fe, 10 and 60 mm in Entre Rios, five and 40 mm in Misiones, and five and 50 mm in San Luis.     No rain was recorded in Corrientes, Chaco and Formosa.     Growers did not revise their estimates for total volume of the coarse grain harvest over last week\'s estimates.     Maize harvesting continued moving forward in central Santa Fe, though slowly. Growers had harvested seven to nine pct of total planted area, compared to five to seven pct last week.     Total maize area planted for the 1986/87 harvest was estimated at between 3.58 and 3.78 mln hectares, or two to seven pct less than the 3.85 mln hectares planted in the 1985/86 harvest.     Maize production is expected to total between 10.4 and 11 mln tonnes, or a drop of 17.5 to 19.4 pct over the 12.4 to 12.6 mln tonnes harvested last year according to private estimates, or 18.9 to 21.9 pct lower than last year\'s volume, according to official figures.     The sunflower harvest advanced to between seven and nine pct of total planted area.     Two to 2.2 mln hectares have been planted with sunflowers for this harvest, down 29.9 to 36.3 pct from last year\'s figure of 3.14 mln hectares.     Sunflower production is expected to total between 2.4 mln and 2.7 mln tonnes, which would mean a drop of between 34.1 and 41.5 pct against the record 4.1 mln tonnes harvested in the 1985/86 harvest.     Grain sorghum harvesting inched forward to between two and four pct of total planted area, which this harvest is 1.23 to 1.30 mln hectares or 10.3 to 15.2 pct less than the 1.45 mln hectares planted in the 1985/86 harvest.     Sorghum production is expected to total between 3.2 mln and 3.5 mln tonnes, or 16.7 to 22 pct less than the 4.1 to 4.2 million tonnes harvested in 1985/86.     Soybean production, by contrast, is expected to hit a record 8.0 to 8.4 mln tonnes, which would mean an increase of 11.1 to 15.1 pct over last year\'s record figure of 7.2 to 7.3 mln tonnes, according to private estimates. Official figures put last year\'s soybean harvest at 7.1 mln tonnes.     Soybean crops were reported to be in generally very good condition, helped by abundant rains and high temperatures.     Total soybean-planted area for the 1986/87 harvest is expected to be a record 3.7 to 3.8 mln hectares, up 10.8 to 13.8 pct from last year\'s harvest figure of 3.34 mln hectares.  \n',grain
'The European Community (EC) cereals trade lobby organisation Coceral said it has written to EC Farm Commissioner Frans Andriessen to propose a new system for sales into intervention, which it claims could save the EC budget money.     It proposes that applications for intervention be made through a certificate valid for execution three months later. If during the three months the trader found a market elsewhere, he could buy back the certificate on payment of a one pct premium.     Coceral argues that this would restore the original function of intervention as a safety net and would end the present situation in which produce is often sold into intervention as a precaution.  \n',grain
'The EC Commission granted 25,000 tonnes of free market barley export licences at today\'s tender and 80,000 tonnes of French maize, grain traders said.     The maximum export rebate for barley was set at 137.25 Ecus and for maize at 129.75 Ecus per tonne.     All bids for wheat were rejected, they said.  \n',grain
'French operators last Friday requested licences to export 10,500 tonnes of free market maize, 11,950 tonnes of free market barley and 13,000 of soft wheat flour to non-EC countries, at prefixed daily (droit commun) rebates, French trade sources said.     The latest requests for the maize were for export to Switzerland, Austria and Lichtenstein at a maximum daily rebate prefixed last Friday at 141 Ecus a tonne against a previous 20 Ecu daily rebate.     The special daily rebate for maize was set in the context of a Commission commitment to grant this season rebates for the export of 500,000 tonnes of French maize to non-EC countries, in compensation for concessions to the U.S. in the recent dispute over grain sales to Spain.     If the latest French requests are accepted as expected, this will bring the total of French maize exported in this context to 25,500 tonnes.     The Commission last Thursday granted weekly rebates for the sale of 15,000 tonnes of free market maize to non-EC countries.     Requests for barley were for export to Switzerland, Austria and Lichtenstein, Ceuta and Melilla at an unchanged pre-fixed restitution of 125 Ecus a tonne, while requests for soft wheat flour were for export to various non-EC countries at an unchanged 178 Ecus a tonne.  \n',grain
'The European Commission authorised the export of 33,500 tonnes of Irish intervention barley at today\'s tender for non-European Community destinations at 53.10 Ecus per tonne, grain traders said.  \n',grain
'Grain trade analysts expect a sharp drop in corn acreage, with most expecting a more modest decline in soybeans, in the U.S. Agriculture Department, USDA, plantings intentions report due out at 1500 est (2100 gmt).     The average trade guess for 1987 planted corn acreage was 66.06 mln acres, ranging from 60.7 to 69.0 mln, all well below the 76.67 mln planted last year due to improved incentives by the USDA for farmers to retire acres. Corn acres totalled only 60.22 mln in 1983, when the PIK program was introduced.     The average soybean planted acreage quesstimate was 59.49 mln, ranging from 58.0 to 63.0 mln and compared with the 61.48 mln planted in 1986     With substantial grain stocks, less interest was expressed among analysts in the USDA stocks report also scheduled today.  \n',grain
'Tunisia is expected to tender shortly for 100,000 tonnes of soft wheat for shipment between April and June, covered by COFACE export credits, trade sources said.     Over 300,000 tonnes of French soft wheat have been sold to Tunisia since the beginning of the 1986/87 campaign, of which 225,000 to 250,000 tonnes have already been shipped, they said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said Turkey has been made eligible for the sale of up to 70,000 tonnes of medium grain milled rice under the department\'s export enhancement program, EEP.     As with the 65 previous EEP initiatives, the export sales would be subsidized with commodities from the inventory of the Commodity Credit Corp and made at competitive world prices, USDA said.  \n',grain
'Three London markets which trade potato, soymeal and meat futures said they will merge to form a new Agricultural Futures Exchange.     Legal advisers have been instructed to implement the amalgamation of the London Potato Futures Association, LPFA, the London Meat Futures Exchange, LMFE, and the Grain and Feed Trade Association\'s, GAFTA, Soya Bean Meal Futures Association, SOMFA. No timetable was given.     Members of the three exchanges have been consulted, Agricultural Futures Exchange secretary Bill Englebright tolds, and no objections have been raised to the merger.     Three markets are involved at present but the new exchange could ultimately combine five markets.     Discussions are taking place with the Baltic International Freight Futures Exchange, BIFFEX, and the GAFTA London Grain Futures Market is considering the possibility of joining the other markets, market officials said.     The BIFFEX board is expected to reach a decision on the merger at its meeting at the end of this month, after members are consulted at a meeting on March 16.     The grain futures market also intends to consult its members soon, GAFTA director general James Mackie said.     The aim of the amalgamation is to limit regulatory and administrative costs and achieve the recognition required under the 1986 Financial Services Act. This legislation requires a futures market to become a Recognised Investment Exchange, RIE, for trading to continue.     Representatives of all the futures markets on the Baltic Exchange have been discussing the possibility of a single RIE structure since the beginning of the year.     The new exchange now planned will apply to the Securities and Investments Board for recognition as an RIE \"at the appropriate time,\" the Agricultural Futures Exchange said.     \"This commitment by the markets will enable progress to be made to develop a stronger and more effective exchange to the benefit of all those involved in the industry,\" the chairman of the formation committee, Pat Elmer, said.     The merged markets will remain at the Baltic Exchange.  \n',grain
'The U.K. Exported 517,600 tonnes of wheat and 315,800 tonnes of barley in the first 25 days of March, the Home Grown Cereals Authority (HGCA) said, quoting provisional Customs and Excise figures.     This brought combined wheat and barley exports since the season started on July 1 to 7.60 mln tonnes, substantially up on the 4.02 mln exported in the same 1985/86 period.     This season\'s total comprises 3.94 mln tonnes of wheat and 3.66 mln barley, compared with 1.63 mln and 2.39 mln, respectively, a year ago.  \n',grain
'A total of 14,685 tonnes of British intervention feed wheat were sold at today\'s tender for the home market, the Home Grown Cereals Authority said.     Bids amounted to 19,115 tonnes against offerings of 31,528. Prices paid were at, or above, the prevailing intervention feed wheat price of 120.71 stg per tonne.     Grain traders said a large part of the tonnage on offer was in stores, which would mean high transport costs to deficient areas. The European Commission recently made available 70,000 tonnes for next week\'s tender.  \n',grain
'The U.K. Exported 612,000 tonnes of wheat and 498,800 tonnes of barley in February, the Home Grown Cereals Authority (HGCA) said.     Based on the previous provisional figures issued for February, wheat exports were increased by 480,200 tonnes and barley by 283,800 tonnes.     The new figures bring cumulative wheat exports for the period July 1-March 13 to 3.66 mln tonnes and barley to 3.50 mln, compared with 1.47 and 2.09 mln tonnes respectively last season.  \n',grain
'Britain and Australia have offered a total of 129,250 tonnes of wheat to Bangladesh as grants to contain rising cereal prices and help support rural employment projects, officials said.     They said 79,250 tonnes of wheat promised by Britain would be shipped next week and used for the government\'s \"Food for Work\" program in the villages.     Under the program, workers building roads, digging irrigation canals and engaged in other rural development activities get their daily wages in wheat instead of money.     The 50,000 tonnes of Australian wheat would arrive in Bangladesh next month and be sold under open-market operations designed to stop price increases, the officials said.     Prices of rice and wheat have risen at least 15 pct in the past month, market sources said. But the government expects prices to fall after the wheat harvest next month.  \n',grain
'The Reagan administration\'s cabinet-level Economic Policy Council is scheduled to meet Friday to discuss, among other issues, the status of agricultural legislation, administration officials said.     The officials said discussion of a U.S. Agriculture Department wheat export subsidy to the Soviet Union was not on the agenda. Matters not on the agenda, however, can be brought before the council, the officials said.     Grain trade officials have speculated that USDA would make a wheat export enhancement offer to Moscow, but USDA officials have said the matter is not under active consideration.     USDA today transmitted to Congress a package of legislative proposals, including bills that would cut target prices and speed up loan rate reductions.  \n',grain
'The Senate Agriculture Committee is expected to take up a bill tomorrow that would exempt from government conservation regulations those farmers who have rotated alfalfa and other multiyear grasses and legumes with row crops, committee staff said.     Under current so-called \"sodbuster\" law, farmers who planted alfalfa and other multiyear grasses and legumes on highly erodible land in the years 1981 through 1985 lose federal farm program benefits if they produce a row crop on that land in later years.     Sen. Edward Zorinsky (D-Neb.), sponsor of the measure, said recently that those crop rotating practices resulted in less erosion than the practices of many farmers who produced strictly row crops.  \n',grain
'Grain traders and analysts look for a 10 to 12 mln acre sign-up in the USDA\'s conservation reserve program, scheduled to be announced after 1400 CST today.     The USDA probably will accept about 80 to 90 pct of the acres submitted, they said.     Total enrollment in the first three years of the program is only 8.9 mln acres, so the sharp increase expected this year has underpinned new crop corn futures all week.     However, some analysts said a 10 to 12 mln acre sign-up may end up being negative to new crop corn prices, citing trade talk earlier this year that 14 to 15 mln acres may be submitted by farmers. Also, acres set-aside under the conservation program are by definition poor yielding, so the impact on total corn production will be minimal, they added.  \n',grain
'U.S. corn acreage this year is  likely to drop to the lowest level since the unsurpassed acreage reductions of the 1983 PIK year and could rank as one of the lowest corn plantings in the United States in sixty years, Agriculture Department officials said.     USDA releases its official plantings report on March 31. Agriculture Department analysts said next week\'s figures will likely show a sharp drop in acreage to as low as 65 mln acres, down 22 pct from last year\'s plantings of 83.3 mln acres.     Assuming an 18 mln acre drop in plantings, U.S. corn production will also decrease significantly. Analysts said 1987 corn production could drop by over one billion bushels to around seven billion bushels.     Expected signup of up to 90 pct in the 1987 feed grains program, along with 1.9 mln acres enrolled in the conservation program, will cause acreage to plummet, Department feedgrain analysts said.     \"There\'s no question that there will be a sharp decrease in corn acreage,\" one said. \"It\'s difficult for any farmer to not go along with the program this year.\"     Soybean acreage is also expected to decline this year but at a much slower rate of around four pct, USDA analysts said.     Soybean plantings could drop to 59 mln acres or below, they said, compared to last year\'s level of 61.5 mln acres.     If analysts\' unofficial estimates prove correct then the drop in u.s. corn acreage will be the largest since 1983 when farmers idled 22 mln acres in the Payment-In-Kind program.     Farmers planted only around 60 mln acres of corn in 1983. A severe drought that summer in major producing states caused yields to tumble and final crop production to total only 4.2 billion bushels.     Given normal weather conditions this year, USDA analysts said the 1987 corn crop could end up around seven billion bushels, down from last year\'s crop of 8.3 billion bushels.     \"This kind of acreage reduction will mean a significant reduction in production,\" an analyst said.     A crop of seven billion bushels is close to the annual U.S. corn usage, so surplus stocks, while not decreasing, would not increase significantly, a specialist said.     High producing corn belt states are expected to show the greatest acreage reductions, based upon historical participation in government programs, analysts said.     In contrast, soybean acreage is likely to be cut the most in marginal producing areas of the southeast and the western corn belt, a USDA soybean analyst said.     \"Soybean acreage in the eastern corn belt will not budge,\" he said. Neither does he expect any significant acreage cuts in higher-producing delta areas.     Soybean production could drop fractionally from last year\'s 2.0 billion bushels to 1.8 to 1.9 billion, he said.     U.S. soybean acreage, after soaring to 71.4 mln acres in 1979 from only 52 mln acres five years prior to that, has steadily declined in the 1980\'s.     U.S. corn acreage, with the exception of 1983, has been in the low to mid 80-mln acre range for the past 10 years. The highest corn plantings reported in the 60 years that USDA has kept such records was in 1932 when farmers planted 113 mln acres and obtained average yields of 26.5 bushels per acre.     Last year U.S. farmers obtained record corn yields averaging 119.3 bushels per acre.     \"We have absolutely no trouble producing an eight billion bushel crop on only 80 mln acres or so,\" an analyst said.     Corn acreage will probably level at around 65 mln acres as long as government program provisions remain the same, analysts said.     Currently farmers enrolling in the program are required to set aside 20 pct of their base acreage and then are eligible for payments of two dlrs per bushel by idling an additional 15 pct of their acreage.     \"To get to the PIK level of 60 mln acres, we would have to provide more incentives,\" an analyst said.  \n',grain
'The recent purchase of 1.5 mln tonnes of U.S. corn by Japan and 600,000 tonnes by South Korea suggests that the two countries\' demand for reliable supplies of corn is increasing, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its World Production and Trade Report, the department said that view is reinforced by the expectation of a decline in exportable supplies of Argentine corn and uncertainty over the availability of South African and Chinese corn.     With these corn purchases, Japan is committed to buying 7.7 mln tonnes of U.S. corn in 1986/87 (Sept-Aug), nearly 400,000 tonnes greater than year-ago figures to date.     South Korea\'s cumulative commitments amount to 2.5 mln tonnes, up 1.5 mln compared to last year, it said.  \n',grain
'Canada\'s ruling in favor of a duty on U.S. corn was a keen disappointment to the National Corn Growers Association and has set a dangerous precedent for other nations to follow, said Mike Hall, lobbyist for the association.     \"The French corn growers will clearly charge ahead now and just change corn to corn gluten feed\" in their complaint, Hall tolds.     A Canadian government agency ruled today that U.S. farm policies are causing injury to Canadian corn farrmers and supported an earlier imposed countervailing duty of about 85 cts per bushel.     \"This was cleary a political decision,\" Hall said. \"The amount of corn we export to Canada is insignificant.\"     The unexpected ruling appeared to be based on the agrument that Canada bases its corn prices on U.S. futures prices and that American farm policy has driven down these prices, thus causing lower prices to Canadian farmers and larger government payments through its farm stabilization program, Hall said.     Hall said this is a new definition for injury, but that other nations might also now apply this same argument to attack U.S. farm programs.     The French corn growers could now charge that U.S. farm programs create an unfair subsidy for corn gluten feed, Hall said. The French have long wanted to control the imports of U.S. corn gluten feed into the community, saying that the imported feed was unfairly displacing European grain.  \n',grain
'Recent purchases of U.S. corn by the Soviet Union have skewed the domestic cash market by increasing the price difference between the premium price paid at the Gulf export point and interior levels, cash grain dealers said.     Many dealers expect the USDA will act soon to reduce the cash price premium at the Gulf versus the interior -- which a dealer in Davenport, Iowa, said was roughly 20 pct wider than normal for this time of year at 25 cents a bushel -- by making it worthwhile for farmers to move grain.     By lowering ASCS county posted prices for corn, the USDA could encourage farmers to engage in PIK and roll corn sales, where PIK certificates are used to redeem corn stored under the government price support loan program and then marketed.     If the USDA acts soon, as many dealers expect, the movement would break the Gulf corn basis.     \"The USDA has been using the Gulf price to determine county posted prices,\" one dealer said. \"It should be taking the average of the Gulf price and the price in Kansas City,\" which would more closely reflect the lower prices in the interior Midwest.     \"But we don\'t know when they might do it,\" an Ohio dealer said, which has created uncertainty in the market.     The USDA started the PIK certificate program in an effort to free up surplus grain that otherwise would be forfeited to the government and remain off the market and in storage.     Yesterday, USDA issued a report showing that only slightly more than 50 pct of the 3.85 billion dlrs in PIK certificates it has issued to farmers (in lieu of cash payments) had to date been exchanged for grain.     With several billion dlrs worth of additional PIK certificates scheduled to be issued in the coming months, the USDA would be well advised to encourage the exchange for grain by adjusting the ASCS prices, cash grain dealers said.     A byproduct of the Soviet buying has been a sharp rise in barge freight costs quoted for carrying grain from the Midwest to the export terminals, cash dealers said.     Freight from upper areas of the Mississippi have risen nearly 50 pct in the past two weeks to over 150 pct of the original tariff price. The mild winter and early reopening of the mid-Mississippi river this spring have also encouraged the firmer trend in barge freight, dealers noted.     The higher transportation costs have served to depress interior corn basis levels, squeezing the margins obtained by the elevators feeding the Gulf export market as well as discouraging farmer marketings, they said.     \"The Gulf market overreacted to the Soviet buying reports,\" which indicate the USSR has booked over two and perhaps as much as 4.0 mln tonnes of U.S. corn, one Midwest cash grain trader said.     But dealers anticipate that once the rumors subside, freight rates will settle back down because of the overall surplus of barges on the Midwest river system.  \n',grain
'U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter suggested the U.S. could file a formal complaint with the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) challenging Canada\'s decision to impose duties on U.S. corn imports.     Asked about the Canadian government decision to apply a duty of 84.9 cents per bushel on U.S. corn shipments, Yeutter said the U.S. could file a formal complaint with GATT under the dispute settlement procedures of the subsidies code.     Other U.S. options would be to appeal the decision in Canadian courts, or to retaliate against Canadian goods, a lower-level U.S. trade official said. However, retaliation is an unlikely step, at least initially, that official said. No decision on U.S. action is expected at least until after documents on the ruling are received here later this week.  \n',grain
'The Senate this week might take up proposed legislation that could serve as a lightning rod to expose broad initiatives to change U.S. farm policy.     The Senate could consider a House-passed bill that would allow wheat and feedgrains farmers to receive at least 92 pct of their income support payments if flooding last year prevented, or will prevent, them from planting their 1987 crops, Senate staff members tolds.     Also pending is a bill extend the life of the National Commission on Dairy Policy.     Sen. Rudy Boschwitz, R-Minn., intends to offer an amendment to one of the bills that would suspend the minimum planting requirement for all 1987 wheat, feedgrain, cotton and rice producers, an aide said.     Under current law, producers must plant at least 50 pct of their base acreage to be eligible for 92 pct of their deficiency payments.     Most major U.S. farm groups have lobbied hard against making any fundamental changes in the 1985 farm bill out of fear a full-scale debate could expose agricultural problems to budget-cutting pressures.     Representatives of these farm groups have said they also fear efforts by Midwestern Democrats to force a floor vote on a bill that would require large acreage set-asides in return for sharply higher support prices.     However, Sen. Tom Harkin, D-Iowa, sponsor of the bill, tolds he did not intend to offer his measure as a floor amendment but to bring it through the committee.  \n',grain
'An American Farm Bureau Federation (AFBF) official said that far from hurting Canadian corn producers, U.S. farm programs benefit all foreign producers.     AFBF president Dean Kleckner made the comments in response to the ruling earlier today by the Canadian Import Tribunal that subsidized U.S. corn imports were injurious to Canadian growers. The tribunal upheld a countervailing duty of 84.9 U.S. cents a bushel.     \"Farm Bureau specialists went to Ottawa and testified previous U.S. farm programs have actually benefited all foreign producers by reducing the amount of corn grown in the U.S. (and losing market share), while exerting an upward influence on the price of corn Worldwide,\" he said.  \n',grain
'U.S. farmers who reorganize their operations to circumvent a cap on federal payments could add 2.3 billion dlrs to the cost of the government\'s agricultural programs by 1989, the General Accounting Office, GAO, said.     \"We estimate that should the trend in farm reorganizations continue, reorganizations since 1984 could be adding almost 900 mln dlrs annually to program costs by 1989,\" GAO Senior Associate Director Brian Crowley said.     \"Cumulative costs for the six-year period, 1984 to 1989, could approach 2.3 billion dlrs,\" he said.     Between 1984 and 1986, reorganizations added almost 9,000 new persons to U.S. Agriculture Department payment rolls, Crowley told the House Agriculture Subcommittee on Wheat, Soybeans and Feedgrains.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Feedgrains Council is surprised and disappointed by the Canadian Import Tribunal\'s decision that imports of corn from the U.S. are materially injuring Canadian corn producers, a council spokesman said.     \"At a time when the world is attempting to liberalize trade in the new rounnd of multilateral negotiations, it is incomprehensible that a country that stands to gain so much from the reduction in agricultural trade barriers would threaten that process by caving in to pressures for protectionism,\" council president Darwin E. Stolte said.     Canada\'s finding will strain the U.S./Canadian trading relationship, could damage the future of U.S. feedgrains  support for the free trade negotiations, and also negatively impact farm trade reform with other nations, the council said.  \n',grain
'Grain analysts surveyed by the American Soybean Association, ASA, projected acreage this year at 59.1 mln acres of soybeans and 64.7 mln acres of corn.     In 1986, farmers planted 61.5 mln acres of soybeans and 76.7 mln acres of corn, according to the February 9 USDA supply/demand report. The USDA is to release its 1987 planting intentions report March 31.     The survey included 15 soybean estimates and 13 corn estimates and was released in the March 16 Soybean Update newsletter sent to members.     Estimates ranged from 56.0 mln to 63.0 mln acres of soybeans and 59.5 mln to 68.0 mln acres of corn.     An ASA spokesman said the association plans no survey of farmers\' planting intentions this year.  \n',grain
'U.S. grain carloadings totaled 25,744 cars in the week ended March 28, down 4.3 pct from the previous week but 41.6 pct above the corresponding week a year ago, the Association of American Railroads reported.     Grain mill product loadings in the week totalled 10,920 cars, up 0.1 pct from the previous week and 12.7 pct above the same week a year earlier, the association said.  \n',grain
'The use of generic commodity certificates, or \"certs,\" for fiscal years 1986-88 will save the government 50 to 100 mln dlrs, Department of Agriculture Undersecretary Daniel Amstutz said.     Speaking at a House agriculture subcommittee hearing on the use of the certificates, Amstutz said that the issuance of 8.5 billion dlrs of certificates during fiscal years 1986-88 could result in government outlays of up to 400 mln dlrs.     However, the use of certificates preclude the need for 450 to 500 mln dlrs in storage and handling costs, resulting in net savings for the government of 50-100 mln dlrs, he said.     Without the use of certificates, Amstutz said nearly the entire 1985 crop which had been put under loan would have been forfeited to the Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC.     In addition, 260 mln bushels of grain that have been redeemed from CCC inventory through certificate exchanges would have remained in the goverment inventory, he said.     When asked to comment on a recent study by the General Accounting Office that concluded certificates result in a net cost to the government, Amstutz said, \"GAO underestimated the benefits and overstated the costs\" of the certificate program.     Amstutz said while certificates encourage more loan entries, they also encourage heavier loan redemptions rather than forfeitures.     GAO underestimated this net loan activity, Amstutz said.     \"There is no question in the mind of the Department of Agriculture that these certificates have been very useful,\" Amstutz said.     Immediate benefits of certificates include greater market liquidity, improved market price competitiveness, higher farm income, and improved debt situation and decreased carrying costs, he said.     Certificates are an integral part of USDA\'s long-range market-oriented farm policy, he said.     Amstutz told subcommittee Chairman Rep. Dan Glickman, D-Kans., that USDA is in the process of preparing an official response to the GAO study on certificates and will submit it to the subcommittee when completed.  \n',grain
'A statement yesterday by Secretary of State George Shultz after he met with wheat growers that U.S. agricultural products must be competitively priced was significant in that he recognized the importance of the Soviet market and the need for U.S. prices to be at world market levels, U.S. grain trade industry officials said.     They said that Shultz\'s comments, while not explicitly endorsing subsidized wheat sales to the USSR, were noteworthy because they were not negative towards such action.     In response to a query on what the State Department\'s position is on selling subsidized wheat to Moscow, Shultz told the leaders of the National Association of Wheat Growers that prices must be competitive if the U.S. is going to trade.     The Soviet Union, the world\'s largest grain importer, has bought no U.S. wheat for more than a year, complaining the price was far above world market levels. A U.S. offer last fall to sell the Soviets lower-priced wheat through the export enhancement program, EEP, was also rebuffed due to the price.     Shultz was said to be adamantly against the U.S. wheat offer last year and has been reported to be one of the major obstacles in making another subsidy overture to the Soviet Union, grain industry sources said.     Intense speculation the U.S. might make a fresh EEP wheat offer to the Soviets has boosted grain prices significantly in recent trading sessions. Kansas City hard wheat futures rose another 2-1/4 cents by midday at 2.88-1/4 dlrs per bushel, while CBT March wheat was up 1-1/2 cents at 2.92-1/2 dlrs.     \"I\'m not sure this is an about-face, but it\'s clearly a recognition that unless we\'re competitive, we won\'t sell to the Soviet Union,\" said a lobbyst for a major commodity group.     \"We have to be competitive. It\'s ridiculous to say that somebody is going to buy your product if they can get the same thing at a lower price somewhere else,\" Shultz told the farm leaders. \"That is our approach in negotiations with the Soviets,\" he said.     If those comments do signal that the State Department is no longer opposed to the U.S. selling wheat to the USSR under EEP, it certainly improves the chances for an EEP wheat offer to Moscow, an industry lobbyst said.     National Wheat Grower\'s officials were taking a cautious attitude towards the secretary\'s comments.     \"His comments were not discouraging, but they didn\'t in our judgment promise any immediate action on EEP,\" an official with the wheat group said.     The Wheat Growers official noted, however, that \"there is significance in that fact that we haven\'t seen any significant negative commentary on the idea of EEP wheat to the Soviets.\"     In a meeting with exporters this week, Secretary of Agriculture Richard Lyng refused to comment on their request that the administration offer subsidized wheat to Moscow, the officials said.     An aide to USDA undersecretary Daniel Amstutz, who is reported to be strongly opposed to EEP wheat to the Soviets, said that the Shultz comments \"are consistent with what he (Shultz) has taught for years as an economist,\" but said they don\'t necessarily relate to the Soviet Union.     Amstutz could not be reached for comment, and an aide to Lyng said Lyng would not comment on Shultz\'s statements.     But trade sources were hopeful that the Shultz comments may indicate some movement towards EEP wheat to Moscow.     \"If he didn\'t say no, then there\'s a chance. This is potentially a positive development,\" a commodity source said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. House Agriculture Committee approved proposals to extend the life of the Export Enhancement Program, EEP, through fiscal 1990 and urged the Reagan administration offer EEP wheat to the Soviet Union.     The proposals were approved as amendments to a comprehensive trade bill moving through Congress this year.     In addition to the amendments on EEP, the committee approved several proposals which could restrict imports of lamb, casein, sugar-containing products and tobacco. Those amendments affecting imports face an uncertain future because the House Ways and Means Committee, which has overall jurisdiction over trade legislation, will oppose them, Congressional sources said.     The effect of the EEP amendments would be to extend the life of the program five years through fiscal 1990 rather than the current three years through fiscal 1988.     The amendments, offered by Rep. Dan Glickman, D-Kan., also would increase funding for the program to 2.5 billion dlrs from 1.5 billion now.     Furthermore, the committee passed an amendment offered by Rep. Glickman which instructs the U.S. Agriculture Department to value EEP bonus commodities at market value, not acquisition value. Glickman said the change would make the program 30 pct less expensive to operate.     The provision on EEP wheat to the Soviet Union, offered by Rep. Bob Smith, R-Ore., does not require the administration make an offer, but urges such action.     The committee approved an amendment, offered by Rep. Glenn English, D-Okla., requiring the Secretary of Agriculture to begin discussions with other major grain producing countries aimed at jointly reducing world grain production.     Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter yesterday opposed the amendment, saying such commodity agreements do not work.     Among the host of amendments to restrict imports approved by the panel, the most significant would require quotas on imports of goods containing more than 25 pct of a bulk farm product that is subject to U.S. quotas. The amendment, offered by Rep. Arlan Stangeland, R-Minn., is aimed primarily at curbing imports from Canada of products containing sugar and foreign foods containing dairy products. It also may affect peanut, cotton and tobacco imports, Committee sources said.     Another amendment would place a quota on U.S. imports of casein, a dairy product shipped to the U.S. primarily by New Zealand and Ireland.     The panel also voted to apply to lamb imports the same countercyclical import quota law which is operating for U.S. beef imports.     Other miscellaneous amendments included:     -- Urging the administration consider retaliating against Japan and South Korea if those countries do not remove restrictions on beef imports.     -- Boosting the amount of U.S. grain which must be shipped each year under a food aid program called Section 416 to 800,000 tonnes from 500,000 tonnes now.     -- Requiring the Agriculture Secretary conduct a study of the Canadian Wheat Board import licensing system for wheat to determine if it is a non-tariff trade barrier.     -- Requiring the Agriculture Secretary reimburse the National Corn Growers Association up to 500,000 dlrs for the costs of defending the U.S. feedgrains program against a Canadian countervailing duty case this year.     -- Urging the administration oppose the Canadian decision to apply a duty on U.S. corn imports, and a proposal by the European Community to apply a vegetable oils tax.     -- USDA conduct a study of the findings of a National Commission on Agricultural Export Policy, which recommended a reorganization of USDA\'s trade policy apparatus.  \n',grain
'A proposal by two U.S. House Democrats to target government farm benefits to small- and medium-sized farms was warmly received by Democrats on a House subcommittee today.     \"On balance, this is the best new idea I have seen,\" said Rep. Dan Glickman (D-Kan.), Chairman of the House Agriculture Subcommittee on Wheat, Feedgrains and Soybeans. \"This is the first hard constructive proposal coming out as an alternative to the (Reagan) administration\'s farm proposal.\"     The plan, offered by Reps. Tim Penny (D-Minn.) and Byron Dorgan (D-ND), would raise target prices for wheat to 5.00 dlrs per bushel and for corn to 3.50 dlrs. Producers could receive deficiency payments on up to 80 pct of normal yield but not more than on 30,000 bu of corn and 20,000 bu of wheat.     The proposal also would require acreage reductions of 20 pct, eliminate generic certificates and prohibit persons not actively engaged in farming from receiving program benefits.     Dorgan said the bill would save 24 billion dlrs over five years, protect family farms and eliminate government accumulation of stocks because nonrecourse loans would be halted.     However, Rep. Pat Roberts (R-Kan.) said the measure would \"involve the federal government in deciding and defining who a family farmer is.\"     Roberts said the bill, for example, would restrict program payments to 500 acres of wheat production in western Kansas.     Other Republicans on the panel questioned how the bill would determine if a person was actively engaged in farming and therefore eligible for payments.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Is to lend Sudan 57 mln dlrs to buy 309,000 tonnes of wheat and 73,000 tonnes of wheat flour, according to an agreement signed here.     Under the agreement Sudan will receive 50 mln dlrs for the commodities and the rest for sea transportation.     The loan is repayable in 40 years, including a 10-year grace period. Interest will be two pct for the grace period and three pct over the repayment period of 30 years.  \n',grain
'A marketing loan for U.S. wheat, feedgrains and soybeans would do nothing to help the surplus production situation and would be extremely costly, Sen. Rudy Boschwitz (R-Minn.) said.     \"I think I would not support a marketing loan now,\" he told the House agriculture subcommittee on wheat, soybeans and feedgrains. Boschwitz was one of the original supporters of a marketing loan for cotton and rice, but has since focused support on decoupling legislation, the Boren/Boschwitiz bill.     A market loan for grains and soybeans would encourage more production, especially in high-yielding areas, would be much more expensive than the current cotton and rice marketing loans and not increase exports significantly, he said.  \n',grain
'A majority of the Senate Agriculture Committee urged President Reagan to reverse his opposition to export subsidies to the Soviet Union as a way to get its negotiators to purchase some 500 mln dlrs in American wheat.     The group, led by committee chairman Patrick Leahy, a Vermont Democrat, urged Reagan to step up negotiations with the Soviet Union by providing export subsidies to help U.S. farmers.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Senate Agriculture Committee approved a measure that would exempt farmers who planted alfalfa or other multiyear grasses and legumes between 1981 and 1985 from a federal conservation requirement.     Sen. Edward Zorinsky, D-Neb., said his bill would restore equity under federal sodbuster rules, which currently deny farm program benefits to farmers who, between 1981 and 1985, planted alfalfa and other multiyear grasses and legumes without interrupting the plantings with a row crop.     An official from a leading conservation group, who asked not to be identified, said the panel\'s move was \"an unfortunate first action\" because it could lead to the exemption of potentially millions of acres from the sod buster regulations, established under the 1985 farm bill.  \n',grain
'The upcoming five-month deficiency payments to corn and sorghum farmers will be made half in cash and half in generic commodity certificates, a senior Agriculture Department official tolds.     Around 300 mln dlrs of the in-kind certificates, or \"certs,\" will be mailed out to farmers around March 15 or 16, Tom von Garlem, Assistant Deputy Administrator for USDA\'s state and county operations, said.     The decision to make the payments in a 50/50 cash/certs ratio was made Monday, but payments to producers will be delayed until mid-month due to a problem with USDA\'s computer program, von Garlem said. get 11.5 cts per bushel in this next payment -- 5.75 cts in certs and around 5.5 cts cash (5.75 cts minus Gramm-Rudman).     Farmers who did not receive advance deficiency payments at signup will receive 63 cts per bushel. Slightly more than half of this payment will be in cash, von Garlem said, but he said this will not markedly upset the 50/50 ratio, since most farmers got advance payments.     \"The final certificate payments will be very close to 300 mln dlrs,\" he said.     When asked if the Office of Management and Budget had resisted the cash/certs ratio, the USDA official said that \"we proposed 50/50 and OMB accepted it.\"  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said he will ask Japan to offer a share of its rice market to U.S. exporters when he visits that country next month.     In an interview withs, Lyng also said the Reagan administration will ask Tokyo to remove its quotas on U.S. beef and citrus exports.     Lyng, who plans to be in Japan April 14-27, said he will not ask Tokyo to liberalize fully its rice market. \"We will urge that they consider sharing their rice market,\" he said.     The USDA secretary would not say how big a share of the Japanese rice market the U.S. would request. \"We\'ve got none of it now. If we got one per cent of it, it would be a big improvement,\" he said.     Last year, the Reagan administration rejected a petition by the U.S. rice industry seeking relief from Japanese import restrictions.     However, the U.S. said it would reexamine the issue if by mid-1987 Japan did not roll back import barriers to U.S. rice exports.     Lyng said he would not be conducting formal negotiations next month with Japan over their beef and citrus quotas, but that his visit \"may be a forerunner in a general way\" to talks prior to expiration of the bilateral agreement in March 1988.     He said, however, that the U.S. \"will ask for a definite liberalization of those items (beef and citrus).... When you translate \'liberalization\' into Japanese, it means do away with the quota.\"  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department is not actively considering offering subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union under the export enhancement program (EEP), senior USDA officials said.     However, grain trade analysts said the proposal has not been ruled out and that an offer might be made, though not in the very near future.     \"The grain companies are trying to get this fired up again,\" an aide to Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said. \"But there just isn\'t much talk about it, informally or formally.\"     Most analysts interviewed bys were more confident than USDA officials that bonus wheat would be offered to the Soviets, even though U.S. officials did not make such an offer when they held grain talks with Soviet counterparts earlier this week.     But administration and private sources agreed that if the Reagan administration did decide to offer subsidized wheat to Moscow, it could take several months.     \"I just don\'t see any proposal like that sailing through any interagency process,\" the aide to Lyng said.     \"An export enhancement offer is not consummated overnight,\" said one former USDA official, who noted that the administration took three months to decide in favor of selling China wheat under the subsidy program.     An official representing a large grain trade company said deliberations within USDA might be nudged along by members of Congress, a number of whom urged USDA this week to make a wheat subsidy offer to the Soviets.     But Lyng\'s aide said that during a day-long visit to Capitol Hill yesterday, House members did not press the secretary on the subsidy question a single time.     The administration\'s interagency trade policy review group, comprised of subcabinet-level officials, has not been asked to clear a request to offer Moscow wheat under the EEP, officials at the U.S. Trade Representative\'s Office said.     In their talks this week, the two sides discussed the administration\'s previous EEP offer but did not talk about any new initiative. One USDA official who took part in the consultations this week described them as an exchange of \"calm, basic, factual economics.\"     Another USDA official said there was \"not even an informal suggestion or hint\" that the Soviets would live up to their pledge to buy four mln tonnes of wheat this year if they were granted more favorable terms.     USDA and private sources agreed that consideration of an EEP initiative by interagency review groups likely would be delayed because of disarray within the White House stemming from the Iran arms affair.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has switched 25.0 mln dlrs in wheat credit guarantees to Jordan under the Export Credit Guarantee Program to the Intermediate Export Credit Guarantee Program, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The switch reduces the total value of GSM-102 guarantees for the current fiscal year to 30.0 mln dlrs.     The credit terms extended for export sales under the Intermediate Export Credit Guarantee Program (GSM-103) must be in excess of three years but not more than seven years.     All sales must be registered and exports completed by September 30, 1987, the department said.  \n',grain
'All major grain producing countries must do their part to help reduce global surpluses and the recent Australian farm policy proposals are flawed, two U.S. wheat organizations said.     The recent Australian proposals were a good starting point for discussions, \"but we do not want the Australians to feel they are alone in developing an agenda for discussions\" on world grain trade, the president of the National Association of Wheat Growers, NAWG, and the chairman of U.S. Wheat Associates said in a letter to U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng and U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter.     Future discussions on international wheat trade should include three topics -- a commitment to privatization of government-run export trading entities, a commitment to public disclosure of sales and other terms if government entities are involved, and a recognition that supply reductions by the U.S. have kept world prices higher than they otherwise would be, the two organizations said      While the Australian proposals are welcome the two organizations said they are not in total agreement with their assessments.     Australia\'s proposals, which aim to reduce U.S. target prices and \"quarantine\" U.S. wheat stocks, would continue to place the burden of supply adjustment and reform on U.S. farmers, they said.       Other countries, including Australia, have benefitted from the higher world prices that have resulted from past U.S. acreage and crop reduction programs, the organizations said.     \"We will not continue to hurt ourselves economically -- and subsidize foreign wheat production -- by unilaterally stocking grain and changing programs which protect our growers,\" Jim Miller, president of NAWG said.     \"We sincerely hope for some type of agreement among the world\'s major grain producing nations to reduce stocks and restore profitability to agriculture,\" Miller said.  \n',grain
'The National Association of Wheat Growers, NAWG, board of directors is scheduled to meet Secretary of State George Schultz and Undersecretary of State Allen Wallis to discuss the Department\'s current role in farm trade policy, the association said.     NAWG President Jim Miller said in a statement that the organization wanted to convey to Secretary Schultz the importance that exports hold for U.S. agriculture and the degree to which farmers are dependent upon favorable State Department trade policies to remain profitable.     \"Foreign policy decisions of the U.S. State Department have in the past severely hampered our efforts to move our product to overseas markets,\" he said.     Miller noted Secretary Schultz is scheduled to meet next month with representatives of the Soviet Union, and the NAWG \"wanted to be certain the secretary was aware of our concerns regarding the reopening of wheat trade with the Soviet Union.\"     The annual spring NAWG board of directors meeting is held in Washington to allow grower-leaders from around the country to meet with their state congressional delegations and members of the executive branch.     The purpose is to discuss the current situation for producing and marketing wheat and help set the legislative and regulatory agenda for the coming year, the NAWG statement said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. National Association of Wheat Growers (NAWG) urged the Reagan administration offer the Soviet Union wheat under the export enhancement program (eep).     In a letter to Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng, NAWG stated its \"strong support\" for an eep offer to Moscow.     \"We believe that a solid case continues to exist for Soviet EEP eligibility, and the recently announced and reported Soviet purchases of U.S. corn indicate a Soviet willingness to purchase U.S. grain if it is competitively priced,\" NAWG said.     \"Consequently, we believe it is important to renew the U.S. eep offer and do all that is reasonably possible to ensure mutual adherence to the terms of the U.S.-Soviet grain agreement,\" the letter said.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture undersecretary Dan Amstutz indicated the United States is willing talk with the Soviet Union about the competitiveness of U.S. wheat prices but would not discuss making U.S. wheat prices \"cheap.\"     \"There sometimes is a difference between being competitive and being cheap,\" Amstutz told a Senate Agriculture Appropriations hearing.     Amstutz said the difference of opinion between Moscow and Washington last summer on the level of the U.S. subsidy offered on wheat to the Soviet Union, was over whether the U.S. wheat price was competitive or cheap.     \"I think there is a (U.S.) willingness to explore this issue as it pertains to competitiveness,\" Amstutz said.     However, Amstutz added that the United States would not be willing to discuss wheat prices with Moscow \"if the issue is being cheap.\"     Asked later by a reporter what he meant by the distinction between competitive and cheap, Amstutz would not elaborate.     Amstutz said it is the U.S. judgment that the long-term grain agreement between the two countries calls for Moscow to buy at least four mln tonnes each of wheat and corn annually at \"prices in effect in this country.\"     Amstutz made the comments in response to a question from Sen. Charles Grassley, R-Iowa, about expanding the export enhancement program to include grain sales to the Soviet Union.  \n',grain
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said he was not sure a long-term U.S.-Soviet grain agreement would be worth extending when it expires next year.     \"It hasn\'t been worth much in the last two years....They haven\'t lived up to the agreement as I see it,\" Lyng said in an interview withs.     \"It would be my thought that it\'s not worth any effort to work out an agreement with someone who wants the agreement to be a one-sided thing,\" he said.     However, Lyng said he did not want to make a \"definitive commitment one way or another at this point.\"     Under the accord covering 1983-88, the Soviets agreed to buy at least nine mln tonnes of U.S. grain, including four mln tonnes each of corn and wheat.     Moscow bought 6.8 mln tonnes of corn and 153,000 tonnes of wheat during the third agreement year, which ended last September, and this year has bought one mln tonnes of corn.     Lyng said he had no knowledge of how much U.S. grain Moscow would buy this year.     \"I\'ve seen people making comments on that and I don\'t know how they know, unless they talk to the Soviets,\" he said. \"I have no knowledge, and I really don\'t think anyone other than the Soviets have any knowledge.\"     Lyng said he thought the Soviets bought U.S. corn last month because \"they needed it and because the price was right.\"     \"Our corn has been pretty reasonably priced. And I think they\'ve always found that our corn was good,\" he said.  \n',grain
'Abnormally warm and dry weather over most parts of China is seriously affecting crops, the New China News Agency said.     It said the drought has made rice planting difficult in eight provinces, including Guangxi, Sichuan and Hunan. Plant diseases and insect pests have increased in wheat-producing areas, it said.     The agency said some areas of Guangxi, Hubei, Shanxi and other provinces have been suffering a drought for more than seven months.     The agency said the dry weather had reduced the amount of water stored by more than 20 pct compared with last March, lowered the water level of many rivers, reduced hydroelectric power supplies and caused water shortages for industry and consumers.     The upper reaches of the Yangtze are at their lowest levels in a century, causing many ships to run aground and making harbour manoeuvres difficult, it said.     The drought has also increased the number of forest fires. More than 1,000 fires in southern China had destroyed 13,340 hectares of forest by mid-February, it said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said it had accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover a sale of durum wheat to Algeria.     USDA General Sales Manager Melvin Sims said the Commodity Credit Corp accepted one bid from Cam USA Inc on a sale of 18,000 tonnes of durum wheat.     Sims said the bonus was 42.44 dlrs per tonne and shipment was scheduled for June 20-30, 1987.     An additional 246,000 tonnes of durum wheat are still available to Algeria under the export enhancement program.  \n',grain
'The Commodity Credit Corp (CCC) has accepted bids for export bonuses to cover sales of 340,000 tonnes of hard red winter wheat and 210,000 tonnes of soft red winter wheat to China, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The bonuses awarded averaged 36.22 dlrs per tonne, and the wheat is scheduled for delivery during May-Oct 1987.     The bonus awards were made to Cargill, Inc (305,000 tonnes), Continental Grain Co (155,000 tonnes), Mitsubishi International Corp (60,000 tonnes) and Richco Grain Co (30,000 tonnes).     Bonuses will be paid to the exporters in the form of commodities from CCC stocks.     The purchases complete the Export Enhancement Program initiative for China announced Jan 26.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said it has extended until April 17 the date by which Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation county offices must determine eligibility of individuals or other entities for payments under 1987 farm programs.     Jerome Sitter, director of ASCS\'s Cotton, Grain and Rice Price Support Division, said the decision meant farmers have until April 17 to file a farm operating plan indicating how many persons would be involved in their farming operations.     Earlier this year USDA extended the deadline to April 1 from March 1, Sitter said.     ASCA Administrator Milton Hertz said in a statement that the extension was necessary because of heavy workloads at county ASCS offices.     Hertz said ASCS county officials \"have had to make a large number of eligibility determinations for individuals and other entities, such as corporations and partnerships, in preparation for imposing the 50,000-dlr-per-entity cap.\"     \"These offices already had a very heavy workload due to the large number of applications for both the 1987 farm programs and the Conservation Reserve Program,\" Hertz said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department announced the following prevailing world market prices of rice on a loan-rate basis, with previous prices --     -- Long grain whole kernels 5.87 cts per lb vs 5.70     -- Medium grain whole kernels 5.28 cts per lb vs 5.12     -- Short grain whole kernels  5.22 cts per lb vs 5.06     -- Broken kernels 2.94 cts per lb vs 2.85     The repayment rate for 1986-crop warehouse or farm-stored rice loans are the higher of the world price or 50 pct of the loan rate of 7.20 dlrs per cwt.     The prices will remain in effect for a week, but new prices could be announced earlier if warranted, USDA said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department is proposing tighter federal standards setting allowable limits on insect infestations in grain shipments.     The changes in the standards would include the following:     -- Establishing equal tolerances for the number of live insects in shipments of food grains, feed grains and oilseeds.     -- Revising the definition of \"infested\" to give equal value to all insects injurious to grain.     -- Establishing lower levels of infestations. In 1988, the infested level would be set at three or more live insects per representative sample (about 100 grams), in 1990 two or more insects, and in 1992 the final infestattion level would be set at one or more live insects per representative sample.     -- Revising the definition of sample grade by adding a limit of 10 live or dead insects per sample.     -- Revising the definition of sample grade for wheat by adding a limit of 32 insect-damaged kernels per 100 grams of wheat.     The department asked for public comments on the proposals by April 17.  \n',grain
'Corn sales gained 2,494,900 tonnes in the week ended February 26, the highest weekly total since August 1984 and two and three-quarter times the prior week\'s level, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In comments on its Export Sales Report, the department said sales of 1.0 mln tonnes to the USSR -- previously reported under the daily reporting system -- were the first sales for delivery to the USSR under the fourth year of the U.S.-USSR Grains Supply Agreement, which began October 1.     Japan added 689,700 tonnes to previous purchases and sales to unknown destinations rose by 429,800 tonnes.     Wheat sales of 362,400 tonnes for the current season and 151,000 for the 1987/88 season were down by more than half from the previous week\'s combined sales, it said.     Egypt, Japan and Iraq were the major wheat buyers for delivery in the current year, while sales to China decreased by 30,000 tonnes for the current season, but increased by 90,000 tonnes for the 1987/88 season, which begins June 1.     Net sales of soybeans totalling 274,200 tonnes equaled the preceding week, but were nearly a third below the four week average. Major increases were for Belgium, South Korea, Mexico and Italy, it said.     Soybean cake and meal sales of 103,700 tonnes were 2-3/4 times the previous week\'s marketing year low, but six pct less than the four week average.     Major increases for West Germany, Belgium, Spain, Italy and Australia were partially offset by declines to unknown destinations.     Soybean oil sales of 5,400 tonnes were the result of increases for Venezuela and reductions of 500 tonnes for unknown destinations.     Combined sales activity in cotton of 75,200 running bales -- 44,700 bales for the current year and 30,500 bales for the 1987/88  bales -- were 56 pct below the prior week\'s good showing, the department said.     Major purchasers for the current season were South Korea, Japan, Taiwan and Thailand, while South Korea and Indonesia were the major buyers for the 1987/88 season, which begins August 1.      \n',grain
'Corn sales of 2,806,300 tonnes in the week ended March 19 were the highest level since mid-November, 1979, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the USSR dominated the week\'s activity with purchases of 1.4 mln tonnes (which were earlier reported under the daily reporting system). Other large increaes were posted for Japan and unknown destinations, it said.     Taiwan purchased 296,300 tonnes for the 1986/87 season and 170,000 tonnes for the 1987/88 season, it said.     Wheat sales of 317,200 tonnes for the current season and 125,000 tonnes for the 1987/88 season were down about one-third from the preceding week and the four-week average.     Wheat sales to China of 60,000 tonnes were switched from 1986/87 to the 1987/88 season, it noted.     Soybean sales of 483,100 tonnes were 11 pct above the prior week and two-thirds above the four-week average.     Japan, the Netherlands, Mexico and Portugal were the main buyers, the department said.     Soybean cake and meal sales of 289,400 tonnes were two-thirds above the previous week and the largest of the marketing year, with Venezuela the dominant purchaser.     Sales activity in soybean oil resulted in decreases of 4,400 tonnes, as reductions for unknown destinations more than offset increases for Canada, the Dominican Republic and Panama, the department said.     Cotton sales of 57,900 running bales -- 43,800 bales for the current year and 14,200 bales for the 1987/88 season -- were off 25 pct from the previous week and 50 pct from the four-week average.     Turkey, Thailand, South Korea and Canada were the major buyers for the current season, while Thailand, Britain and Japan were the major purchasers from the upcoming season, the department said.      Sorghum sales of 178,800 tonnes were two-thirds above the prior week and 75 pct over the four-week average.     Venezuela was the leading buyer it said.     Sales of 41,800 tonnes of barley were 10 times the previous week and 10 pct greater than  the four-week average. Israel, Cyprus and Saudi Arabia were the main buyers, it said.  \n',grain
'No changes have been made or are being planned in the Agriculture Department\'s calculation of price differentials between interior grain locations and the Texas Gulf, a senior USDA official said.     Ralph Klopfenstein, USDA deputy administrator for commodity operations, tolds, \"We do not anticipate any changes to be made\" in the Texas Gulf differentials used to calculate posted county prices for corn.     \"We do not relate the Texas Gulf structure with the Louisiana Gulf structure at all. It\'s a totally different situation,\" he said.     Rumors had circulated through the market this morning that USDA had widened Texas Gulf differentials in a similar manner to last weekend\'s adjustments with the Louisiana Gulf.  \n',grain
'Farmers enrolled over 6.5 mln acres of program crops in the latest conservation reserve program signup and around four mln acres of non-program crops, Agriculture Department conservation specialists said.     Soybean acreage amounted to less than two mln acres of the non-program crop acreage enrolled, a USDA analyst said. Heavy enrollment of non-base acreage in wheat states, of which a big percentage would be fallow and non-soybean land, accounted for a large portion of the non-program acreage, the analyst said.     Wheat and corn acreage comprised slightly over 40 pct of the total 10,572,402 acres accepted into the ten-year program.     USDA analysts gave the following enrollment breakdown:     -- wheat  2,615,140 acres     -- corn   1,894,764 acres     -- barley   705,888 acres     -- sorghum  585,552 acres     -- cotton   417,893 acres     -- rice       2,035 acres     -- peanuts      611 acres     -- tobacco      285 acres     -- total program crops  6,512,700 acres     -- total nonprogram     4,059,702 acres     -- total enrollment    10,572,402 acres     USDA analysts are currently working on a complete state breakdown of crop acreage enrollment and should have it ready for publication later this week, they said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department forecast Australia\'s 1986/87 wheat crop at 17.30 mln tonnes, vs 17.50 mln tonnes last month. It estimated 1985/86 output at 16.13 mln tonnes, vs 16.13 mln last month.     Australian wheat exports in 1986/87 are forecast at 14.50 mln tonnes, vs 15.00 mln tonnes last month, while exports in 1985/86 are estimated at 15.96 mln tonnes, vs 15.96 mln last month.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department estimated Canada\'s 1986/87 wheat crop at 31.85 mln tonnes, vs 31.85 mln tonnes last month. It estimated 1985/86 output at 24.25 mln tonnes, vs 24.25 mln last month.     Canadian 1986/87 coarse grain production is projected at 27.62 mln tonnes, vs 27.62 mln tonnes last month. Production in 1985/86 is estimated at 24.95 mln tonnes, vs 24.95 mln last month.     Canadian wheat exports in 1986/87 are forecast at 19.00 mln tonnes, vs 18.00 mln tonnes last month. Exports in 1985/86 are estimated at 17.71 mln tonnes, vs 17.72 mln last month.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department forecast the Soviet 1986/87 wheat crop at 92.30 mln tonnes, vs 92.30 mln tonnes last month. It put the 1985/86 crop at 78.10 mln tonnes, vs 78.10 mln tonnes last month.     Soviet 1986/87 coarse grain production is estimated at 103.30 mln tonnes, vs 103.30 mln tonnes last month. Production in 1985/86 is projected at 100.00 mln tonnes, vs 99.99 mln tonnes last month.     USSR wheat imports are forecast at 15.00 mln tonnes in 1986/87, vs 14.00 mln tonnes last month. Imports in 1985/86 are put at 15.70 mln tonnes, vs 15.70 mln tonnes last month. USDA estimated Soviet 1986/87 coarse grain imports at 10.00 mln tonnes, vs 8.00 mln tonnes last month, and 1985/86 imports at 13.70 mln tonnes, vs 13.70 mln tonnes last month.  \n',grain
'The Federal Grain Inspection Service Advisory Committee will meet here Monday, April 13, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     Items on the agenda for the meeting, which is scheduled to begin at 0830 edt, are grain-quality issues, status of proposed regulations, financial matters and safety matters, the department said.     The Federal Grain Inspection Service Advisory Committee is composed of 12 members representing the grain industry who provide advice to the administrator of the Federal Grain Inspection Service.  \n',grain
'The Agriculture Department is not considering any major changes in its pricing system for posted county prices, an Agriculture Department offical said.     \"We do not have current plans to make any major adjustments or changes in our pricing,\" said Bob Sindt, USDA assistant deputy administrator for commodity operations.     U.S. grain traders and merchandisers said earlier this week USDA might act soon to reduce the cash corn price premium at the Gulf versus interior price levels by dropping ASCS posted prices to encourage interior PIK and roll movement.     But Sindt denied USDA is planning any such changes.     \"If people are suggesting that we are going to make wholesale changes in pricing, we are not considering this,\" he said.     Sindt, however, did not rule out the possiblity of implementing more minor changes in its pricing system.     \"We are continually monitoring the whole nationwide structure to maintain its accuracy,\" he said. \"If we become convinced that we need to make a change, then appropriate adjustments will be made.\"     Sindt acknowledged that concern has been voiced that USDA\'s price differentials between the New Orleans Gulf and interior markets are not accurate because of higher than normal barge freight rates.     He said commodity operations deputy administrator Ralph Klopfenstein is currently in the midwest on a speaking tour and will meet with ASCS oficials in Kansas City next week.     Sindt said a number of issues will be discussed at that meeting, including the current concern over the gulf corn premiums.     He defended the USDA differentials, saying that these price margins reflect an average of prices throughout the year and that seasonal factors will normally cause prices to increase or decrease.     The USDA official also said that only those counties that use the Gulf to price grain are being currently affected by the high barge freight tariffs and increased gulf prices.     When asked if the USDA emergency storage program which allows grain to be stored in barges was taking up barge space and accounting for the higher freight rates, Sindt discounted the idea.     He said USDA has grain left in only about 250 barges and that, under provisions of the program, these all have to be emptied by the end of March.  \n',grain
'There will be seven to eight billion dlrs of generic certificates on the market by the end of harvest, an Agriculture Department official said.     The Commodity Credit Corp will \"depend heavily\" on certificates to relieve storage problems this year, Ralph Klopfenstein, Deputy Administrator for Commodity Operations, USDA, told participants at the National Grain and Feed Association\'s annual convention.     Klopfenstein said that CCC will not be able to relocate grain in any significant amount this fall, so certificates will be used in various programs to relieve storage tightness.     Klopfenstein said certificates meet the goal of allowing prices to go below loan levels and providing USDA with an inventory management tool.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department increased its estimate of Soviet 1986/87 grain imports to 26 mln tonnes from last month\'s projection of 23 mln tonnes.     In its monthly USSR Grain Situation and Outlook, USDA said the increase reflected the return of the Soviet Union to the U.S. corn market and continued purchases of both wheat and coarse grain from other major suppliers.     USSR wheat imports were projected at 15 mln tonnes, up one mln from last month\'s estimate and 700,000 tonnes below the preliminary 1985/86 figure.     Soviet grain for feed use was estimated at a record 129 mln tonnes. Record or near-record livestock inventories, along with a dry fall which likely reduced late season pasturage, and a cold winter have increased feed demand, USDA said.     USSR meat and egg production in January rose only slightly from the previous January\'s level, while milk production increased by nearly six pct.     Unusually cold weather in January and smaller increases in roughage supplies during 1986 than in 1985 kept livestock production from expanding as much as it did a year earlier, USDA said.  \n',grain
'Sri Lankan Food Department officials said the U.S. Department of Agriculture rejected a U.S. Firm\'s offer of 80 U.S. Dlrs per tonne CAF to supply 52,500 tonnes of soft wheat to Colombo from the Pacific Northwest.     They said Sri Lanka\'s Food Department subsequently made a counter-offer to five U.S. Firms to buy wheat at 85 U.S. Dlrs CAF for April 8-16 delivery.     The company which obtains USDA approval for the proposed price must inform the Department before 1330 gmt, they said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department has accepted 10,572,402 more acres of highly erodable cropland into the Conservation Reserve Program, USDA announced.     In the latest signup, farmers on 101,020 farms submitted bids on a total of 11,254,837 acres.     The accepted bids for annual rental payments ranged up to 90 dlrs per acre with an average of 51.17 dlrs per acre.     Land entered into the Conservation Reserve Program will be ineligible for farming for ten years and must be planted with permanent vegetative cover.     Producers enrolled 1,894,764 acres of corn base acreage in the conservation program to take advantage of a corn \"bonus\" rental payment that was offered by USDA.     The corn bonus, to be paid in generic comodity certificates, amounts to two dlrs per bushel, based on the ASCS program payment yield for corn, for each acre of corn based accepted into the reserve.     The state showing the biggest enrollment in the conservation program during this signup was Texas with approximately 1.225 mln acres, followed by Iowa with 1.030 mln acres, Minnesota with 890,000 acres, Montana 875,000 acres, and Kansas with 842,000 acres.     Other states showing big enrollment were Missouri with 646,000 acres, North Dakota with 588,000 acres, and Nebraska with 554,000 acres.     In the corn belt states of Illinois and Indiana, 217,000 acres and 116,000 acres respectively were enrolled.     Farm land signed up to date in the conservation program totals 19,488,587 acres. Bids on the previous signups ranged up to 90 dlrs per acre with an average of 45.52 dlrs.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said private U.S. exporters reported sales of 104,000 tonnes of corn to unknown destinations for shipment in the 1986/87 marketing year.     The marketing year for corn began September 1, it said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said private U.S. exporters reported new sales of 900,000 tonnes of corn to the Soviet Union and 350,000 tonnes of corn switched from previously announced unknown destinations to the USSR.     The corn is for delivery during the 1986/87 marketing year and under the fourth year of the U.S.-USSR Long Term Grain Supply Agreement, the USDA said.     The department said exporters also reported corn sales of 143,000 tonnes for delivery to Taiwan, with 56,000 tonnes for shipment in the 1986/87 season and the balance for shipment in the 1987/88 year.     The marketing year for corn began September 1.     Sales of corn to the USSR for delivery during the fourth year of the agreement, which ends this September 30, now total 2.25 mln tonnes.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said private U.S. exporters reported 200,000 tonnes of corn previously to unknown destinations have been switched to the Soviet Union.     The corn is for delivery during the 1986/87 marketing year and under the fourth year of the U.S.-USSR Long Term Grain Supply Agreement.     The marketing year for began September 1.     Sales of corn to the USSR for delivery during the fourth year of the agreement -- which began October 1, 1986 -- now total 2,600,000  tonnes, it said.     In the third agreement year sales totaled 6,960,700 tonnes -- 152,600 tonnes of wheat and 6,808,100 tonnes of corn.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department probably will not offer a two dlr per bushel bonus payment to corn farmers for any erodible cropland they enrolled in the conservation reserve program last year, an aide to USDA Secretary Richard Lyng said.     Sen. Charles Grassley (R-Iowa) said yesterday that Lyng had indicated he would consider giving those farmers the same two dlr bonus offered corn farmers who are signing up for the 1987 program this month.     But the aide to Lyng said it was doubtful that the department would offer a retroactive bonus to farmers who enrolled land in the 10-year conservation reserve last year.     \"How are you going to stop the tide,\" he said, referring to demands that would follow from other commodity groups.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said private U.S. exporters reported purchases from foreign sellers of 120,000 tonnes of wheat for delivery to unknown destinations.     The wheat, consisting of 60,000 tonnes of hard red winter and 60,000 tones of soft red winter, is for delivery during the 1987/88 season, which begins June 1.     A purchase from a foreign seller is a transaction in which a U.S. exporter contracts to buy U.S.-produced commodities from a foreign firm, the department said.  \n',grain
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said it will update its estimate of winter wheat seeded acreage in the prospective planting report, scheduled for release at 1500 est (2100 gmt) tomorrow, March 31.     The original estimate of seedings of winter wheat was published in January.     It said the new survey is possible because of the new integrated nationwide survey program that uses probability sampling procedures that combine information from farmers operating in selected areas and farmers identified on special lists.  \n',grain
'The package of proposed farm policy changes that the Reagan administration sent to Congress today includes a provision that would eliminate minimum price support levels for upland cotton, rice and soybeans.     The package, obtained bys, also includes a provision, outlined in advance by USDA officials, that would increase the annual permissible cut in the basic price support levels for all major crops to 10 pct from five pct.     Under current law, the basic support prices for upland cotton, rice and soybeans between 1987 and 1990 cannot be cut below 50 cents per lb, 6.50 dlrs per hundredweight and 4.50 dlrs per bushel, respectively.     USDA\'s intention to propose scrapping price floors for cotton, rice and soybeans had not been disclosed previously.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union\'s recent corn purchases from the United States could total as much as 3.5 mln tonnes, U.S. Agriculture Undersecretary Daniel Amstutz said.     \"We are not sure how much (Soviets have bought) but we think it could be as high as 3.5 mln tonnes,\" Amstutz told a House Agriculture Appropriations Subcommittee.     He added that China also will need to import more corn this year than earlier anticipated, but he gave no figures.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union has been a heavy buyer of Yugoslav corn since October, purchasing close to 1.5 mln tonnes in the 1986/87 marketing year, according to a report from the U.S. agriculture counselor in Belgrade.     Approximately 1.5 mln tonnes of Yugoslav corn have already been committed to foreign buyers for 1986/87, with most of this sold to the Soviet Union, the Yugoslav Grain Association reported to the U.S. official.     In a report dated March 10, the official said that about 800,000 tonnes of the corn has been delivered, with the balance of 700,000 tonnes to be shipped between now and June.     An additional 500,000 tonnes of corn can be shipped from July-September, the grain associaiton said, so total Yugoslav corn exports could reach 2.0 mln tonnes, the counselor said.     Heavier than normal monthly shipping rates for Yugoslav corn exports are due to the increased use of river barges for exporting corn to the Soviet Union, the counselor said.     Monthly corn shipments out of Yugoslavia have averaged around 160,000 tonnes since October 1, higher than earlier estimates of 150,000, the official said.     The Soviet Union has taken an increased share of Yugoslav corn sales during this marketing year, he said.  \n',grain
'The Soviet Union will likely honor its commitment with the United States to buy a minimum of four mln tonnes of corn this year, an Agriculture Department official said.     \"They have always honoured the agreement, and there\'s no reason now to think they won\'t this year,\" he tolds.     \"They have an aggressive buying campaign from the European Community, from Canada, from the U.S. They\'re active buyers from all sources at this point,\" the official said in explaining why the Department raised its Soviet grain imports estimate today by three mln tonnes to 26 mln tonnes.     This is a dramatic shift from just a few months ago when analysts were saying the USSR might not buy any U.S. corn for the first time in 15 years.     A drawdown of corn supplies in China and Argentina, concern over Soviet winter crops, and increasing competition for U.S. corn were all cited as possible factors in creating Moscow\'s recent interest.     Lower corn production prospects in some major supplying countries have stirred activity from big buyers such as Japan, and the Soviets are also closely watching the situation, the official said.     \"The Soviets will try to out-capitalize the capitalists\" and buy corn before prices get too high, the official said. \"As soon as they need corn, they\'ll buy it,\" he added.     USDA has confirmed one mln tonnes of corn sold to the Soviet Union, but both U.S. and Soviet analysts have said the purchases stand at 1.5 mln tonnes.     The USDA official would not speculate on when the Soviets would enter the U.S. market again.     \"There has definitely been an evolving mind set -- from the situation of slow grain buying a couple months ago to one of frenetic buying now,\" the official said.     However, the situation in wheat is \"a different story,\" he said. Greater world supplies of wheat, heavier Soviet purchase commitments and less competitive U.S. wheat prices make Soviet purchases of U.S. wheat less likely, he said.     Speculation has continued for several days that the U.S. is considering making an export bonus wheat subsidy offer to the Soviets, but U.S. officials have provided no confirmation.   \n',grain
'The Reagan administration continues to debate whether to offer subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union, but would need assurances from the Soviets that they would buy the wheat before the subsidy offer would be made, a senior U.S. Agriculture Department official said.     \"I think it still is under active debate whether or not it would be advisable\" to make an the export enhancement offer to the Soviets, Thomas Kay, administrator of the department\'s Foreign Agriculture Service, tolds.     \"We\'d need some assurances from them (the Soviets) that they would buy if offered\" the wheat under the subsidy plan, he said. Kay called reports that such an offer was imminent \"premature.\"     The Reagan administration\'s cabinet-level Economic Policy Council is set to meet today to discuss, among other matters, agricultural policy but is not expected to address a wheat subsidy offer to the Soviet Union, administration officials said earlier.  \n',grain
'Grain trade representatives continued to speculate that the Reagan administration will offer subsidized wheat to the Soviet Union, while U.S. Agriculture Department officials said there was no substance to the reports.     \"It\'s pure fiction,\" said one senior official at USDA\'s Foreign Agricultural Service, referring to the rumor that the administration would make an export enhancement offer to Moscow in the next two to three weeks.     An aide to Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng who asked not to be identified said there was nothing to substantiate the speculation, which he said was started by \"somebody fanning the (wheat) market.\" Wheat futures strengthened today, partly on the basis of the speculation.     One lobbyist with close connections to the Reagan administration said a Soviet trade team told private grain trade officials in New York last week that Moscow would buy as much as four mln tonnes of U.S. wheat, much of it before mid-year, if it was \"competitively priced.\"     Alexander Ivlev, an official with Amtorg, a Soviet trading organization, tolds he had no information to substantiate the rumors of an imminent wheat subsidy offer, but said that Moscow \"would consider\" buying U.S. wheat if it was competitively priced.     \"We don\'t care if it is EEP, what we (the Soviets) are looking for is competitive prices,\" Ivlev said. \"If they (the administration) are interested in selling it (wheat), they should find ways to do it.\"  \n',grain
'Vietnam has ordered its army to grow more food to ease shortages and meet economic recovery goals set for 1990.     The army newspaper Quan Doi Nhan Dan, monitored here, said soldiers must work harder to care for rice, vegetables and other crops endangered by the present unusually hot weather.     The paper said the 1.6-mln strong regular army contributed less than one pct to the nation\'s 18.2 mln tonne food output.     North Vietnam has set a 1990 food target of 23 to 24 mln tonnes.  \n',grain
'Unfavorable late winter weather conditions in the main wheat growing areas of Yugoslavia indicate dimmed prospects for the emerging winter wheat crop, the U.S. embassy\'s agricultural officer in Belgrade said.     The officer, who travelled through an area from Belgrade to Subotica, said in a field report dated March 27 the wheat crop had been set back at least three weeks because of a cold spell that followed a period of warm weather.     He said unseasonably warm weather in late February that brought the wheat crop out of winter dormancy early was followed by three weeks of unusually cold weather.     Damaging effects were seen in the fields, most of which show stands with a yellow-brown cast indicating extensive leaf and possible root damage from repeated freezings, he said.     The report said that since much of the early growth in February was from late seeding rather than from normal development, his view was that the damage may be more extensive than some local observers say.     The most seriously affected fields were late-seeded fields on normal maize soils. Stands in these fields were thin and chances of recovery appeared less favorable, he said.     However, he said soil moisture conditions were favorable and many of the fields had already been top-dressed, which would aid recovery.  \n',grain
'Winter kill has probably affected West German winter barley and rapeseed to an above average degree this season, West German grain trader Alfred C. Toepfer said in its latest report.     It is too soon to assess the extent of the damage, but it is likely that northern West German crops are particularly at risk because of insufficient snow cover, it said.     The soil needs to warm up rapidly and moisture content must improve to avoid further delays to spring field work, it added.  \n',grain
'Western Canada\'s resource-based economy is being hurt by international market forces and there is little Ottawa can do about it, Finance Minister Michael Wilson said.     \"If you can tell me how we can get the international energy price up and how we can get the price for copper up and how we can get the price for wheat up, then we will listen,\" Wilson told the House of Comnons Finance Committee.     Although under pressure from oil companies and wheat farmers for help in battling depressed commodity prices, Wilson said it has to be recognized the area was a \"prisoner of market forces outside the boundaries of this country.\"     Wilson, appearing before the committee to discuss the government\'s spending estimates released earlier this week, said the government is doing what it can in the region, citing more than 3.5 billion dlrs in aid for western agriculture.     \"Those resources are a reflection of very real concerns on our part in dealing with a very difficult problem,\" Wilson said in response to questions about management of the economy from opposition party members.     He said the long term answer for depressed regions of the country was reaching a free trade pact with the United States, which he claimed would improve the outlook for Western Canada.  \n',grain
'Shifts from mild to very cold weather in East Germany damaged winter barley and late sown winter wheat in central regions and barley north of Berlin, the U.S. agricultural officer in East Berlin said.     In a field report, the officer said indications were that winter kill might well be more than 100,000 hectares compared with 38,000 last year.     He said the damage was probably more limited in southern and central regions and most widespread in the north.     Damage was most severe on plants above the ground where little or no snow cover was present, he added.     The officer said heavy frosts at night followed by sunshine during the day led to some heaving, particularly for well developed plants and for winter barley.     Furthermore, as the ground surface thawed, some standing water occurred in the fields.     The officer said repairing damage will probably call for special measures this spring in fields with damaged plants and where stands are thin. Harrowing, as well as well-timed applications of nitrogen, will be necessary, he added.  \n',grain
'World grain trade could be turning the corner and heading toward recovery in the 1986-87 season, a Cargill, Inc. analyst said.     Writing in the March issue of the Cargill Bulletin, David Rogers of Cargill\'s Commodity Marketing Division cited a gradual rise in world wheat trade in recent months, with a slow rise in wheat prices after recent historic lows.     He said the wheat trade, because wheat can be produced in many nations, is a good barometer of world grain trade and could lead to more activity in other grain markets.     Rogers said that with world grain prices at their lowest level in over a quarter of a century in real terms, demand has begun to rise while producing nations are re-examining their expensive price-support policies and reducing planted acres.  \n',grain
'There was no evidence of winterkill in Yugoslavian winter wheat during field travel along a line running northwest from Belgrade to near Maribor, the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s counselor in Belgrade said in a field report.     The report, dated February 26, said there is evidence of delayed germination in most areas due to late seeding last fall because of dry conditions.     However warm temperatures over the past three weeks have promoted some early growth and will help the crop catch up on last fall\'s late seeding, it said.     Some Yugoslav agriculture officials are concerned about the situation because warm temperatures have brought the grain out of dormancy and taken away snow protection a little early, the report said.     Cold temperatures over the next month could cause damage under these conditions, they said.     The report said all wheat farmers contacted during the field trip were optimistic about the crop and the way it emerged from winter.  \n',grain
'Zaire has been authorized to purchase about 30,000 tonnes of U.S. rice under an existing PL 480 agreement, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     It may buy the rice, valued at 5.5 mln dlrs, between March 31 and August 31, 1987, and ship it from U.S. ports by September 30, the department said.     The purchase authorization covers the entire quantity of rice provided under the agreement.  \n',grain
'Zambia\'s marketed maize production will probably fall to less than 630,000 tonnes in 1986/87 (May-Apr), from 918,000 last year, because of poor rainfall in major producing areas, Agriculture Minister Kingsley Chinkuli said.     He told Parliament that in the southern provinces the harvest would be over 50 pct down on the level in the previous marketing year.     \"The nation would be lucky to produce over seven mln bags (630,000 tonnes) of maize this year,\" he stated.     Chinkuli added that Zambia was setting up an irrigation fund with Canadian aid to lessen the effects of poor rainfall.  \n',grain
'The American Pork Congress kicks off tomorrow, March 3, in Indianapolis with 160 of the nations pork producers from 44 member states determining industry positions on a number of issues, according to the National Pork Producers Council, NPPC.     Delegates to the three day Congress will be considering 26 resolutions concerning various issues, including the future direction of farm policy and the tax law as it applies to the agriculture sector. The delegates will also debate whether to endorse concepts of a national PRV (pseudorabies virus) control and eradication program, the NPPC said.     A large trade show, in conjunction with the congress, will feature the latest in technology in all areas of the industry, the NPPC added.  \n',livestock
'The National Pork Producers Council, NPPC, announced at this year\'s American Pork Congress, APC, that the Congress and trade show will be divided into two parts in 1988.     Next years APC, held in Atlanta, will be a business session only and will continue to be the first week of March.     The trade show is being changed into a new international event called the World Pork Expo. The first expo will be held in June 1988 in Des Moines with an expanded format, they said.     Executive vice-president Orville Sweet said the decision to spilt the show and Congress came about because there are producers who never get to see the trade show floor.     \"It makes sense that we divide the business session from the trade show,\" Sweet said.  \n',livestock
'Australian beef output is forecast to decline to 1.34 mln tonnes carcass weight in 1987 and 1.36 mln in 1988 from 1.44 mln in 1986, the Australian Meat and Live-Stock Corp (AMLC) said.     Exports of beef/veal are also predicted to decline to 480,000 tonnes shipped weight in 1987 from 515,000 in 1986, and then rally to 490,000 in 1988, the AMLC said in a summary of its bi-annual meat and livestock forecasts.     It sees cattle numbers remaining at around the 1986 level of 23.2 mln beasts in both years because herd rebuilding is expected to be slower than previously forecast.     Beef producers are becoming more confident that higher returns in the market, both domestically and overseas, will continue, the AMLC said.     The slow herd build-up and the forecast lower production is expected to bring about a slight drop in both export and domestic consumption this year, it said.     The forecast does not assume a turnaround in production levels until late next year.     It said the outlook for beef exports as a proportion of output remains much the same as last year when it was around 55 pct of total production. In 1985 it was 52 pct.     The increase in exports of beef as a percentage of production has mainly been attributed to the decline in the Australian dollar, the AMLC said.     It also forecast that Australia\'s four major markets, the U.S., Japan, Canada and Taiwan, will continue to dominate the chilled and frozen beef export markets. They take collectively around 94 pct of total Australian exports.  \n',livestock
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover the sale of 380 head of dairy cattle to Kuwait, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The dairy cattle are for shipment on or before May 31, 1987, it said.     The bonus of 1,465.00 dlrs per head was made to American Marketing Services, Inc, and will be paid in the form of commodities from the CCC inventory, it said.     An additional 761 head of dairy cattle are still available to Gulf countries (kuwait, Bahrain, Oman, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced October 30, 1986, it said.  \n',livestock
'The Commodity Credit Corporation has accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover the sale of 760 head of dairy cattle to Egypt, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The delivery period for the cattle is April, 1987-June, 1988, it said.     The bonus of 1,870.00 dlrs per head was made to Esmah Nevada Inc and will be paid in the form of commodities from the CCC inventory.     An additional 7,199 head of dairy cattle are still available to Egypt under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced September 12, 1986, the department said.  \n',livestock
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted a bonus offer from an exporter on the sale of 13 head of dairy cattle to Morocco, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the bonus awarded was 1,505.00 dlrs per head and was made to Brown Swiss Enterprises Inc. It will be paid in the form of commodities from CCC inventories.     The cattle are for delivery during March 9-September 30, 1987.     The department said the purchase completes the Export Enhancement Program initiative for dairy cattle to Morocco announced on April 16, 1986.  \n',livestock
'The U.S. Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has accepted a bid for an export bonus to cover a sale of 186 head of dairy cattle to Egypt, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the cattle are for delivery May 7-June 7, 1987, and the bonus awarded was 1,888.06 dlrs per head.     The bonus was made to First Interstate Trading Co and will be paid to the exporter in the form of commodities from CCC stocks, the department said.     An additional 7,959 head of dairy cattle are still available to Egypt under the Export Enhancement Program initiative announced September 12, 1986, it said.  \n',livestock
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has accepted a bonus offer from an exporter on the sale of 75 head of dairy cattle to the Canary Islands, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the bonus awarded was 1,459.00 dlrs per head and was made to T.K. International Inc. It will be paid in the form of commodities from the inventory of CCC stocks.     The cattle are for delivery during March-June, 1987, it said.     An additional 3,925 head of dairy cattle are still available to the Canary Islands under the Export Enahcnement Program initiative announced July 28, 1986, it said.  \n',livestock
'Over 750,000 head of cattle are suffering the effects of a severe shortage of feed as a result of a prolonged drought in the normally rich sugar and cattle producing province of Camaguey, the newspaper Granma reported.     The province produces 23 pct of Cuba\'s beef and is the island\'s number two province in milk production. Granma said 20,000 head of cattle are now in imminent danger.     The newspaper said a \"cattle emergency\" had been decreed and the cattle are being rounded up.     Some 110,000 head have been transferred to the sugar cane conditioning centers where newly harvested cane is cleaned before being sent to the mills. The cattle are being fed the residue left after cleaning the cane stalks. 32,000 head have been sent to nearby provinces of Las Tunas and Ciego de Avila.     Despite Cuba\'s ambitous cattle development plans, beef rationing has been in effect over the past 25 years. In Havana, each Cuban receives approximately 3/4 lb of rationed beef every 18 days.     In a major area hit by drought, San Miguel, practically no rain has fallen in the past 14 months. Grazing lands are parched and the region was unable to produce 117,000 tonnes of silage projected in its annual plan.     Granma said rainfall over the past year has been less than 50 pct of normal precipitation.  \n',livestock
'The 350 mln Ecu three-year package of social and structural measures agreed early today by European Community farm ministers features a plan to compensate farmers for reducing output of certain surplus products, EC Commission sources said.     The ministers agreed that under this \"extensification\" scheme, farmers would qualify for compensation if they cut output of specific products by at least 20 pct.     The plan would initially apply to cereals, beef, veal and wine, they added.     Cereals farmers would have to achieve their output cuts by reducing acreage, while cattle farmers would reduce their number of head and vinegrowers would cut yield. In each case, farmers would have to undertake not to step up their capacity for output of other products which are in surplus in the EC.     The sources said payment levels have not yet been fixed but will be designed to compensate farmers for loss of profit on the production they forego.     The sources said the package also contains provisions for payments to farmers who embark on a program aimed at protecting or improving the environment.     It would also mean compensatory allowances in less favoured farming areas would be extended to crops. At present such allowances are available only for livestock.     The package would provide 20 mln Ecus for research into alternative farming techniques, the sources added.     At a news conference EC Farm Commissioner Frans Andriessen said the Commission is also working on proposals to enable the EC and member states to provide direct income supports for relatively poor farmers.     Andriessen did not give full details, but said member state aid would be subject to \"strict criteria to avoid distortion of competition.\"     EC payments would aim to help farmers to survive a difficult period while the EC tackles the problems of surplus production.     The Commission withdrew from the package agreed last night proposals to pay \"early retirement\" pensions to farmers aged 55 or over who gave up production. Those who took their land completely out of farm production, rather than passing it on to their heirs, would have received more generous payments.     Andriessen said the Commission plans to present revised proposals along these lines in an effort to get a scheme agreed.  \n',livestock
'Haiti\'s agriculture minister yesterday announced his department will permit the importation of 730 black Creole pigs, which had been banned from the island nation since 1983.     Between 1981 and 1983, a team of Canadian veterinarians funded by the United States, Canada, Mexico and Costa Rica supervised the slaughter of all Haiti\'s 1,200,000 pigs under a program to eradicate African swine flu.     Today\'s announcement that Catholic Relief Services (CARITAS) can import 730 Jamaican pigs comes after months of protests by farmers who had owned 90 pct of the slaughtered pigs.  \n',livestock
'World animal health experts called for a campaign to eradicate the lethal cattle disease Rinderpest in Bangladesh, Bhutan, India, Nepal and Pakistan, a statement from a Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO) meeting here said.     Some 230 mln dlrs is needed over two years to vaccinate the entire susceptible cattle population in Bangladesh and Pakistan and high-risk areas of the other three countries. In India some 240 mln cattle are estimated to be at risk from the disease.     The experts recommended the campaign be funded mostly by the governments of the five nations, with help from the FAO. Similar campaigns are needed in Egypt, Yemen, Iraq and Iran.  \n',livestock
'International Minerals and Chemical Corp said its board approved a 50 mln dlrs budget over the next several years to build production facilities for a newly developed product to be used to improve the lean weight of hogs.     The new product, porcine somatotropin (PST) is described as a natural bio-synthetic protein that improves the lean weight and rate of weight gain, as well as reduces the cost of feed for market hogs, the company said.     Specific details of the PST production project, including sites for proposed facilities and engineering plans, were not disclosed. International Minerals said it set a completion target for the spring of 1989, by which time necessary Food and Drug Administration approvals are expected to be obtained.  \n',livestock
'Japan\'s plan to cut beef intervention prices for the fiscal year starting April 1 will not boost demand because of strict supply controls and a complex distribution system, Japanese and U.S. Industry sources said.     \"Government beef policy protects farmers rather than meeting consumers\' demands and the cutback ... Is too marginal,\" a Housewives Association of Japan official said.     Despite mounting U.S. Pressure on Japan to open farm markets, beef is strictly controlled by the government, which maintains a price stabilisation zone to protect farmers.     Under the plan, expected to be announced this month, the standard or bottom price of castrated wagyu -- known as marbled beef -- will be set at 1,370 yen per kilo for 1987/88 against 1,400 now, and the ceiling at 1,780 yen against 1,820.     The standard price of other beef, mainly produced from dairy steers, is set at 1,020 yen against 1,090 and the ceiling at 1,325 against 1,420.     Ministry officials said the semi-government Livestock Industry Promotion Corp (LIPC) conducts buffer stock operations to help keep wholesale beef prices within the intervention price zone.     The LIPC is allowed to import most beef, with the amount set by the government under a quota system. When wholesale prices go above the ceiling, the LIPC releases its beef stocks, both domestic and imported, and buys locally produced beef when prices are below.     But the LIPC has often been criticised for releasing beef stocks when the prices are higher than the ceiling.     Phillip Seng, Asian Director of the U.S. Meat Export Federation, tolds the two pct cut in prices is a step toward closing the gap with European Community prices, about half those in Japan.     But Seng said the cut will not benefit consumers or U.S. Meat exporters because of Japan\'s rigid and complicated distribution system and strict supply control by the LIPC.     The Housewives Association official said retail beef prices are high mainly because of distribution problems and high production costs, as well as poor operations by the LIPC.     American meat packers see Japan as a promising market. F.C. Beatty, of U.S. Packer John Morrell and Co, told the Japan Times beef cuts, which sell for 1.20 to 3.00 dlrs a pound in the U.S., Are sold at 15 to 30 dlrs in Japan.     But Seng said the cut will not benefit consumers or U.S. Meat exporters because of Japan\'s rigid and complicated distribution system and strict supply control by the LIPC.     The Housewives Association official said retail beef prices are high mainly because of distribution problems and high production costs, as well as poor operations by the LIPC.     American meat packers see Japan as a promising market. F.C. Beatty, of U.S. Packer John Morrell and Co, told the Japan Times beef cuts, which sell for 1.20 to 3.00 dlrs a pound in the U.S., Are sold at 15 to 30 dlrs in Japan.     But industry sources said it is unclear how much demand will pick up if retail beef prices drop following any sharp reduction in intervention prices.     U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said this week he will ask Japan to remove all beef import restrictions when he visits here next month.     In 1984, Japan decided to increase its beef import quota by 9,000 tonnes a year until March 31, 1988.     In 1987/88, the quota will rise to 177,000 tonnes from 168,000 in 1986/87, ministry officials said, adding Japan wants to keep self-sufficiency in beef at around 70 pct.  \n',livestock
'The Agriculture Ministry is expected to reduce official intervention prices for beef and pork in 1987/88 starting in April, but the cutback ratio has not been set yet, industry sources said.     Production prices, the basis for setting intervention prices, have been falling because of declining compound feed prices due to low coarse grain import prices, they said.     Last November an advisory panel urged the government to work on reducing officially set high farm product prices to levels closer to international values, the sources added.     In Japan the government maintains a price stabilisation zone system for beef and pork to support domestic producers.     The stabilisation zone is kept by the semi-government Livestock Industry Promotion Corp (LIPC) through a buffer stock operation in the wholesale market.     The 1987/88 beef and pork price stabilisation zone will be set by the end of March after an advisory panel to the Agriculture Ministry recommends the price zone at a meeting on March 25, ministry officials said. At present, the standard or bottom price of castrated wagyu beef, known as marbled beef, is 1,400 yen per kilo, while its ceiling is 1,820, they said.     The standard price of other beef, mainly produced from dairy steers, is now 1,090 yen per kilo and the ceiling is 1,420, the officials said. The pork standard price is now 540 yen per kilo and the ceiling 760.     They said the domestic beef intervention price influences imported beef selling prices on the domestic market.     Japan sets an annual beef import quota. A semi-government body imports most of this and releases it to wholesalers or processors in line with the standard price of other beef categories in an attempt to avoid jeoparadising domestic beef prices, they said.  \n',livestock
'Japan\'s Livestock Industry Promotion Corp (LIPC) said that on April 28 it will import 7,515 tonnes of beef for the first half of the 1987 fiscal year started on April 1 under the simultaneous buy and sell tender system, against 6,813 a year ago.     The system calls on the agency to buy beef from trading houses and simultaneously sell it to users in one tender. The tender quota in April-September is 10 pct of the agency\'s beef import share. Japan\'s beef import quota in 1987/88 was set at 93,000 tonnes against 85,000 for the same period in 1986/87.  \n',livestock
'The USDA monthly cold storage report for meats is expected to have little, if any, effect on livestock and meat futures at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange Monday and daily fundamentals will likely provide the bulk of direction, livestock analysts said.     The increase of 66.4 mln lbs in total poultry offsets the 22.6 mln lbs decline in total red meats. Fundamentals may provide most of the direction in futures on Monday, they said.     \"I think the market is going to be looking at some other things and accentuate whatever the action of cash markets might be early next week,\" Jerry Gidel, livestock analyst for GH Miller, said.     Shearson Lehman livestock analyst Chuck Levitt said futures will be in the shadow of a little larger seasonal hog marketings pace next week. Also, Easter ham business was completed this week and there may be less aggressive interest for pork in general next week.     \"We needed some help from the cold storage report to avert a possible setback next week in the pork complex,\" Levitt said.     Analysts agreed with CME floor traders and called the belly figure neutral to slightly negative. Although belly stocks were down 33 pct from last year, they exceeded the average expectation and actually showed a lighter than expected decline from last month due to an adjustment to last month\'s holdings, they said.     However, analysts noted that the amount of bellies put in storage has been light since the beginning of March and this is a potentially bullish situation.     Glenn Grimes, agronomist at the University of Missouri, said, \"I would not look for (belly) storage during the next month or two to be heavier than a year ago - I think it will be less.\"  \n',livestock
'Delegates to the American Pork Congress will decide whether or not they want mandatory production controls when they vote on the official pork producer policy wednesday, the National Pork Producers Council said.     The American Pork Congress, APC, delegates, listened to both sides of the question when former Iowa Congressman Berkley Bedell and Bill Lesher, USDA Assistant Secretary for Economics for the years 1981 to 1985 debated at the convention in Indianapolis.  \n',livestock
'Congressmen from beef producing states and representatives of the U.S. livestock industry  urged the Reagan administration to press Japan and South Korea to open up their markets to imports of beef.     Testifying at a House subcommittee hearing on livestock issues, Rep. Hal Daub (R-Nebr.), said the administration should push hard for greater beef imports by Japan and South Korea. Daub was joined by several other lawmakers.     U.S. assistant trade representative Suzanne Earley, replied \"we\'re not going to let Japan off the hook, or Korea.\" She noted trade representative Clayton Yeutter met with a senior Korean official last week on the beef issue, and that Yeutter and Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng will visit Tokyo in April for discussions on farm trade issues.     Japan maintains a quota on beef imports, set at 58,400 tonnes high quality beef in fiscal 1987. South Korea has banned beef imports but there are indications Seoul may bow to U.S. pressure and allow some imports soon, industry officials said.     In testimony today, Tom Cook, director of industry affairs for the National Cattlemens Association said \"the Congress, administration and the industry must take a strong, tough and united stand to impress the Japanese that we mean business and that we expect them to open their markets.\"  \n',livestock
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said he would not agree to an extension of the 18-month whole dairy herd buyout program set to expire later this year.     Speaking at the Agriculture Department to representatives of the U.S. National Cattlemen\'s Association, Lyng said some dairymen asked the program be extended.     But he said the Reagan administration, which opposed the whole herd buyout program in the 1985 farm bill, would not agree to an extension.     The program begun in early 1986, is to be completed this summer. U.S. cattlemen bitterly opposed the scheme, complaining that increased dairy cow slaughter drove cattle prices down last year.  \n',livestock
'Delegates from the National Pork Producers Council, NPPC, yesterday approved programs for control and eradication of pseudorabies and establishment of a national safe drug use program.     The delegate body, attending the American Pork Congress in Indianapolis, approved a pseudorabies control and eradication program at the state level after a recommendation from NPPC\'s PRV (pseudorabies virus) oversight committee.     The PRV committee received results of a three year, five state pilot project which had a 97.5 pct success rate in eradication of the disease within 116 hog herds. The project was jointly funded by the USDA and NPPC.     \"Primarily it (the program) allows individual states to deal with their own problems according to a timetable that suits them best,\" Mike Wehler, member of the NPPC\'s PRV oversight committee said.     In regards to safe drug use, the delegates approved a plan asking that NPPC be active in establishing a national safe drug use program.     The program would establish better relationships between producers and veterinarians and eventually lead to a quality assurance program in pork production, according to the plan.     \"This program basically communicates to the FDA that we are concerned about safe drug use and will do our part to use drugs safely, if FDA will allow the same policy to continue in effect,\" Wehler said.  \n',livestock
'The National Pork Board announced at the American Pork Congress convention in Indianapolis that refunds under the legislative checkoff program are running less than expected.     The Board oversees collection and distribution of funds from the checkoff program that was mandated by the 1985 farm bill. Virgil Rosendale, a pork producer from Illinois and chairman of the National Pork Board, said over 2.2 mln dlrs was collected in January and refunds are running almost nine pct, considerably less than expected.     \"We believe that this indicates good producer support for the new checkoff. We\'re getting good compliance from markets, from packers and from dealers,\" Rosendale said.  \n',livestock
'Delegates from the National Pork Producers Council, NPPC, attending the American Pork Congress in Indianapolis, voted overwhelmingly to recommend the U.S. congress not to change the farm bill. While there are no specific pork items in that legislation, feed grain prices directly affect pork producer profits, the NPPC said.     Don Gingerich, a delegate from Iowa, said \"to have unpredictable changes come along periodically makes it very difficult to plan and causes a lot of disruption.\"     Other members said the farm bill has some imperfections but that\'s a price pork producers are willing to pay for legislative stability, an NPPC spokesman said.     Delegates also passed unanimously a resolution that Congress and the administration should act swiftly to identify problems in the farm credit system.     Farm Credit Task Force chairman and newly elected Vice President of the NPPC Ray Hankes, said delegates wanted a program that all commodity groups can work with and bring a  resolution to this problem with legislators in Washington.     Hankes added that the National Pork Producers Council will work to save farmers and keep credit available, but not to save or create any one credit system.   \n',livestock
'Livestock analysts expect renewed bull spreading in live cattle futures following yesterday\'s USDA 7-state cattle on feed report.     The USDA reported high placements in February, which may weigh on back months of cattle futures. Meanwhile, continued strong marketings during the month will support the April contract.     Contracts for June delivery forward could open 25 to 50 cents lower while April will likely open about steady, analysts said.     Cheap corn is still the main incentive for putting cattle on feed, according to Smith Barney livestock analyst Tom O\'Hare. \"They have no place to send the grain,\" he said.     Strong daily fundamentals may add to nearby support while the current discount of deferred months to the cash market may offset much of the effect of the report, analysts said.     \"The cash market is strong and may overshadow the report,\" said Robin Fuller, analyst for Agri Analysis. She added that even though placements came in above the average trade guess, many traders had expected high placements.     Placements are not that negative, especially since the technical correction in June and August live cattle futures since last week, GH Miller analyst Jerry Gidel said.     He said the current marketing posture will provide added support to the nearby month. Feedlot marketings have been running at a heavier than expected pace.     Chuck Levitt, analyst for Shearson Lehman said that with the number of cattle on feed down five pct at the beginning of the year, a three pct decline in marketings was expected. But the report for January showed marketings at 101 pct of a year ago and in February marketings were at 100 pct, Levitt noted.     \"So far we haven\'t seen any decline in marketings. They (feedlot operators) are marketing more cattle than they had intended for the first quarter, which is a bullish development,\" Levitt said.     Gidel also noted that marketings for the early part of March are running ahead of a year ago. Feedlots are not falling behind and are holding that 100 pct marketing pace.  \n',livestock
'The National Weather Service said a powerful winter storm centered over north central Oklahoma was spreading snow from western and central Kansas across much of Nebraska to southern and eastern South Dakota.     Rain was reported across parts of Minnesota, Iowa, eastern Kansas, Missouri and eastern Oklahoma, with showers and a few thundershowers extending from Arkansas through the lower Mississippi Valley to Alabama and northwest Florida.     Strong winds of 20 to 35 mph with some stronger gusts were reported across much of the Plains, causing considerable blowingand drifting snow. A blizzard warning continued this morning across most of western Kansas. A winter storm warning was issued this morning over central and northeast Nebraska.     Weather advisories were posted for this morning over central Kansas and central and southeast sections of South Dakota where two to five inches of snow could accumulate.     Locally heavy rains accompanied the storm over portions of the central Plains. Flash flood watches were issued for this morning across the eastern half of Kansas.     A flood warning continues today for eastern Nebraska. Widespread lowland and small stream flooding is expected to continue over most of eastern Nebraska through Wednesday.     Due to cold, damp and windy conditions, livestock advisories were posted this morning across central and southeast portions of South Dakota.     As the storm moves north across the central Plains, winter storm watches were issued over south central South Dakota, late tonight and Wednesday over west central Minnesota.     Elsewhere, a travelers advisory remains in effect this morning over northeast New Mexico and the Oklahoma and Tecas Panhandle for blowing snow and slick roadways and across the mountains and deserts of southern California for strong gusty winds of 25 to 40 mph. Gale warnings were issued for today along the central California Coast.     Mostly clear skies extended from the Great Lakes and Ohio Valley through the central Appalachians to the central Atlantic Coast and New England.  \n',livestock
'U.S. factory usage of lard in the production of both edible and inedible products during February totaled 22.0 mln lbs, vs a revised 20.2 mln lbs in January, according to Census Bureau figures.     In the year-earlier period, usage, which includes hydrogenated vegetable and animal fats and other oils in process, amounted to 31.4 mln lbs.     Usage in February comprised 16.6 mln lbs of edible products and 5.4 mln lbs of inedible products.     Total lard usage in the 1986/87 marketing season, which began October 1, amounted to 125.2 mln lbs, vs 185.6 mln lbs in the year-ago period.  \n',livestock
'The American Meat Institute, AME, said it intended to ask the U.S. government to retaliate against a European Community meat inspection requirement.     AME President C. Manly Molpus also said the industry would file a petition challenging Korea\'s ban of U.S. meat products.     Molpus told a Senate Agriculture subcommittee that AME and other livestock and farm groups intended to file a petition under Section 301 of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade against an EC directive that, effective April 30, will require U.S. meat processing plants to comply fully with EC standards.     \n',livestock
'Four U.S. meat processors have asked the federal government to relax a labelling requirement which they said discourages the use of mechanically separated meat, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The petition, filed by Bob Evans Farms, Odom Sausage Co, Sara Lee Corp and Owens Country Sausage, asks USDA to allow mechanically separated meat to be listed on product labels as the species from which it was derived.     For example, \"pork\" would be listed on the ingredients statement instead of \"mechanically separated pork.\"     Under the petition, the calcium content of the meat product would have to be stated on the label and the mechanically separated meat could constitute no more than 10 pct of the meat and poultry portion of the product.     Mechanically separated meat is a high-protein, low-cost product that has been approved for use since 1978, USDA said.     Current regulations allow use of mechanically separated ingredients at levels up to 20 pct of the meat and poultry product, but require it to be listed in the ingredient statement as \"mechanically separated (species),\" USDA said.     USDA said the petitioning firms claimed companies avoid using mechanically separated meat in their products because the term carries an \"unwarranted negative connotation\" in the minds of many consumers. The petitioners also noted that no similar regulation exists for poultry products.     Mechanically separated meat is made by placing carcass parts, which usually have been hand-trimmed but still have some remaining meat, into specialized processing equipment.  \n',livestock
'U.S. factory production of inedible tallow and grease amounted to 421.5 mln lbs in February, vs a revised 471.5 mln lbs the previous month and 419.2 mln lbs in the year-ago period, the Census Bureau said.     The bureau placed February factory production of edible tallow at 96.9 mln lbs, vs a revised 111.4 mln lbs the previous month and 122.7 mln lbs in February a year earlier.     It estimated factory and warehouse stocks of inedible tallow on February 28 at 410.7 mln lbs, vs a revised 351.6 mln the previous month and 361.9 mln in February, 1986.     End-Feb stocks of edible tallow amounted to 41.9 mln lbs, vs a revised 40.1 mln lbs and 48.6 mln lbs in their respective periods.     Factory consumption of inedible tallow and grease in February was assessed at 238.3 mln lbs, vs a revised 250.4 mln lbs a month earlier and 220.5 mln lbs in the year-ago period.     During February, factories used 65.3 mln lbs of edible tallow, vs a revised 71.8 mln and 84.6 mln, respectively.     Total factory production and consumption of tallow in the 1987 marketing season, which began Jan 1, vs the 1986 season, were as follows, in mln lbs --    Production -- 1987     1986     Inedible    893.0    920.1       Edible    208.3    274.7  Consumption --     Inedible    488.7    473.7       Edible    137.1    176.4  \n',livestock
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng will ask the Japanese Government to remove all beef import restrictions when he visits there next month.     Lyng\'s remarks came in a speech at Oklahoma State University today.     \"We think Japanese consumers should have the same freedom of choice as our consumers. Look at all the Japanese cameras and tape recorders in this room. We know they\'d buy more beef if they had the opportunity,\" Lyng said.  \n',livestock
'The U.S. Agriculture Department proposes to rename the \"USDA Good\" grade of beef to \"USDA Select.\"     The department said the proposed change is in response to a petition from Public Voice for Food and Health Policy and would present a more positive image of this grade of beef and help calorie-conscious consumers select leaner cuts of meat.     Under current rules, the \"good\" grade of meat has less marbling and fat than the \"prime\" or \"choice\" grades, it said.     Standards for all of the grades would remain unchanged under the proposal.  \n',livestock
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said an estimated 8,700 head of dairy cattle were slaughtered during the week ending March 13 as a result of the Whole Herd Dairy Buyout program.     The cumulative total of cattle slaughtered under the program from April 1 through March 13 is estimated at 1,032,300 head, it said.     Cumulative meat purchases through March 27 total 376,897,330 lbs, the department said.     Dairy cattle reported for export under the program for the period April 1 through March 27 totaled an estimated 55,055 head, the department said.     Live cattle exports are in addition to the meat purchase requirements, the department said.  \n',livestock
'U.S. Agriculture Department animal health officials are conducting a national survey of live-bird markets and auctions to check for signs of avian influenza, an infectious viral disease of poultry, the department said.     The survey will locate poultry dealers and live-bird markets that sell live birds directly to the consumer and once the dealers and markets are identified, there will be tests to determine any past or present exposure to avian influenza viruses, it said.     In 1983-84, an outbreak of avian influenza in Pennsylvania, Maryland, Virginia and New Jersey cost taxpayers 65 mln dlrs to control and required the destruction of more than 17 mln birds, it said.     The survey is expected to be completed by April 15.  \n',livestock
'Zimbabwe has confirmed an outbreak of the animal-borne hoof-and-mouth disease, which prompted Botswana on Thursday to stop imports of almost all Zimbabwean meat products.     Agriculture Ministry Permanent Secretary Robbie Mupawose said it had been found at a ranch in southwestern Matabeleland province and that all measures were being taken to contain it from spreading. \"The effect of this outbreak on Zimbabwe\'s beef exports is being examined,\" he added in a statement.     Zimbabwe exports a wide range of meat products to neighbouring states and some 8,000 tonnes of high-grade beef to the European Community annually worth about 48 mln U.S. Dlrs.  \n',livestock
'Congress should give the U.S. Agriculture Secretary the authority to keep the 1987 soybean loan rate at the current effective rate of 4.56 dlrs per bushel in order to help resolve the problem of soybean export competitiveness, USDA undersecretary Dan Amstutz said.     Speaking to reporters following a Senate Agriculture Appropriations hearing, Amstutz suggested that one way out of the current soybean program \"dilemma\" would be for Congress to allow the loan rate to remain at 4.56 dlrs. He indicated if the loan rate were 4.56 dlrs, USDA could then consider ways to make U.S. soybeans more competitive such as using certificates to further buydown the loan rate.     Under current law, the 1987 soybean loan rate cannot be less than 4.77 dlrs per bu.     Amstutz\' suggestion would be for Congress to change the farm bill to allow USDA to leave the soybean loan rate at 4.56 dlrs in crop year 1987 rather than increase it to 4.77 dlrs.     The 1986 effective loan rate is 4.56 dlrs because of the 4.3 pct Gramm-Rudman budget cut.     Amstutz stressed that a major factor in any decision on soybean program changes will be the budget costs.     He told the hearing that the problem in soybeans is that the U.S. loan rate provides an \"umbrella\" to foreign production and causes competitive problems for U.S. soybeans.     Asked about the American Soybean Association\'s request for some form of income support, Amstutz said \"the competitive problem is the most severe.\" He said USDA is still studying the situation and \"no resolution\" has yet been found.  \n',oilseed
'France supports the European Commission\'s plans for a European Community (EC) fats and oils tax but objects to some of its oilseeds proposals, Yves Van Haecke, an aide to French agriculture minister Francois Guillaume said.     He told a general assembly of France\'s Oilseeds Federation (FFCOP) that a suppression of monthly increases of oilseed support prices, for example, was unacceptable.     French oilseeds experts added the principle of a single tax regardless of varying quality was clumsy and capable of unneccessarily alienating exporters such as the U.S.  \n',oilseed
'Argentine subproducts shipments during January/December 1986 totalled 5,618,315 tonnes, against 4,815,188 tonnes in the same period of 1985, the Argentine Grain Board said.     Breakdown was as follows: cotton 26,992 (41,933), sunflower 1,403,230 (1,190,862), linseed 261,600 (309,191), groundnutseed 23,595 (22,809), soybean 3,275,225 (2,415,492), bran/pollards wheat 606,352 (659,271), fiber cotton 3,256 (107,752), wheat flour 18,065 (67,878), rape nil (nil), the board added.     Shipments during December 1986 amounted to 418,755 tonnes, against 257,844 tonnes in the same month of 1985.     The breakdown, was as follows, in tonnes:     Cotton 3,002 (6,234), sunflower 86,612 (38,347), linseed 23,954 (38,290), groundnutseed nil (nil), soybean 264,650 (104,571), bran/polards wheat 37,724 (49,946), fiber cotton 987 (2,121), wheat flour 1,826 (18,335), rapeseed nil (nil), the board said.     The ten principal destinations during January/December 1986, with comparative figures for the same period of 1985 in brackets, were as follows, in tonnes:     Holland 2,444,260 (2,234,049), Belgium 546,423 (595,635), Italy 430,029 (338,766), Czechoslovakia 365,897 (236,836), Cuba 253,067 (222,842), Iran 250,646 (192,430), West Germany 232,049) (158,491), Bulgaria 207,030 (300,488), Spain and Canary Islands 176,287 (113,751), Corea 163,304 (37,416), the board added.  \n',oilseed
'The West German government expressed support for the U.S. Position in opposing the proposed European Community tax on vegetable oils and fats, a U.S. Embassy spokesman said.     The spokesman, speaking from Bonn, said, \"We have good reason to think West Germany holds to its resistance to the proposed tax.\"     Several top government officials told the American Soybean Association and the National Soybean Processors Association delegations there was no reason for American producers and processors to pay for EC agriculture, the spokesman said.     European agriculture was facing severe problems, but both the Community and the U.S. Should work closely within the framework provided by the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, he said.     The delegations will continue their top level meetings in Bonn today but will not issue a statement before returning to the U.S. At the weekend.     The EC and the U.S. Realised the tax issue would stay on the agenda for several months and there were indications that both sides would have to prepare for some tough negotiations, the spokesman said.  \n',oilseed
'Brazil\'s soybean harvest was 13 pct complete by March 20, the Safras e Mercado newsletter said.     This compares with an historic average for this time of year of 20 pct.     The newsletter gave the following figures for the progress of the harvest in the main producer states:     Parana: 40 pct     Mato Grosso do Sul: 15 pct     Mato Grosso: five pct     Rio Grande do Sul: two pct  \n',oilseed
'Further talks will be held this morning at Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s oilseed processing plant at Seaforth, after yesterday\'s meeting between management and unions failed to produce a solution to end the three month old strike, a company spokesman said.     Talks will be extended to tomorrow if there is no breakthrough in today\'s session, he said.  \n',oilseed
'Talks between management and unions at Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s oilseed processing plant at Seaforth adjourned today without a solution to the three month old strike, a company spokesman said.     Negotiations will resume next Tuesday, he said.  \n',oilseed
'Two days of talks between management and unions to try to end the 3-1/2 month labour dispute at Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s oilseed crushing plant at Seaforth ended yesterday without resolving the situation, a company spokesman said.     Fresh talks are expected to be held early next week but the actual date has not yet been fixed, he added.     Oilseed processing at the mill has been at a standstill since December 19 and the company has declared force majeure for deliveries of soymeal and soyoil ahead to May.  \n',oilseed
'Talks due today between management and unions to try to end the strike at Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s Seaforth oilseed crushing plant have been rescheduled for Thursday, a company spokesman said.     Oilseed processing at the plant has been halted since December 19 when mill workers walked out in protest at new contract manning levels.  \n',oilseed
'Talks set for today between management and unions to try to solve the labour dispute at Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s Seaforth oilseed crushing plant have been rescheduled for Monday, a company spokesman said.     Oilseed processing at the mill has been at a standstill since December 19.  \n',oilseed
'Talks between Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s management and unions, aimed at ending the prolonged strike at its Seaforth oilseed processing plant, will resume this afternoon, a company spokesman said.     Yesterday\'s session failed to reach a compromise but some progress was made, he said.  \n',oilseed
'The USDA\'s weekly export inspection report is expected to show a decline in soybean exports and steady to slightly lower corn and wheat exports, according to CBT floor traders\' forecasts.     Traders projected soybean exports at 15 mln to 16 mln bushels, down from 20.3 mln bushels a week ago and 25.5 mln bushels a year ago.     Corn guesses ranged from 20 mln to 25 mln bushels, compared with 21.9 mln bushels a week ago and 28.2 mln a year ago.     Wheat guesses ranged from 13 mln to 18 mln bushels, compared with 14.1 mln bushels a week ago and 17.9 mln a year ago.  \n',oilseed
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has reallocated 15.0 mln dlrs in credit guarantees to Turkey previously earmarked for sales of U.S. oilseeds to provide coverage for sales of U.S. protein meals in fiscal year 1987, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the action reduces the guarantee line authorized for sales of oilseeds to 5.0 mln dlrs from 20.0 mln dlrs and creates the new line for protein meals.     All sales under the credit lines must be registered and exports completed by September 30, 1987, it said.  \n',oilseed
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has authorized 2.0 mln dlrs in credit guarantees to cover sales of seeds for planting to Algeria, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department said the additional guarantees increase the cumulative fiscal year 1987 program for sales of U.S. agricultural products to Algeria to 466.0 mln dlrs.     To be eligible under the new seed credit guarantees, all sales must be registered by September 30, 1987, and shipped by December 31, 1987, USDA said.  \n',oilseed
'China bought 6,000 tonnes of Malaysian refined bleached deodorised palm stearine today for May shipment at prices equivalent to around 270 to 275 dlrs per tonne fob, traders said.  \n',oilseed
'China\'s soybean crop this year is forecast at 11.5 mln tonnes, down slightly from 11.55 mln estiamted for last year, the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s officer in Peking said in a field report.     The report, dated April 2, said Chinese imports this year are projected at 300,000 tonnes unchanged from last year\'s level.     Exports are forecast to increase to 1.0 mln tonnes from 800,000 tonnes exported last year, the report said.     Imports of soybean oil are estimated at 200,000 tonnes, also unchanged from last year.  \n',oilseed
'The yield on 46,000 hectares (ha) of rapeseed in central China will be cut by up to 70 pct by hailstorms and tornadoes that swept across nearly 100,000 ha of crops on March 6, the New China News Agency said today.     The storm, which lashed the Huai and Yangtze rivers and eastern Anhui province, left two people dead and 800 others injured. Some 800 houses were flattened and 19 boats sunk, it said.     The Anhui provincial government has sent emergency relief to the 19 counties affected, the news agency said.  \n',oilseed
'Several leading farm-state Congressmen said they will press the U.S. Agriculture Department to implement some kind of marketing loan to make soybeans exports competitive while protecting farm income.     Speaking at a House grains subcommittee hearing, chairman Dan Glickman, D-Kan., proposed that Congressmen and representatives of soybean growers meet with USDA on the subject in the next two weeks.     \"Let\'s see if we can try to push them (USDA) to do something without legislation,\" Glickman told the hearing.     The current soybean loan rate effectively is 4.56 dlrs per bushel with no income protection, or marketing loan.     David Haggard, American Soybean Association, ASA, president said USDA must make changes in the soybean program.     The current soybean program \"gave us the worst of both worlds,\" ASA\'s Haggard told the hearing. The 1987 loan rate is too high relative to corn and is encouraging an expansion of soybean production in South America, he said. At the same time, the U.S. soybean loan rate is too low to provide any income support for soybean farmers, Haggard said.     \"We need some kind of market loan,\" he added.     The 1985 farm bill provides authority for the Agriculture Secretary to implement a marketing loan for soybeans but USDA so far has resisted pressure to use the authority.     Representatives of ASA met earlier this month with USDA, but Haggard said USDA officials gave no indication if they would seriously consider offering a marketing loan.     USDA undersecretary Daniel Amstutz yesterday said the soybean situation is a \"dilemna\" which has been studied extensively by the department. But he did not say what, if any changes, are under consideration.     In his testimony, Haggard indicated there are ways other than a marketing loan which should be considered to help soybean growers, such as a so-called producer option payment, or a direct payment program.     Haggard said barring any program changes, Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, soybean stocks, now at 385 mln bu, will rise to 500 mln by the end of August. A further 100 mln bu of soybeans could be forfeited between September and end-year.     \"Thus, CCC could own the equivalent of Brazil\'s entire soybean crop by the end of calendar year 1987,\" Haggard said.     However, Haggard said that the U.S. should be cautious in making soybean program changes that might allow the European Community to challenge the U.S. program under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, GATT.     He noted that The EC imports one quarter of U.S. soybean production and loss of that market would be devastating.     The Reagan administration has given \"mixed signals\" on whether it believes a marketing loan for soybeans could be successfully challenged in GATT by the EC, Haggard said.     While the ASA position is to support a 5.02 dlrs per bu loan rate combined with a marketing loan, Haggard also endorsed a proposal by Rep. Jerry Huckaby, D-La., which would set a six dlrs per bu loan rate and apply a marketing loan.     The Huckaby proposal is also supported by the ranking Republican on the House Agriculture committee, Rep. Edward Madigan of Illinois.     Subcommittee chairman Glickman endorsed the need to take some action on soybeans, but cautioned that the marketing loan could mean a substantial increase in budget costs.     Glickman noted that the Agriculture Committee must cut one to 1.5 billion dlrs from its fiscal 1988 budget and therefore must fit any soybean program changes into the overall budget.     Haggard said at a soybean loan rate of six dlrs per bu combined with a marketing loan, the U.S. soybean price might fall to four dlrs per bu initially. This would cost the government a maximum of two billion dlrs. But he said the costs would decline as market prices recovered.  \n',oilseed
'The European Community\'s (EC) executive Commission defended attacks on major elements of its ambitious program to rid the EC of its controversial farm surpluses, after strong attacks from northern states.     Britain and West Germany, backed by the Netherlands and Denmark, opposed a proposed tax on edible oils and fats which has already sparked strong protest from exporters to the EC led by the U.S. and from EC consumer groups, diplomats said.     But EC Agriculture Commissioner Frans Andriessen told journalists he had warned ministers that failure to agree the tax, proposed last month as part of the Commission\'s annual farm price package, would leave a large hole in the group\'s budget.     He added that he hoped states had not yet made their mind up for good. \"I hope the debate is still open, if not there will be a formidable hole in the budget,\" he said.     The shortfall could reach two billion dollars in 1988 and would be only slightly less this year, he said.     Foreign ministers were taking a first look at the tax ahead of farm ministers in a move described by diplomats as unprecedented and welcomed by Andriessen as a sign ministers recognised the importance of reforming the EC\'s farm policy.     The proposed tax is designed to provide the EC with extra cash to finance community oilseed crops at their current levels and to brake a dramatic decrease in olive oil consumption by making it more competitive with other oils.     Andriessen noted the EC has over two mln olive oil producers, mostly small farmers, who could be helped by the tax.     \"What we are suggesting is reasonable, it should be better understood not just outside the community but at home,\" he said.     Britain, normally a keen advocate of radical changes in the EC\'s costly farm subsidies system, warned the proposal to impose the tax on both domestic and imported oils and fats could seriously damage the EC\'s trade relations with other countries.     Britain also warned that the tax could hit developing countries already receiving aid from the EC, they said.     The Commission also defended proposals to dismantle Monetary Compensatory Amounts (MCA) -- a system of cross border subsidies and taxes to level out foreign exchange fluctuations for farm exports -- against harsh West German criticism.     In a letter this weekend from Chancellor Helmut Kohl to EC executive Commission President, Jacques Delors, Kohl made clear such a dismantling would mainly hit West German farmers.     Diplomats said West Germany again repeated its criticism at the talks here but Andriessen told journalists that Germany had been alone in its opposition. The question was a key aspect of the Commission\'s farm price proposals, he added.    Ministers also agreed a 3.5 billion dlrs scheme to rid the EC of its butter mountain, despite Spanish and Portuguese opposition.     The scheme will pay for the disposal of one mln tonnes of unwanted butter, by selling it at knock-down prices, turning it into animal feed or exporting it at subsidised prices.     National capitals are due to be reimbursed later out of savings from another plan to curb milk production.     Diplomats said Spain and Portugal have been angered by the scheme, which they feel forces them to pay for massive surpluses built up before they joined the community last year, but the two countries did not block today\'s vote.  \n',oilseed
'The outcome of negotiations on proposals by the European Commission for a 330 Ecus a tonne tax on EC-produced and imported oilseeds and marine oils remains difficult to predict, Belgian agriculture minister Paul de Keersmaeker told a news conference.     De Keersmaeker, who chaired a meeting of EC farm ministers which ended today, was asked about reports enough countries were against the tax to ensure that it would be defeated in negotiations on the EC farm price package for 1987/88.     He said it was true some countries were strongly opposed, but others were less so and others basically in favour.     \"I think there is room for negotiations, and I would not want to make any predictions at this stage,\" de Keersmaeker said.     Yesterday, British minister Michael Jopling said Britain, West Germany, Portugal, the Netherlands and Denmark were opposed to the measure. Between them these countries have more than enough voting power to block it.     Diplomatic sources said at today\'s meeting the Spanish delegation also expressed strong reservations about the idea.  \n',oilseed
'Soybean imports are forecast to rise to 425,000 tonnes in 1987/88 (October/September) from an estimated 300,000 in 1986/87 and 375,000 in 1985/86, the U.S. Embassy said in its annual report on Indonesia\'s agriculture.     It said Indonesia did not achieve its goal of self-sufficiency in soybean output in calendar 1986 because it did not meet a planned increase in area planted and because yields have remained below target.     Soybean meal imports are forecast to fall to around 190,000 tonnes in 1987/88 from 270,000 tonnes in 1986/87 and 295,000 tonnes in 1985/86.     Domestic soybean production is forecast to rise steadily to 1.08 mln tonnes in 1987/88 from 980,000 in the current year and 890,000 in 1985/86, the report said.     Imports are forecast to fall in the current year but to rise in 1987/88 because of a new soybean crushing plant due to come on stream in early 1988.     China is the main supplier with a 79 pct share, while the U.S. Provides the rest, it said.     \"This pattern will likely continue during 1986/87 since domestic soyfood processors prefer Chinese beans and are willing to pay a premium for them,\" it said.     Area planted is expected to increase by 10 pct in both 1986/87 and 1987/88.     \"Yield increases continue to be hampered by an insufficient supply of quality seeds, along with pest and disease problems,\" the report said.  \n',oilseed
'Japan bought 5,000 tonnes of Canadian rapeseed overnight at an undisclosed price for April shipment, trade sources said.  \n',oilseed
'Japanese crushers bought 2,000 tonnes of Canadian rapeseed in export business overnight for May shipment, trade sources said.  \n',oilseed
'Japanese crushers have bought some 214,000 tonnes of Brazilian soybeans for late April/early July shipment and may buy up to 140,000 to 190,000 tonnes more for June to August shipment, trade sources said.     Japan imported 128,089 tonnes of Brazilian beans in calendar 1986, Finance Ministry customs-cleared statistics show.     The sources said Brazilian beans were cheaper than U.S. Origin which may account for the heavy purchases, but added there were concerns about deliveries from Brazil in the near term due to labour problems there.     The Japanese purchases comprise 30,000 tonnes for April 20/May 10 shipment, 102,000 for May, 15,000 for late May/early June, 36,000 for June, and 31,000 for late June/early July shipment, the sources said.     As a result of the large volumes of Brazilian beans purchased, Japanese crushers will buy a total of only 150,000 tonnes of U.S. Beans for May shipment. Some 100,000 of this shipment has already been purchased, the sources added.     They said crushers bought some 270,000 to 280,000 tonnes of U.S. Beans for April shipment.  \n',oilseed
'Japanese importers bought some 95,000 tonnes of Chinese soybeans late last month for May to September shipment, under the semi-annual trade accords, trade sources said.     The FOB premium rose to 13.50 dlrs per tonne, up 2.50 dlrs from the premium for the November to April shipment, but down from 13.80 for the last May to September shipment.     Flat prices for Chinese beans are based on futures prices in Chicago plus the FOB premium.     Japanese purchases of Chinese soybeans, including spot buying, may have totalled 240,000 to 250,000 tonnes of the 1986 crop for November to April 1987 shipment, down from some 300,000 tonnes the previous year, the sources said.     Domestic demand for edible-use soybeans is expected to remain stable at about 240,000 to 250,000 tonnes a year, the sources said.     In recent years Japanese importers have overbought Chinese edible-use soybeans and sold the surplus to domestic crushers, but low 1986 U.S. Crop prices have discouraged the purchase of Chinese origin beans for crushing, they said.  \n',oilseed
'Japanese crushers, starting to buy U.S. Soybeans for April shipment, have recently made purchases of some 48,000 tonnes, trade sources said.     The sources said they could not estimate the total volume to be purchased for April shipping because Japan\'s crushing program for April and June is unclear.     They had predicted earlier that crushers\' April shipment U.S. Bean purchases would drop to 260,000 to 270,000 from the monthly average of 300,000 to 330,000 tonnes due to low soybean meal prices.  \n',oilseed
'Japanese crushers are likely to buy at least 200,000 tonnes of Brazilian soybeans this year and another 100,000 to 200,000 if quality and shipping conditions are good against 128,089 tonnes in 1986, trade sources said.     A Japanese trading house recently bought about 31,000 tonnes of soybeans for April 10/May 10 shipment, they said.     \"Because Brazilian soybean prices are now some 10 cents a bushel cheaper than U.S. Origin due to the bumper harvest, it is highly likely that Japanese crushers will increase their buying volume,\" one source said. Brazilian beans are available to Japan for shipment from May to July.  \n',oilseed
'Japanese crushers bought 5,000 tonnes of Canadian rapeseed in export business overnight for late May/early June shipment, trade sources said.  \n',oilseed
'U.S. soybean lobbyists and congressional aides criticized a proposal from a senior Agriculture Department official that Congress allow the U.S. soybean loan level to be officially lowered to 4.56 dlrs per bushel next year.     \"I don\'t know who in Congress would propose that happening. Politically it would be totally unacceptable,\" an aide to a senior farm-state senator said.     USDA undersecretary Daniel Amstutz said this week that Congress should give USDA authority to keep the soybean loan  at its current effective rate of 4.56 dlrs per bushel rather than increasing it to its minimum allowed level of 4.77 dlrs.     \"I\'m convinced that Congress will not go along with this,\" American Soybean Association President Dave Haggard said.     Amstutz told reporters following a senate hearing that if the soybean loan rate were 4.56 dlrs, USDA could then consider ways to make U.S. soybeans more competitive.     His comments were seen as possibly indicating what the  the administration\'s position is in the debate over what should be done to make soybeans competitive and at the same time protect soybean farmers\' income.     Using soybean specific certificates to further buydown the loan rate or implementation of a marketing loan have been pointed to as the most effective ways to get soybean prices competitive. USDA secretary Richard Lyng, however, continues to maintain his opposition to a marketing loan, saying such a move would be too costly.     \"There will be alot of other options that will be considered before Congress looks at that one (the Amstutz proposal,\" said Bill O\'Conner, aide to Rep. Edward Madigan (R-Ill), ranking minority leader of the Agriculture Committee.     \"Anybody representing large groups of soybean producers would not be very excited about supporting a lower soybean loan,\" O\'Conner said.     Congress may very likely look at the soybean loan and decide that they cannot increase it from its current 5.02 dlr basic rate, but that there has to be something mandated to increase soybean\'s competitiveness, David Graves, aide to Sen. Thad Cochran (R-Miss) said. Cochran, a staunch supporter of a soybean marketing loan, would support a soybean loan of 5.02 or 4.77 dlrs with a certificate buydown, Graves said.  \n',oilseed
'Mexico bought 51,000 tonnes of U.S. number two yellow soybeans in an overnight tender, for various ocean and rail shipments in May, private export sources said.     About 40,000 tonnes sold for ocean shipment at prices ranging from 199.67 to 210.17 dlrs per tonne, c and f, and about 11,000 tonnes sold for rail shipment at prices from 205.50 to 217.88 dlrs per tonne, they said.  \n',oilseed
'Newly-installed Philippine Coconut Authority Chairman Jose Romero has announced the appointment of lawyer Leandro Garcia as administrator, replacing Colonel Felix Duenas who is returning to military duty.     The new constitution does not allow military men to hold positions in civilian agencies.     Duenas and four other military men who were assigned to the authority in 1978, will return to the ministry of defence where they worked prior to their appointments at the coconut agency.  \n',oilseed
'Philippine coconut oil exports to Europe would be virtually wiped out if the European Community (EC) implements a new tax on vegetable oils, Philippine Coconut Authority (PCA) chairman Jose Romero said.     But he told reporters he did not think the EC would impose the tax because of objections from the U.S.     \"There\'s just so much flak coming from many countries, spearheaded by the United States, whose soybean exports would be adversely affected. This would spark a trade war,\" he said.     The tax, to be imposed from July, would add about 375 dlrs a tonne to vegetable oils entering the EC.     The Philippines exported 43,540 tonnes of coconut oil worth 11.7 mln dlrs to Europe in January, against total exports of 86,959 tonnes worth 23.8 mln. It also exports copra and copra meal.     Agriculture Secretary Carlos Dominguez has also raised objections to the proposed EC tax.     He said it could cause the collapse of world demand and prices and destroy the domestic industry.  \n',oilseed
'Coconut product exports fell to 163,924 copra tonnes in January from 196,610 tonnes in December and 167,747 tonnes in January last year, government figures show.     Coconut product sales earned 44.54 mln dlrs compared with 45.30 mln in December and 49.09 mln a year earlier.  \n',oilseed
'France\'s Oilseed and Bean Cooperatives Federation, FFCOP, said it expected French rapeseed sowings for the 1987 harvest to rise by between 54.6 pct and 67.5 pct to between 600,000 and 650,000 hectares from 388,000 planted last year.     Its latest estimates also suggested a 66.7 pct rise in soybean sowings to 80,000 ha from 48,000 last year. Sunflower sowings were expected to increase by between 8.6 pct and 14.6 pct from 829,000 ha. Pea sowings are estimated likely to rise 27.7 pct to 350,000 ha against 274,000, while field bean sowings are forecast unchanged at 40,000.  \n',oilseed
'The Agriculture Department must make a decision soon on how to change the current U.S. soybean loan or more soybeans will continue to be forfeited to the government and foreign soybean production will increase, the president of the American Soybean Association, ASA, said.     \"The USDA will have to bite the bullet one way or another ... USDA can dodge and dart around it (the soybean loan) as much as they want, but they have to eventually address this problem,\" David Haggard, ASA president, tolds.     USDA is not offering any new soybean loan options, and Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng has not consulted ASA on the soybean loan, Haggard said.     \"I don\'t know if USDA is really very serious about addressing the soybean loan problem,\" he said.     At ASA\'s annual winter board of directors meeting here, ASA leaders refused to change their official position on the  loan -- still calling for income support at 5.02 dlrs.     The association backs current bills of Rep. Bill Emerson, R-Mo. and Sen. Thad Cochran, R-Miss., which call for either a 5.02 marketing loan or a producer option payment.     Haggard said he does not know what chances the ASA-backed proposals have but said, \"in all honesty, we do not want to see the farm bill be torn apart.\"     He said if USDA feels it cannot withdraw its opposition to a market loan, there are still numerous ways the USDA could change the loan without new legislation.     Making the loan partially in certificates which would not have to be paid back would be one option, he said.  \n',oilseed
'Taiwan bought 25,000 tonnes U.S. soybeans today at 203.40 dlrs a tonne, C and F, Gulf, for May 15-30 shipment, private export sources said.  \n',oilseed
'The joint committee of Taiwan\'s soybean importers awarded a contract to Richco Grain Ltd of New York to supply a 27,000-tonne cargo of U.S. Soybeans, a committee spokesman tolds.     The shipment, priced at 210.34 U.S. Dlrs per tonne c and f Taiwan, is set for delivery between March 20 and April 5, he said.     Taiwan\'s soybeans imports in calendar 1987 are targetted at 1.81 mln tonnes, against an actual 1.74 mln tonnes imported in 1986, he said.     All the imports come from the U.S., He added.  \n',oilseed
'The joint committee of Taiwan\'s soybean importers will tender March 12 for a 27,000 tonne cargo of U.S. Soybeans for March 20 to April 5 delivery, a committee spokesman tolds.     Taiwan\'s soybean imports in calendar 1987 are provisionally set at 1.81 mln tonnes compared with a revised 1.74 mln tonnes imported last year.     The 1.74 mln tonne figure was revised from 1.76 mln tonnes.     Taiwan imports all its soybeans from the United States.  \n',oilseed
'American soybean producers are confident the proposed European Community (EC) tax on vegetable oils and fats will be rejected but are leaving nothing to chance, American Soybean Association (ASA) president-elect Wayne Bennett said.     Bennett, who is leading one of three soybean producer delegations on a lobbying tour of EC capitals, was speaking at a lunch.     After meetings at the Economics and Foreign ministries this morning, he said the Dutch Government had indicated it would vote against the proposal, as had a number of other countries.     \"Our information suggests we will have the required number of votes in Brussels to prevent the tax proposal going forward,\" he said.     \"The proposal has been talked of in Brussels for the past 20 years, and dropped every time. What we want now is to kill it once and for all,\" Bennett added.     Backing up the soybean producers\' active lobbying, the U.S. Government has also indicated it will be prepared to retaliate with penal import taxes if the proposal does get through, he said.     The U.S. Government also feels it has a good case to fight the proposed tax in the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), a U.S. Embassy spokesman said.     U.S. Exports of soybeans and products to the EC account for one-fifth of annual production, and are worth about 2.5 billion dlrs a year, Bennett said.     The proposed tax on oils and fats would hit U.S. Producers badly while at the same time virtually doubling the price of soyoil in the EC, which would suffer far worse than other higher-priced oils because of the nature of the proposed tax, he added.     The revenue to the EC from the tax would simply be used to finance the EC\'s own oilseed subsidy machine, he said.     \"We in the ASA are dedicated free-traders. We helped defeat the Wine Equity Act two years ago, but we will not stand by and watch our own farmers suffer from such protectionist EC measures,\" Bennett said.     \"The mood in the U.S. Is turning increasingly protectionist, and the EC\'s actions are fueling the chances of a trade war,\" he added.  \n',oilseed
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng said a marketing loan for soybeans would serve no present purpose because the U.S. price is not above the world price.     Asked in an interview if it was time to consider a marketing loan for soybeans, Lyng said, \"I don\'t think so. I don\'t think the world price is lower than our price anyway.\"     However, the USDA secretary said that if current conditions of surplus production persisted, it might be appropriate to consider a marketing loan.     \"I suppose that under that condition there is a danger our exports will continue to drop and that the government will continue to accumulate large stocks of soybeans,\" he said. \"It might be (worth contemplating a marketing loan), if there were a world market that was lower than our market.\"  \n',oilseed
'Soybeans produced in the United States face a competitive price problem because of the loan rate provisions of the 1985 farm bill, U.S. Undersecretary of Agriculture Daniel Amstutz said.     Amstutz told a House Agriculture Appropriations subcommittee hearing that soybeans are caught in a \"squeeze\" because the Farm Bill allowed steep cuts in grain loan rates while limiting the soybean reduction.     As a result, he said U.S.-produced soybeans \"have a price problem\" in competing with other soybean producing countries.     Amstutz called the situation a \"dilemma\" for the USDA, and said \"we have spent hours in ASCS (Agriculture Stabilization and Conservation Service) looking at this.\"     He did not say what may be done to rectify the situation.  \n',oilseed
'Lower production of coconut and palm oils could lead to a decline in vegetable oil stocks this year despite growing supplies of oilseeds, senior oilseeds analyst for Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Mario Balletto said.     Balletto told a conference of Canadian farmers at Alberta Agriculture\'s annual farm outlook conference that the world vegetable oil situation is one of potentially tight supplies.     \"Prices for edible oils appear to have more upside potential reflecting strong world demand and an unprecedented decline in the production of tree oils,\" Balletto said.     Balletto estimated production of palm, coconut and palm kernel oils this year at 8.5 mln tonnes, down from 9.1 mln tonnes last year, enough to offset higher oilseed output.     He estimated total vegetable oil production this year at 33.4 mln tonnes, up from 33.0 mln last year, and disappearance at 34.0 mln tonnes, up from 32.6 mln.     Unless oilseed crushing increases sharply, he said, disappearance of vegetable oils could exceed production by 600,000 tonnes, the largest deficit since 1976.     \"If world protein meal demand stagnates, thus limiting the crush of soybeans ... the need for serious supply rationing in the edible oils sector could develop,\" he said.     \"This would be relatively favorable for the prices of high oil yielding seeds,\" Balletto said.     Oilseeds, on the other hand, remain at depressed prices because of burdensome supplies, he said.     World ending stocks of oilseeds are estimated to increase for the fourth straight year to a record 28.4 mln tonnes, compared with 25.4 mln last year.     The increase should result from lower disappearance, as production is expected to fall to 184.0 mln tonnes from 185.7 mln last year, he said.     World soybean production in 1987 totalled a record 98.9 mln tonnes, up from 90.6 mln the previous year, Balletto said, while production of other oilseeds was lower.     Higher soybean production in South America and Europe made up for lower production in the United States, he said.     Soybeans account for the bulk of the surplus, and U.S. stocks make up most of those, Balletto said.     The Commodity Credit Corporation owned 12.7 mln tonnes, about half of the world soybean surplus, he said.     Since 1983-84, he said, world oilseed stocks have increased 13.1 mln tonnes.     \"During the same period, U.S. soybean stocks increased 12.1 mln tonnes, becoming the dumping ground of the entire world surplus, courtesy of the CCC and highlighting the artificially high prices caused by the U.S. loan program.\"     \"Soybean prices and, to a great extent, world oilseeds prices are likely to be dominated by the loan program, as long as the U.S. soybean surplus continues.     For the 1987 crop, he said, prices are likely to hover in a range tied to the U.S. loan program.     \"Upside potential for prices is limited by the huge supply overhang while strong underlying support is provided by the U.S. loan rate.\"     The problem is likely to become worse as the artificially high prices encourage producers in South America, Canada and Australia to shift from grains to oilseeds, Balletto said.  \n',oilseed
'Johnson and Johnson said the U.S. Food and Drug Administration has notified the company its food additive petition for a high-intensity sweetener has been formally accepted and now will be reviewed by the agency.     The company said the product, with the generic name of sucralose, is made from sugar and tastes like sugar, but is about 600 times sweeter.     It yields no calories and does not promote tooth decay.     Johnson and Johnson said the sweetner is being jointly developed with Tate and Lyle PLC TATL.     Tate and Lyle is seeking approval in Canada, the United Kingdom and other European countries, Johnson and Johnson said. The company noted its petition covering the product and its safety evaluation were submitted to the FDA last month.     While awaiting FDA approval, the company said, it is proceeding with plans for commercialization through its McNeil Specialty Products Co subsidiary.     Johnson and Johnson said it is operating under a licensing agreement with Tate and Lyle, whose collaborative research with scientists at Queen Elizabeth College in London led to the discovery of Sucralose in 1976.     Patents and licensing agreements control the use of sucralose through the year 2001, Johnson and Johnson said.     Sucralose is a chlorinated derivative of ordinary sugar. The carbon-chloride bonds in sucralose are stable and are not broken during digestion or metabolism.     Sucralose is essentially not metabollized by the body. The chlorine content enhances sweetness without providing calories.  \n',sugar
'Australia sold 180,000 tonnes of raw sugar to the Soviet Union for shipment in the next few weeks, Queensland Primary Industries Minister Neville Harper said.     Loading of a 50,000-tonne cargo on the Soviet freighter Nikolay Kuznetsov for shipment to Odessa was completed today at the Lucinda terminal, he said in a statement.     The balance will be shipped from Mackay by end-March, Harper said.     Australia exported 159,000 tonnes of sugar to the Soviet Union in 1986.  \n',sugar
'Dry areas of the Australian sugar cane belt along the Queensland coast have been receiving just enough rain to sustain the 1987 crop, an Australian Sugar Producers Association spokesman said.     The industry is not as worried as it was two weeks ago, but rainfall is still below normal and good soaking rains are needed in some areas, notably in the Burdekin and Mackay regions, he said from Brisbane.     Elsewhere, in the far north and the far south of the state and in northern New South Wales, the cane crop is looking very good after heavy falls this month, he said.     The spokesman said it is still too early to tell what effect the dry weather will have on the size of the crop, which is harvested from around June to December.     He said frequent but light falls in the areas that are short of moisture, such as Mackay, mean they really only need about three days of the region\'s heavy tropical rains to restore normal moisture to the cane.     But rainfall in the next two or three weeks will be crucial to the size of the crop in the dry areas, he said.     \"It\'s certainly not a disastrous crop at this stage but it might be in a month without some good falls,\" he said.  \n',sugar
'Bangladesh\'s sugar production increased by nearly 60,000 tonnes over last year\'s season to total 140,000 tonnes at the end of this year\'s season, the Sugar and Food Industries Corp said.     The increased output will enable Bangladesh to cut imports. Corporation officials tolds the country has already imported 37,000 tonnes of sugar and will buy 113,000 tonnes more to make up shortfall in the 1986/87 year ending June 30.     Imports in 1985/86 totalled 224,000 tonnes, of which nearly 100,000 tonnes are still in stock, they said without giving further details.  \n',sugar
'French sugar producer Beghin-Say is not currently planning to withdraw the sugar it has placed into intervention, despite the exceptionally high rebate awarded at this week\'s European Community (EC) sugar tender, Beghin-Say President Jean-Marc Vernes tolds.     The maximum rebate of 46.864 Ecus per 100 kilos on Wednesday was the largest ever granted, according to traders.     Vernes said he was satisfied the European Commission has started to move in the right direction, but said his company had no plans to change its decision to put sugar into intervention.     But Vernes said he hoped that in the next few weeks a final agreement would be reached with the commission which would allow operators to withdraw the sugar from intervention.     European operators offered 854,000 tonnes of sugar into intervention to protest about export rebates which they say are too low. Over 785,000 tonnes of this sugar was accepted by the commission on Wednesday, according to commission sources.     Under EC regulations, however, operators have another four to five weeks to withdraw the sugar from intervention before payment is made for it.     A total of 706,470 tonnes of French sugar and 79,000 tonnes of West German sugar has been accepted into intervention, trade sources said here. This amount represents about a third of annual EC exports to non-EC countries.     Beghin-Say declined to specify the amount of sugar it had offered into intervention, but said it was below 500,000 tonnes.     Producers say they have been losing 2.5 to 3.0 Ecus on every 100 kilos exported due to the failure of rebates to fully bridge the gap between EC and world prices. Wednesday\'s rebate was 0.87 Ecus short of what producers say is needed to get an equivalent price to that for sales into intervention, traders said.     Vernes said operators hope to get a rebate which equates to the full intervention price and said Wednesday\'s tender was a step in the right direction.     Sugar producers here said the volume of sugar authorised for export since the begining of the current campaign had been inadequate and that more should be exported now to compensate.     Trade sources said new regulations governing export rebates, which are due to be adopted shortly, may smooth the path for the commission to award larger export rebates in future.     One source at a leading French sugar house said it seemed the commission had understood the protest action and was now moving towards adapting the situation accordingly, thereby allowing the operators to withdraw their sugar from intervention once they got satisfaction.  \n',sugar
'A plan by European producers to sell 854,000 tonnes of sugar to European Community intervention stocks still stands, Andrea Minguzzi, an official at French sugar producer Beghin-Say, said.     Last week Beghin-Say president Jean-Marc Vernes said a possible settlement of a row with the EC would lead producers to withdraw their offer, which was made as a protest against EC export licensing policies.     The EC policy is to offer export rebates, which fail to give producers an equivalent price to that which they would get by offering sugar into intervention stocks, Vernes said.     But Minguzzi said the offer was a commercial affair and that producers had no intention of withdrawing the sugar offer already lodged with intervention boards of different European countries. He said final quality approval for all the sugar offered could come later this week. Some 95 pct had already cleared quality specifications.     The EC can only reject an offer to sell into intervention stocks on quality grounds. Minguzzi added that under EC regulations, the Community has until early May to pay for the sugar. He declined to put an exact figure on the amount of sugar offered by Beghin-Say, but said it was below 500,000 tonnes.  \n',sugar
'A settlement could soon be reached in the dispute between European sugar producers and the European Community over EC export licencing policies, Jean-Marc Vernes, president of French sugar producer Beghin-Say, which is leading the protest, told journalists today.     \"Our contacts with the EC authorities over the past few days indicate that we are moving towards a solution,\" he said, adding that if this happened the producers would withdraw the 854,000 tonnes of sugar they have offered into intervention.     Vernes said that the protest, involving 770,000 tonnes of sugar from French producers alone, was prompted by the EC\'s policy since mid-1986 of offering export rebates which failed to give producers an equivalent price to that they would obtain by offering sugar into EC intervention.     At last week\'s tender the EC Commission made an apparent concession by offering a maximum rebate only 1.3 European currency units (Ecus) per 100 kilos below the level producers say is needed, compared with the previous week\'s rebate which was 2.5 Ecus below the necessary level.     Vernes would not say what form any compromise between the producers and the EC would take, but he reaffirmed the long-term desire of producers to export to the world market, providing they were not losing money by doing so.     Producers can withdraw their intervention offer after April 1, when the sugar will officially enter intervention stores, or at any time over the following five weeks before the official payment date.     The EC has threatened to put the sugar back on the internal market if the producers refuse to withdraw their offers.  \n',sugar
'Drilling of this year\'s British sugar beet crop got off to a slow start due to poor weather conditions with only around one pct sown so far, a spokesman for British Sugar Plc said.     This compares with two pct at the same stage last year, three pct in 1985 and 38 to 39 pct in 1984.     There is little cause for concern with better weather forecast and the capacity available to drill the contracted area of around 200,000 hectares in about 10 days. Seed beds look good and farmers are advised to wait for soil temperatures to rise, the spokesman said.     \"If the crop can be drilled by the third week in April we will be delighted,\" he said. Last year a large proportion of the crop was not drilled until May but it still turned out to be the equal second largest on record.  \n',sugar
'China has to decide if it will increase sugar imports this year to cover falling domestic output and rising demand, in view of market predictions that international sugar prices will remain firm this year, traders and the official press said.     He Kang, Minister of Agriculture, Animal Husbandry and Fisheries, said this week that China has adjusted the purchasing price for sugar cane and beet to check a drop in production last year but he gave no price details.     One Japanese trader said domestic demand is rising rapidly because of improving living standards and rising demand for sweet drinks, cakes and biscuits and other sugary foods.     \"It will not be easy to cut domestic demand, even in a state-controlled economy. China may have to import,\" he said.     Customs figures show imports fell to 1.182 mln tonnes in 1986 from 1.909 mln in 1985 and fell to 25,165 tonnes in January 1987 from 54,000 in January 1986.     The official Economic Information newspaper last month said production in the 1986/87 crushing season (September-April) will be 1.18 mln tonnes short of demand.     The paper put 1986/87 output at 4.82 mln, down from 5.24 mln in 1985/86, and domestic demand at about six mln tonnes.     \"In the last two years, acreage under sugar cane and beet has fallen, sugar mills are underutilised, output has dropped and cannot meet demand that is rising every day,\" it said.     \"The country will have to continue imports of sugar and draw down stocks to meet market demand,\" it added.     It quoted the Ministry of Light Industry as blaming the drop in output on unreasonable state purchasing prices for cane and beet as against other crops, which has resulted in farmers refusing to grow them.     The paper said in 1985 a farmer could earn up to three times more per hectare from pineapple and watermelon and up to seven times more from bananas than from sugarcane. He could sell grain on the free market at 560 yuan a tonne, against only 70 yuan a tonne for sugarcane.     Sugar mills are suffering because refined sugar prices have not changed for 20 years despite rising costs, it said.     In Fujian, the cost of producing one tonne rose to 702 yuan in 1985 from 520.1 in 1980, cutting the mills\' profit to 117 yuan a tonne from 217.9, it added.     The paper said unreasonable pricing resulted in 144 of the 442 sugar mills working in the 1985/86 crushing season losing money. China has 521 sugar mills.     A foreign agricultural expert forecast a drop in cane acreage in 1986/87 (September-August) of up to 10 pct in Guangdong, which produced 45 pct of China\'s sugar in calendar 1985, and a smaller drop in Fujian, which produced 11 pct of China\'s sugar in calendar 1985.     He said both provinces are more developed than other sugar-producing areas and more sensitive to demand from cities.     But cane acreage in Guangxi and Yunnan, which accounted for 28 pct of the 1985 crop, has risen by 10 to 30 pct in 1986/87, because cane-growing is more economic there, he said.     He put sugar stocks at 2.333 mln tonnes in September 1986.     A Hong Kong trader estimated stocks at more than three mln at end-January. \"Now they are falling but (they) have not reached the critical level, compelling China to import quickly,\" he said.     \"China has options not easily available in western countries. It controls stocks strictly and can release less into the consumer market if stocks fall too quickly,\" he said.     The Hong Kong trader said calendar 1987 imports will be slightly less than those of 1986, because of firm world prices and serious foreign exchange constraints which, he said, are likely to continue until at least end-1988.     He said nearly all cane and beet is sold to the state-owned mills, with a small amount sold raw to consumers.     \"Most of the mills are old and inefficient, with many of them using Soviet equipment imported in the 1950s,\" he said.     He said demand in rural areas will in future rise an annual four pct, with demand in the cities rising an annual two pct.  \n',sugar
'China\'s 1986/87 sugar crop has been revised to 5.26 mln tonnes (raw value), down four pct from the previous forecast and five pct below the previous season, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its World Production and Trade Report, the department attributed the decline to relatively poor profitability of sugar, causing harvested area of cane and beets to decline seven pct from 1985/86.     Beet sugar production for 1986/87 is now estimated at 837,000 tonnes, five pct less than earlier forecast and down five pct from the previous season, while cane output is projected at 4.423 mln tonnes, down four pct from previously forecast and five pct below the previous season, it said.  \n',sugar
'Colombia is holding a snap selling tender tonight for one cargo of world market raw sugar, traders said.     The sugar is for March 15/April 15 shipment and bids are being sought based on the New York May delivery futures contract, they added.  \n',sugar
'Costa Rica has agreed to sell more than 32,000 tonnes of sugar this year to the Soviet Union, a spokesman for local producers said.      Miguel Alfaro, president of the agricultural league of the sugar cane industry, said the sale follows a recent 50 pct cut in Costa Rica\'s quota for sugar exports to the U.S.     Alfaro said up to 45,000 tonnes of sugar could be exported to the Soviet Union this year under the deal, which is similar to one the Soviets made recently with the Dominican Republic.     A Soviet ship will load 25,000 tonnes at the Pacific port of Punta Morales Monday, Alfaro said, and a second ship will take an additional 7,107 tonnes two days later.     Alfaro and other industry sources declined to disclose the price at which the sugar was sold.  \n',sugar
'Cuban president Fidel Castro told a Congress of the Union of Young Communists here that the production of crude sugar during the harvest still in progress is 800,000 tonnes behind schedule.     In a speech Sunday, published in today\'s official paper GRANMA, Castro said unseasonable rains since January seriously interrupted harvesting and milling operations especially in the central and western parts of the island.     The Cuban leader said the mechanical cane harvesters scheduled to cut over 60 pct of the cane this year were particularly \"vulnerable,\" as muddy fields prevent operations.     Neither Castro nor the Cuban press have given out figures to estimate tonnes of crude production during the present harvest or the goals for the sugar campaign.     However, a cuban sugar official tolds that the country will be lucky if crude output reaches last year\'s 7.2 mln tonnes. Output of crude for the previous 1984-85 harvest was 8.2 mln tonnes.     The harvest was scheduled to end April 30 but due to the present shortfalls it will be extended into May and June, the official said.  \n',sugar
'Cuban sugar export figures for January suggest that this year\'s crop may be at least as large as last year\'s 7.35 mln tonnes, according to sugar analysts.     Exports in January totalled 733,000 tonnes raw value, up from 725,000 a year earlier, according to figures received by the International Sugar Organization.     January is the first major export month and the figures thus give a good indication of the current crop, they said. Fourth quarter exports fell to 622,000 tonnes from 909,000 tonnes a year earlier, but this was because Cuba was destocking at the end of 1985, they added.     Trade house C Czarnikow recently estimated production this year at 7.50 mln tonnes.     Cuban sugar production in the third quarter of 1986 was 12,000 tonnes, giving a final 1985/86 crop total of 7.35 mln tonnes, compared with a 1984/85 crop of 8.10 mln tonnes.     There is normally no third quarter production in Cuba, but a hurricane meant that last year\'s crop was extended.     Exports to the USSR were substantially down in January at 362,000 tonnes from 489,000 in January 1986, but other Comecon countries received 210,000 tonnes, against 80,000 tonnes in the same month last year, figures received by the ISO show.     Bulgaria, Czechoslovakia, Poland and Romania all took substantially more Cuban sugar.     Cuba\'s November 1986 exports totalled 158,000 tonnes, compared with 190,000 tonnes in 1985, and December\'s total was 237,000 tonnes, down from 518,000 tonnes the year before. Calendar year exports for 1986 were also lower at 6.69 mln tonnes against 7.21 mln in 1985 -- the lowest level since 1980\'s 6.19 mln tonnes, the figures show.  \n',sugar
'Cuba has told international sugar operators who have bought its sugar for shipment in March that these contracts will take second place to Cuba\'s direct shipments to its export markets, dealers here said.     Some traders who have received telexes from Cuba said the language of the message was not totally clear and some believed shipments would be honoured if the traders declare the Soviet Union as the destination of their contracts.     The telexes have fueled rising world prices in the last week and reflect a poor Cuban crop, worry over Brazil\'s export availability, and increasing Soviet demand, analysts said.     Traders said signs of Cuba\'s shortage of immediately available raw sugar to supply its traditional martkets was probably the factor behind Syria calling a snap buying tender last month.     Normally Syria calls white sugar buying tenders for forward delivery, and last month\'s spot requirement resulted in the sale of several cargoes.     Cuba in its telex told operators they would not receive March shipments as Cuba has to meet its contracts to export markets, traders said.  \n',sugar
'Cuban sugar output this season (1986/87) is put at around 7.5 mln tonnes raw value by broker C.Czarnikow in its monthly sugar market review.     Allowing for around 700,000 tonnes for the current year\'s domestic usage it would leave around 6.8 mln tonnes for export of which, Czarnikow estimates, about 3.7 mln tonnes will be taken by the USSR, 1.530 mln by other socialist countries and the remainder for delivery to non-socialist bloc destinations.     Czarnikow also estimated USSR 1986/87 production at 8.75 mln tonnes raw value which when added to the 3.7 mln imports from Cuba and set against its estimated domestic and export needs of 14.2 mln tonnes will leave a gap of 1.75 mln tonnes to be acquired from the world market. Soviet purchases to date may not be far short of that quantity, Czarnikow said.  \n',sugar
'European sugar output on the basis of three year average yields will be over half a mln tonnes white value down on last year although yields do vary widely from year to year, broker C Czarnikow said in its market review.     European Community sowings are likely to be down compared with last year. There have been suggestions these sowings might respond to the recent upsurge in world prices, but Czarnikow said \"it is not the sort of fact that easily becomes known.\"     The broker bases its forecasts on Licht planting estimates which put W Germany, the Netherlands and USSR lower but Hungary, Romania, Poland, Turkey and Yugoslavia higher.     Czarnikow\'s projections in mlns tonnes white value and three differing yields include       \'87/88  max      aver      min    1986/87  France       3.57     3.42     3.28       3.44  W Germany    3.08     2.88     2.64       3.19  EC          13.82    13.01    12.13      13.76  W Europe    17.71    16.45    14.98      16.71  Poland       2.02     1.80     1.13       1.74  USSR         8.65     7.60     5.71       8.05  E Europe    13.87    12.14     9.08      12.44  All Europe  31.58    28.58    24.06      29.15   \n',sugar
'The Dominican Republic sold 35,000 long tons of sugar for immediate delivery, with an option for 25,000 tons more, to Czarnikow Rionda of New York, the state sugar council announced.     It was not immediately clear when the sale was made or at what price. A council communique said \"the sale was made at the best prevailing conditions in the world sugar market.\"  \n',sugar
'Dutch sugar traders deny involvement in a plan to offer more than 850,000 tonnes of sugar to intervention in protest at EC export policy and prices, traders tolds.     Although some 2,500 tonnes of sugar have been offered to intervention in the Netherlands, Dutch producers and traders said this sugar was actually Belgian and was being offered by the Belgian industry.     \"We sympathise with the actions of the French, West German and Belgian traders and producers, but we are not party to it,\" a spokesman said.     EC Commission sources said yesterday French traders planned to sell 775,000 tonnes into intervention stocks, West German traders 75,000 tonnes and Dutch traders 2,500. Dutch trade sources gave the same figure for France, but estimated up to 110,000 tonnes offered by German traders and producers.     The Dutch spokesman added, \"The weekly export tender policy and prices are squeezing the European sugar industry, and this is the only way in which they can really register their protest.     \"These are desperate actions, but we believe that most of this offered sugar will be withdrawn within the three-week breathing space allowed.\"  \n',sugar
'The European Community (EC) Commission declined to give an official reaction to reports that a group of european operators plan to offer one mln tonnes of sugar into intervention in protest at Commission export policies.     However, a spokesman for the Commission confirmed the offers had been made to intervention agencies in various member states, and said it would now take up to three weeks for the agencies concerned to complete all necessary documentation.     The spokesman said that under current regulations, the EC would have to accept all the offers if there were no technical problems.     The spokesman said the Commission would only have to reimburse the member state for the cost of buying-in the sugar after the product was sold out of intervention stores at a later date.     He said that at present there was virtually no sugar held in intervention stores.     Last year, 45,000 tonnes were sold into intervention and during the 1984-85 campaign 108,000 tonnes.  \n',sugar
'The European Community Commission confirmed it granted export licences for 59,000 tonnes of current series white sugar at a maximum export rebate of 45.678 European Currency Units (ECUs) per 100 kilos.     Out of this, traders in West Germany received 34,750 tonnes, in the U.K. 13,000, in Denmark 7,250 tonnes and in France 4,000 tonnes.  \n',sugar
'The European Community Commission has told EC member states that it is not prepared to discuss EC sugar prices while sugar traders threaten to make a huge sale into intervention stocks to protest against its policies, Commission sources said.     \"Our position is that we are not willing to discuss the problems of market prices at a time when traders are making threats,\" one source said.     The sources said the Commission\'s view was made clear at a meeting of its sugar management committee today.     They said French, West German and Dutch officials had informed the committee that traders in their countries intended to sell just over 850,000 tonnes of sugar into EC intervention stocks.     The Commission riposted by signalling that it would sell the sugar sold into intervention back onto the EC market by tender, a move that would push down prices.     The sources said French traders planned to sell 775,000 tonnes into intervention stocks, West German traders 7,500 tonnes and Dutch traders 2,500.  \n',sugar
'Sugar which EC producers plan to sell into intervention may be offered by the European Commission for sale within the Community, broker C. Czarnikow says in its latest sugar review.     The Commission will propose to offer the sugar at a very nominal premium of 0.01 European Currency Unit (Ecu) to the intervention price, with detrimental consequences for producers\' returns, Czarnikow says. The move is seen as an attempt to persuade the producers to take back the surrendered sugar.     The Commission may also take other steps to dissuade producers from their chosen course, such as removing the time limit on storage contracts, which presently means that intervention stocks have to be removed by the end of September, Czarnikow says. There is also the possibility of production quotas being reduced.     If the Commission decided to offer the sugar to traders for export, the restitutions would have to be higher than those at recent export tenders, Czarnikow notes. To match the difference between the EC price and the world market price, the extra costs might be as much as 20 Ecus per tonne, it says.     The producers might have to repay these costs through production levies and the proposed special elimination levy, Czarnikow says, but it would be several months before any costs could be recovered under EC rules.     The primary cause of the plan to sell 775,000 tonnes of sugar into intervention in France is dissatisfaction with the EC export program as the restitution has increasingly failed to bridge the gap between the EC price and the world market price, Czarnikow notes. The French move is thus seen as a form of protest designed to force the Commission\'s hand.     In West Germany, 79,250 tonnes have been tendered for intervention, but Czarnikow says the motive here is to ensure that the 1986/87 price is paid for sugar that was produced in 1986. In addition to a two pct cut in the intervention price, West German producers face a further price reduction in July with a probable revaluation of the \"green\" mark.     Even if the immediate crisis is resolved, the problem is not expected to disappear permanently. It has appeared to traders for some years that the EC\'s export policy is insufficiently responsive to changing patterns of demand, it says.     The weekly tenders should respond to fluctuating demand by increasing or reducing the tonnage awarded, Czarnikow says, suggesting that the Commission might also take steps to cut down the amount of \"unnecessary bureaucracy\" surrounding the export tender system.  \n',sugar
'The following import levies for white and raw sugar are effective tomorrow, in European currency units (ecu) per 100 kilos.     White sugar, denatured and non-denatured 51.94 versus 51.36 previously.     Raw sugar, denatured and non-denatured 44.05 versus 43.69 previously.     The rate for raws is based on 92 pct yield.  \n',sugar
'The maximum rebate granted at yesterday\'s European Community (EC) sugar tender marked no change in policy towards producers\' complaints that they are losing money on exports outside the EC, EC commission sources said.     They said this was despite the fact that the commission accepted over 785,000 tonnes of sugar into intervention yesterday from traders protesting that rebates are being set too low.     The maximum rebate at yesterday\'s tender was 46.864 Ecus per 100 kilos, up from 45.678 Ecus the previous week.     London traders said yesterday the rebate was the largest ever granted. The commission sources said today the increase was entirely explained by world market conditions. The amount by which the rebate fell short of what producers claim is needed to obtain an equivalent price to that for sales into intervention remained at 0.87 Ecus per 100 kilos, they said.     Operators offered a total of 854,000 tonnes of sugar into intervention last month to protest at rebates which they said were too low. The sources said about 706,470 tonnes of French sugar and 79,000 tonnes of German sugar had been accepted, the remainder being rejected as of too low quality.     The sources noted the operators could withdraw their offers in the five week period between the acceptance of the sugar and payment for it.     They said they saw no sign of planned withdrawals as yet, adding that they would expect operators to wait another week or two to review commission policy before making up their minds.     The sources said the commission felt entitled to offer rebates at slightly below the level theoretically justifiable in the light of its 1987/88 farm price package proposal to reduce guaranteed prices for sugar by two pct from the start of the new season in July.  \n',sugar
'The rebate granted at yesterday\'s EC sugar tender represents some concession to producers\' complaints that they are losing money on exports outside the bloc, EC Commission officials said.     The maximum rebate of 44.819 European currency units (Ecus) per 100 kilos was 1.3 Ecus below what producers say is needed to obtain the equivalent price to that offered for sales into intervention.     The rebate at last week\'s tender was 2.5 Ecus per 100 kilos short of the level producers said was needed, the officials said.     The officials said the Commission is not negotiating with producers who have offered a total of 854,000 tonnes of sugar for sale into intervention in an apparent attempt to persuade it to offer higher rebates.     They said the French and German producers involved are now unable to withdraw this offer before April 1 when the sugar will officially enter intervention stores.     Payment for it is due five weeks later, and it will be open to them to withdraw their offers at any time between April 1 and the official payment date when the Commission officially takes ownership of the sugar, the officials said.     The officials said if the Commission has to buy the sugar, it is determined to immediately resell it, a move which would drive down market prices further.     They expressed some hope that the operators would not eventually go through with their plan for intervention sales.     \"We think they realise they have gone too far,\" one official said.  \n',sugar
'The rebates granted at yesterday\'s EC sugar tender represent a further concession to producers\' complaints that they are losing money on exports outside the bloc, trade sources said.     They said the maximum rebate of 45.678 European currency Units (Ecus) per 100 kilos was 0.87 Ecus below what producers claim is needed to obtain the equivalent price to that offered for sales into intervention.     The rebate at last week\'s tender was 1.3 Ecus short of the level producers thought necessary and that of the previous week was 2.5 Ecus below this level.     But the sources said producers who have offered a total of 854,000 tonnes of sugar into intervention in an apparent attempt to persuade the Commission to set higher maximum rebates have given no formal indication to the Commission that they intend to withdraw these offers.     The French and German operators involved would be able to withdraw the offers up to five weeks after April 1 when the sugar will officially enter intervention stores.     The five-week period is the normal delay between sugar going into intervention and payment being made for it.     EC officials have said that if the Commission has to buy the sugar, it is determined immediately to resell it, a move which could drive down market prices further.  \n',sugar
'European sugar beet plantings are expected to show little change from last year, despite recent firmness in world prices, analysts and industry sources said.     A survey of planting intentions showed that while, so far, European Community (EC) growers plan unchanged to lower areas, increases are expected in some Eastern European nations.     Trade analysts said their private reports give similar results and do not differ significantly from the first estimate of stagnant 1987 European beet plantings made last week by West German sugar statistician F. O. Licht.     Areas may be slightly lower but analysts and agricultural experts said the steady rise in yields resulting from improved seed varieties and better farming techniques could offset this. In recent years, good autumn weather has given yields a late boost, making up for lower areas despite some disappointing starts to growing seasons.     Changes in EC areas reflect the extent to which producers will grow so-called \"C\" sugar for unsubsidised sale to the world market. This is what is produced in excess of the basic area needed to meet the EC \"A\" and \"B\" quotas, which receive full and partial price support, respectively.     Some analysts said the open row that broke out last week between producers and the EC commission over its export policy could have serious implications for future sugar output.     Beet producers have threatened to effectively dump nearly one mln tonnes of white sugar into EC intervention stocks as they feel export subsidies have been too low to compensate for the gap between high EC internal and low world market prices.     However, with the EC budget stretched to breaking point, this could give treasury ministers extra resolve in resisting higher guaranteed sugar prices and build a case for a future cut in the basic \"A\" and \"B\" quotas, they added.     In France, the largest producer of EC quota and non quota sugar, the sugar market intervention board FIRS said first planting intentions indicate an area about the same as last year\'s 421,000 hectares, nine pct below the previous year.     \"The basic trend is towards stability,\" a FIRS spokesman said. Unlike world market raw sugar prices in dollars, white sugar French franc prices are not particularly high and are not encouraging higher planting levels, he said. Beet sugar output last year was 3.37 mln tonnes, with an average yield of 8.00 tonnes per ha, the highest in the EC apart from the Netherlands but below 8.52 the previous year and a five year average 8.11.     In West Germany, recent price rises have not altered plans, since planting decisions were taken a few months ago, industry sources said. The farm ministry said a December survey is still valid and plantings should be cut slightly after being trimmed by just under four pct in 1986 when yields were above average.     Licht last week estimated West German plantings at a reduced 385,000 hectares against 399,000 last year.     British Sugar Plc, the monopoly beet processor, has signed up U.K. Farmers to grow 8.1 mln tonnes of beet. This should yield about 1.25 mln tonnes of whites. Last year\'s crop equalled the second highest ever at 1.32 mln tonnes.     British Sugar has \"A\" and \"B\" quotas totalling 1.144 mln tonnes of whites and its \"C\" output is due to improved yields from more consistent disease-resistant seed types.     Recent price rises have not altered Polish plans, Wincenty Nowicki, a deputy director of Cukropol, the Amalgamated Sugar Industry Enterprises, said. World prices are still below Polish production costs and there is no way to convince farmers to increase the area above the already signed contracted level.     The national plan, set before prices began to rise, put plantings this year at 460,000 hectares, against 425,000 in 1986, Nowicki said. Last year production was 1.74 mln tonnes.     World prices have less impact in Italy than in France or Germany as it is traditionally not an exporter but is geared to the domestic market, an official at the national beet growers\' association said. Italian sowings are not yet complete but surveys suggest a drop from last year\'s 270,000 ha, especially in the north where some farmers have switched to soya.     Beet output last season of 15.5 mln tonnes yielded a higher than expected 1.72 mln tonnes of white sugar.     Dutch plantings are expected to fall to 130,000 ha from a record 137,600 in 1986 as a new self-imposed quota system comes into force, a spokesman for Centrale Suiker, the second largest Dutch sugar processor, said.     The new system aims for an average of around 915,000 tonnes of white sugar and to cut output of \"C\" sugar. Last year, the Netherlands produced a record 1.2 mln tonnes of white sugar against a combined \"A\" and \"B\" quota of only 872,000 tonnes.     \"The world price of sugar would have to rise much higher than it has done recently to make planned production of \"C\" sugar really worthwhile,\" the spokesman said.     Western agricultural experts in Moscow said Soviet planting intentions are likely to be unchanged. Licht put this year\'s Soviet beet area at 3.40 mln ha, against 3.44 mln last year.     Hungary is expanding its beet area to 105,000 ha from some 95,000 in 1986, the official MTI news agency said, but diplomats said policy is to balance supply with domestic demand.     The Spanish ministry of agriculture said beet sowings are estimated unchanged at 180,000 ha this year.     A spokesman for Denmark\'s largest beet concern, De Danske Sukkerfabrikker A/S, said its 1987 sugar target was unchanged from 1986 at 365,000 tonnes from a steady area of 60,000 ha.     In Sweden, where beet is grown just to meet domestic demand, the planted area is seen little changed at 51,000 ha against 51,300 last year, according to a spokesman for sugar company Svenska Sockerfabriks AB.     Last year, Irish yields were the lowest for 10 years due to late sowings and the state-run Irish Sugar Plc said the 1987 plantings target is the equivalent of 36,400 hectares, down from 37,600 in 1986.  \n',sugar
'The National Farmers Union, NFU, remains concerned about the future ownership of British Sugar despite last week\'s decision by the government to block bids from Italy\'s Gruppo Ferruzzi and Britain\'s Tate &amp; Lyle Plc.     The union\'s sugar beet committee met yesterday to consider the implications of a government Monopolies and Merger Commission, MMC, report issued last week. \"We are still concerned about S and W Berisford being long-term owners of British Sugar,\" a spokesman said. \"We do not view Berisford as providing the long-term stability we want.\"     The Trade and Industry Secretary accepted a recommendation last week by the MMC that it block a bid by Tate and Lyle for S and W Berisford Plc and stop Gruppo Ferruzzi buying a majority of British Sugar, owned by Berisford.     Union officials believe a new bid for the monopoly beet processor is now likely. \"We are looking again at the undertakings that we have demanded of existing bidders and which we would seek of any future bidders,\" the spokesman said. The NFU, which represents Britain\'s 11,500 sugar beet growers, is also taking legal advice on particular paragraphs in the MMC report which it says need further explanation.  \n',sugar
'The French sugar market intervention board, FIRS, raised its estimate of 1986/87 beet sugar production in the 12-member European Community to 13.76 mln tonnes white equivalent in its end-February report from 13.74 mln a month earlier.     Its forecast for total EC sugar production, including cane and molasses, rose to 14.10 mln tonnes from 14.09 mln. Portugal, which joined the Community in January 1986, was estimated at 12.75 mln tonnes white equivalent, unchanged from the previous forecast and compared with 12.41 mln tonnes for 1985/86.     Production for the current campaign in Spain was higher than reported last month at 1.03 mln tonnes compared with 997,000 tonnes.     Beet sugar production, expressed as white equivalent, was estimated at 3.44 mln tonnes in France, 3.17 mln tonnes in West Germany, 1.72 mln in Italy, 1.30 mln in Britain, 1.22 mln in the Netherlands, 936,000 tonnes in Belgium/Luxembourg, 499,000 in Denmark, 287,000 in Greece, 183,000 in Ireland and 4,000 in Portugal.  \n',sugar
'West German sugar stocks rose to 2.60 mln tonnes, white value, at the end of February from 2.50 mln at the same time a year earlier, the sugar industry association WVZ said.     However, stocks were well below the 2.82 mln held at the end of January.     Sugar exports between October 1 and February 28 rose to 449,253 tonnes from 435,727 in the same period of 1985/86. Sales to non-European Community countries rose to 419,541 tonnes from 349,511, while sales within the EC fell sharply to 29,712 tonnes from 86,216.     Imports in October-February fell to 59,605 tonnes from 76,044 in the same months a year earlier, the sugar industry association said.     Human sugar consumption in October-February rose to 817,856 tonnes from 799,128 in the year-ago period.  \n',sugar
'The West German intervention board said about 100,000 tonnes of sugar have been offered into intervention so far.     A spokesman, speaking from Frankfurt, tolds offers have increased recently but contracts have not yet been concluded. A European Commission spokesman in Brussels earlier confirmed that one mln tonnes of sugar had been offered to intervention boards in various member states. The intervention board spokesman in Frankfurt said, \"One million tonnes is an awful lot and the Community\'s coffers are almost empty. This could turn into a serious political problem.\"     West German trade sources said they believed the one mln tonne offer by the EC sugar industry into intervention would have a neutral market impact overall.  \n',sugar
'Greece will hold a buying tender on April 8, for reply by April 10, for 40,000 tonnes of white sugar from EC member countries, for delivery in four equal tranches in May, June, July and August, traders said.  \n',sugar
'Hungary is to grow sugar beet on 105,000 hectares of land this year compared with some 95,000 in 1986, the official MTI news agency said.     Diplomats said this reflected Hungary\'s policy of keeping the sugar beet area stable under the current five-year plan (1985-89) and producing enough to cover only domestic demand despite the recent rise of world prices to 10 month highs.     Drought cut the 1986 harvest to 3.58 mln tonnes from 4.07 mln in 1985. But a record yield of 130 kilos per tonne of beet kept production at 454,000 tonnes, with 30,000 extra refined in Yugoslavia from Hungarian beet. Output was 483,000 in 1985.  \n',sugar
'India has called a fresh buying tender for up to four 13,000 tonne cargoes of white sugar on March 11, traders here said.     The tender calls for one cargo of prompt sugar and two to three with March/April shipment sugar, or the same as the eight cargoes bought at a tender two days ago. That tender originally only sought two to three cargoes but resulted in the sale of eight. India also granted the sellers options to sell twice that amount at the same price but for April/May shipment.     Depending on prices, traders said it would be likely for India again to buy more than the tonnage formally sought.  \n',sugar
'India bought eight cargoes of white sugar at a buying tender this week but also gave sellers options to sell an extra eight cargoes at the same prices, traders said.     Four international firms shared the business which gave each of them sales of two cargoes of Mar/Apr shipment sugar at 233 dlrs CIF and options on two cargoes of Apr/May.     This brings recent options India has given traders to some 200,000 tonnes at fixed prices and makes future Indian purchases very dependent on price fluctuations, traders said.     At 233 dlrs CIF the sugar sold this week was at a discount of up to 10 dlrs to current prices, some traders said.  \n',sugar
'India bought up to 10 cargoes of white sugar at a buying tender today which originally called for just two to three cargoes of March/April shipment, traders said.     London trader E D and F Man said it sold two cargoes at 233 dlrs a tonne CIF for March/April shipment with an option to sell an additional two cargoes at the same price.     Traders said at least one other international trader made a similar contract while a French house sold two cargoes at an outright price of 233 dlrs CIF without the option. This brought total Indian purchases to at least six cargoes with traders having options to sell another four.  \n',sugar
'India yesterday bought two cargoes of white sugar from London traders for April/May shipment and granted the trade houses the option to sell an additional two cargoes at the same price for May/June shipment, the firms involved said.     E D and F Man and Woodhouse, Drake and Carey both said they sold single cargoes at 237.35 dlrs a tonne cif for April/May and were granted options to sell an extra cargo each at the same price for May/June at the Indian buying tender for three to four cargoes of whites held yesterday. The tender had called for a single cargo of prompt and two to three cargoes of April/May.  \n',sugar
'India is reported to have bought two white sugar cargoes for April/May shipment at its tender today near 227 dlrs a tonne cost and freight and could be seeking a third cargo, traders said.     A British operator is believed to have sold one of the cargoes, while an Austrian concern is thought to have featured in the second cargo sale, they said.  \n',sugar
'India will hold a buying tender on Wednesday, March 4, for two to three cargoes of white sugar for March/April shipment, traders said.  \n',sugar
'India\'s sugar output to January 31 in the 1986/87 season (October/September) rose to 3.66 mln tonnes from 3.46 mln in the same 1985/86 period, the Indian Sugar Mills Association said.     Total offtake in the first four months of the current year was 2.71 mln tonnes (including 241,000 tonnes imported) for domestic use and 4,000 tonnes for export, against 2.81 mln tonnes (including 993,000 imported) for domestic use and 3,000 tonnes for export in the corresponding period of 1985/86.     Factory stocks at end-January were 3.05 mln tonnes (96,000 imported) against 3.13 mln (96,000 imported) a year earlier.  \n',sugar
'Indonesian sugar output is forecast by the government to reach 2.126 mln tonnes in calendar 1987 against projected consumption of 2.039 mln tonnes, Agriculture Minister Achmad Affandi said.     Production in 1986, when Indonesia was forced to import sugar, is officially estimated at 2.016 mln tonnes against 1.728 mln in 1985.     The U.S. Embassy said in its annual Agriculture Report on Indonesia there were growing signs that actual output was lower than official figures. It estimated 1986 production at 1.8 mln tonnes and forecast little change for 1987.     Indonesia imported 162,000 tonnes of sugar towards the end of last year and in early 1987 to boost low stocks.     Affandi told reporters stocks fe&#127;l to as low as 159,000 tonnes at the beginning of 1987. Industry sources said this represented under one month\'s consumption.     The minister said Indonesia should hold three months\' supply, or 510,000 tonnes.     A spokesman for the National Logistics Bureau, which distributes and stores sugar, said stocks this month were 489,437 tonnes. The harvesting season begins in April.  \n',sugar
'Indonesia\'s raw sugar output is likely to be 1.8 mln tonnes in calendar 1987, unchanged from 1986 and below the government\'s 1987 forecast of 2.5 mln, the U.S. Embassy said in its agricultural outlook for 1987.     Indonesia bought 162,500 tonnes of raw sugar on world markets in late 1986, the report said.     The embassy estimated Indonesia\'s calendar 1986 raw sugar production at 1.8 mln tonnes, against a government estimate of 1.99 mln.     It said that Indonesia\'s move into sugar self-sufficiency in 1984 may have been short-lived.     The report said, \"The government continues to promote sugarcane production through its smallholder intensification program and a relatively high guaranteed price to sugarcane producers.     \"However, there are considerable indications that farmers are reluctant to plant cane because its economic return is not as good as that of other crops.\"  \n',sugar
'The International Sugar Agreement (ISA) will be renegotiated, International Sugar Organization (ISO) officer in charge Constantin Politoff tolds after a special session of the pact\'s council.     A decision on how to renegotiate will be taken at the ISO six monthly session in May. The alternatives are between an autumn London conference for another pact without economic clauses, but a different voting and budgetary structure, or a Geneva-based conference next year for a new pact with economic clauses, he said.     But delegates said the latter would only be considered if the world\'s four major exporters -- Australia, Brazil, Cuba and the European Community -- can resolve differences over how prices can best be supported and how to share the world     Today\'s special session was called because the U.S. earlier indicated it would only be able to pay 56 pct of its share of the ISO budget.     At today\'s council session Politoff said the U.S. would try and find a way to pay the balance of about 50,000 stg later this year. Currently, about three quarters of this year\'s ISO 800,000 stg budget has not been paid but delegates said the U.S. caused controversy as it said it might not pay its full contribution in the last year of the current pact.     The Soviet Union has called for changes to the way the ISO budget is shared out. Currently it is halved between importers and exporters and the Soviet Union has a 30 pct share of the importer half. The Soviets want a new sugar pact to have only a single category of members who would all share the costs pro rata to their share of world sugar trade.     The ISO executive committee next meets on April 23 with the next full council session in the week of May 19.     There are 12 importing and 44 exporting members of the ISO.  \n',sugar
'The Agriculture Ministry said it revised its April-June sugar consumption estimate down to 623,300 tonnes on a refined basis, from 637,800 estimated at the end of December.     It said the estimate for domestically produced sugar supply for the same period was revised to 190,400 tonnes from the earlier estimate of 195,100 tonnes, while imports were revised to 402,000 tonnes from the earlier 435,800 tonnes.     It did not revise its sugar consumption estimate of 2.53 mln tonnes for the 1986/87 sugar year ending September 30.     The ministry said the estimate for the 1986/87 year\'s supply of domestically produced sugar was revised to 881,000 tonnes, from the earlier estimate of 863,000.     The estimate for 1986/87 imports was revised to 1.642 mln tonnes, from an earlier 1.645 mln tonnes.  \n',sugar
'London-based sugar operator Kaines Ltd confirmed it sold two cargoes of white sugar to India out of an estimated overall sales total of four or five cargoes in which other brokers participated.     The sugar, for April/May and April/June shipment, was sold at between 214 and 218 dlrs a tonne cif, it said.  \n',sugar
'Trade house Kaines said it sold Jordan two cargoes of white sugar at its buying tender today.     The sale comprised two 12,000 to 14,000 tonne cargoes (plus or minus 10 pct) for Mar/Apr shipment, a Kaines trader said.     Traders said the business was done at 235.5 dlrs a tonne cost and freight.  \n',sugar
'Libya is reported to have recently bought two cargoes of white sugar from operators at around 229/230 dlrs a tonne cost and freight, traders said.     The shipment period required was not specified.  \n',sugar
'The overall area devoted to sugar beet in Europe is forecast to remain stagnant this year at 7.22 mln hectares compared with 7.21 mln ha in 1986, West German statistician F.O. Licht said.     It was feared that the recent steep rise in sugar prices would have a marked effect on planting intentions this year, Licht said, but judging by this first estimate the effect was probably minimal.     The total beet area in the European Community is forecast to fall two pct to 1.85 mln ha against 1.89 mln in 1986.     The total Western Europe area is put at 2.49 mln ha, against 2.50 mln in 1986. Eastern Europe area is forecast at 4.73 mln ha against 4.72 mln.     Individual West Europe country estimates, in 1,000 hectares (with 1986 figures in brackets), are, Belgium/Luxembourg 114 (118), Denmark 69 (69), France 419 (421), Greece 35 (44), Ireland 36 (38), Italy 270 (275), Netherlands 129 (138), Portugal 1 (1), Spain 192 (190), U.K. 200 (201), West Germany 385 (399), Austria 32 (28), Finland 30 (31), Sweden 51 (52), Switzerland 15 (14), Turkey 355 (340), Yugoslavia 160 (136).     Eastern Europe plantings are forecast as follows, USSR 3400 (3440), Albania 10 (9), Bulgaria 52 (50), Czechoslovakia 195 (196), East Germany 210 (205), Hungary 108 (96), Poland 460 (440), Romania 295 (280).     On the basis of average yields this year, Licht said these area forecasts pointed to a total European beet sugar crop in 1987/88 of 29.8 mln tonnes, raw value, down from 31.4 mln tonnes in 1986/87. Licht said sugar yields were fairly high last season, thanks to favourable weather, and this increases the chances of a significant reduction in production in 1987/88.     Based on average yields, EC beet sugar production could fall nearly 10 pct this year to 13.5 mln tonnes from 14.9 mln in 1986/87, while total Western Europe production could be 16.9 mln tonnes against 18.1 mln. Eastern Europe production could be 12.9 mln tonnes against 13.3 mln in 1986/87.  \n',sugar
'Delfzyl/India 14,700 mt bagged sugar about 30 dlrs 750/1,000 ppt a/c Benham.     Antwerp/Lagos 12,000 mt bagged sugar 750/750 try liner discharge 5-20/4 a/c E D and F Man.     T/C single or tweendecker 16,000/19,000 tonnes dw del Queensland mid-April/early-May for trip with bulk sugar redel China duration about 30 to 40 days a/c Kawasaki.     One port A-H range/Dubai 6,800 mt bagged sugar 750/750 10-15/4 a/c unnamed charterer.     enquiries - Rouen-Hamburg/India 14,000 mt bagged sugar 750/1,000 15-25/4 a/c Woodhouse, Drake and Carey.     Flushing/Hodeidah and Mokha 16,800 mt bagged sugar 750/750 9-15/4 Genoc.     Santos/Hodeidah 10,000 mt bagged sugar about 30 dlrs 750/750 20-30/4 a/c Dutch charterer.     Cargill is reported to have withdrawn its enquiries for cargoes from South Korea to India, from Constanza to India and from Buenaventura to the U.S.  \n',sugar
'Raw sugar futures had a quiet opening call of 38 lots with prices holding steady from last night with gains of 20 to 80 cents a tonne, dealers said.     Aug was trading at 157.60 dlrs from 157.40 asked yesterday.     The modest rise continued the recent rally from an oversold situation but, dealers noted, there was little fresh physicals news to stimulate activity.     Whites tenders are scheduled for next Wednesday by Syria for 36,000 tonnes and Greece for 40,000 tonnes while Pakistan is due to tender on April 11 for 100,000 tonnes whites, they said.     This week has seen whites buying by India and Egypt.  \n',sugar
'Raw sugar futures firmed to session highs by midmorning, securing gains from last night\'s basically steady close of 1.00 to 1.80 dlrs a tonne in a 166 lot volume.     Shortcovering against an oversold situation continued to play a part in the extended rally with unsettled dollar rates versus sterling providing additional support.     Recent and prospective whites buying in the world market was supportive but the raws section lacked feature, dealers said.     India and Egypt bought white sugar this week while next week sees tenders by Pakistan, Greece and Syria, they said.     May was at 154 dlrs from 152.80 asked last night.     All London Daily prices rose two dlrs a tonne on tone.     The Raws price was set at 150 dlrs Fob and 173 dlrs (107.50 stg) Cif.     The Whites price was at 192 dlrs from 190 yesterday.  \n',sugar
'Malta is tendering to buy 3,000 tonnes white sugar today for arrival in two equal parts in May and June, traders said.  \n',sugar
'Mauritius exported 47,144 tonnes of sugar (tel quel) in February, down from 57,911 tonnes (tel quel) shipped in January and 89,351 in February 1986, the Mauritius Chamber of Agriculture\'s Sugar News Bulletin said.     Opening stocks at the beginning of last month totalled 320,057 tonnes, against 288,406 tonnes at the start of February last year. Closing stocks at the end of February were 270,212 tonnes, up from 196,309 tonnes at end-February 1986.     The estimate for 1986 sugar production was unchanged from last month at 748,472 tonnes, raw value, the Chamber said.  \n',sugar
'The Minneapolis Grain Exchange (MGE) will start trading futures contracts in high fructose corn syrup on April 6 if the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) approves the contract as expected next week.     Pat Henderson, spokesperson for the MGE, said the exchange expects contract approval at CFTC\'s Tuesday meeting. It has been under review since the exchange submitted the proposal in December, 1985.     The proposed contract is based on 48,000 pound lots of 55-pct high fructose corn syrup, the equivalent of one tank truck of the sweetening agent derived from corn in the wet milling process. The syrup, commonly called HFCS-55, is most commonly used as a sweetener in soft drinks and other beverages.     Delivery would be by shipping certificate from production facilities designated by the exchange. The contract, designated by the symbol \"HF,\" would trade from 0900 to 1315 CST. Months traded would correspond with the Chicago corn futures months of March, May, July, September and December.     Contract price will be quoted per hundred weight, with a minimum price fluctuation of one cent and maximum fluctuation of one dlr per CWT.     \"We hope the producers and users of fructose will be actively involved, those producers being the large processors, the corn wet millers, and the users being the beverage bottlers,\" Henderson said. \"But there are potentials for all types of people to use it. There is quite a list of industries that utilize fructose.\"  \n',sugar
'Dominican Alfredo Ricart will take over as executive director of the International Sugar Organization (ISO) in mid-April, ISO officer in charge Constantin Politoff said.     Previous ISO chief William Miller retired at end-February last year.     Ricart tolds his first aim is put the \"house in order\" by having a new administrative sugar pact with improved allocations of voting rights and financial contributions.     Once this is done, time can be dedicated to working towards a new International Sugar Agreement (ISA) with economic clauses, he said.     Ricart, currently the Dominican Republic\'s ambassador to Austria, the Netherlands and the UN in Geneva, said he will visit the four major exporters - Australia, Brazil, Cuba and the European Community - to talk to governments and producers and find out about problems that are preventing these countries finding common ground for a new sugar pact.  \n',sugar
'Taiwan is not expected to export sugar this year because of falling production and growing domestic consumption, state-owned Taiwan Sugar Corp said.     A company spokesman tolds this will be the first time in more than 40 years Taiwan has not exported sugar. Last year, sugar exports totalled 149,755 tonnes.     He said the actual production during the 1986/87 season (November/May) is about 480,000 tonnes, barely enough to meet local consumption. This compares with actual 1985/86 output of 570,000. He said the production fall was due to typhoon damage to more than 6,000 hectares of canefields last year.  \n',sugar
'Trade house sources said China is expected to step up its sugar purchases following yesterday\'s steep drop in world sugar prices.     The consensus is that the Chinese will buy between 200,000 and 400,000 tonnes of raw sugar.     \"China is short of foreign exchange and a drop in prices is usually taken as a buying opportunity by Peking,\" one trader said.     Yesterday, prices on the New York world sugar market plummeted by 0.58 to 0.50 cent on heavy liquidation by speculators, disenchanted over the market\'s lack of rallying power.     Speculation is that China will need the sugar for the May/July period.  \n',sugar
'The Soviet Union bought almost 90,000 tonnes of raw sugar from international trade houses last night, with some of the sugar changing hands at discounts to the spot May world sugar contract, according to trade sources.     They said Japanese trade houses sold up to three cargoes of Thai sugar for relatively nearby delivery.     British and European-based trade houses sold the remaining six cargoes for shipment between April/May/July, they said.     Traders said this week\'s sharp fall in world sugar prices helped to provoke the Soviet Union into covering nearby needs.     Yesterday, spot May sugar closed at 7.18 cents a pound.  \n',sugar
'Turkey bought an estimated 100,000 tonnes of white sugar from three trade houses today for April to June shipment, according to trade sources.     They said a large U.K. trade house sold 50,000 tonnes, a U.S. house traded 25,000 tonnes, and a Swiss-based dealer house 25,000 tonnes.     Price details were unclear but reports this morning suggested that Turkey was offered sugar at prices ranging down to 212 dlrs a tonne, c and f basis.  \n',sugar
'Trading Corp of Pakistan Ltd said it had invited tenders up to April 11, 1987 for the import of 100,000 tonnes of white refined crystal sugar up to June.     It said each cargo should consist of 15,000 tonnes. Four cargoes should reach Port Bin Qasim or Karachi Port (buyers option) by May 31 and the balance by June 30, 1987, it added.  \n',sugar
'The Panamanian motor vessel Northern 1, 4,217 dwt, was safely towed into Greenock over the weekend after having its crankshaft broken off the Scottish coast during severe weather, Lloyds Shipping Intelligence said.     Northern 1 was loaded with 3,000 tons of sugar from Demerara.  \n',sugar
'Sugar production in Peru for the 1986/87 season has been revised to 593,000 tonnes (raw value), down 10 pct from the previous forecast and 21 pct below the 1985/86 harvest, the U.S. Agriculture Department said in its World Production and Trade Report.     It said while rains in the northern mountain region are improving the supply of irrigation water, the major benefits will not occur until the 1987/88 season.  \n',sugar
'Philippine sugar production in the 1987/88 crop year ending August has been set at 1.6 mln tonnes, up from a provisional 1.3 mln tonnes this year, Sugar Regulatory Administration (SRA) chairman Arsenio Yulo said.     Yulo tolds a survey during the current milling season, which ends next month, showed the 1986/87 estimate would almost certainly be met.     He said at least 1.2 mln tonnes of the 1987/88 crop would be earmarked for domestic consumption.     Yulo said about 130,000 tonnes would be set aside for the U.S. Sugar quota, 150,000 tonnes for strategic reserves and 50,000 tonnes would be sold on the world market.     He said if the government approved a long-standing SRA recommendation to manufacture ethanol, the project would take up another 150,000 tonnes, slightly raising the target.     \"The government, for its own reasons, has been delaying approval of the project, but we expect it to come through by July,\" Yulo said.     Ethanol could make up five pct of gasoline, cutting the oil import bill by about 300 mln pesos.     Yulo said three major Philippine distilleries were ready to start manufacturing ethanol if the project was approved.     The ethanol project would result in employment for about 100,000 people, sharply reducing those thrown out of work by depressed world sugar prices and a moribund domestic industry.     Production quotas, set for the first time in 1987/88, had been submitted to President Corazon Aquino.     \"I think the President would rather wait till the new Congress convenes after the May elections,\" he said. \"But there is really no need for such quotas. We are right now producing just slightly over our own consumption level.\"     \"The producers have never enjoyed such high prices,\" Yulo said, adding sugar was currently selling locally for 320 pesos per picul, up from 190 pesos last August.     Yulo said prices were driven up because of speculation following the SRA\'s bid to control production.     \"We are no longer concerned so much with the world market,\" he said, adding producers in the Negros region had learned from their mistakes and diversified into corn and prawn farming and cloth production.     He said diversification into products other than ethanol was also possible within the sugar industry.     \"The Brazilians long ago learnt their lessons,\" Yulo said. \"They have 300 sugar mills, compared with our 41, but they relocated many of them and diversified production. We want to call this a \'sugarcane industry\' instead of the sugar industry.\"     He said sugarcane could be fed to pigs and livestock, used for thatching roofs, or used in room panelling.     \"When you cut sugarcane you don\'t even have to produce sugar,\" he said.     Yulo said the Philippines was lobbying for a renewal of the International Sugar Agreement, which expired in 1984.     \"As a major sugar producer we are urging them to write a new agreement which would revive world prices,\" Yulo said.     \"If there is no agreement world prices will always be depressed, particularly because the European Community is subsidising its producers and dumping sugar on the markets.\"     He said current world prices, holding steady at about 7.60 cents per pound, were uneconomical for the Philippines, where production costs ranged from 12 to 14 cents a pound.     \"If the price holds steady for a while at 7.60 cents I expect the level to rise to about 11 cents a pound by the end of this year,\" he said.     Yulo said economists forecast a bullish sugar market by 1990, with world consumption outstripping production.     He said sugar markets were holding up despite encroachments from artificial sweeteners and high-fructose corn syrup.     \"But we are not happy with the Reagan Administration,\" he said. \"Since 1935 we have been regular suppliers of sugar to the U.S. In 1982, when they restored the quota system, they cut ours in half without any justification.\"     Manila was keenly watching Washington\'s moves to cut domestic support prices to 12 cents a pound from 18 cents.     The U.S. Agriculture Department last December slashed its 12 month 1987 sugar import quota from the Philippines to 143,780 short tons from 231,660 short tons in 1986.     Yulo said despite next year\'s increased production target, some Philippine mills were expected to shut down.     \"At least four of the 41 mills were not working during the 1986/87 season,\" he said. \"We expect two or three more to follow suit during the next season.\"  \n',sugar
'The Philippines will ask the U.S. Agriculture Department (USDA) to increase its 1987 sugar import quota following market reports that Taiwan will not be able to fulfil its quota, Sugar Regulation Administration (SRA) chairman Arsenim Yulo said.     Yulo tolds the SRA would also protest a USDA move to award Taiwan\'s shortfall to the Dominican Republic.     The Dominican Republic already has a larger sugar quota, Yulo said. \"Any Taiwanese shortfall should be awarded to the Philippines or at the least we should share a hike with the Dominican Republic.\"     The USDA last December listed 1987 sugar import quota allocations for the Dominican Republic at 160,160 short tons and for Taiwan at 10,920 short tons.     The Philippines has said it was badly hit by a cut in its quota to 143,780 short tons from 231,660 in 1986.  \n',sugar
'The recent fall in world sugar prices, due to increased producer pricing sales and evidence of export availability, has encouraged renewed buying interest from China and the Soviet Union, London trade house E.D.And F. Man said.     Further purchases are expected by the Peoples Republic of China at the lower end of the recent price range, which should limit the downside movement, it said in its latest monthly market report.    \"And it is believed that the Soviet Union will need to return to the market to take a further 250,000/350,000 tonnes for May/June shipment, Man added.     The Soviets purchased five cargoes of raws for April/May shipment towards the end of last month, which brings its total purchases to around 1.65 mln tonnes, Man said.     Production estimates for the Thai crop now exceed 2.3 mln tonnes and the final outturn appears set to reach around 2.5 mln tonnes. However, this upturn in the Thai crop is being countered by a reduction in China\'s production forecast to 5.3 mln tonnes from 5.5 mln estimated earlier.     Market participation by Cuba suggests that its crop could be close to last year\'s 7.3 mln tonnes. But even with similar production Man expects Cuban exports to be significantly down.     Cuba was reported to be carrying 1.3 mln tonnes of stocks in September 1985, of which some 440,000 tonnes were used to boost its 1985/86 exports to about 6.9 mln. But as it will not be able to draw on surplus stocks this year, Man estimates Cuba\'s export availabilty will be reduced to 6.4 to 6.5 mln tonnes.     However, Cuba is only one of a large number of exporters with reduced availability, Man said.     Since 1980 the total free market export supply has fallen to 18 mln from about 22 mln tonnes. But at the same time free market demand has also fallen by almost the same amount, which has left exporters chasing falling import requirements.     A fairly tight balance now appears to have emerged. But the difficult task of keeping production advances at bay still remains, as at least one more season of production deficit is needed to eliminate some of the remaining surplus stocks still overhanging the market, Man said.     The increasing cases of record production as a result of record yields and better husbandry have forced sugar producers to strive for greater efficiency.     As this increase in efficiency reduces the marginal cost of production, sugar exporters may become more responsive to prices and in particular to upward price movements, Man said.     Commenting on the current row between the EC Commission and sugar producers, Man said despite the recent improvement in the level of restitutions, they are still insufficient to fully compensate producers when exporting on the world market.     Unless there are further improvements, at least some sugar is expected to remain in intervention, it added.  \n',sugar
'The Food Department will no longer import sugar from April 1, senior officials of the Food and Cooperatives Ministry and the Department tolds.     They said the decision was taken after the Sugar Importers Association asked that the sugar trade be further liberalised.     \"The Food Department will cease trading in sugar and will no longer hold a buffer stock,\" a senior official said.     He said the government has finalised an agreement with E.D.F.Man (Sugar) Ltd under which E.D.F.Man will hold a buffer stock on the government\'s behalf of 20,000 tonnes, against the 45,000 tonne buffer stock usually held by the Department.     Officials said the size of the buffer stock has been reduced because the private sector will hold its own stocks.     The agreement with E.D.F. Man includes details such as trigger pricing mechanisms, they said.     Four months ago the Department allowed the private sector to import sugar without government clearance. The Department and the private sector each imported around 115,000 tonnes of sugar last year, when national consumption was 280,000 tonnes.     An Importers Association official said that \"even if the Department no longer imports sugar, we would not necessarily buy more.\"     This is because the Association would still have to compete with the Cooperatives Wholesale Establishment (CWE), he said.     The CWE is a semi-government body and the official said arrangements are being made for state cooperatives and holders of food subsidy stamps to draw their sugar from it, starting April 1.     Ministry officials said the CWE can either import sugar or buy it from a local bonded warehousing scheme run by E.D.F. For the past two years.  \n',sugar
'Reports the Soviet Union has lately extended its recent buying programme by taking five to eight raws cargoes from the free market at around 30/40 points under New York May futures highlight recent worldwide demand for sugar for a variety of destinations, traders said.     The Soviet buying follows recent whites buying by India, Turkey and Libya, as well as possible raws offtake by China.     Some 300,000 to 400,000 tonnes could have changed hands in current activity, which is encouraging for a sugar trade which previously saw little worthwhile end-buyer enquiry, they added.     Dealers said a large proportion of the sales to the Soviet Union in the past few days involved Japanese operators selling Thai origin sugar.     Prices for nearby shipment Thai sugars have tightened considerably recently due to good Far Eastern demand, possibly for sales to the Soviet Union or to pre-empt any large block enquiries by China, they said.     Thai prices for March/May 15 shipments have hardened to around 13/14 points under May New York from larger discounts previously, they added.     Traders said the Soviet Union might be looking to buy more sugar in the near term, possibly towards an overall requirement this year of around two mln tonnes. It is probable that some 1.8 mln tonnes have already been taken up, they said.     Turkey was reported this week to have bought around 100,000 tonnes of whites while India had further whites purchases of two to three cargoes for Mar/Apr at near 227 dlrs a tonne cost and freight and could be seeking more. Libya was also a buyer this week, taking two cargoes of whites which, for an undisclosed shipment period, were reported priced around 229/230 dlrs a tonne cost and freight, they added.     Futures prices reacted upwards to the news of end-buyer physicals offtake, although much of the enquiry emerged recently when prices took an interim technical dip, traders said.     Pakistan is lined up shortly to buy 100,000 tonnes of whites although traders said the tender, originally scheduled for tomorrow, might not take place until a week later.     Egypt will be seeking 20,000 tonnes of May arrival white sugar next week, while Greece has called an internal EC tender for 40,000 tonnes of whites to be held in early April, for arrival in four equal parts in May, June, July and August.  \n',sugar
'The 2,500 tonnes of sugar offered to intervention in the Netherlands has been refused by the intervention board because of wrong packaging, a spokeswoman for the Ministry of Agriculture said.     She said the sugar could be offered again to intervention.     EC producers have threatened to sell over 800,000 tonnes of sugar to intervention stocks as a protest against EC export licensing policies.     Last month Dutch traders said the sugar on offer in the Netherlands was Belgian, but the ministry could not confirm this.  \n',sugar
'Latin American sugar producers are awaiting further rises in world market prices before moving to boost production, official and trade sources said.     Although prices have risen to around eight from five U.S. Cents per lb in the past six months, they are still below the region\'s nine to ten cents per lb average production cost.     The recent rise in prices has placed producers on the alert, Manuel Rico, a consultant with the Group of Latin American and Caribbean Sugar Exporting Countries (GEPLACEA), tolds.     However, Rico said, it would require another five to seven cents to stimulate notable increases in output.     \"Producers are taking measures for increasing their production when the prices are profitable,\" he said.     Officials in Mexico, Guatemala and Ecuador said a continued rise in prices would stimulate production, but industry leaders in Panama and Costa Rica said there was still a long way to go.     \"The prices are ridiculous,\" said Julian Mateo, vice president of Costa Rica\'s Sugar Cane Industrial-Agricultural League. \"At current prices nobody is going to consider increasing production.\"     Other producers are wary of committing funds to increasing output, given the instability of world markets.     An official at Colombia\'s National Association of Sugar Cane Growers said they had no plans to raise export targets. \"The market is very unstable. What is happening is not yet giving way to a pattern and so there is no reason to modify anything.\"     In 1985, the latest year for which full figures are available, Central and South American nations produced 28 mln tonnes, raw value, of sugar of which 12.3 mln were exported. A year earlier, they had produced and exported about 800,000 more, according to the London-based International Sugar Organization.     Years of continuous low prices have plunged the sugar industry in many countries in the region into a recession from which it will be hard to recover.     Miguel Guerrero, director of the Dominican Republic\'s National Sugar Institute, said it would be difficult to boost production even if prices recovered sharply.     Output had slumped to under 450,000 tonnes a year from 900,000 in the late 1970s. Obsolete refineries, poor transport and badly maintained plantations were barriers to any short term recovery in output, he added.     Plans of nearby Cuba, the world\'s largest cane sugar exporter, to increase output to 10 mln tonnes a year by the end of the decade seem ambitious, trade sources said. Output is running well below the record 8.6 mln produced in 1970.     Cuba suffers from run down plantations, harvesting problems and poor processing facilities more than from low world prices, since much of its output is sold to Eastern Bloc countries under special deals. Last year, bad weather added to its troubles, and output fell to 7.2 mln tonnes from 8.2 mln in 1985.     The low world prices of recent years have led many countries in the region to cut exportable production to levels where they barely cover U.S. And, in the case of some Caribbean countries, European Community (EC) import quotas, for which they receive prices well above free market levels.     Progressive reductions in the U.S. Quotas have led to production stagnating or falling rather than being shifted to the free world market.     Peru, for example, shipped 96,000 tonnes to the U.S. In both 1983 and 1984. This fell to 76,000 in 1986 and this year its quota is only 37,000.     A national cooperative official said that, as long as world market levels continue at around half of Peru\'s production cost, the future of the industry is uncertain.     At a meeting of GEPLACEA in Brazil last October officials stressed the need to find alternative uses for sugar cane which, according to the group\'s executive-secretary Eduardo Latorre, \"grows like a weed\" throughout the region.     Brazil, the largest cane producer with output of around 240 mln tonnes, uses over half to produce alcohol fuel. Cane in excess of internal demand for alcohol and sugar is refined into sugar for sale abroad to earn much needed foreign currency.     The difference in the price the state-run Sugar and Alcohol Institute (IAA) pays local industry and what it receives from foreign buyers costs the government some 350 mln dlrs a year.     Soaring domestic demand for both alcohol and sugar over the past year, coupled with a drought-reduced cane crop, has meant Brazil will have difficulties in meeting export commitments in 1987, trade sources said. Negotiations to delay shipments to next year have been indecisive so far, the main sticking point being how Brazil should compensate buyers for non-delivery of sugar it had sold at around five cents per lb and which would cost eight cents to replace.     Brazilian sugar industry sources said new sugar export sales were expected to be extremely low for the next year, with the Institute wary of exposing itself to domestic shortages of either alcohol or sugar and because of the need to rebuild depleted reserve stockpiles.     However, the situation could change dramatically if the economy goes into recession and internal demand slumps.     Sources within Latin America and the Caribbean hold little hope for the region\'s sugar industry to return to profitability unless the U.S. And EC change their policies.     \"The agricultural policies of the European Community and of the United States have caused our economies incalculable harm by closing their markets, by price deterioration in international commerce and furthermore by the unfair competition in third countries,\" Brazil\'s Trade and Industry Minister Jose Hugo Castelo Branco told the October GEPLACEA meeting.     The EC has come under prolonged attack from GEPLACEA for what the group charges is its continued dumping of excess output on world markets. GEPLACEA officials say this is the main cause of low prices.     GEPLACEA sees a new International Sugar Agreement which would regulate prices as one of the few chances of pulling the region\'s industry out of steady decline. Such an agreement would have to have both U.S. And EC backing and industrialised countries would have to see it as a political rather than a merely economic pact.     \"They have to realise that the more our economies suffer, the less capcity we have to buy their goods and repay the region\'s 360 billion dollar foreign debt,\" GEPLACEA\'s Latorre said.  \n',sugar
'The U.S. Agriculture Department said cumulative sugar imports from individual countries during the 1987 quota year, which began January 1, 1987 and ends December 31, 1987 were as follows, with quota allocations for the quota year in short tons, raw value --             CUMULATIVE     QUOTA 1987               IMPORTS     ALLOCATIONS  ARGENTINA        nil          39,130  AUSTRALIA        nil          75,530  BARBADOS         nil           7,500  BELIZE           nil          10,010  BOLIVIA          nil           7,500  BRAZIL           nil         131,950  CANADA           nil          18,876                            QUOTA 1987               IMPORTS     ALLOCATIONS  COLOMBIA         103          21,840  CONGO            nil           7,599  COSTA RICA       nil          17,583  IVORY COAST      nil           7,500  DOM REP        5,848         160,160  ECUADOR          nil          10,010  EL SALVADOR      nil          26,019.8  FIJI             nil          25,190  GABON            nil           7,500                            QUOTA 1987               IMPORTS     ALLOCATIONS  GUATEMALA        nil          43,680  GUYANA           nil          10,920  HAITI            nil           7,500  HONDURAS         nil          15,917.2  INDIA            nil           7,500  JAMAICA          nil          10,010  MADAGASCAR       nil           7,500  MALAWI           nil           9,,100                            QUOTA 1987                IMPORTS    ALLOCATIONS  MAURITIUS         nil         10,920  MEXICO             37          7,500  MOZAMBIQUE        nil         11,830  PANAMA            nil         26,390  PAPUA NEW GUINEA  nil          7,500  PARAGUAY          nil          7,500  PERU              nil         37,310  PHILIPPINES       nil        143,780  ST.CHRISTOPHER-  NEVIS             nil          7,500                           QUOTA 1987                 IMPORTS  ALLOCATIONS  SWAZILAND          nil         14,560  TAIWAN             nil         10,920  THAILAND           nil         12,740  TRINIDAD-TOBAGO    nil          7,500  URUGUAY            nil          7,500  ZIMBABWE           nil         10,920   \n',sugar
'London traders say the European Community is likely to award a maximum rebate of 46.80 European currency units per 100 kilos at today\'s tender, while traders in Paris predict a maximum award of 46.40 Ecus.     Last week the EC awarded licences for 59,000 tonnes at a rebate of 45.678 Ecus.     Trade views differed on the amount of sugar likely to be released today.     London traders said the EC Commission will probably endeavour to release a large tonnage, and as much as  100,000 tonnes may be authorised for export under licences up to end-September.     Paris traders put the likely tonnage at around 60,000.   \n',sugar
'Syria will hold a buying tender on April 8 for 36,000 tonnes of white sugar for shipment in June, July and August at a rate of 12,000 tonnes a month, traders said.  \n',sugar
'Thai sugar production continued at a high level in February, latest figures received by the International Sugar Organization (ISO) show.     The figures show stocks at end-February of 2.49 mln tonnes raw value against 2.33 mln a year earlier. Analysts said this was a new peak for the date.     Production in February was 961,000 tonnes against 888,000 in February 1986 and took the Nov/Feb total for the current crop to 2.25 mln tonnes. Production normally tails off sharply after March, but in recent years production from March to the end of the crop has been over 500,000 tonnes, analysts said.     Thailand\'s exports in February were 32,800 tonnes and consumption 57,800.     Last month the Thai Agriculture Ministry said 1986/87 production was expected to fall to 2.3 mln tonnes from 2.48 mln in 1985/86.  \n',sugar
'Thai sugar production totalled 960,788 tonnes in January, an increase of 12.7 pct on January 1986, according to figures received by the International Sugar Organization.     November and December production figures also exceeded last year\'s totals with the result that output in the first three months of the season showed a 23.1 pct increase over 1985/86. Production in the November 1986 to January 1987 period totalled 1.29 mln tonnes.     Thai exports in December and January were down, however. January exports fell from 73,164 to 35,910 tonnes.     Domestic consumption increased 7.3 pct to 192,069 tonnes for the three month period, but this was not sufficient to prevent a significant rise in stocks, which climbed to 1.62 mln tonnes by the end of January, compared with 1.52 mln a year earlier.     Thai Agricultural Ministry officials have previously forecast a decline in 1986/87 raws output to around 2.3 mln tonnes from 2.48 mln in 1985/86.  \n',sugar
'Thailand\'s sugarcane output will fall to about 23.55 mln tonnes in the 1986/87 (November-October) season from 24.09 mln in 1985/86, the Agriculture Ministry said.     It said a January survey put the total area under sugarcane at 545,528 hectares, down from 556,860 hectares the previous year.     The national average yield is expected to fall to 43.17 tonnes/hectare from 43.22 tonnes in 1985/86, it said.  \n',sugar
'Traders here and in Paris said the results of today\'s EC white sugar tender are hard to forecast because of plans by a group of French, West German, Dutch and Belgian operators to sell one mln tonnes of sugar into intervention.     London traders said bids for licences have been reported between 43.00 and 44.00 Ecus per 100 kilos and if any licences are granted they are likely to be towards the lower end of that range, possibly 43.30/43.50 Ecus.     Traders in Paris said they expect maximum rebates of between 43 and 43.50 Ecus.     Other than the Commission releasing no sugar for export, the likely tonnage is expected to be very small, the London traders said, while the French sources declined to estimate volume in view of the psychological impact of the planned sales into intervention in protest against EC export policies.     Last week licences for 60,500 tonnes were awarded at a maximum rebate of 43.147 Ecus.  \n',sugar
'Turkey is holding a buying tender for 100,000 tonnes of white sugar on March 24, traders here said.     The sugar is being sought for early arrival and will probably be met with April/May shipment sugar, they added.     Earlier today newspapers in Turkey carried an advertisement from Turkish Sugar Factories inviting offers of 100,000 tonnes of crystal sugar with a 50 pct option to increase or decrease the amount.     Over the 1983/85 period Turkey each year has exported between 240,000 and 350,000 tonnes of whites to Iran and between 62,000 and 230,000 tonnes to Iraq.     Following lower sugar crops in the past two years analysts said Turkey needs to import sugar now if it is to continue filling these export contracts, and may need to buy more.     Last month London broker C Czarnikow estimated Turkish 1986/87 production at 1.42 mln tonnes raw value against 1.4 mln in 1985/86 and an average 1.76 mln in the previous three seasons.     The semi-official Anatolian Agency recently quoted Turkish Minister of Industry and Trade Cahit Aral as saying Turkey would export 100,000 tonnes of sugar this year and import the same amount.  \n',sugar
'Turkey has announced a tender to import 100,000 tonnes of white crystal sugar with an advertisement in local newspapers.     Turkish Sugar Factories said in the advertisement there was a 50 pct option to increase or decrease the amount and bids should reach it before March 24.     The semi-official Anatolian Agency recently quoted Turkish Minister of Industry and Trade Cahit Aral as saying Turkey will export 100,000 tonnes of sugar this year and import the same amount.  \n',sugar
'A total 102,350 tonnes of current series white sugar received export rebates of a maximum 46.864 European Currency Units (Ecus) per 100 kilos at today\'s European Community (EC) tender, the U.K. Intervention Board said.     Out of this, traders in France received 31,000 tonnes, in West Germany 21,000, in Belgium 19,050, in the U.K. 15,800, in Denmark 8,500, in the Netherlands 6,000 and in Spain 1,000 tonnes, it added.     Earlier today, London traders had expected the subsidy for the current season whites campaign for licences to end-Sep to be around 46.80 Ecus per 100 kilos while French traders had put the rebate at around 46.40 Ecus.     Traders here had also forecast today\'s total authorised sugar tonnage export awards up to 100,000 tonnes versus 59,000 last week when the restitution was 45.678 Ecus.     Total export authorisations for the 1985/86 campaign (42  weeks) now stand at 2,076,620 tonnes.  \n',sugar
'New immigration rules relating to alien farm workers and reportedly being drafted by the U.S. Agriculture Department are meeting with objections in Congress, sources on Capitol Hill said.     USDA is drafting regulations, required by a 1986 law, that would offer amnesty to illegal aliens if they worked in the cultivation of fruits, vegetables and other perishable commodities.     The department is considering including in its definition of perishable commodities such farm products as tobacco, hops, Spanish reeds and Christmas trees, while excluding sugar cane, the New York Times reported yesterday.     Rep. Howard Berman, D-Calif., would like to see the definition extended to include sugar cane, cultivation of which is \"a breeding ground for one of the scandals of the nation,\" Gene Smith, a spokesman for Berman, said.     Livestock, dairy and poultry producers have been lobbying USDA hard to have their products covered by the amnesty provision, farm industry sources said.     Chuck Fields of the American Farm Bureau Federation said livestock producers were \"desperate\" because they fear they will be unable to retain the many illegal aliens who have joined that industry.     A House staff member involved in drafting the landmark 1986 immigration law who asked not to be identified said Congress did not mean to extend special amnesty provisions to workers who helped cultivate tobacco, and that inclusion of hops and Spanish reeds was \"marginal.\"     In addition, lawmakers made it clear during consideration of the bill that lumber workers were not to be covered by the the amnesty provisions, making the inclusion of Christmas trees \"a tough call,\" this source said.     USDA officials declined to comment on the draft regulation except to say it was subject to change before it will be released, probably some time later this month.     While lawmakers may object to the USDA rule under consideration relating to perishable commodities, Congress is not likely to reopen debate on the controversial immigration question, congressional sources said.     The amnesty provision specially designed for farm workers was crucial to passage of the overall immigration bill.     Congressional staff members estimate the special farm worker amnesty provision would apply to between 250,000 to 350,000 aliens. The law would allow eligible farm workers who worked for 90 days during the year ending May 1, 1986, to apply for temporary, then permanent, resident status.  \n',sugar
'Sugar imports subject to the U.S. sugar import quota during the week ended March 6 totaled 25,192 short tons versus 29,043 tons the previous week, the Agriculture Department said.     Cumulative imports now total 130,804 tons, it said.     The sugar import quota for the 1987 quota year (January-December) has been set at 1,001,430 short tons compared with 1,850,000 tons in the 1986 quota year, which was extended three months to December 31.     The department said the Customs Service reported that weekly and cumulative imports are reported on an actual weight basis and when final polarizations are received, cumulative import data are adjusted accordingly.  \n',sugar
'Sugar imports subject to the U.S. sugar import quota during the week ended January 9, the initial week of the 1987 sugar quota year, totaled 5,988 short tons versus 46,254 tons the previous week, the Agriculture Department said.     The sugar import quota for the 1987 quota year (January-December) has been set at 1,001,430 short tons compared with 1,850,000 tons in the 1986 quota year, which was extended three months to December 31.     The department said the Customs Service has reported that weekly and cumulative imports are reported on an actual weight basis and when final polarizations are received, cumulative import data are adjusted accordingly.  \n',sugar
'A leading U.S. farm-state Congressman, Jerry Huckaby, D-La., warned he will press next year for legislation to control domestic production of sweeteners, perhaps including corn sweeteners, if the industry fails to voluntarily halt output increases this year.     \"We\'re moving toward a direction where we could self-destruct (the U.S. sugar program),\" Rep. Huckaby, chairman of the House agriculture subcommittee dealing with sugar issues, tolds in an interview.     Huckaby, who told U.S. sugarbeet growers earlier this year they must halt production increases, said he will deliver the same message to Louisiana sugarcane growers Friday. He also said he will soon talk with corn refiners on the subject.     Huckaby said the campaign to urge a halt to domestic sweetener output increases is an effort to forestall further cuts in the sugar import quota, now at one mln short tons.     \"I think if we\'re talking about dropping (the quota) another half mln tons, lets say, you\'re getting to the point where the program might not work,\" he said.     \"Ideally, I\'d like to freeze things right where we are,\" said Huckaby, leading advocate for sugar growers in Congress.     A freeze would mean domestic sugar production at about the current level of 6.5 mln tons, the corn sweetener share of the U.S. market staying at just over 50 pct, and U.S sugar imports holding at about 1.2 mln tons, Huckaby said.     A decision on whether to seek legislation will not be made until 1987 output numbers are known late this year, he said.     \"I feel like if we didn\'t expand production, we could probably hold where we are indefinitely, or at least through the 1985 farm bill without any changes (in the sugar program),\" Huckaby said.     However, much depends on whether high-fructose corn syrup producers continue to expand their share of the U.S. sweetener market from just over 50 pct, Huckaby said.     He noted most estimates are that corn sweeteners will capture at most only another 10 pct of the sweetener market in the U.S.     But he said if there were an economic breakthrough in the production of a new crystalline corn sweetener which further expanded the corn sweetener share, then U.S. sugar imports might be eliminated and U.S. sugar output severely reduced.     Huckaby said he will deliver this message to corn refiner companies such as A.E. Staley and Archer Daniels Midland soon.     \"This program is advantageous to the corn users. They have some natural, legitimate self-interest in seeing that the program is preserved,\" Huckaby said.     Huckaby said he has asked sugar industry representatives to think about how domestic output could be controlled, either through production allocations, acreage or marketing controls.     Huckaby also said he would be seeking guidance from the Justice Department to determine if it would be legal to ask corn refiners to limit production.     \"I don\'t know if we will go this route, but if we do there\'s a question in my mind at this point in time; can you do that legally?\" he said.     Asked if he would proceed with production controls without the support of corn refiners, Huckaby said \"You build a fragile house if you do it that way.\"     Huckaby said he understands why U.S. cane and beet farmers have expanded production, because high sugar price support means returns from sugar are higher than competing crops such as soybeans and grain.     But he said for sugar growers as a whole, expansion would not be good policy.     Huckaby said he has tried to stress, in his speeches to sugar industry groups, that if growers continue to expand, they may be penalized retroactively under any production control legislation passed next year.     Huckaby said Congress is unlikely to approve any changes in the sugar program this year despite a Reagan administration proposal to drastically slash the program.     \"The administration proposal is so drastic, that I don\'t think it will get up a head of steam,\" Huckaby said.     He said even a more moderate proposal to reduce sugar price support is unlikely to be approved.     Instead of seeking to slash the domestic sugar program, Huckaby said the Reagan administration should file a complaint with the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade against the European Community\'s sugar policy. He said EC policies are the major cause of the depressed world sugar market.  \n',sugar
'The U.S. Agriculture Department  formally transmitted to Congress a long-awaited proposal to drastically slash the sugar loan rate and compensate growers for the cut with targeted income payments.     In a letter to the Congressional leadership accompanying the \"Sugar Program Improvements Act of 1987\", Peter Myers, Deputy Agriculture Secretary, said the Reagan administration wants the sugar loan rate cut to 12 cents per pound beginning with the 1987 crop, down from 18 cts now.     Sugarcane and beet growers would be compensated by the government for the price support cut with targeted income payments over the four years 1988 to 1991. The payments would cost an estimated 1.1 billion dlrs, Myers said.     The administration sugar proposal is expected to be introduced in the House of Representatives next week by Rep. John Porter, R-Ill.     Congressional sources said the program cut is so drastic it is unlikely to be adopted in either the House or Senate because politically-influential sugar and corn growers and high fructose corn syrup producers will strongly resist.     The direct payment plan outlined by the administration  targets subsidies to small cane and beet growers and gradually lowers payments over four years. It also excludes from payment any output exceeding 20,000 short tons raw sugar per grower.     For example, on the first 350 tons of production, a grower would receive 6 cts per lb in fiscal 1988, 4.5 cts in 1989, 3 cts in 1990 and 1.5 cts in 1991.     The income payments would be based on the amount of commercially recoverable sugar produced by a farmer in the 1985 or 1986 crop years, whichever is less, USDA said.     Myers said the administration is proposing drastic changes in the sugar program because the current high price support is causing adverse trends in the sugar industry.     He said the current program has artificially stimulated domestic sugar and corn sweetener production which has allowed corn sweeteners to make market inroads.     U.S. sugar consumption has declined which has resulted in a \"progressive contraction\" of the sugar import quota to only one mln short tons this year, he said. This has hurt cane sugar refiners who rely on imported sugar processing.     Furthermore, USDA said the current sugar program gives overseas manufacturers of sugar-containing products a competitive advantage. The result has been higher imports of sugar-containing products and a flight of U.S. processing facilities overseas to take advantage of cheaper sugar.     USDA also said the current program imposes a heavy cost on U.S. consumers and industrial users. In fiscal 1987, USDA said consumers are paying nearly two billion dlrs more than necessary for sugar.     \"Enactment of this bill will reduce the price gap between sweeteners and help to correct or stabilize the many adverse impacts and trends which the sugar industry is currently facing,\" Myers said.     The following table lists the rate of payments, in cts per lb, to growers and the quantity covered, in short tons recoverable raw sugar, under the administration\'s proposal to compensate sugar growers with targeted payments.     QUANTITY            1988     1989      1990      1991 First 350 tons         6.000    4.500     3.000     1.500 Over 350 to 700        5.750    4.313     2.875     1.438 Over 700 to 1,000      5.500    4.125     2.750     1.375 Over 1,000 to 1,500    5.000    3.750     2.500     1.250 Over 1,500 to 3,000    4.500    3.375     2.250     1.125 Over 3,000 to 6,000    3.500    2.625     1.750     0.875 Over 6,000 to 10,000   2.250    1.688     1.125     0.563 Over 10,000 to 20,000  0.500    0.375     0.250     0.125 Over 20,000 tons        nil      nil       nil       nil   \n',sugar
'The United States may soon ease its 1987 sugar import quota of one mln short tons by bringing forward to the third quarter some shipments scheduled for the fourth quarter of 1987, Jerry Huckaby, a leading Congressman representing sugar growers tolds in an interview.     Huckaby, a Louisiana Democrat and chairman of the House subcommittee which deals with the sugar program, indicated the easing of the quota might be a way to calm the concern about the impact of the severe cut in U.S. sugar imports this year.     \"With imports coming down from 1.8 mln (last year) to one mln, there is legitimate concern about the impacts on Caribbean countries and the Philippines,\" Huckaby said.     By bringing forward to the third quarter some imports, the quota would effectively be eased by about 250,000 tons.     Huckaby said by simply bringing forward to the third quarter of the year sugar imports scheduled for the September to December period \"we could get away without having to increase the quota.\"     He noted that some in the sugar industry believe an increase in the quota is justified.     Earlier this month, representatives of U.S. cane sugar refiners met with U.S. Agriculture Department officials to request a quota increase of at least 200,000 tons. The refiners said the increase is needed because the quota is so restrictive there could be some spot shortages of sugar in the U.S later this year, a refiner spokesman said.     However, the official slaid the USDA replied only that it would consider the request.     Following the refiners\' request, representatives of the Florida sugarcane producers met with USDA to express opposition to any quota expansion, industry sources said.     The statement by Huckaby, who as a representative from a sugar growing district in Louisiana is a leading architect of the current sugar program, indicates at least some grower officials are concerned enough to support an easing of the import quota, industry officials said.     Any final decision on easing the quota must be made by the Reagan administration\'s interagency sugar policy group.     Asked about possible quota changes, A USDA official said \"As far as I know, changing the quota volume or the quota year is not under active consideration.\"  \n',sugar
'Representatives of U.S. sugar grower organizations said they expect some increase the area planted to sugarbeets this year and said the prospects for the 1987 cane sugar crop also are good.     Dave Carter, president of the U.S. beet sugar association, said plantings may be up in two major beet growing states, California and Michigan, while sowings could be down slightly in the largest producing state of Minnesota.     Overall, Carter predicted beet plantings would rise in the midwest, and this coupled with increases in California would increase U.S. sugarbeet plantings slightly from the 1.232 mln acres sown last year.     USDA later today releases its first estimate of 1987 U.S. sugarbeet plantings in the prospective plantings report.     The main reason for the expected increase in beet sowings is that returns from competing crops such as soybeans and grains are \"just awful,\" said Carter.     In the midwest, bankers are strongly encouraging farmers to plant sugarbeets because the U.S. sugar program offers a loan rate of 18 cents per pound and because payments to farmers from beet processors are spread evenly over the growing season, said Luther Markwart, executive vice president of the American sugarbeet growers association.     \"The banks are putting a lot of pressure on these guys,\" Markwart said.     In some areas there are waiting lists of farmers seeking a contract with processors to plant beets, Markwart said.     USDA\'s report today will not include any harvested area estimates for sugarcane, but representatives of Florida, Hawaii and Louisiana growers said crop prospects are good.     Horis Godfrey, a consultant representing Florida and Texas cane growers, said Florida cane is off to a good start  because for the first time in several years there was no winter freeze. Although area to be harvesteed is about the same as last year, cane production may be up in Florida this year, he said.     In Hawaii, area harvested may decline slightly this year, but likely will be offset again in 1987 by increased yields, said Eiler Ravnholt, vice president of the Hawaiian Sugar Planters Association.     The acreage planted to sugarbeets will receive more than the usual amount of attention this year because of mounting concern that continued increases in domestic sugar production threaten the U.S. sugar program, industry sources said.     The increases in beet plantings have especially caused concern among cane growers who have not expanded plantings, particularly in Hawaii, industry officials said.     \"We haven\'t had a good weather year throughout the beet and cane areas in more than five years,\" said Godfrey, adding that the U.S. may be due for a good weather year.     Rep. Jerry Huckaby, D-La., chairman of the House agriculture subcommittee responsible for the sugar program, has threatened to offer legislation next year to curb domestic sweetener output if growers fail to restrain output in 1987.  \n',sugar
'Considerable uncertainty surrounds the outcome of today\'s EC white sugar tender, traders here said, noting it remains overshadowed by European operator threats to move over 800,000 tonnes of sugar into intervention.     They said that due to the dispute between the Commission and producers over the issue, it is not clear whether the Commission will authorise any exports at all or grant licences on a large tonnage.     The subsidy is seen being set above 45.00 Ecus per 100 kilos, although traders are reluctant to predict a precise level after prices fell yesterday.     Earlier, traders in Paris said they expected the Commission to award licences for around 50,000 tonnes of white sugar with a maximum export rebate of 45.75 to 46.0 Ecus.     Last week, the Commission granted licences to end August on 60,500 tonnes of whites at a maximum rebate of 44.819.  \n',sugar
'West German sugar production last year rose 38,000 tonnes to an estimated 3.17 mln tonnes, the Agricultural Ministry said.     It said the increase was exclusively due to higher beet sugar content, which went up to 17.93 pct from 17.3 pct in 1985.     Last year\'s beet deliveries totalled 20.22 mln tonnes, down 554,000 tonnes from the previous year.     The ministry estimates West Germany\'s sugar self-sufficiency during the current agricultural year (July/June) unchanged at 137 pct.  \n',sugar
'U.S. tin disposals should have little effect on an agreement reached last weekend by tin producing countries to limit group exports to 96,000 tonnes in the year started March 1, a government official said.     The agreement by the seven-member Association of Tin Producing Countries (ATPC) aimed to cut the world surplus and boost prices. Following the accord, ATPC Chairman Subroto appealed to the United States to restrict its tin releases from its strategic stockpile.     \"We don\'t think that (the U.S. government) has a large influence in the (tin) market at this stage of the game,\" said Thomas O\'Donnell, Director of International Commodities at the State Department. Last year the United States released about 4,900 tonnes of tin to two ferroalloy firms.  \n',tin
'Mine and industry officials from most member states of the Association of Tin Producing Countries (ATPC) say they have found ways to limit group exports to 96,000 tonnes in the year started March 1, according to views polled by correspondents.     The plan to curb exports, agreed in January, is aimed at cutting the world surplus to 50,000 tonnes from 70,000 now and boosting prices to about 19 ringgit a kilo from just over 16.     Members of the seven-member Kuala Lumpur-based ATPC account for some 65 pct of the world\'s tin output.     Under the ATPC plan, Malaysia has been allocated an export quota of 28,526 tonnes, Indonesia 24,516, Thailand 19,000, Bolivia 13,761, Zaire 1,736 and Nigeria 1,461.     Australia has said it is not setting any export quota. However, the tonnage allocated to it, 7,000 tonnes, is roughly equal to its expected output this year.     Comment from officials in Zaire was unavailable.     Mine officials in Malaysia, the world\'s leading producer, said only 188 mines will be allowed to operate to ensure that output is limited to around 31,500 tonnes in the year started March 1.     Chief Inspector of Mines Redzuan Sumun tolds that excess output of some 3,000 tonnes after exports of 28,500 in the one-year quota period would be kept in the national stock.     Mine owners in Malaysia have welcomed the ATPC export curb and asked the government not to issue new mining licences. More than 100 applications for licences are pending.     Redzuan said the Mines Department would approve new mining licences only if a six-month review of production trends showed that local mines were not overproducing.     ATPC chairman and Indonesia\'s Mining and Energy Minister Subroto has pledged his country\'s support for the export curb.     A spokesman for the state-owned tin mining company PT Tambang Timah tolds it would be easy for Indonesia to stick to an export quota of 24,516 tonnes because this was close to exports in calendar 1986 of 24,636.     In Bangkok, Thai Industry Minister Pramual Sabhavasu said Thailand would keep to its 19,000 tonne quota and added this would not cause the local industry hardship at current prices.     To insure adherence, the industry ministry and sole tin exporter Thailand Smelting and Refining Co would encourage bigger stockpiles, and income tax exemptions would be permitted, he said.     The Thai Mineral Resources Department is expected to disallow new tin mines opening this year to prevent excessive production, industry sources said.     But Mining Industry Council President Dam Teutong tolds that if the tin price rose above 18 ringgit a kilo, Thai miners would press for the opening of more new mines.     Thailand exported 18,367 tonnes in 1986, up from 17,359 in 1985, Pramual said.     Bolivia said it expects to export less tin this year than its allocated 13,761 tonne quota.     Mining Minister Jaimie Villalobos tolds in La Paz that Bolivia expected to export about 9,000 tonnes of tin in calendar 1987.     He said this was due to the sacking after the tin crisis of October 1985 of about 20,000 of the 28,000 workers at the state mining company Comibol, which produces more than 80 pct of Bolivia\'s total exports.     He said there were risks in the ATPC plan to cut exports but added he was confident the goals set by the plan would be achieved. He did not elaborate.     Mines, Power and Steel Minister Bunu Sheriff Musa said in Lagos that Nigeria would have no difficulty keeping within its ATPC quota of 1,461 tonnes because its metals output had declined due to poor demand and high production costs.     Industry sources tolds that Nigeria\'s output was less than 1,000 tonnes last year.     ATPC officials said they would monitor member countries\' export figures every three months using customs documents and make projections from such data to see if quotas were likely to be breached within the year-long quota period.     The ATPC officials said members that appeared likely to breach their quotas would be told to take remedial measures.     They added that if member countries were unable to fulfil their quotas their extra tonnage would be reallocated to other members at the ATPC\'s discretion.     The ATPC would have produced and exported an estimated 106,000 tonnes of tin in 1987 without the plan.     Non-members Brazil and China have pledged to cooperate with the ATPC and limit their exports to 21,000 and 7,000 tonnes respectively during the quota period.  \n',tin
'Bolivia\'s top union leader today joined a hunger strike by 1,300 state employed miners and workers to press for higher wages he said.     Juan Lechin Oquendo, the veteran secretary general of the Bolivian Labour Organization, COB, told reporters: \"I am joining the fast to abide with our call for a hunger strike\".     Lechin, 83, became one of 12 COB leaders to join a hunger strike to protest against the austerity programme of the government of president Victor Paz Estenssoro.     The striking leader began his fast as leaders of 9,000 miners employed by the state corporation COMIBOL were due to star negotiations on ways to solve their conflict over pay.     About 1,300 miners and workers entered today their fourth day of fast in union offices and Roman Catholic churches to press for a substantial hike in Bolivia\'s minimum monthly wage, which is 40 bolivianos (about 20 dlrs), COB leader Walter Degadillo said.     \"I will take part in the miners\' negotiations because that does not force me to suspend my fast,\" Lechin told reporters.     The COMIBOL miners\' strike entered its fifth day to press for higher wages and more funds for the mining nationalised industry.     About 20,000 miners, or two-thirds of the working force, have been laid off through the government\'s decision to streamline the deficit-ridden state corporation following a collapse in the international tin price.     The government, faced with mounting social unrest against its economic policies, has called the miners\' strike and fasts part of a campaign aimed at discrediting it during the visit of West German president Richard von Weizsaecker, who began a four-day visit last Friday.     \"I regret not being able to attend an invitation by president Weizsaecker to a dinner tonight because I am on a hunger strike,\" Lechin told reporters. \"I also have to orga- nise the strike.\"     Weizsaecker is hosting a dinner tonight for Paz Estenssoro and had invited both Lechin and Victor Lopez, the miners\' federation top leader. Although lopez has not joined the fast, union sources said its unlikely he would attend the dinner.  \n',tin
'About 9,000 miners employed by the state corporation, Comibol, declared a general strike as from midnight (0400 gmt) to press for higher salaries, a statement by the federation for Bolivian mine workers said.      It said the strike was called to defend the nationalised mining industry. The miners were willing to negotiate with the government of President Victor Paz Estenssoro, but only if it showed an intention to meet the strikers\' demands.      The government said the strike was designed to cause it embarrassment during the four-day visit of West German President Richard Von Weizsaecker, which starts on Friday.     The miners statement said police had violently evicted Comibol office workers in the city of Oruro after they began a hunger strike yesterday.     The government has sacked about 20,000 miners from its deficit-ridden corporation since the collapse in the international price of tin. The lay-offs represent about two-thirds of the original workforce.  \n',tin
'About 9,000 miners employed by the state corporation Comibol went on hunger strike to press for higher wages, a miners union spokesman said.      Victor Lopez, executive secretary of the miners union, told a news conference the strikers began to fast in the major tin mining districts of oruro and potosi and the action would spread tomorrow to la paz and other areas.      The government has charged that the strike by the miners union, crippled by massive layoffs, is part of a left-wing destabilisation plan to coincide with the visit of West German president Richard von Weizsaecker, who arrives on a four-day official tour on Friday.      But miners union chief Simon Reyes told reporters the strike had nothing to do with subversion and was to press for more government investment in Comibol.      The government of president Victor Paz Estenssoro has streamlined the deficit-ridden state mining corporation laying off about 20,000 miners, two-thirds of the workforce, following a collapse of the international tin price in 1985.  \n',tin
'The tin price is likely to rise to 20 ringgit a kilo this year because of the producers\' accord on export quotas and the reluctance of brokers and banks to sell the metal at lower prices, a Malaysian government bulletin said.     The Malaysian Tin bulletin said it is in producers\' interest to keep to their quotas to limit total exports to 90,000 tonnes and to gradually deplete the 80,000 tonnes overhang.     It said consumption by industrialised countries should stay at 160,000 tonnes and that International Tin Council creditors and brokers are not likely to dump their stocks excessively unless there is a large and abrupt price jump.     The continued depreciation of the dollar could also help push up the price of tin, the bulletin said.     A depreciation of the dollar means the depreciation of the ringgit which is closely pegged to it, making the price of tin cheaper in sterling terms, it added.     \"Even in the absence of economic rationale in the tin market, psychological optimism alone is sufficient to secure a price recovery of up to 20 ringgit per kilo,\" the bulletin said.  \n',tin
'Consuming countries, chastened by the collapse of International Tin Council (ITC) price support operations in 1985, are insisting more than ever before that commodity pacts reflect the reality of the markets they are serving, a survey showed.     They want price ranges to be more responsive to market trends - to avoid overstimulating output and straining the accords\' support operations - and intervention rules that avoid the risk of exports by non-members undermining the pacts. Consumers and producers, mindful of ITC buffer stock losses, have also sought strict conditions for buffer operations.     Importers and some key exporting countries have shunned a generalised approach to commodity price stabilisation and prefer to assess each commodity case by case, the survey showed.     The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) last week set precise limits on what the Buffer Stock Manager (BSM) could do under the new agreement. It imposed daily and weekly purchase limits, prohibited the BSM from operating on futures markets and stipulated, after consumer insistence, that up to 15 pct of total buffer stock purchases could be of non-member cocoa. This will help prevent lower quality cocoa from Malaysia, the world\'s fourth largest producer, undermining the market.     The cocoa pact establishes precise differentials the Buffer Stock Manager must use when purchasing varying grades.     A new International Natural Rubber Agreement (INRA) was adopted earlier this month in Geneva. Importing and exporting countries agreed several changes to make the reference price more responsive to market trends and they eliminated provisions under which the buffer stock could borrow from banks to finance operations. Direct cash contributions from members will fund buffer stock purchases. Bank financing was a particular feature of the failed ITC buffer stock which suffered losses running into hundreds of millions of sterling. Legal wrangles continue.     Recent International Coffee Organization (ICO) negotiations in London exemplified the degree to which consumers insist that agreements reflect market reality, commodity analysts said.     Consumers and a small group of producers argued that \"objective criteria\" should be used to define export quota shares, which would have meant a reduction in the share of Brazil, the world\'s leading producer. Brazil wanted to maintain its previous quota share of 30 pct. The talks broke down and, although an ICO executive board meeting starts in London today, delegates and trade sources see chances of any near term negotiations on export quota distribution as remote.     International agreements exist for sugar and wheat. These do not have any economic clauses but provide a forum for discussions on possible future economic agreements, collect statistics and draw up market analyses. Analysts said differences between sugar exporting countries have held up any progress towards an accord with economic teeth, while sheer competition between major exporters amid a world grain glut militate against any pact with economic provisions for wheat.     An alternative focus for commodity discussions are international study groups, made up of governments with advice from industry, such as those for lead and zinc and rubber.     The U.N. Common fund for commodities, with a planned directly contributed capital of 470 mln dlrs, has failed to become operational because neither the U.S. Nor the Soviet Union has ratified it. U.S. Officials in Washington said the U.S. Doubts the fund would be able to fulfil its objectives, citing the lack of widespread support.     U.S. Officials in Washington and Malaysian officials in Kuala Lumpur expressed a policy of looking at each commodity pact case by case. U.S. Officials said it has been willing to study individual cases for economically sound, market-oriented commodity accords balancing producer and consumer interests.     \"We see little to be gained by attempting to increase the price of a commodity whose long-term trend is downward,\" official Administration policy states. The U.S. Currently belongs to only two international commodity agreements that have economic clauses - the International Coffee Agreement (ICA) and INRA - but it is also a member of the sugar and wheat pacts.     The U.S. Did not join the International Cocoa Agreement because it considered its proposed price ranges unrealistic and not designed to protect the interests of consuming countries, the State Department said. U.S. Officials singled out the INRA as the one commodity agreement that seems to be working.     U.S. Negotiators were successful in getting other members of the pact to agree that the price review and adjustment mechanism of the rubber agreement would accurately reflect market trends and also to continue the accord as a market oriented agreement, U.S. Officials said.     Canadian officials in Ottawa also said they have consistently tried to look at membership of commodity pacts on the merits of each case. Malaysian Primary Industries Minister Lim Keng Yaik tolds in Kuala Lumpur his country, the world\'s top producer of rubber, tin and palm oil, decides its participation in international commodity pacts case by case.     Malaysia is a member of the Association of Tin Producing Countries (ATPC) which produce 65 pct of world tin. The ATPC launched a plan to limit member tin exports to 96,000 tonnes for a year from March to cut the tin surplus to 50,000 from 70,000.     Economist in the West German Ministry of Agriculture and delegate to cocoa, wheat and sugar agreements Peter Baron tolds in London, \"Agreements with economic clauses to stabilise prices could function if fixed price ranges were close to market reality, if there was full participation by producers and consumers, and if participants were prepared to take their obligations in the framework of the agreement seriously.\"     But Baron added, \"No real sanctions are available for a country that doesn\'t stick to its obligations...The German approach is sceptical. We don\'t think agreements are the best instrument to help developing countries. They were never meant to be a vehicle for the transfer of resources and that is how developing countries often interpret them.\"     Traditionally Britain has always been supportive of commodity agreements, reflecting its strong links with Third World producing countries. But recently demands for more stringent and justifiable pacts with emphasis placed on the need for \"intellectual honesty\" and \"objective criteria\" have grown.     British officials stress the need for commodity pacts to be a two way partnership in trade rather than a disguise for aid.     It is now seen as essential that any pacts involving direct market participation through a buffer stock have a high degree of transparency and do not contain the risk of open-ended borrowing that occurred in the tin pact, they said. U.K. Delegates talk of stabilisation and the need for prices to reflect changes in market structure and price trends rather than dictate what prices should be.     A Foreign Ministry official in Tokyo said Japan urges price realism in commodity pacts, adding high prices inflate supply.     A government spokesman in Paris said France is favourable to commodity pacts. France, a large consumer and producer of sugar, favours a sugar pact as long as it reflects the real market situation, particularly regarding stocks.     Indonesia\'s Foreign Minister Mochtar Kusumaatmadja tolds in Jakarta: \"These agreements can work as long as the problems are cyclical..But it\'s another matter when there are structural problems..But we are still committed to commodity agreements as an act of faith.\" Nicaraguan External Trade Minister Alejandro Martinez Cuenca said in London producers cannot afford not to give their backing to commodity agreements.     \"The political will is not there on the part of some consumers to make agreements work,\" Martinez Cuenca said.     The head of the economics department in the Brazilian Foreign Ministry, Sebastiao do Rego Barros, tolds an agreement can be successful if it keeps a link with market reality. If you have an agreement such as coffee with a system of quotas, with a link between prices practised inside the pact and actual market prices, it can work. UNCTAD spokesman Graham Shanley said consuming countries realise steady export earnings enhance developing countries\' ability to service debt and mean greater demand for industrialised nations\' capital goods.  \n',tin
'Bolivia, once Latin America\'s most delinquent debtor, is preparing for a second International Monetary Fund agreement after an economic stabilisation program has effectively slowed inflation and reduced public spending.     A fund spokesman said an IMF team would visit La Paz shortly to discuss terms of the new agreement.     He said the IMF had disbursed 130 mln dlrs here and 20 mln dlrs are pending under the one year agreement that ends this month. The accord provided for a stand-by loan, a compensatory financing facility and a structural adjustment facility.     The spokesman said that if the agreement is renewed, Bolivia can expect a further 60-mln-dlr stand-by loan over the next 12 months.     Bolivia\'s agreement with the IMF, its first since 1980, opened the door to rescheduling negotiations with the Paris Club and Argentina and Brazil, which hold 2.5 billion dlrs of Bolivia\'s 4.0-billion-dlr foreign debt.     Central Bank President Javier Nogales tolds the negotiations with the Paris Club, which have yet to be finalised, had been extremely successful.     Nogales said the Paris Club had agreed to reschedule Bolivia\'s debt over 10 years with five to six years grace and had waived all interest payments until the end of 1988.     Bilateral discussions on interest rates continue, he said.     Nogales said Bolivia was expecting some 400 mln dlrs in disbursements this year from lender countries and international agencies, including the World Bank and the Inter-American Development Bank, although diplomatic and banking sources put the figure at closer to 300 mln dlrs.     Nogales said Bolivia\'s net international reserves are around 250 mln dlrs, up from one mln dlrs when President Ictor Paz Estenssoro took office in august 1985. Nogales said the capital flow on Bolivia\'s debt servicing versus new credits had changed from a net outflow of 200 mln dlrs in 1985 to a net inflow of 130 mln dlrs in 1986.     Bolivia\'s return from the financial wilderness follows paz estenssoro\'s economic stabilisation program. He inherited inflation of 23,000 pct a year, state enterprises that were losing hundreds of mlns of dlrs and a currency that traded on the black market at up to 16 times its official rate.     Paz estenssoro froze public sector wages, set a market- related rate for the peso, introduced tax reforms and laid off thousands of workers in state corporations.     Inflation has been running at 10 pct a year for the past six months, according to the Central Bank, and the government  expects the economy to grow three pct this year after a 14 pct contraction over the last six years.     The government is also proposing a novel solution to its debt to commercial banks, some 900 mln dlrs, on which interest has not been paid since March, 1984.     Nogales said that over the next few months Bolivia would make a one-time offer to buy back all its commercial debt at the price it trades on the international secondary market --  10-15 cents on the dlr. He said Bolivia\'s commercial bank steering committee agreed at a meeting in New York to consider the proposal, but it is still unclear what proportion of the country\'s creditor banks will take up the offer.     One foreign banker speculated that Bolivia might be able to buy back up to 30 pct of its commercial debt paper under the deal, mostly from small banks who have written off their loans to the country.     But he said the larger creditors were more interested in a scheme of debt-equity swaps, similar to that which has operated in Chile for the past two years.     The Bolivian government has yet to draw up proposals for debt-equity swaps, but the banker said it was planning to privatise more than 100 state companies and these could serve as a basis for such a scheme.     Foreign bankers said this type of proposal might prove attractive to Bolivia in the long run, especially as the government realises that it will have to attract a large amount of new capital in order to grow.     Planning Minister Gonzalo Sanchez de Lozada tolds that Bolivia was hoping for five to six billion dlrs in new investment over the next 10 to 12 years.     The government realises that in order to remain viable, Bolivia will need to develop new exports.     The price of tin, which accounted for some 45 pct of Bolivia\'s exports in 1984, has collapsed on the world markets, and gas, the country\'s major revenue earner, is in abundant supply in the region.  \n',tin
'A strike by 9,000 miners employed by the state corporation Comibol has paralysed tin production in the major centers of Huanuni, Corocoro, Siglo, Catavi and Colquiri, the Conflicts Secretary of the Bolivian Miners Federation, Cristobal Aranibar, tolds.      The strike began at midnight to press demands for higher wages and more funds for the nationalised mining industry.      The miners federation left the door open to negotiations with the government but \"only if the authorities show their intention to find solution to our demands\", Aranibar said.     The government of president Victor Paz Estenssoro, faced with mounting social unrest against its economic policies, has said the miners strike was part of a campaign to discredit it during the visit of West German president, Richard von Weizsaecker, who arrives today for a four-day official visit.     The government froze salaries as part of its efforts to pull Bolivia out of a deep economic crisis. According to central bank forecasts inflation will reach an annual 10 pct rate versus up to 20,000 pct in 1985.      In addition to the miners\' strike, about 1,000 railway factory workers of the bolivian labour organization (COB) began a second day of a hunger strike in the country\'s main cities to press for substantial wage increases, a union leader said.  \n',tin
'Malaysian miners criticised the U.S. For violating an agreement with Southeast Asian producers by selling more stockpiled tin in 1986 than agreed.     The U.S. General Services Administration sold 5,490 tonnes of tin in 1986, well above an agreed upon annual limit of 3,000 tonnes, the States of Malaya Chamber of Mines said.     In its latest annual report, it said the U.S. Had promised to limit sales of tin in a memorandum of understanding signed with the six-member Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) in December 1983.     \"The U.S. Appears to have lost sight of the U.S./ASEAN Memorandum of Understanding,\" the Chamber said.     The Chamber estimated the U.S. Strategic stockpile held 180,444 tonnes of tin in December 1986, 137,744 tonnes in excess of of its original stockpile goal of 42,700.     The main ASEAN tin producers are Malaysia, Indonesia and Thailand, which produce the bulk of the world\'s tin.  \n',tin
'An extension of the International Tin Agreement (ITA) is unrealistic and the pact should be allowed to lapse, Indonesian Mines and Energy Minister Subroto told reporters.     Asked about Jakarta\'s position for the quarterly session of the International Tin Council on April 8-9, Subroto said Indonesia had agreed to the formation of a study group to look into how to replace the pact.     But he said that given the present disagreement between producers and consumers, there is unlikely to be any follow-up to the ITA.     Asked by reporters if Indonesia would support an extension of the ITA, he said, \"No one will propose that. It\'s also unrealistic to do so.\"     Subroto played a key part in securing agreement between the seven member Association of Tin Producing Countries to introduce a quota system which limited their exports and consumption to 96,000 tonnes in the year starting March 1.     Indonesia\'s quota was set at 24,516 tonnes.  \n',tin
'Thailand exported 1,120 tonnes of tin metal in February, down from 1,816 tonnes the previous month and 2,140 tonnes a year ago, the Mineral Resources Department said.     It said major buyers last month were Britain, Japan, the Netherlands, West Germany and the U.S.  \n',tin
'Thailand exported 1,816 tonnes of tin metal in January, up from 1,731 in December and 1,330 a year ago, the Mineral Resources Department said.     It said major buyers last month were Singapore, Japan, Britain, the Netherlands, Malaysia and the U.S.  \n',tin
'Amalgamated Metal Trading, AMT, today lodged an appeal against the ruling which prevented its petition to wind up the International Tin Council, ITC.     The verdict was given by Mr Justice Millett on January 22, when AMT led an effort by ITC creditors to recover sums claimed by banks and London Metal Exchange brokers as a result of the collapse of the ITC\'s buffer stock operations in October 1985. AMT had until March 26 to lodge its appeal.     The grounds for the appeal are that the judge erred on three points when giving his verdict, Michael Arnold, head of the broker creditors group Tinco Realisations, tolds.     The judge ruled that the U.K. Court had no jurisdiction to wind up the Tin Council, that the ITC was not an association within the meaning of the Companies Act, and that the winding-up petition was not a proceeding in respect of an arbitration award. AMT will contest all three points.     The U.K. Companies Act allows the possibility of the winding-up of what it defines as an association, and AMT will argue that the Tin Council falls within this definition, Arnold said.     The ITC has immunity except for the enforcement of an arbitration award, and thus it is important for AMT that the court accepts that the winding-up petition represents a move to enforce an arbitration ruling.     The court originally decided that the winding-up petition went wider than the enforcement of such a debt, an AMT spokesman said.     The appeal is unlikely to be heard for several months, but a case brought by fellow ITC creditor Maclaine Watson is to be heard on April 28. This is a move by the metal broker to have a receiver appointed over the ITC\'s assets.     Since similar arguments will be used in this case, it is possible that any appeal in the Maclaine Watson case could be consolidated with AMT\'s appeal, Arnold said.     Other ITC creditors have brought direct actions against the Council\'s member states and an application by the governments to strike out the first of these, brought by J.H. Rayner (Mincing Lane) Ltd, is to be heard on May 11.     Shearson Lehman Brothers action against the LME\'s tin \"ring-out\" in March 1986 is also scheduled to be heard in the near future. The hearing date has now been put back slightly to June 8.  \n',tin
'An extension of the sixth International Tin Agreement, ITA, for one or two years beyond June 30 is increasingly likely, International Tin Council, ITC, delegates said following a special council session today.     A formal decision will be taken at the quarterly council session on April 8-9 when decisions are needed on the budget and activities for the year beginning July one, they stated.     Delegates said most countries now favour a continued legal ITC presence to answer the still unresolved legal disputes over the outstanding debts of its buffer stock with court hearings likely to continue well after the June 30 expiry of the pact.     The ITC was informally told of the appeal made yesterday by Amalgamated Metal Trading Ltd, AMT, against the January court ruling against it in the legal bid it led on behalf of ITC creditor brokers to have the ITC wound up.     In January the judge ruled that the U.K. Court had no jurisdiction to wind up the tin council, the ITC was not an association within the meaning of the U.K. Companies act, and the winding-up petition was not a proceeding in respect in respect of an arbitration award.     AMT is appealing on all points and has said it is important for the court to accept that a winding-up petition is a move to enforce an arbitration ruling.  \n',tin
'A further special session of the International Tin Council, ITC, held here tomorrow, March 24, will give member countries an update on the latest debate over the hundreds of millions of sterling lost when its buffer stock price support scheme failed in October 1985, delegates said.     But the ITC quarterly session scheduled for April 8-9 will be important, as the council will by then be wanting to decide on whether the current pact should be extended beyond June 30 or just allowed to expire, delegates said. A two year extension is possible.  \n',tin
'The United States defended its sales of stockpiled tin in 1986 in reaction to criticism from Malaysian miners who have said it violated an agreement with southeast Asian producers.     \"The United States has continued to abide by the spirit of the memorandum of understanding and has consulted with the ASEAN states on GSA tin disposals,\" a State Department spokesman said in a statement.     \"The views of the ASEAN governments have been taken into account in determining disposal levels,\" the statement said.     The United States and the ASEAN countries signed a memorandum of understanding concerning tin disposals by the U.S. General Services Administration (GSA) in December 1983.     In its latest annual report, the States of Malaya Chamber of Mines said the GSA sold 5,490 tonnes of tin in 1986, well above an agreed upon annual limit of 3,000 tonnes. \"The United States appears to have lost sight of the U.S./ASEAN Memorandum of Understanding,\" it said.     The State Department statement said GSA tin disposals increased in calendar year 1986 due to changed market conditions. During the first quarter of calendar year 1987, they have been running at a lower rate compared to 1986.     The spokesman declined to say how much stockpiled tin the GSA sold last year, however.  \n',tin
'Zaire agreed to limit its tin exports to 1,736 tonnes for 12 months from March 1 in line with an Association of Tin Producing Countries (ATPC) plan to curb exports, the ATPC said.     ATPC Executive Director Victor Siaahan tolds he received a telex from Zaire indicating its willingess to take part in the plan to limit total ATPC exports to 96,000 tonnes for a year from March 1.     Siaahan said Zaire is expected to produce 1,900 tonnes of tin in calendar 1987, and that in 1986 its output and exports were about 1,200 tonnes.     The ATPC hopes to cut the 70,000-tonne world surplus by 20,000 tonnes and boost prices.     All ATPC members except Zaire and Australia recently agreed to adhere to the export quotas allocated them under the plan. Australia said its quota of 7,000 tonnes was roughly equal to its expected output this year.     The ATPC consists of Malaysia, Indonesia, Thailand, Bolivia, Australia, Nigeria and Zaire.     China and Bolivia, important producers of tin, are not members.  \n',tin
'Argentine vegetable oils shipments during January/December 1986 totalled 1,796,121 tonnes, against 1,577,722 tonnes in the same period of 1985, the Argentine Grain Board said.     Breakdown was as follows: cotton 9,000 (27,900), sunflower 954,303 (840,440), linseed 119,954 (138,944), groundnutseed 26,248 (26,246), soybean 669,094 (524,715), tung 9,047 (11,363), olive 2,417 (4,125), maize 6,058 (3,989), rape nil (nil) , grape nil (nil), the board added.     Shipments during December 1986 amounted to 102,870 tonnes, against 108,514 tonnes in the same month of 1985.     The breakdown, was as follows, in tonnes:     Cotton 5,000 (nil), sunflower 25,156 (23,713), linseed 6,127 (5,990), groundnutseed nil (738), soybean 65,759 (76,371), tung 645 (730), olive 183 (660), maize nil (312), rape nil (nil), grape nil (nil), the board said.         The ten principal destinations during January/December 1986, with comparative figures for the same period of 1985 in brackets, were as follows, in tonnes:     Iran 212,043 (209,177), Holland 204,558 (215,784), Soviet Union 173,060 (266,389), Egypt 163,119 (164,252), Algeria 116,330 (11,492), South Africa 105,230 (110,064), Brazil 101,599 (103,142), Cuba 89,957 (98,740), United States 80,109 (44,826), India 67,182 (17,403), the board said.  \n',veg-oil
'Bangladesh floated an international tender for the purchase of 10,000 tonnes of refined soyabean oil for delivery at Chittagong/Chalna port by April 24, Food Ministry officials said.     The tender closes March 28 at 0500 GMT.  \n',veg-oil
'A British minister said that a proposed European Community tax on vegetable oils and fats would raise the price of fish and chips and he pledged the government would fight against it.     Lord Belstead, a junior agriculture minister, told the House of Lords the tax would raise the price of raw materials used in many processed foods by about 100 pct.     He said revenue should not be raised by taxing the consumer and called the proposal \"repugnant.\"  \n',veg-oil
'Three consecutive days of talks between management and unions aimed at ending the three month old strike at Cargill U.K. Ltd\'s oilseed processing plant at Seaforth, ended yesterday without resolving the situation, although some progress was made, a company spokesman said.     Fresh talks have been scheduled for next Tuesday, he said.  \n',veg-oil
'The Commodity Credit Corporation, CCC, has reallocated two mln dlrs in credit gurantees previously earmarked for sales of U.S. protein meals to cover sales of vegetable oil and tallow to El Salvador, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The action reduces coverage for sales of protein meals to 14 mln dlrs from 16 mln dlrs and creates new lines of one mln dlrs for tallow and/or greases and one mln dlrs for vegetable oils, the department said.     All sales under the credit guarantee lines must be registered and exported by Sepember 30, 1987, it said.     The guarantee rates include a charge to provide for a yearly interest rate coverage of up to 4.5 pct on the guaranteed value, the department said.  \n',veg-oil
'Contract terms for trade in coconut oil are to be changed from long tons to tonnes with effect from the Aug/Sep contract onwards, Dutch vegetable oil traders said.     Operators have already started to take account of the expected change and reported at least one trade in tonnes for Aug/Sept shipment yesterday.     The Federation of Oils Seeds and Fats Associations, FOSFA, in London said it had previously advised traders to adopt the metric system for coconut oil transactions to bring the commodity into line with other vegetable oils.  \n',veg-oil
'Whether the European Community\'s Council of Ministers will approve a proposed tax on vegetable oils that has sparked threats of U.S. retaliation is uncertain, an EC official said.     \"It is very far from certain that it will go through,\" Sir Roy Denman, Head of the EC Delegation in Washington, told reporters before he addressed the Foreign Trade Association.     Denman noted Britain remains opposed to the plan and West Germany has opposed it in the past.     U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter has threatened retaliation if the tax is approved, as it would limit U.S. soybean exports to the EC. Council action is expected soon.     Denman said while the EC is willing to negotiate about agriculture in a new round of trade talks, it is unwilling to single out export subsidies on a negotiating agenda or put agricultural policy on a special fast track.     \"The key to a solution in this area seems to me not in the framing of the GATT (General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade) wording...but in tackling government subsidies to farmers on both sides of the Atlantic,\" he said.  \n',veg-oil
'The proposed European Community (EC) tax on vegetable oils and fats is no longer a major issue on the agenda and the EC Commission merely used it as a threat, the West German Feed Stuffs Industry Association (MFI) said.     Association chairman Ulrich Wagner told a news conference the West German feed industry believes the EC does not seriously contemplate the introduction of such a tax because it would end in another transatlantic trade war.     \"We have just avoided a trade conflict with the U.S. And the Commission used the tax threat to calm national farm lobbies.\"     American Soybean Association (ASA) president-elect Wayne Bennett said yesterday in The Hague that U.S. Soybean producers were confident the tax would be rejected.     Bennett, who is leading one of three soybean delegations on a lobbying tour of EC capitals, will also visit Bonn on Thursday and Friday.     There are indications the Bonn government will also reject the proposed tax, Wagner said.  \n',veg-oil
'Egypt purchased 46,000 tonnes of optional origin sunflowerseed oil at its import tender yesterday, all for May arrival, traders said.     The business comprised 41,000 tonnes of crude sunflowerseed oil in bulk at prices ranging from 344.25 to 348 dlrs and 5,000 tonnes of refined oil in drums at from 517.50 to 522.50 dlrs per tonne, cost and freight Alexandria, delivered quality terms.  \n',veg-oil
'Egypt rejected all offers at a vegetable oil import tender yesterday for unspecified amounts of sunflowerseed oil and/or cottonseed oil, traders said. It has asked for a renewal of offers on March 24.     Exporters said they were not prepared to offer material on Egypt\'s new landed contract terms which include a clause, \"free from radioactive contamination.\" Offers submitted were on old contract terms, all of which were rejected.  \n',veg-oil
'The sharp decline in soybean crush ratios seen in the last few weeks, accelerating in recent days, has pushed margins below the cost of production at most soybean processing plants and prompted many to cut output of soybean meal and oil.     The weekly U.S. soybean crush rate was reported by the National Soybean Processors Association this afternoon at 21.78 mln bushels, down from the 22 mln bushel plus rate seen over the past two months when crush margins surged to the best levels seen in over a year.     Active soymeal export loadings at the Gulf had pushed soybean futures and premiums higher, prompting a pick-up in the weekly crush number.     However, much of that export demand seems to have been met, with most foreign meal users now waiting for the expected surge in shipments of new crop South American soymeal over the next few months.     U.S. processors are now finding domestic livestock feed demand is very light for this time of year due to the milder than normal winter, so they steadily dropped offering prices in an attempt to find buying interest, soyproduct dealers said.     Soybean meal futures have also steadily declined in recent weeks, setting a new contract low of 139.70 dlrs per ton in the nearby March contract today.     \"Many speculators down here bought March soymeal and sold May, looking for no deliveries (on first notice day tomorrow, which would cause March to gain on deferreds),\" one CBT crush trader said.     \"But they\'ve been bailing out this week because the March has been acting like there will be a lot delivered, if not tomorrow, then later in the month,\" he added.     As a result of the weakness in soymeal, the March crush ratio (The value of soyproducts less the cost of the soybeans) fell from the mid 30s earlier this month to 22.6 cents per bushel today, dropping over five cents in just the last two days.     The May crush ended today just over 17 cents, so no processors will want to lock in a ratio at that unprofitable level, the trader said. Hopefully, they will now start to cut back production to get supplies in line with demand, he added.     With futures down, processors are finding they must bid premiums for cash soybeans, further reducing crush margins.     A central Illinois processor is only making about 30 cents for every bushel of soybeans crushed at current prices, down sharply from levels just seen just a few weeks ago and below the average cost of production, cash dealers said.     Most soybean processing plants are still in operation, with little talk of taking temporary down-time, so far. But processors will start halting production in the next few weeks it they continue to face unprofitable margins, they added.  \n',veg-oil
'The Indian State Trading Corporation (STC) bought four cargoes of rbd palm olein totalling 24,000 tonnes at its vegetable oil import tender last week, traders said. Market reports on Friday said the STC had booked two cargoes.     The business comprised three 6,000 tonne cargoes for June at 346 dlrs and 6,000 tonnes for July at 340 dlrs per tonne cif.     It also secured a 20,000 tonne cargo of optional origin rapeseed oil for May 15/Jun 15 shipment at 321 dlrs cif.  \n',veg-oil
'The Indian State Trading Corporation (STC) bought a 20,000 tonne cargo of optional origin rapeseed oil at its vegetable oil import tender yesterday, traders said. The oil was for June 20/July 20 shipment at 321 dlrs per tonne cif.     Traders said the STC attempted to buy eight cargoes of processed palm oil but its price ideas were too low for exporters. It also failed to secure soyoil for the same reason, they said.  \n',veg-oil
'The Indian State Trading Corporation purchased 46,000 tonnes of vegetable oils at its import tender on Friday, market sources said.     The business was for April shipments and comprised 20,000 tonnes of European rapeseed oil at 318 dlrs, 20,000 tonnes of soyoil, believed South American origin, at 314, and 6,000 tonnes of Malaysian rbd palm olein at 347 dlrs, all per tonne cif.     Palm oil sellers were disappointed at the light purchase of rbd olein and early trading saw the market ease nearly 10 dlrs under Malaysian refiner and dealer selling. April shipments traded down to 326 dlrs per tonne, fob.  \n',veg-oil
'The Indian State Trading Corp bought one, or possibly two, 6,000 tonne cargoes of Malaysian refined bleached deodorised palm olein at its vegetable oil import tender today for Mar 15/Apr 15 shipment at 355 dlrs per tonne cif, traders said.  \n',veg-oil
'The Indian State Trading Corporation (STC) bought 20,000 tonnes of optional origin soybean oil and 6,000 tonnes of rbd palm olein at its import tender yesterday, traders said.     Pakistan, however, rejected offers at its tender for 12,000 tonnes of rbd palm oil, but is expected to reenter the market next week, they said.     The STC soyoil purchase was for May 20/Jun 20 shipment at 319 dlrs per tonne cif and the palm olein for Apr 25/May 25 shipment at 355 dlrs per tonne.  \n',veg-oil
'India is to partially cover the cost of its Malaysian palm oil imports through a countertrade deal involving the construction of two bridges valued at 20 mln dlrs, an Indian trade source tolds.     He said Malaysia agreed to the oil-for-bridges deal in October after India said it could no longer buy some 700,000 tonnes of palm oil a year because of its trade deficit.     Malaysia has also agreed to barter palm oil for 30 mln dlrs of hydroelectric equipment and is interested in countertrading for Indian iron ore, wheat and other goods and services, he said.  \n',veg-oil
'The Indian State Trading Corporation (STC) bought three cargoes of rbd palm olein at its vegetable oil import tender yesterday, traders said. Late yesterday the market was reporting it had bought one to two cargoes.     The business comprised two 6,000 tonne cargoes for March 15/April 15 shipments at 355 dlrs per tonne cif, and 6,000 tonnes for May at 358 dlrs. The first two cargoes were on a cash basis and the May position was transacted on a 30 pct counter-trade basis, traders said.  \n',veg-oil
'Indonesia, the world\'s second largest producer of palm oil, has not issued licences to import the commodity, a spokesman for the Ministry of Trade said.     Traders in London said Indonesia has issued licences to local operators to import around 135,000 tonnes of palm oil starting in April, but the spokesman said this was incorrect.     A spokesman for the Indonesian Importers Association also denied knowledge of the import plan. He said importers would quickly know if licences were issued. The Trade Ministry official said there was no sign of a palm oil shortage in Indonesia.  \n',veg-oil
'Indonesia has imported palm oil this year and is likely to take more, trade sources said.     They were commenting on a weekend Jakarta report quoting a Ministry of Trade spokesman as saying Indonesia had not issued licences to import the commodity. He also said there was no sign of a shortage of palm oil in Indonesia.     A major palm oil dealer said he shipped Malaysian palm oil to Indonesia in February, additional vessels were loading this month and other vessels had been earmarked for April.     Other operators claimed they had palm oil booked for Indonesia but would not disclose tonnages.     Traders said palm oil production in Indonesia this year had been below expectations and current stocks were low. They said licences were issued at the start of the year to import crude palm oil but were subsequently revised to include RBD olein and RBD oil.     Last week there were rumours in European markets that Indonesia had issued licences to import around 135,000 tonnes of palm oil for deliveries commencing April. An Indonesian Ministry of Trade official said this was incorrect.     Some traders here said the total could be more. Others said they could include those issued earlier this year and applications not yet granted.  \n',veg-oil
'Indonesia will build a crude palm oil terminal at a new port on Batam island, south of Singapore, Research and Technology Minister Yusuf Habibie said.     The terminal will be able to handle 2.1 mln tonnes of crude palm oil from new plantations in northern Sumatra and western Kalimantan (Borneo), he said.     A tender for engineering work on the Asia Port project will be offered mid-year. Habibie did not say when the terminal was expected to be operational.  \n',veg-oil
'Indonesia has protested to the European Community (EC) about its plan to raise import duties on vegetable oils, which will affect the country\'s palm oil exports to the EC, Trade Minister Rachmat Saleh said.     \"Indonesia, both individually and together with other members of the Association of South-East Asian Nations (ASEAN), has protested against the EC plan to increase duties on vegetable oil imports,\" he told Indonesian reporters.     \"We very much regret the community\'s plan,\" he added.     He did not say in what form the Indonesian protest was made.     Indonesia is a major palm oil producer.     According to central bank figures, Indonesia exported 362,700 tonnes of crude palm oil to EC countries in calendar 1985 and 301,400 tonnes in the first 10 months of 1986. Complete 1986 figures are not yet available.     Finance Minister Radius Prawiro said recently that the increase in EC duties would add a new burden to ASEAN countries at a time when they were trying to strengthen their economies in the face of lower commodity prices.  \n',veg-oil
'Indonesia has issued licences to traders to import palm oil to avert a possible shortage of cooking oil during the Moslem fasting month of Ramadan in May, Trade Minister Rachmat Saleh tolds.     \"We have given permission for a small amount of imports to prevent a shortage during Ramadan,\" he said. He gave no figures for the amount of palm oil to be imported, but said it would come from Malaysia.     Indonesia, the world\'s second largest palm oil producer, earlier denied it had granted palm oil import licences.     Saleh was replying to a question froms after traders in London said Indonesia had issued licences to import around 135,000 tonnes of palm oil for delivery in April.     Indonesia, with 168 mln people, is the world\'s largest Moslem country. During Ramadan Moslems fast during the day and have large meals after sunset.     Indonesian crude palm oil exports in the first 11 months of 1986 were 469,100 tonnes, according to central bank figures, against 652,000 tonnes in the whole of calendar 1985.     Indonesia is expanding palm oil output, and Saleh did not explain why there might be a shortage during Ramadan.  \n',veg-oil
'Indonesia\'s palm oil output is expected to rise and exports to increase, the U.S. Embassy said in its annual report on Indonesia\'s agriculture sector.     The Indonesian government said crude palm oil (CPO) output is expected to rise to 1.56 mln tonnes in 1987 and 2.11 mln in 1988, up from a projected 1.45 mln tonnes in 1986 and 1.26 mln in 1985.     The 1986 projection of 1.45 mln tonnes is up from a provisional figure of 1.3 mln tonnes.     A U.S. Embassy assessment puts 1987 output at 1.45 mln tonnes, against 1.35 mln in 1986 and 1.208 mln in 1985.     \"More realistic estimates indicate that 1988 production will be between 1.5 and 1.6 mln tonnes,\" the report said.     The report said the abolition of the five pct CPO export tax, the devaluation of the rupiah in September 1986 and higher international palm oil prices should lead to a modest increase in exports this year.     Exports are forecast to rise to 720,000 tonnes against 695,000 tonnes in 1986, the report added.  \n',veg-oil
'Italy\'s response to protests by U.S. Soybean producers about the proposed European Community (EC) tax on vegetable oils and fats had not been encouraging, American Soybean Association (ASA) board chairman George Fluegel said.     Fluegel, heading one of three U.S. Soybean producer delegations currently on a lobbying tour of EC countries, tolds in an interview meetings with officials from the Italian Foreign and Agricultural ministries had not yielded much to encourage hopes that Italy would vote against the proposed tax.     Fluegel said his delegation had received a negative response from the Italian Agriculture Ministry, but that the attitude of the Foreign Ministry appeared \"more realistic.\"     He said the proposed tax was discriminatory against U.S. Farmers since it was basically asking them to help finance the EC\'s Common Agricultural Policy (CAP) on oilseeds.     Asked which EC countries might be expected to vote against the proposed tax, he said, \"Realistically, from the information we\'re getting, it looks like the English, the Germans, hopefully the Netherlands and Denmark.\" His delegation also hoped to convince Belgium to vote against the issue, he added.     Asked what form he thought U.S. Retaliatory action might take in the event of the EC tax proposal being approved, Fluegel said industrial as well as agricultural products could be involved.     U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng warned the EC yesterday it would face serious retaliation if it enacted the tax.     ASA president-elect Wayne Bennett said yesterday in The Hague American soybean producers were confident the proposed tax would be rejected.  \n',veg-oil
'The government said it raised the export duty on processed palm oil (PPO) to 64.06 ringgit per tonne from 40.96 ringgit, effective from March 1.     Export duty on crude palm oil (CPO) was unchanged at 16.06 ringgit per tonne.     The gazetted price of PPO rose to 796.8604 ringgit per tonne from 719.8286. That of CPO remained at 617.8238 ringgit.     The export duty and gazetted price of palm kernel were left unchanged at 191.15 and 955.75 ringgit per tonne respectively.  \n',veg-oil
'Malaysian crude palm oil (cpo) production fell to an estimated 270,400 tonnes in February from an estimated 273,300 tonnes in January and 332,995 in February 1986, the Palm Oil Registration and Licensing Authority (PORLA) said.     Cpo stocks fell to an estimated 286,440 tonnes in February from 287,940 in January and 653,411 in February last year.     Processed palm oil stocks in February fell to an estimated 193,060 tonnes from 205,060 in January and 225,576 in February 1986.     The January and February figures are subject to revision.  \n',veg-oil
'Malaysian palm kernel output fell to an estimated 80,500 tonnes in February from a revised 83,231 (originally 83,700) in January and 98,393 in February 1986, the Palm Oil Registration and Licensing Authority said.     Palm kernel stocks dropped to an estimated 45,870 tonnes in February from a revised 55,693 (65,100) in January and 85,595 in February last year, it said.  \n',veg-oil
'The Mexican Secretariat of Commerce has told the U.S. that recent implementation of a 10 pct ad valorem tariff for fixed vegetable oils, fluid or solid, crude, refined or purified, was not targeted at sunflower oil, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     In its World Production and Trade Report, the department said the increase in tariffs on this category which includes sunflower, corn and rapeseed oils, was a reaction to importers using basket categories to avoid paying tariffs on specific high-tariff products.  \n',veg-oil
'Enough European Community (EC) states appear to be opposed to the proposals by the EC Commission for a 330 European currency unit (Ecu) a tonne tax on vegetable oils, fats and marine oils to block adoption by EC ministers, British Farm Minister Michael Jopling said.     He told a news conference held during a meeting here of EC agriculture ministers that Britain, West Germany, the Netherlands, Denmark, and Portugal were all against the tax.     Between them, these five countries had more than enough votes in the weighted voting system used in EC ministers\' meetings to block a decision, Jopling said.  \n',veg-oil
'Pakistan is likely to import 100,000 tonnes of refined, bleached and deodorised palm oil between April and June this year, vegetable oil dealers said.     They said the import would be financed by the Islamic Development Bank (IDB) which signed an agreement with Pakistan earlier this week in Jeddah, Saudi Arabia.     Pakistan had imported 600,000 tonnes of edible oil since the beginning of the current financial year last July, they added. The palm oil would come from Malaysia or Indonesia.  \n',veg-oil
'Pakistan will retender for 6,000 tonnes of refined bleached deodorised palm oil for second half March shipment tomorrow, after failing to take up offers today, palm oil traders said.  \n',veg-oil
'Pakistan will hold an import tender tomorrow for 6,000 tonnes of refined bleached deodorised palm oil for second half March shipments, traders said.  \n',veg-oil
'Pakistan will tender tomorrow for 12,000 tonnes of refined bleached deodorised palm olein tomorrow, split in two equal cargo lots for first and second half April shipments, traders said.     The tender will be financed with Islamic Development Bank credit.  \n',veg-oil
'Malaysian and Indonesian palm oil production is likely to drop sharply this year, due to lower yields, the Hamburg-based newsletter Oil World said.     The publication expects total Malaysian output during Jan/Sept 1987 to decline by eight pct to 3.05 mln tonnes. For East Malaysia, it put production during the period at 297,000 tonnes after 312,000 a year earlier and for West Malaysia 2.75 mln compared with just over 3.0 mln during Jan/Sept 1986.     It said new plantings had slowed markedly in both countries, but the effects of this will not be felt until 1988-90.     Above normal yields during recent years resulted in trees reacting to the stress by changing the sex ratio to more male inflorescences and/or aborting more female, Oil World said.     Yields per hectare are also likely to be adversely affected this year by insufficient rain up to 25 months ago. This could especially affect trees in West Malaysia during April/June, while in East Malaysia the impact will be in February/April and July/Dec, and in Indonesia July/Sept.     Last year\'s cut in fertilizer use will hit this year\'s yields and bigger effects are expected within the next three years, Oil World said without elaborating.     Opening stocks in West Malaysia at the start of this year were put at only 565,000 tonnes compared with 914,000 in January 1986, Oil World said.     West Malaysian net exports are therefore expected to drop 500,000 tonnes to 2.54 mln during Jan/Sept, while those of East Malaysia are likely to decline by 10 pct to 280,000 tonnes.     Indonesian palm oil production is forecast to fall about eight pct during Jan/May, but to rise from June on. Overall Indonesian output during Jan/Sept is forecast to rise three pct to 933,000 tonnes. Indonesian stocks as of April 1, however, are put at only 65,000 tonnes compared with 160,000 a year ago.     Indonesian export commitments and domestic requirements are both running at high levels, Oil World said, and it expects the country\'s imports to reach a record 110,000 tonnes during Jan/Sept. The bulk of this will arrive during Feb/May, ahead of the April elections and the religious Ramadan festival throughout May, it said.     Indonesian net exports, therefore, may fall by 29 pct to 350,000 tonnes, Oil World said. The possibility that recent Indonesian palm oil purchases will not actually enter the country but be transshipped to other countries to fulfill Indonesia\'s export orders cannot be ruled out, it said.  \n',veg-oil
'Saudi Arabia bought 5,000 tonnes of refined bleached deodorised palm olein at its import tender yesterday for April 16/25 shipment at 353 dlrs per tonne cost and freight Jeddah, traders said.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng warned the European Community yesterday it will face serious retaliation if it enacts a new tax on products such as U.S. Soybean oil.     Speaking at a news conference before a scheduled speech, Lyng said he did not think the tax, which is still in the discussion stage, would be approved.     He said the U.S. Would take serious retaliatory action because if implemented, the tax would have a considerable impact on U.S. Farmers.  \n',veg-oil
'The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) switched five mln dlrs in credit guarantees to Ecuador to provide for more sales of U.S. vegetable oil, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The credit guarantees were previously earmarked for sales of U.S. cotton, feedgrains and wheat.     The action reduces the guarantee lines previously authorized for sales of cotton from 1.5 mln dlrs to 500,000 dlrs, for feedgrains from four mln to two mln and for wheat from 45 mln dlrs to 43 mln dlrs and increases coverage for vegetable oil sales from two mln to seven mln dlrs, the department said.  \n',veg-oil
'American soybean producers and processors are hoping the proposed EC tax on vegetable oils and fats will not be imposed, but say the U.S. Is prepared to retaliate if it is introduced.     Wayne Bennett, the American Soybean Association\'s first vice president, told a news conference the U.S. Administration would not hesitate to retaliate, but both producers and processors were trying to solve the issue through negotiation.     U.S. Secretary of Agriculture Richard Lyng said in a letter to EC officials that U.S. Retaliatory measures would cover more than agricultural products if the tax was imposed, Bennett said.     The ASA and National Soybean Processors Association (NSPA) delegations will meet top West German government officials today and tomorrow to lobby for support.     Bennett said West Germany, Britain, the Netherlands, Denmark and Portugal oppose the tax, but Italy and Belgium seem to have taken a hardline view on the issue.     \"Europeans in favour of the tax say it would be to their advantage economically, but that is not correct because we would hit back,\" NSPA chairman Jack Reed said.     This step would be very expensive for all and no one would emerge as a winner if the tax were introduced, he said.     Reed pointed out the U.S. Administration and the soybean industry view the EC proposal as violating the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.     The proposed tax also violates the zero duty bindings agreed between the EC and U.S. In 1962, he said.     Under the zero duty bindings pact U.S. Soybeans and products can be exported to the Community duty-free.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. Agriculture Department proposals to offer 260,000 tonnes of subsidized vegetable oil to four countries are still under consideration by an interagency trade policy group, a USDA official close to the group said.     The official, who asked not to be identified, dismissed a report circulating in markets today that the interagency trade policy review group had rejected the proposals.     Under the proposals, USDA would offer vegetable oil under the export enhancement program, EEP, to four countries, including 80,000 tonnes to Turkey and 60,000 tonnes to Algeria, Morocco and Tunisia, industry sources said.     The proposals \"are still under review\" by the interagency working group, the USDA official said.  \n',veg-oil
'The U.S. Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) has authorized an additional 10.0 mln dlrs in credit guarantees to cover sales of U.S. vegetable oils to North Yemen, the U.S. Agriculture Department said.     The department also said at the request of the North Yemen Government five mln dlrs in credit guarantees previously earmarked for sales of wheat have been switched to cover sales of mixed poultry feed.     The actions increase the value of credit guarantees for vegetable oil for the current fiscal year to 38 mln dlrs, reduce the guarantee coverage for sales of wheat to eight mln dlrs and increase the coverage for sales of mixed poultry feed to 10 mln dlrs.     All exports must be completed by September 30, 1987.  \n',veg-oil
'A meeting among government agencies today reaffirmed the strong opposition of the United States to a proposed new tax on vegetable oils and fats in the European Community, U.S. trade officials said.     Representatives of the major government agencies agreed at a trade policy review group meeting, which includes officials of the deputy secretary rank, to continue diplomatic pressure on EC member states.     \"We (all agencies) are together on this,\" said one U.S. trade official.     One source said the U.S. would continue to make clear to member states and to the EC commission that if Brussels proceeds with the vegetable oils tax \"there will be a great cost.\"     U.S. officials said no formal list of European products on which the U.S. might retaliate, has yet been drawn up.     \"I don\'t think we\'re at that point yet,\" said one trade official, adding that the EC has only begun deliberations on its farm price package.     Suzanne Early, assistant trade representative, tolds the interagency meeting was to discuss U.S. strategy on the vegetable oils issue. Asked about retaliation, she said \"sometimes its better not to be specific.\"     U.S. trade representative Clayton Yeutter Monday warned another major transatlantic trade row will develop if the EC proceeds with the vegetable oils tax.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. scientists said some tropical vegetable oils can be hazardous to consumers whose health is at risk because of high levels of saturated fat, lending weight to a campaign by the American Soybean Association (ASA) for labelling changes.     The scientists appeared to support an ASA charge, denied by Malaysian palm growers, that imported coconut, palm and palm kernel oils contain high levels of saturated fat and thus raise blood cholesterol and the risk of heart disease.     In a petition filed in January, the ASA asked the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to require palm, palm kernel and coconut oils to be identified as saturated fats on food manufacturers\' labels.     The FDA responded to the ASA in a letter saying it would consider the petition as a comment to a proposed rule dealing with cholesterol and fatty acid labelling of foods.     Malaysian oil palm growers have said the charges by the ASA that palm oil consumption increases blood cholesterol and contributes to heart disease are untrue.     But Steve Chang, Professor of Food Science at Rutgers University, said, \"Palm oil is definitely not good for human health because it has a high content of saturated fatty acid.\"     He added that the higher the fatty acid, the greater the blood cholesterol level. \"It has been well established that high cholesterol levels will have a higher level of heart disease,\" he said.     A Malaysian Oil Palm Growers Council official, Borge Bek-Nielsen, has said studies have shown that palm oil is cholesterol-free, low in saturated fats, has anti-cancer properties and prevents blood clotting and blocking of arteries in humans.     Bek-Nielsen said Americans consume more saturated fats daily through food like butter, bacon, ham and beef than from palm oil, which, he added is rich in vitamins A and E.     David Kritchevsky, Associate Director of the Wistar Institute in Philadelphia, appeared to take the ASA view on labelling. \"What people really have to learn is to read labels,\" said Kritchevsky. \"The more a consumer knows, the more likely he will make an intelligent choice.\"     The U.S. scientists said they had no doubt imported palm, palm kernel and coconut oils contain high saturated fat levels.     Kritchevsky, a specialist in nutrition, said, \"More saturated fat would raise cholesterol levels...So, from that point of view it\'s a health risk. High cholesterol levels in the blood are a risk factor for heart disease.\"     Susanne Harris, deputy assistant secretary of the U.S. Agriculture Department\'s Food and Consumer Services Division, said the health risk among consumers of vegetable oils with high saturated fat levels was highest among those who have heart disease.     The scientists said more than 50 pct of the fatty acid content of the tropical oils was saturated, whereas less than 20 pct of the fatty acid content of soybean oil was saturated.     David Ericksen, director of ASA\'s technical services, said U.S. soybean producers could regain about one-half of the 273 mln dlrs in sales lost to imported tropical oils if consumers were aware the vegetable oils were high in saturated fat.     Imported tropical oils displace 171 mln bushels of U.S. soybean sales in the U.S. market, ASA estimates.     U.S. imports of coconut oil during January totaled 82.9 mln lbs compared with 48.0 mln lbs in December and 106.5 mln a year earlier, according to Commerce Department figures.     Imports of palm oil totaled 44.0 mln lbs compared with 51.3 mln lbs in December and 85.2 mln a year earlier.  \n',veg-oil
'The Senate voted to condemn the proposed European common market tax on vegetable and fish fats and oils and said it would result in retaliation.     The non binding Senate resolution, a sense of Senate sentiment, was approved on a 99 to 0 vote.     \"The administration should communciate to the European Community the message that the United States will view the establishment of such a tax as inconsistent with the European Community\'s obligations under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade that will result in the adoption of strong and immediate countermeasures,\" the resolution stated.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. factories used 1,053.0 mln lbs of various vegetable oils in the production of edible products during February, the Census Bureau reported.     That compared with a revised usage of 1,075.0 mln lbs in January and 1,084.2 mln lbs in February, 1986.     February production of selected products included the following, with comparisons, in mln lbs --                  Feb 87    Jan 87    Feb 86      Baking or    Frying Fats -- 355.5    387.6-r   427.4  Soybean Salad and    Cooking Oil -- 388.1    373.3-r   351.7  R-Revised.      Production, continued (in mln lbs --)                    Feb 87    Jan 87   Feb 86  Other Salad and     Cooking Oils   111.2    111.4-r   114.3        Margarine   218.8    216.9-r   214.4        Glycerine --            Crude    21.5     25.9      31.3          Refined    23.5     23.6-r    25.4      Fatty Acids   102.9    112.5-r   113.1        Meat/Meal          Tankage   410.2    458.2-r   446.2  R-Revised.^M \n',veg-oil
'Reporting members of the National Soybean Processors Association (NSPA) crushed 21,782,929 bushels of soybeans in the week ended Feb 25 compared with 22,345,718 bushels in the previous week and 16,568,000 in the year-ago week, the association said.     It said total crushing capacity for members was 25,873,904 bushels vs 25,873,904 last week and 25,459,238 bushels last year.     NSPA also said U.S. soybean meal exports in the week were 117,866 tonnes vs 121,168 tonnes a week ago and compared with 84,250 tonnes in the year-ago week.     NSPA said the figures include only NSPA member firms.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. Agriculture Undersecretary Daniel Amstutz said he was confident that a European Community, EC, proposal to tax vegetable and marine oils and fats would not be approved by the Community.     Asked bys if he was confident the plan eventually would be defeated, Amstutz said, \"Yes, I am, but I also know that things like this take constant vigilance.\"     The USDA official said the EC Council of Ministers held an ad hoc meeting yesterday.     Commenting on that meeting, he said, \"So far, so good.\"     Yesterday British Farm Minister Michael Jopling said enough EC states appeared to be opposed to the proposals by the commission for a 330 European Currency Unit a tonne tax on vegetable oils, fats and marine oils for the moves to be defeated.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. trade representative Clayton Yeutter today said that if the European Community\'s Council of Ministers approves a tax on vegetable oils and fats, another major transatlantic trade row will erupt over agriculture.     In a statement issued by the trade representative\'s office following a speech to the American Soybean Association\'s board of directors, Yeutter said the proposed tax would have a severe impact on American soybean farmers, who export some 2.4 billion dlrs in soybeans and products annually to the EC.     \"This is an unacceptable situation for us and its (vegetable oils tax) enactment would leave us no choice but to vigorously protect our trade rights and defend our access to the European market,\" Yeutter said.     Yeutter said the proposed vegetable oils tax would violate EC obligations under the GATT.     He said the effect of the tax would be to double the price of soyoil produced from imported soybeans, making margarine made from soyoil more expensive than tallow-based margarine, and closer in price to expensive European butter.     \"I am astonished that the EC commission would propose such a provocative measure so soon after we successfully resolved the agricultural dispute over the enlargement of the EC to include Spain and Portugal,\" Yeutter said.     \"It serves no purpose to embark on another confrontational course before the recent wounds have healed and as we are beginning to make progress on the Uruaguay round (of global trade talks),\" he said.  \n',veg-oil
'U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said the United States will retaliate if the European Community adopts a proposed tax on vegetable oils, but he did not say what EC products would be singled-out for reprisal.     Speaking to the National Grain and Feed Association (NGFA) convention here, Yeutter said he is \"cautiously optimistic\" the controversial oils tax proposal will be rejected by the EC Council of Ministers.     Yeutter said the proposed tax is a \"flagrant violation of the spirit of GATT\" because it would imperil the zero binding duty on U.S. exports of soybeans to Europe.     He said the Reagan administration has yet to decide on a retaliation list. The administration would not reveal a retaliation list unless the EC approved the proposal, he said.  \n',veg-oil
